!<arch>
book1/          1351528222  47990 11180 100660  888940    `
INTRODUCTION

Daudet once remarked that England was the last of foreign countries to
welcome his novels, and that he was surprised at the fact, since for
him, as for the typical Englishman, the intimacy of home life had great
significance. However long he may have taken to win Anglo-Saxon hearts,
there is no question that he finally won them more completely than any
other contemporary French novelist was able to do, and that when but
a few years since the news came that death had released him from his
sufferings, thousands of men and women, both in England and in America,
felt that they had lost a real friend. Just at the present moment one
does not hear or read a great deal about him, but a similar lull in
criticism follows the deaths of most celebrities of whatever kind, and
it can scarcely be doubted that Daudet is every day making new friends,
while it is as sure as anything of the sort can be that it is death, not
estrangement, that has lessened the number of his former admirers.

"Admirers"? The word is much too cold. "Lovers" would serve better, but
is perhaps too expansive to be used of a self-contained race. "Friends"
is more appropriate because heartier, for hearty the relations between
Daudet and his Anglo-Saxon readers certainly were. Whether it was that
some of us saw in him that hitherto unguessed-at phenomenon, a French
Dickens--not an imitator, indeed, but a kindred spirit--or that others
found in him a refined, a volatilized "Mark Twain," with a flavour of
Cervantes, or that still others welcomed him as a writer of naturalistic
fiction that did not revolt, or finally that most of us enjoyed him
because whatever he wrote was as steeped in the radiance of his own
exquisitely charming personality as a picture of Corot's is in the light
of the sun itself--whatever may have been the reason, Alphonse Daudet
could count before he died thousands of genuine friends in England and
America who were loyal to him in spite of the declining power shown in
his latest books, in spite even of the strain which _Sapho_ laid upon
their Puritan consciences.

It is likely that a majority of these friends were won by the two great
Tartarin books and by the chief novels, _Fromont_, _Jack_, _The Nabob_,
_Kings in Exile_, and _Numa_, aided by the artistic sketches and short
stories contained in _Letters from my Mill_ and _Monday Tales (Contes
du Lundi)_. The strong but overwrought _Evangelist_, _Sapho_--which of
course belongs with the chief novels from the Continental but not from
the insular point of view--and the books of Daudet's decadence, _The
Immortal_, and the rest, cost him few friendships, but scarcely gained
him many. His delightful essays in autobiography, whether in fiction,
_Le Petit Chose (Little What's-his-Name)_, or in _Thirty Years of Paris_
and _Souvenirs of a Man of Letters_, doubtless sealed more friendships
than they made; but they can be almost as safely recommended as the more
notable novels to readers who have yet to make Daudet's acquaintance.

For the man and his career are as unaffectedly charming as his style,
and more of a piece than his elaborate works of fiction. A sunny
Provencal childhood is clouded by family misfortunes; then comes a year
of wretched slavery as usher in a provincial school; then the inevitable
journey to Paris with a brain full of verses and dreams, and the
beginning of a life of Bohemian nonchalance, to which we Anglo-Saxons
have little that is comparable outside the career of Oliver Goldsmith.
But poor Goldsmith had his pride wounded by the editorial tyranny of a
Mrs. Griffiths. Daudet, by a merely pretty poem about a youth and
maiden making love under a plum-tree, won the protection of the Empress
Eugenie, and through her of the Duke de Morny, the prop of the Second
Empire. His life now reads like a fairy-tale inserted by some jocular
elf into that book of dolors entitled _The Lives of Men of Genius_.
A _protege_ of a potentate not usually lavish of his favours, and a
valetudinarian, he is allowed to flit to Algiers and Corsica, to enjoy
his beloved Provence in company with Mistral, to write for the theatres,
and to continue to play the Bohemian. Then the death of Morny seems to
turn the idyl into a tragedy, but only for a moment. Daudet's delicate,
nervous beauty made his friend Zola think of an Arabian horse, but
the poet had also the spirit of such a high-bred steed. Years of
conscientious literary labour followed, cheered by marriage with a woman
of genius capable of supplementing him in his weakest points, and then
the war with Prussia and its attendant horrors gave him the larger and
deeper view of life and the intensified patriotism--in short, the final
stimulus he needed. From the date of his first great success--_Fromont,
Jr., and Risler, Sr._--glory and wealth flowed in upon him, while
envy scarcely touched him, so unspoiled was he and so continuously and
eminently lovable. One seemed to see in his career a reflection of his
luminous nature, a revised myth of the golden touch, a new version of
the fairy-tale of the fair mouth dropping pearls. Then, as though grown
weary of the idyllic romance she was composing, Fortune donned the
tragic robes of Nemesis. Years of pain followed, which could not abate
the spirits or disturb the geniality of the sufferer, but did somewhat
abate the power and disturb the serenity of his work. Then came the
inevitable end of all life dramas, whether comic or romantic or tragic,
and friends who had known him stood round his grave and listened sadly
to the touching words in which Emile Zola expressed not merely his own
grief but that of many thousands throughout the civilized world. Here
was a life more winsome, more appealing, more complete than any creation
of the genius of the man that lived it--a life which, whether we know it
in detail or not, explains in part the fascination Daudet exerts upon us
and the conviction we cherish that, whatever ravages time may make among
his books, the memory of their writer will not fade from the hearts of
men. Many Frenchmen have conquered the world's mind by the power or
the subtlety of their genius; few have won its heart through the
catholicity, the broad sympathy of their genius. Daudet is one of these
few; indeed, he is almost if not quite the only European writer who has
of late achieved such a triumph, for Tolstoi has stern critics as well
as steadfast devotees, and has won most of his disciples as moralist and
reformer. But we must turn from Daudet the man to Daudet the author of
_The Nabob_ and other memorable novels.

If this were a general essay and not an introduction, it would be proper
to say something of Daudet's early attempts as poet and dramatist. Here
it need only be remarked that it is almost a commonplace to insist that
even in his later novels he never entirely ceased to see the outer world
with the eyes of a poet, to delight in colour and movement, to seize
every opportunity to indulge in vivid description couched in a style
more swift and brilliant than normal prose aspires to. This bent
for description, together with the tendency to episodic rather than
sustained composition and the comparative weakness of his character
drawing--features of his work shortly to be discussed--partly explains
his failure, save in one or two instances, to score a real triumph
with his plays, but does not explain his singular lack of sympathy with
actors. Nor was he able to win great success with his first book
of importance, _Le Petit Chose_, delightful as that mixture of
autobiography and romance must prove to any sympathetic reader. He was
essentially a romanticist and a poet cast upon an age of naturalism
and prose, and he needed years of training and such experience as the
Prussian invasion gave him to adjust himself to his life-work. Such
adjustment was not needed for _Tartarin de Tarascon_, begun shortly
after _Le Petit Chose_, because subtle humour of the kind lavished in
that inimitable creation and in its sequels, while implying observation,
does not necessarily imply any marked departure from the romantic and
poetic points of view.

The training Daudet required for his novels he got from the sketches
and short stories that occupied him during the late sixties and early
seventies. Here again little in the way of comment need be given, and
that little can express the general verdict that the art displayed
in these miniature productions is not far short of perfect. The two
principal collections, _Lettres de mon Moulin_ and _Contes du Lundi_,
together with _Artists' Wives (Les Femmes d'Artistes)_ and parts at
least of _Robert Helmont_, would almost of themselves suffice to put
Daudet high in the ranks of the writers who charm without leaving upon
one's mind the slightest suspicion that they are weak. It is true
that Daudet's stories do not attain the tremendous impressiveness that
Balzac's occasionally do, as, for example, in _La Grande Breteche_,
nor has his clear-cut art the almost disconcerting firmness, the
surgeon-like quality of Maupassant's; but the author of the ironical
_Elixir of Father Gaucher_ and of the pathetic _Last Class_, to name no
others, could certainly claim with Musset that his glass was his own,
and had no reason to concede its smallness.

As we have seen, the production of _Fromont jeune et Risler aine_
marked the beginning of Daudet's more than twenty years of successful
novel-writing. His first elaborate study of Parisian life, while it
indicated no advance of the art of fiction, deserved its popularity
because, in spite of the many criticisms to which it was open, it was a
thoroughly readable and often a moving book. One character, Delobelle,
the played-out actor who is still a hero to his pathetic wife and
daughter, was constructed on effective lines--was a personage worthy of
Dickens. The vile heroine, Sidonie, was bad enough to excite disgusted
interest, but, as Mr. Henry James pointed out later, she was not
effective to the extent her creator doubtless hoped. She paled beside
Valerie Marneffe, though, to be sure, Daudet knew better than to attempt
to depict any such queen of vice. Yet, after all, it is mainly the
compelling power of vile heroines that makes them tolerable, and neither
Sidonie nor the web of intrigue she wove can fairly be said to be
characterized by extraordinary strength. But the public was and is
interested greatly by the novel, and Daudet deserved the fame and money
it brought him. His next book, _Jack_, was not so popular. Still, it
showed artistic improvement, although, as in its predecessor, that bias
towards the sentimental, which was to be Daudet's besetting weakness,
was too plainly visible. Its author took to his heart a book which the
general reader found too long and perhaps overpathetic. Some of us,
while recognising its faults, will share in part Daudet's predilection
for it--not so much because of the strong and early study made of the
artisan class, or of the mordantly satirical exposure of D'Argenton
and his literary "dead-beats" (_rates_), or of any other of the special
features of a story that is crowded with them, as because the ill-fated
hero, the product of genuine emotions on Daudet's part, excites cognate
and equally genuine emotions in us. We cannot watch the throbbing
engines of a great steamship without seeing Jack at work among them. But
the fine, pathetic _Jack_ brings us to the finer, more pathetic _Nabob_.

Whether _The Nabob_ is Daudet's greatest novel is a question that may be
postponed, but it may be safely asserted that there are good reasons why
it should have been chosen to represent Daudet in the present series.
It has been immensely popular, and thus does not illustrate merely the
taste of an inner circle of its author's admirers. It is not so subtle
a study of character as _Numa Roumestan_, nor is it a drama the scene of
which is set somewhat in a corner removed from the world's scrutiny and
full comprehension, as is more or less the case with _Kings in Exile_.
It is comparatively unamenable to the moral, or, if one will, the
puritanical, objections so naturally brought against _Sapho_. It
obviously represents Daudet's powers better than any novel written after
his health was permanently wrecked, and as obviously represents fiction
more adequately than either of the Tartarin masterpieces, which belong
rather to the literature of humour. Besides, it is probably the most
broadly effective of all Daudet's novels; it is fuller of striking
scenes; and as a picture of life in the picturesque Second Empire it is
of unique importance.

Perhaps to many readers this last reason will seem the best of all.
However much we may moralize about its baseness and hollowness, whether
with the Hugo of _Les Chatiments_ we scorn and vituperate its charlatan
head or pity him profoundly as we see him ill and helpless in Zola's
_Debacle_, most of us, if we are candid, will confess that the Second
Empire, especially the Paris of Morny and Hausmann, of cynicism and
splendour, of frivolity and chicane, of servile obsequiousness and
haughty pretension, the France and the Paris that drew to themselves the
eyes of all Europe and particularly the eyes of the watchful Bismarck,
have for us a fascination almost as great as they had for the gay and
audacious men and women who in them courted fortune and chased pleasure
from the morrow of the _Coup d'Etat_ to the eve of Sedan. A nearly
equal fascination is exerted upon us by a book which is the best sort of
historical novel, since it is the product of its author's observation,
not of his reading--a story that sets vividly before us the political
corruption, the financial recklessness, the social turmoil, the public
ostentation, the private squalor, that led to the downfall of an empire
and almost to that of a people.

Daudet drew on his experiences, and on the notes he was always
accumulating, more strenuously than he should have done. He assures
us that he laboured over _The Nabob_ for eight months, mainly in his
bed-room, sometimes working eighteen consecutive hours, often waking
from restless sleep with a sentence on his lips. Yet, such is the irony
of literary history, the novel is loosely enough put together to have
been written, one might suppose, in bursts of inspiration or else more
or less methodically--almost with the intention, as Mr. James has noted,
of including every striking phase of Parisian life. For it is a series
of brilliant, effective episodes and scenes, not a closely knit drama.
Jenkins's visit to Monpavon at his toilet, the _dejeuner_ at the
Nabob's, the inspection of the OEuvre de Bethleem--which would have
delighted Dickens--the collapse of the fetes of the Bey, the Nabob's
thrashing Moessard, the death of Mora, Felicia's attempt to escape the
funeral of the duke, the interview between the Nabob and Hemerlingue,
the baiting in the Chamber, the suicide of that supreme man of tone,
Monpavon, the Nabob's apoplectic seizure in the theatre--these and many
other scenes and episodes, together with descriptions and touches, stand
out in our memories more distinctly and impressively than the characters
do--perhaps more so than does the central motive, the outrageous
exploitation of the naive hero. For from the beginning of his career to
the end Daudet's eye, like that of a genuine but not supereminent poet,
was chiefly attracted by colour, movement, effective pose--in other
words, by the surfaces of things. One may almost say that he was more of
a landscape engineer than of an architect and builder, although one must
at once add that he could and did erect solid structures. But the
reader at least helps greatly to lay the foundations, for, to drop the
metaphor, Daudet relied largely on suggestion, contenting himself with
the belief that a capable imagination could fill up the gaps he left
in plot and character analysis. Thus, for example, he indicated and
suggested rather than detailed the way in which Hemerlingue finally
triumphed over the Nabob, Jansoulet. To use another figure, he drew the
spider, the fly, and a few strands of the web. The Balzac whose bust
looked satirically down upon the two adventurers in Pere la Chaise would
probably have given us the whole web. This is not quite to say that
Daudet is plausible, Balzac inevitable; but rather that we stroll
with the former master and follow submissively in the footsteps of the
latter. Yet a caveat is needed, for the intense interest we take in the
characters of a novel like _The Nabob_ scarcely suggests strolling.

For although Daudet, in spite of his abounding sympathy, which is one
reason of his great attractiveness, cannot fairly be said to be a great
character creator, he had sufficient flexibility and force of genius to
set in action interesting personages. Part of the early success of _The
Nabob_ was due to this fact, although the brilliant description of the
Second Empire and the introduction of exotic elements, the Tunisian and
Corsican episodes and characters, counted, probably, for not a little.
Readers insisted upon seeing in the book this person and that more or
less thinly disguised. The Irish adventurer-physician, Jenkins, was
supposed to be modelled upon a popular Dr. Olliffe; the arsenic pills
were derived from another source, as was also the goat's-milk hospital
for infants. Felicia Ruys was thought by some to be Sarah Bernhardt,
and originals were easily provided for Monpavon and the other leading
figures. But Daudet confessed to only two important originals, and if
one does not take an author's word in such matters one soon finds one's
self in a maze of conjectures and contradictions.

The two characters drawn from life in a special sense--for Daudet, like
most other writers of fiction, had human life in general constantly
before him--are Jansoulet and Mora, precisely the most effective
personages in the book, and scarcely surpassed in the whole range of
Daudet's fiction. The Nabob was Francois Bravay, who rose from poverty
to wealth by devious transactions in the Orient, and came to grief in
Paris, much as Jansoulet did. He survived the Empire, and his relatives
are said to have been incensed at the treatment given him in the novel,
an attitude on their part which is explicable but scarcely justifiable,
since Daudet's sympathy for his hero could not well have been greater,
and since the adventurer had already attained a notoriety that was not
likely to be completely forgotten. Whether Daudet was as much at liberty
to make free with the character of his benefactor Morny is another
matter. He himself thought that he was, and he was a man of delicate
sensitiveness. Probably he was right in claiming that the natural son
of Queen Hortense, the intrepid soldier, the author of the _Coup
d'Etat_ that set his weaker half-brother on the throne, the dandy, the
libertine, the leader of fashion, the cynical statesman--in short, the
"Richelieu-Brummel" who drew the eyes of all Europe upon himself,
would not have been in the least disconcerted could he have known that
thirteen years after his death the public would be discussing him as the
prototype of the Mora of his young _protege's_ masterpiece. In fact,
it is easy to agree with those critics who think that Daudet's kindly
nature caused him to soften many features of Morny's unlovely character.
Mora does not, indeed, win our love or our esteem, but we confess him to
have been in every respect an exceptional man, and there is not a page
in which he appears that is not intensely interesting. He must be an
unimpressionable reader who soon forgets the death-room scenes, the
destruction of the compromising letters, the spectacular funeral.

Of the other characters there is little space to speak here. Nearly all
have their good points, as might be expected of the creator of his two
fellow Provencals, Numa and Tartarin, the latter being probably the
only really cosmopolitan figure in recent literature; but some, like the
Hemerlingues, verge upon mere sketches; others, like Jansoulet's obese
wife, upon caricatures. The old mother is excellently done, however, and
Monpavon, especially in his suicide, is nothing short of a triumph of
art. It is the more or less romantic or sentimental personages that give
the critic most qualms. Daudet seems to have introduced them--De Gery,
the Joyeuse family, and the rest--as a concession to popular taste, and
on this score was probably justified. A fair case may also be made
out for the use of idyllic scenes as a foil to the tragical, for
the Shakespearian critics have no monopoly of the overworked plea,
"justification by contrast." Nor could a French analogue of Dickens
easily resist the temptation to give us a fatuous Passajon, an
ebullient Pere Joyeuse--who seems to have been partly modelled on a
real person--an exemplary "Bonne Maman," a struggling but eventually
triumphant Andre Maranne. The home-lover Daudet also felt the necessity
of showing that Paris could set the Joyeuse household, sunny in its
poverty, over against the stately elegance of the Mora palace, the walls
of which listened at one and the same moment to the music of a ball and
the death-rattle of its haughty owner. But when all is said, it remains
clear that _The Nabob_ is open to the charge that applies to all the
greater novels save _Sapho_--the charge that it exhibits a somewhat
inharmonious mixture of sentimentalism and naturalism. Against this
charge, which perhaps applies most forcibly to that otherwise almost
perfect work of art, _Numa Roumestan_, Daudet defended himself,
but rather weakly. Nor does Mr. Henry James, who in the case of the
last-named novel comes to his help against Zola, much mend matters. But
the fault, if fault it be, is venial, especially in a friend, though not
strictly a coworker, of Zola's.

Naturally an elaborate novel like _The Nabob_ lends itself indefinitely
to minute comment, but we must be sparing of it. Still it is worth while
to call attention to the skill with which, from the opening page, the
interest of the reader is controlled; indeed, to the remarkable art
displayed in the whole first chapter devoted to the morning rounds of
Dr. Jenkins. The note of romantic extravagance is on the whole avoided
until the Nabob brings out his check-book, when the money flies with
a speed for which, one fancies, Daudet could have found little
justification this side of Timon of Athens. In the description of the
_Caisse Territoriale_ given by Passajon this note is relieved by a
delicate irony, but seems still somewhat incongruous. One turns more
willingly to the description of Jansoulet's sitting down to play
_ecarte_ with Mora, to the story of how he gorged himself with the
duke's putative mushrooms, and to similar episodes and touches. In the
matter of effective and ironically turned situations few novels
can compare with this; indeed, it almost seems as if Daudet made an
inordinate use of them. Think of the poor Nabob reading the announcement
of the cross bestowed on Jenkins, and of the absurd populace mistaking
him for the ungrateful Bey! As for great dramatic moments, there is at
least one that no reader can forget--the moment when Jansoulet, in the
midst of the speech on which his fate depends, catches sight of his old
mother's face and forbears to clear himself of calumny at the expense of
his wretched elder brother. The situation may not bear close analysis,
but who wishes to analyze? Or who, indeed, wishes to indulge in further
comment after the scene has risen to his mind?

_The Nabob_ was followed by _Kings in Exile_; then came _Numa Roumestan_
and _The Evangelist_; then, on the eve of Daudet's breakdown, _Sapho_;
and the greatest of his humorous masterpieces, _Tartarin in the Alps_.
It is not yet certain what rank is to be given to these books. Perhaps
the adventures of the mountain-climbing hero of the Midi, combined
with his previous exploits as a slayer of lions--his experiences as a
colonist in _Port-Tarascon_ need scarcely be considered--will prove, in
the lapse of years, to be the most solid foundation of that fame which
even envious Time will hardly begrudge Daudet. As for _Kings in Exile_,
it is difficult to see how even the art with which the tragedy of Queen
Frederique's life is unfolded or the growing power of characterization
displayed in her, in the loyal Merault, in the facile, decadent
Christian, can make up for the lack of broadly human appeal in the
general subject-matter of a book which was so sympathetically written
as to appeal alike to Legitimists and to Republicans. Good as _Kings
in Exile_ is, it is not so effective a book as _The Nabob_, nor such
a unique and marvellous work of art as _Numa Roumestan_, due allowance
being made for the intrusion of sentimentality into the latter. Daudet
thought _Numa_ the "least incomplete" of his works; it is certainly
inclusive enough, since some critics are struck by the tragic relations
subsisting between the virtuous discreet Northern wife and the peccable,
expansive Southern husband, while others see in the latter the hero of
a comedy of manners almost worthy of Moliere. If _Numa_ represents the
highest achievement of Daudet in dramatic fiction or else in the art
of characterization, _The Evangelist_ proved that his genius was not
at home in those fields. Instead of marking an ordered advance, this
overwrought study of Protestant bigotry marked not so much a halt, or a
retreat, as a violent swerving to one side. Yet in a way this swerving
into the devious orbit of the novel of intense purpose helped Daudet in
his progress towards naturalism, and imparted something of stability to
his methods of work. _Sapho_, which appeared next, was the first of his
novels that left little to be desired in the way of artistic unity and
cumulative power. If such a study of the _femme collante_, the mistress
who cannot be shaken off--or rather of the man whom she ruins, for it
is Gaussin, not Sapho, that is the main subject of Daudet's acute
analysis--was to be written at all, it had to be written with a resolute
art such as Daudet applied to it. It is not then surprising that
Continental critics rank _Sapho_ as its author's greatest production; it
is more in order to wonder what Daudet might not have done in this line
of work had his health remained unimpaired. The later novels, in which
he came near to joining forces with the naturalists and hence to losing
some of the vogue his eclecticism gave him, need not detain us.

And now, in conclusion, how can we best characterize briefly this
fascinating, versatile genius, the most delightful humorist of his time,
one of the most artistic story-tellers, one of the greatest novelists?
It is impossible to classify him, for he was more than a humorist, he
nearly outgrew romance, he never accepted unreservedly the canons of
naturalism. He obviously does not belong to the small class of the
supreme writers of fiction, for he has no consistent or at least
profound philosophy of life. He is a true poet, yet for the main he has
expressed himself not in verse, but in prose, and in a form of prose
that is being so extensively cultivated that its permanence is daily
brought more and more into question. What is Daudet, and what will he
be to posterity? Some admirers have already answered the first question,
perhaps as satisfactorily as it can be answered, by saying, "Daudet is
simply Daudet." As for the second question, a whole school of critics is
inclined to answer it and all similar queries with the curt statement,
"That concerns posterity, not us." If, however, less evasive answers are
insisted upon, let the following utterance, which might conceivably be
more indefinite and oracular, suffice: Alphonse Daudet is one of
those rare writers who combine greatness with a charm so intimate and
appealing that some of us would not, if we could, have their greatness
increased.

W. P. TRENT.




BIOGRAPHICAL NOTE

Alphonse Daudet was born at Nimes on the 13th of May, 1840. He was the
younger son of a rich and enthusiastically Royalist silk-manufacturer
of that town, the novelist, Ernest Daudet (born 1837), being his elder
brother. In their childhood, the father, Vincent Daudet, suffered
reverses, and had to settle with his family, in reduced circumstances,
at Lyons. Alphonse, in 1856, obtained a post as usher in a school at
Alais, in the Gard, where he was extremely unhappy. All these painful
early experiences are told very pathetically in "Le Petit Chose." On
the 1st of November, 1857, Alphonse fled from the horrors of his life at
Alais, and joined his brother Ernest, who had just secured a post in the
service of the Duc de Morny in Paris. Alphonse determined to live by
his pen, and presently obtained introductions to the "Figaro." His early
volumes of verse, "Les Amoureuses" of 1858 and "La Double Conversion"
of 1861, attracted some favourable notice. In this latter year his
difficulties ceased, for he had the good fortune to become one of the
secretaries of the Duc de Morny, a post which he held for four years,
until the popularity of his writings rendered him independent. To the
generosity of his patron, moreover, he owed the opportunity of visiting
Italy and the East. His first novel, "Le Chaperon Rouge," 1863, was not
very remarkable, and Daudet turned to the stage. His principal dramatic
efforts of this period were "Le Dernier Idole," 1862, and "L'OEillet
Blanc," 1865. Alphonse Daudet's earliest important work, however, was
"Le Petit Chose," 1868, a very pathetic autobiography of the first
eighteen years of his life, over which he cast a thin veil of romance.
After the death of the Duc de Morny, Daudet retired to Provence, leasing
a ruined mill at Fortvielle, in the valley of the Rhone; from this
romantic solitude, among the pines and green oaks, he sent forth those
exquisite studies of Provencal life, the "Lettres de mon Moulin." After
the war, Daudet reappeared in Paris, greatly strengthened and ripened
by his hermit-existence in the heart of Provence. He produced one
masterpiece after another. He had studied with laughter and joy the
mirthful side of southern exaggeration, and he created a figure in which
its peculiar qualities should be displayed, as it were, in excelsis.
This study resulted, in 1872, in "The Prodigious Feats of Tartarin of
Tarascon," one of the most purely delightful works of humour in the
French language. Alphonse Daudet now, armed with his cahiers, his little
green-backed books of notes, set out to be a great historian of
French manners in the second half of the nineteenth century. His first
important novel, "Fromont Jeune et Risler Aine," 1874, enjoyed a notable
success; it was followed in 1876 by "Jack," in 1878 by "Le Nabob," in
1879 by "Les Rois en Exil," in 1881 by "Numa Roumestan," in 1883 by
"L'Evangeliste," and in 1884 by "Sapho." These are the seven great
romances of modern French life on which the reputation of Alphonse
Daudet as a novelist is mainly built. They placed him, for the moment at
all events, near the head of contemporary European literature. By this
time, however, a physical malady, which Charcot was the first to locate
in the spinal cord, had begun to exhaust the novelist's powers. This
disease, which took the form of what was supposed to be neuralgia in
1881, racked him with pain during the sixteen remaining years of his
life, and gradually destroyed his powers of locomotion. It spared
the functions of the brain, but it cannot be denied that after 1884
something of force and spontaneous charm was lacking in Daudet's books.
He continued, however, the adventures of Tartarin, first with unabated
gusto in the Alps, then less happily as a colonist in the South Seas. He
wrote, in the form of a novel, a bitter satire on the French Academy,
of which he was never a member; this was "L'Immortel" of 1888. He wrote
romances, of little power, the best being "Rose et Ninette" of 1892, but
his imaginative work steadily declined in value. He published in 1887
his reminiscences, "Trente Ans de Paris," and later on his "Souvenirs
d'un Homme de Lettres." He suffered more and more from his complaint,
from the insomnia it caused, and from the abuse of chloral. He was
able, however, to the last, to enjoy the summer at his country-house, at
Champrosay, and even to travel in an invalid's chair; in 1896 he visited
for the first time London and Oxford, and saw Mr. George Meredith. In
Paris he had long occupied rooms in the Rue de Bellechasse, where Madame
Alphonse Daudet was accustomed to entertain a brilliant company. But in
1897 it became impossible for him to mount five flights of stairs any
longer, and he moved to the first floor of No. 41 Rue de l'Universite.
Here on the 16th of December, 1897, as he was chatting gaily at the
dinner-table, he uttered a cry, fell back in his chair, and was dead.
The personal appearance of Alphonse Daudet, in his prime, was very
striking; he had clearly cut features, large brilliant eyes, and an
amazing exuberance of curled hair and forked beard.

EDMUND GOSSE, LL.D.




CONTENTS

     Introduction, William Peterfield Trent

     Life of Alphonse Daudet, Edmund Gosse


     THE NABOB:

     Dr. Jenkins's patients
     A luncheon in the Place Vendome
     Memoirs of an office porter--A mere glance at the Territorial Bank
     A debut in society
     The Joyeuse family
     Felicia Ruys
     Jansoulet at home
     The Bethlehem Society
     Bonne Maman
     Memoirs of an office porter--Servants
     The festivities in honour of the Bey
     A Corsican election
     A day of spleen
     The Exhibition
     Memoirs of an office porter--In the antechamber
     A public man
     The apparition
     The Jenkins pearls
     The funeral
     La Baronne Hemerlingue
     The sitting
     Dramas of Paris
     Memoirs of an office porter--The last leaves
     At Bordighera
     The first night of "Revolt"




THE NABOB

by Alphonse Daudet




DOCTOR JENKIN'S PATIENTS

Standing on the steps of his little town-house in the Rue de Lisbonne,
freshly shaven, with sparkling eyes, and lips parted in easy enjoyment,
his long hair slightly gray flowing over a huge coat collar, square
shouldered, strong as an oak, the famous Irish doctor, Robert Jenkins,
Knight of the Medjidjieh and of the distinguished order of Charles III
of Spain, President and Founder of the Bethlehem Society. Jenkins in a
word, the Jenkins of the Jenkins Pills with an arsenical base--that
is to say, the fashionable doctor of the year 1864, the busiest man in
Paris, was preparing to step into his carriage when a casement opened
on the first floor looking over the inner court-yard of the house, and a
woman's voice asked timidly:

"Shall you be home for luncheon, Robert?"

Oh, how good and loyal was the smile that suddenly illumined the
fine apostle-like head with its air of learning, and in the tender
"good-morning" which his eyes threw up towards the warm, white
dressing-gown visible behind the raised curtains; how easy it was to
divine one of those conjugal passions, tranquil and sure, which habit
re-enforces and with supple and stable bonds binds closer.

"No, Mrs. Jenkins." He was fond of thus bestowing upon her publicly
her title as his lawful wife, as if he found in it an intimate
gratification, a sort of acquittal of conscience towards the woman who
made life so bright for him. "No, do not expect me this morning. I lunch
in the Place Vendome."

"Ah! yes, the Nabob," said the handsome Mrs. Jenkins with a very marked
note of respect for this personage out of the _Thousand and One Nights_
of whom all Paris had been talking for the last month; then, after a
little hesitation, very tenderly, in a quite low voice, from between the
heavy tapestries, she whispered for the ears of the doctor only:

"Be sure you do not forget what you promised me."

Apparently it was something very difficult to fulfil, for at the
reminder of this promise the eyebrows of the apostle contracted into
a frown, his smile became petrified, his whole visage assumed an
expression of incredible hardness; but it was only for an instant. At
the bedside of their patients the physiognomies of these fashionable
doctors become expert in lying. In his most tender, most cordial manner,
he replied, disclosing a row of dazzling white teeth:

"What I promised shall be done, Mrs. Jenkins. And now, go in quickly and
shut your window. The fog is cold this morning."

Yes, the fog was cold, but white as snow mist; and, filling the air
outside the glasses of the large brougham, it brightened with soft
gleams the unfolded newspaper in the doctor's hands. Over yonder, in the
populous quarters, confined and gloomy, in the Paris of tradesman
and mechanic, that charming morning haze which lingers in the great
thoroughfares is not known. The bustle of awakening, the going and
coming of the market-carts, of the omnibuses, of the heavy trucks
rattling their old iron, have early and quickly cut it up, unravelled
and scattered it. Every passer-by carries away a little of it in a
threadbare overcoat, a muffler which shows the woof, and coarse gloves
rubbed one against the other. It soaks through the thin blouses, and
the mackintoshes thrown over the working skirts; it melts away at every
breath that is drawn, warm from sleeplessness or alcohol; it is engulfed
in the depths of empty stomachs, dispersed in the shops as they are
opened, and the dark courts, or even to the fireless attics. That is
the reason why there remains so little of it out of doors. But in that
spacious and grandiose region of Paris, which was inhabited by Jenkins's
clients, on those wide boulevards planted with trees, and those deserted
quays, the fog hovered without a stain, like so many sheets, with
waverings and cotton wool-like flakes. The effect was of a place
inclosed, secret, almost sumptuous, as the sun after his slothful
rising began to diffuse softly crimsoned tints, which gave to the mist
enshrouding the rows of houses to their summits the appearance of white
muslin thrown over some scarlet material. One might have fancied it a
great curtain beneath which nothing could be heard save the cautious
closing of some court-yard gate, the tin measuring-cans of the milkmen,
the little bells of a herd of she-asses passing at a quick trot followed
by the short and panting breath of their shepherd, and the dull rumble
of Jenkins's brougham commencing its daily round.

First, to Mora House. This was a magnificent palace on the Quai d'Orsay,
next door to the Spanish embassy, whose long terraces succeeded its own,
having its principal entrance in the Rue de Lille, and a door upon the
side next the river. Between two lofty walls overgrown with ivy, and
united by imposing vaulted arches, the brougham shot in, announced by
two strokes of a sonorous bell which roused Jenkins from the reverie
into which the reading of his newspaper seemed to have plunged him.
Then the noise of the wheels became deadened on the sand of a vast
court-yard, and they drew up, after describing an elegant curve, before
the steps of the mansion, which were surrounded by a large circular
awning. In the obscurity of the fog, a dozen carriages could be seen
ranged in line, and along an avenue of acacias, quite withered at
that season and leafless in their bark, the profiles of English grooms
leading out the saddle-horses of the duke for their exercise. Everything
revealed a luxury thought-out, settled, grandiose, and assured.

"It is quite useless for me to come early; others always arrive before
me," said Jenkins to himself as he saw the file in which his brougham
took its place; but, certain of not having to wait, with head carried
high, and an air of tranquil authority, he ascended that official flight
of steps which is mounted every day by so many trembling ambitions, so
many anxieties on hesitating feet.

From the very antechamber, lofty and resonant like a church, which,
although calorifers burned night and day, possessed two great wood-fires
that filled it with a radiant life, the luxury of this interior reached
you by warm and heady puffs. It suggested at once a hot-house and
a Turkish bath. A great deal of heat and yet brightness; white
wainscoting, white marbles, immense windows, nothing stifling or shut
in, and yet a uniform atmosphere meet for the surrounding of some
rare existence, refined and nervous. Jenkins always expanded in this
factitious sun of wealth; he greeted with a "good-morning, my lads,"
the powdered porter, with his wide golden scarf, the footmen in
knee-breeches and livery of gold and blue, all standing to do him
honour; lightly drew his finger across the bars of the large cages of
monkeys full of sharp cries and capers, and, whistling under his breath,
stepped quickly up the staircase of shining marble laid with a carpet
as thick as the turf of a lawn, which led to the apartments of the duke.
Although six months had passed since his first visit to Mora House,
the good doctor was not yet become insensible to the quite physical
impression of gaiety, of frivolity, which he received from this
dwelling.

Although you were in the abode of the first official of the Empire there
was nothing here suggestive of the work of government or its boxes
of dusty old papers. The duke had only consented to accept his high
dignitaries as Minister of State and President of the Council upon the
condition that he should not quit his private mansion; he only went
to his office for an hour or two daily, the time necessary to give the
indispensable signatures, and held his receptions in his bed-chamber.
At this moment, notwithstanding the earliness of the hour, the hall was
crowded. You saw there grave, anxious faces, provincial prefects with
shaven lips, and administrative whiskers, slightly less arrogant in this
antechamber than yonder in their prefectures, magistrates of austere
air, sober in gesture, deputies important of manner, big-wigs of the
financial world, rich and boorish manufacturers, among whom stood out
here and there the slender, ambitious figure of some substitute of a
prefectorial councillor, in the garb of one seeking a favour, dress-coat
and white tie; and all, standing, sitting in groups or solitary, sought
silently to penetrate with their gaze that high door closed upon their
destiny, by which they would issue forth directly triumphant or with
cast-down head. Jenkins passed through the crowd rapidly, and every one
followed with an envious eye this newcomer whom the doorkeeper, with
his official chain, correct and icy in his demeanour, seated at a table
beside the door, greeted with a little smile at once respectful and
familiar.

"Who is with him?" asked the doctor, indicating the chamber of the duke.

Hardly moving his lips, and not without a slightly ironical glance of
the eye, the doorkeeper whispered a name which, if they had heard it,
would have roused the indignation of all these high personages who had
been waiting for an hour past until the costumier of the opera should
have ended his audience.

A sound of voices, a ray of light. Jenkins had just entered the duke's
presence; he never waited, he.

Standing with his back to the fireplace, closely wrapped in a
dressing-jacket of blue fur, the soft reflections from which gave an
air of refinement to an energetic and haughty head, the President of the
Council was causing to be designed under his eyes a Pierrette costume
for the duchess to wear at her next ball, and was giving his directions
with the same gravity with which he would have dictated the draft of a
new law.

"Let the frill be very fine on the ruff, and put no frills on the
sleeves.--Good-morning, Jenkins. I am with you directly."

Jenkins bowed, and took a few steps in the immense room, of which the
windows, opening on a garden that extended as far as the Seine, framed
one of the finest views of Paris, the bridges, the Tuileries, the
Louvre, in a network of black trees traced as it were in Indian ink upon
the floating background of fog. A large and very low bed, raised by
a few steps above the floor, two or three little lacquer screens with
vague and capricious gilding, indicating, like the double doors and the
carpets of thick wool, a fear of cold pushed even to excess, various
seats, lounges, warmers, scattered about rather indiscriminately, all
low, rounded, indolent, or voluptuous in shape, composed the furniture
of this celebrated chamber in which the gravest questions and the most
frivolous were wont to be treated alike with the same seriousness. On
the wall was a handsome portrait of the duchess; on the chimneypiece a
bust of the duke, the work of Felicia Ruys, which at the recent Salon
had received the honours of a first medal.

"Well, Jenkins, how are we this morning?" said his excellency,
approaching, while the costumier was picking up his fashion-plates,
scattered over all the easy chairs.

"And you, my dear duke? I thought you a little pale last evening at the
Varietes."

"Come, come! I have never felt so well. Your pills have a most
marvellous effect upon me. I am conscious of a vivacity, a freshness,
when I remember how run down I was six months ago."

Jenkins, without saying anything, had laid his great head against the
fur-coat of the minister of state, at the place where, in common men,
the heart beats. He listened a moment while his excellency continued to
speak in the indolent, bored tone which was one of the characteristics
of his distinction.

"And who was your companion, doctor, last night? That huge, bronzed
Tartar who was laughing so loudly in the front of your box."

"It was the Nabob, _Monsieur le Duc_. The famous Jansoulet, about whom
people are talking so much just now."

"I ought to have guessed it. The whole house was watching him. The
actresses played for him alone. You know him? What sort of man is he?"

"I know him. That is to say, I attend him professionally.--Thank you,
my dear duke, I have finished. All is right in that region.--When
he arrived in Paris a month ago, he had found the change of climate
somewhat trying. He sent for me, and since then has received me upon
the most friendly footing. What I know of him is that he possesses a
colossal fortune, made in Tunis, in the service of the Bey, that he has
a loyal heart, a generous soul, in which the ideas of humanity--"

"In Tunis?" interrupted the duke, who was by nature very little
sentimental and humanitarian. "In that case, why this name of Nabob?"

"Bah! the Parisians do not look at things so closely. For them, every
rich foreigner is a nabob, no matter whence he comes. Furthermore, this
nabob has all the physical qualities for the part--a copper-coloured
skin, eyes like burning coals, and, what is more, gigantic wealth, of
which he makes, I do not fear to say it, the most noble and the most
intelligent use. It is to him that I owe"--here the doctor assumed a
modest air--"that I owe it that I have at last been able to found the
Bethlehem Society for the suckling of infants, which a morning paper,
that I was looking over just now--the _Messenger_, I think--calls 'the
great philanthropic idea of the century.'"

The duke threw a listless glance over the sheet which Jenkins held out
to him. He was not the man to be caught by the turn of an advertisement.

"He must be very rich, this M. Jansoulet," said he, coldly. "He finances
Cardailhac's theatre; Monpavon gets him to pay his debts; Bois l'Hery
starts a stable for him; old Schwalbach a picture gallery. It means
money, all that."

Jenkins laughed.

"What will you have, my dear duke, this poor Nabob, you are his great
occupation. Arriving here with the firm resolution to become a Parisian,
a man of the world, he has taken you for his model in everything, and I
do not conceal from you that he would very much like to study his model
from a nearer standpoint."

"I know, I know. Monpavon has already asked my permission to bring
him to see me. But I prefer to wait; I wish to see. With these great
fortunes that come from so far away one has to be careful. _Mon Dieu_! I
do not say that if I should meet him elsewhere than in my own house, at
the theatre, in a drawing-room----"

"As it just happens, Mrs. Jenkins is proposing to give a small party
next month. If you would do us the honour----"

"I shall be glad to come, my dear doctor, and if your Nabob should
chance to be there I should make no objection to his being presented to
me."

At this moment the usher on duty opened the door.

"Monsieur the Minister of the Interior is in the blue salon. He has only
one word to say to his excellency. Monsieur the Prefect of Police is
still waiting downstairs, in the gallery."

"Very well," said the duke, "I am coming. But I should like first to
finish the matter of this costume. Let us see--friend, what's your
name--what are we deciding upon for these ruffs? Au revoir, doctor.
There is nothing to be done, is there, except to continue the pills?"

"Continue the pills," said Jenkins, bowing; and he left the room beaming
with delight at the two pieces of good fortune which were befalling him
at the same time--the honour of entertaining the duke and the pleasure
of obliging his dear Nabob. In the antechamber, the crowd of petitioners
through which he passed was still more numerous than at his entry;
newcomers had joined those who had been patiently waiting from the
first, others were mounting the staircase, with busy look and very pale,
and in the courtyard the carriages continued to arrive, and to range
themselves on ranks in a circle, gravely, solemnly, while the question
of the sleeve ruffs was being discussed upstairs with not less
solemnity.

"To the club," said Jenkins to his coachman.

The brougham bowled along the quays, recrossed the bridges, reached the
Place de la Concorde, which already no longer wore the same aspect as an
hour earlier. The fog was lifting in the direction of the Garde-Meuble
and the Greek temple of the Madeleine, allowing to be dimly
distinguished here and there the white plume of a jet of water, the
arcade of a palace, the upper portion of a statue, the tree-clumps of
the Tuileries, grouped in chilly fashion near the gates. The veil, not
raised, but broken in places, disclosed fragments of horizon; and on the
avenue which leads to the Arc de Triomphe could be seen brakes passing
at full trot laden with coachmen and jobmasters, dragoons of the
Empress, fuglemen bedizened with lace and covered with furs, going two
by two in long files with a jangling of bits and spurs, and the snorting
of fresh horses, the whole lighted by a sun still invisible, the light
issuing from the misty atmosphere, and here and there withdrawing into
it again as if offering a fleeting vision of the morning luxury of that
quarter of the town.

Jenkins alighted at the corner of the Rue Royale. From top to bottom of
the great gambling house the servants were passing to and fro, shaking
the carpets, airing the rooms where the fume of cigars still hung about
and heaps of fine glowing ashes were crumbling away at the back of the
hearths, while on the green tables, still vibrant with the night's play,
there stood burning a few silver candlesticks whose flames rose straight
in the wan light of day. The noise, the coming and going, ceased at
the third floor, where sundry members of the club had their apartments.
Among them was the Marquis de Monpavon, whose abode Jenkins was now on
his way to visit.

"What! It is you, doctor? The devil take it! What is the time then? I'm
not visible."

"Not even for the doctor?"

"Oh, for nobody. Question of etiquette, _mon cher_. No matter, come in
all the same. You'll warm your feet for a moment while Francis finishes
doing my hair."

Jenkins entered the bed-chamber, a banal place like all furnished
apartments, and moved towards the fire on which there were set to
heat curling-tongs of all sizes, while in the contiguous laboratory,
separated from the room by a curtain of Algerian tapestry, the Marquis
de Monpavon gave himself up to the manipulations of his valet. Odours of
patchouli, of cold-cream, of hartshorn, and of singed hair escaped from
the part of the room which was shut off, and from time to time, when
Francis came to fetch a curling-iron, Jenkins caught sight of a huge
dressing-table laden with a thousand little instruments of ivory, and
mother-of-pearl, with steel files, scissors, puffs, and brushes, with
bottles, with little trays, with cosmetics, labelled and arranged
methodically in groups and lines; and amid all this display, awkward and
already shaky, an old man's hand, shrunken and long, delicately trimmed
and polished about the nails like that of a Japanese painter, which
faltered about among this fine hardware and doll's china.

While continuing the process of making up his face, the longest, the
most complicated of his morning occupations, Monpavon chatted with the
doctor, told of his little ailments, and the good effect of the _pills_.
They made him young again, he said. And at a distance, thus, without
seeing him, one would have taken him for the Duc de Mora, to such
a degree had he usurped his manner of speech. There were the same
unfinished phrases, ended by "ps, ps, ps," muttered between the teeth,
expressions like "What's its name?" "Who was it?" constantly thrown into
what he was saying, a kind of aristocratic stutter, fatigued, listless,
wherein you might perceive a profound contempt for the vulgar art of
speech. In the society of which the duke was the centre, every one
sought to imitate that accent, those disdainful intonations with an
affectation of simplicity.

Jenkins, finding the sitting rather long, had risen to take his
departure.

"Adieu, I must be off. We shall see you at the Nabob's?"

"Yes, I intend to be there for luncheon. Promised to bring him--what's
his name. Who was it? What? You know, for our big affair--ps, ps, ps.
Were it not for that, should gladly stay away. Real menagerie, that
house."

The Irishman, despite his benevolence, agreed that the society was
rather mixed at his friend's. But then! One could hardly blame him for
it. The poor fellow, he knew no better.

"Neither knows nor is willing to learn," remarked Monpavon with
bitterness. "Instead of consulting people of experience--ps, ps,
ps--first sponger that comes along. Have you seen the horses that Bois
l'Hery has persuaded him to buy? Absolute rubbish those animals. And he
paid twenty thousand francs for them. We may wager that Bois l'Hery got
them for six thousand."

"Oh, for shame--a nobleman!" said Jenkins, with the indignation of a
lofty soul refusing to believe in baseness.

Monpavon continued, without seeming to hear:

"All that because the horses came from Mora's stable."

"It is true that the dear Nabob's heart is very full of the duke. I am
about to make him very happy, therefore, when I inform him----"

The doctor paused, embarrassed.

"When you inform him of what, Jenkins?"

Somewhat abashed, Jenkins had to confess that he had obtained permission
from his excellency to present to him his friend Jansoulet. Scarcely
had he finished his sentence before a tall spectre, with flabby face
and hair and whiskers diversely coloured, bounded from the dressing-room
into the chamber, with his two hands folding round a fleshless but very
erect neck a dressing-gown of flimsy silk with violet spots, in which he
was wrapped like a sweetmeat in its paper. The most striking thing about
this mock-heroic physiognomy was a large curved nose all shiny with cold
cream, and an eye alive, keen, too young, too bright, for the heavy and
wrinkled eyelid which covered it. Jenkins's patients all had that eye.

Monpavon must indeed have been deeply moved to show himself thus devoid
of all prestige. In point of fact, with white lips and a changed voice
he addressed the doctor quickly, without the lisp this time, and in a
single outburst:

"Come now, _mon cher_, no tomfoolery between us, eh? We are both met
before the same dish, but I leave you your share. I intend that you
shall leave me mine."

And Jenkins's air of astonishment did not make him pause. "Let this be
said once for all. I have promised the Nabob to present him to the duke,
just as, formerly, I presented you. Do not mix yourself up, therefore,
with what concerns me alone."

Jenkins laid his hand on his heart, protested his innocence. He had
never had any intention. Certainly Monpavon was too intimate a friend of
the duke, for any other--How could he have supposed?

"I suppose nothing," said the old nobleman, calmer but still cold.
"I merely desired to have a very clear explanation with you on this
subject."

The Irishman extended a widely opened hand.

"My dear marquis, explanations are always clear between men of honour."

"Honour is a big word, Jenkins. Let us say people of deportment--that
suffices."

And that deportment, which he invoked as the supreme guide of conduct,
recalling him suddenly to the sense of his ludicrous situation, the
marquis offered one finger to his friend's demonstrative shake of the
hand, and passed back with dignity behind his curtain, while the other
left, in haste to resume his round.

What a magnificent clientele he had, this Jenkins! Nothing but princely
mansions, heated staircases, laden with flowers at every landing,
upholstered and silky alcoves, where disease was transformed into
something discreet, elegant, where nothing suggested that brutal hand
which throws on a bed of pain those who only cease to work in order to
die. They were not in any true speech, sick people, these clients of
the Irish doctor. They would have been refused admission to a hospital.
Their organs not possessing even strength to give them a shock, the seat
of their malady was to be discovered nowhere, and the doctor, as he bent
over them, might have sought in vain the throb of any suffering in those
bodies which the inertia, the silence of death already inhabited. They
were worn-out, debilitated people, anaemics, exhausted by an absurd
life, but who found it so good still that they fought to have it
prolonged. And the Jenkins pills became famous precisely by reason of
that lash of the whip which they gave to jaded existences.

"Doctor, I beseech you, let me be fit to go to the ball this evening!"
the young woman would say, prostrate on her lounge, and whose voice was
reduced to a breath.

"You shall go, my dear child."

And she went; and never had she looked more beautiful.

"Doctor, at all costs, though it should kill me, to-morrow morning I
must be at the Cabinet Council."

He was there, and carried away from it in a triumph of eloquence and of
ambitious diplomacy.

Afterward--oh, afterward, if you please! But no matter! To their
last day Jenkins's clients went about, showed themselves, cheated the
devouring egotism of the crowd. They died on their feet, as became men
and women of the world.

After a thousand peregrinations in the Chaussee d'Antin and the
Champs-Elysees, after having visited every millionaire or titled
personage in the Faubourg Saint Honore, the fashionable doctor arrived
at the corner of the Cours-la-Reine and the Rue Francois I., before a
house with a rounded front, which occupied the angle on the quay, and
entered an apartment on the ground floor which resembled in nowise those
through which he had been passing since morning. From the threshold,
tapestries covering the wall, windows of old stained glass with strips
of lead cutting across a discrete and composite light, a gigantic saint
in carved wood which fronted a Japanese monster with protruding eyes
and a back covered with delicate scales like tiles, indicated the
imaginative and curious taste of an artist. The little page who answered
the door held in leash an Arab greyhound larger than himself.

"Mme. Constance is at mass," he said, "and Mademoiselle is in the studio
quite alone. We have been at work since six o'clock this morning," added
the child with a rueful yawn which the dog caught on the wing, making
him open wide his pink mouth with its sharp teeth.

Jenkins, whom we have seen enter with so much self-possession the
chamber of the Minister of State, trembled a little as he raised the
curtain masking the door of the studio which had been left open. It was
a splendid sculptor's studio, the front of which, on the street corner,
semi-circular in shape, gave the room one whole wall of glass, with
pilasters at the sides, a large, well-lighted bay, opal-coloured just
then by reason of the fog. More ornate than are usually such work-rooms,
which the stains of the plaster, the boasting-tools, the clay, the
puddles of water generally cause to resemble a stone-mason's shed, this
one added a touch of coquetry to its artistic purpose. Green plants in
every corner, a few good pictures suspended against the bare wall
and, here and there, resting upon oak brackets, two or three works
of Sebastien Ruys, of which the last, exhibited after his death, was
covered with a piece of black gauze.

The mistress of the house, Felicia Ruys, the daughter of the famous
sculptor and herself already known by two masterpieces, the bust of her
father and that of the Duc de Mora, was standing in the middle of the
studio, occupied in the modelling of a figure. Wearing a tightly fitting
riding-habit of blue cloth with long folds, a fichu of China silk
twisted about her neck like a man's tie, her black, fine hair caught up
carelessly above the antique modelling of her small head, Felicia was
at work with an extreme earnestness which added to her beauty the
concentration, the intensity which are given to the features by an
attentive and satisfied expression. But that changed immediately upon
the arrival of the doctor.

"Ah, it is you," said she brusquely, as though awaked from a dream. "The
bell was rung, then? I did not hear it."

And in the ennui, the lassitude that suddenly took possession of that
adorable face, the only thing that remained expressive and brilliant was
the eyes, eyes in which the factitious gleam of the Jenkins pills was
heightened by the constitutional wildness.

Oh, how the doctor's voice became humble and condescending as he
answered her:

"So you are quite absorbed in your work, my dear Felicia. Is it
something new that you are at work on there? It seems to me very
pretty."

He moved towards the rough and still formless model out of which there
was beginning to issue vaguely a group of two animals, one a greyhound
which was scampering at full speed with a rush that was truly
extraordinary.

"The idea of it came to me last night. I began to work it out by
lamplight. My poor Kadour, he sees no fun in it," said the girl,
glancing with a look of caressing kindness at the greyhound whose paws
the little page was endeavouring to place apart in order to get the pose
again.

Jenkins remarked in a fatherly way that she did wrong to tire herself
thus, and taking her wrist with ecclesiastical precautions:

"Come, I am sure you are feverish."

At the contact of his hand with her own, Felicia made a movement almost
of repulsion.

"No, no, leave me alone. Your pills can do nothing for me. When I do not
work I am bored. I am bored to death, to extinction; my thoughts are the
colour of that water which flows over yonder, brackish and heavy. To be
commencing life, and to be disgusted with it! It is hard. I am reduced
to the point of envying my poor Constance, who passes her days in
her chair, without opening her mouth, but smiling to herself over her
memories of the past. I have not even that, I, happy remembrances to
muse upon. I have only work--work!"

As she talked she went on modelling furiously, now with the
boasting-tool, now with her fingers, which she wiped from time to time
on a little sponge placed on the wooden platform which supported the
group; so that her complaints, her melancholies, inexplicable in the
mouth of a girl of twenty which, in repose, had the purity of a Greek
smile, seemed uttered at random and addressed to no one in particular.

Jenkins, however, appeared disturbed by them, troubled, despite the
evident attention which he gave to the work of the artist, or rather to
the artist herself, to the triumphant grace of this girl whom her beauty
seemed to have predestined to the study of the plastic arts.

Embarrassed by the admiring gaze which she felt fixed upon her, Felicia
resumed:

"Apropos, I have seen him, you know, your Nabob. Some one pointed him
out to me last Friday at the opera."

"You were at the opera on Friday?"

"Yes. The duke had sent me his box."

Jenkins changed colour.

"I persuaded Constance to go with me. It was the first time for
twenty-five years since her farewell performance, that she had been
inside the Opera-House. It made a great impression on her. During the
ballet, especially, she trembled, she beamed, all her old triumphs
sparkled in her eyes. Happy who has emotions like that. A real type,
that Nabob. You will have to bring him to see me. He has a head that it
would amuse me to do."

"He! Why, he is hideous! You cannot have looked at him carefully."

"On the contrary, I had a perfect view. He was opposite us. That mask,
as of a white Ethiopian, would be superb in marble. And not vulgar,
in any case. Besides, since he is so ugly as that, you will not be
so unhappy as you were last year when I was doing Mora's bust. What a
disagreeable face you had, Jenkins, in those days!"

"For ten years of life," muttered Jenkins in a gloomy voice, "I would
not have that time over again. But you it amuses to behold suffering."

"You know quite well that nothing amuses me," said she, shrugging her
shoulders with a supreme impertinence.

Then, without looking at him, without adding another word, she plunged
into one of those dumb activities by which true artists escape from
themselves and from everything that surrounds them.

Jenkins paced a few steps in the studio, much moved, with avowals on
the tip of his tongue which yet dared not put themselves into words. At
length, feeling himself dismissed, he took his hat and walked towards
the door.

"So it is understood. I must bring him to see you."

"Who?"

"Why, the Nabob. It was you who this very moment----"

"Ah, yes," remarked the strange person whose caprices were short-lived.
"Bring him if you like. I don't care, otherwise."

And her beautiful dejected voice, in which something seemed broken, the
listlessness of her whole personality, said distinctly enough that it
was true, that she cared really for nothing in the world.

Jenkins left the room, extremely troubled, and with a gloomy brow. But,
the moment he was outside, he assumed once more his laughing and cordial
expression, being of those who, in the streets, go masked. The morning
was advancing. The mist, still perceptible in the vicinity of the Seine,
floated now only in shreds and gave a vaporous unsubstantiality to
the houses on the quay, to the river steamers whose paddles remained
invisible, to the distant horizon in which the dome of the Invalides
hung poised like a gilded balloon with a rope that darted sunbeams. A
diffused warmth, the movement in the streets, told that noon was not far
distant, that it would be there directly with the striking of all the
bells.

Before going on to the Nabob's, Jenkins had, however, one other visit to
make. But he appeared to find it a great nuisance. However, since he had
made the promise! And, resolutely:

"68 Rue Saint-Ferdinand, at the Ternes," he said, as he sprang into his
carriage.

The address required to be repeated twice to the coachman, Joey, who
was scandalized; the very horse showed a momentary hesitation, as if the
valuable beast and the impeccably clad servant had felt revolt at the
idea of driving out to such a distant suburb, beyond the limited but
so brilliant circle wherein their master's clients were scattered.
The carriage arrived, all the same, without accident, at the end of a
provincial-looking, unfinished street, and at the last of its buildings,
a house of unfurnished apartments with five stories, which the street
seemed to have despatched forward as a reconnoitring party to discover
whether it might continue on that side isolated as it stood between
vaguely marked-out sites waiting to be built upon or heaped with the
debris of houses broken down, with blocks of freestone, old shutters
lying amid the desolation, mouldy butchers' blocks with broken hinges
hanging, an immense ossuary of a whole demolished region of the town.

Innumerable placards were stuck above the door, the latter being
decorated by a great frame of photographs white with dust before which
Jenkins paused for a moment as he passed. Had the famous doctor come so
far, then, simply for the purpose of having a photograph taken? It might
have been thought so, judging by the attention with which he stayed
to examine this display, the fifteen or twenty photographs which
represented the same family in different poses and actions and with
varying expressions; an old gentleman, with chin supported by a high
white neckcloth, and a leathern portfolio under his arm, surrounded by
a bevy of young girls with their hair in plait or in curls, and with
modest ornaments on their black frocks. Sometimes the old gentleman had
posed with but two of his daughters; or perhaps one of those young and
pretty profile figures stood out alone, the elbow resting upon a broken
column, the head bowed over a book in a natural and easy pose. But, in
short, it was always the same air with variations, and within the glass
frame there was no gentleman save the old gentleman with the white
neckcloth, nor other feminine figures that those of his numerous
daughters.

"Studios upstairs, on the fifth floor," said a line above the frame.
Jenkins sighed, measured with his eye the distance that separated the
ground from the little balcony up there in the clouds, then he decided
to enter. In the corridor he passed a white neckcloth and a majestic
leathern portfolio, evidently the old gentleman of the photographic
exhibition. Questioned, this individual replied that M. Maranne did
indeed live on the fifth floor. "But," he added, with an engaging smile,
"the stories are not lofty." Upon this encouragement the Irishman began
to ascend a narrow and quite new staircase with landings no larger than
a step, only one door on each floor, and badly lighted windows through
which could be seen a gloomy, ill-paved court-yard and other cage-like
staircases, all empty; one of those frightful modern houses, built
by the dozen by penniless speculators, and having as their worst
disadvantage thin partition walls which oblige all the inhabitants to
live in a phalansterian community.

At this particular time the inconvenience was not great, the fourth and
fifth floors alone happening to be occupied, as though the tenants had
dropped into them from the sky.

On the fourth floor, behind a door with a copper plate bearing the
announcement "M. Joyeuse, Expert in Bookkeeping," the doctor heard
a sound of fresh laughter, of young people's chatter, and of romping
steps, which accompanied him to the floor above, to the photographic
establishment.

These little businesses perched away in corners with the air of having
no communication with any outside world are one of the surprises of
Paris. One asks one's self how the people live who go into these
trades, what fastidious Providence can, for example, send clients to
a photographer lodged on a fifth floor in a nondescript region, well
beyond the Rue Saint-Ferdinand, or books to keep to the accountant
below. Jenkins, as he made this reflection, smiled in pity, then went
straight in as he was invited by the following inscription, "Enter
without knocking." Alas! the permission was scarcely abused. A tall
young man wearing spectacles, and writing at a small table, with his
legs wrapped in a travelling-rug, rose precipitately to greet the
visitor whom his short sight had prevented him from recognising.

"Good-morning, Andre," said the doctor, stretching out his loyal hand.

"M. Jenkins!"

"You see, I am good-natured as I have always been. Your conduct towards
us, your obstinacy in persisting in living far away from your parents,
imposed a great reserve on me, for my own dignity's sake; but your
mother has wept. And here I am."

While he spoke, he examined the poor little studio, with its bare walls,
its scanty furniture, the brand-new photographic apparatus, the little
Prussian fireplace, new also and never yet used for a fire, all forced
into painfully clear evidence beneath the direct light falling from the
glass roof. The drawn face, the scanty beard of the young man, to whom
the bright colour of his eyes, the narrow height of his forehead,
his long and fair hair thrown backward gave the air of a visionary,
everything was accentuated in the crude light; and also the resolute
will in that clear glance which settled upon Jenkins coldly, and in
advance to all his reasonings, to all his protestations, opposed an
invincible resistance.

But the good Jenkins feigned not to perceive anything of this.

"You know, my dear Andre, since the day when I married your mother I
have regarded you as my son. I looked forward to leaving you my practice
and my patients, to putting your foot in a golden stirrup, happy to see
you following a career consecrated to the welfare of humanity. All at
once, without giving any reason, without taking into any consideration
the effect which such a rupture might well have in the eyes of the
world, you have separated yourself from us, you have abandoned your
studies, renounced your future, in order to launch out into I know not
what eccentric life, engaging in a ridiculous trade, the refuge and the
excuse of all unclassed people."

"I follow this occupation in order to earn a living. It is bread and
butter in the meantime."

"In what meantime? While you are waiting for literary glory?"

He glanced disdainfully at the scribbling scattered over the table.

"All that is not serious, you know, and here is what I am come to tell
you. An opportunity presents itself to you, a double-swing door opening
into the future. The Bethlehem Society is founded. The most splendid of
my philanthropic dreams has taken body. We have just purchased a superb
villa at Nanterre for the housing of our first establishment. It is the
care, the management of this house that I have thought of intrusting
to you as to an _alter ego_. A princely dwelling, the salary of the
commander of a division, and the satisfaction of a service rendered to
the great human family. Say one word, and I take you to see the Nabob,
the great-hearted man who defrays the expense of our undertaking. Do you
accept?"

"No," said the other so curtly that Jenkins was somewhat put out of
countenance.

"Just so. I was prepared for this refusal when I came here. But I am
come nevertheless. I have taken for motto, 'To do good without hope,'
and I remain faithful to my motto. So then, it is understood you prefer
to the honourable, worthy, and profitable existence which I have just
proposed to you, a life of hazard without aim and without dignity?"

Andre answered nothing, but his silence spoke for him.

"Take care. You know what that decision will involve, a definitive
estrangement, but you have always wanted that. I need not tell you,"
continued Jenkins, "that to break with me is to break off relations also
with your mother. She and I are one."

The young man turned pale, hesitated a moment, then said with effort:

"If it please my mother to come to see me here, I shall be delighted,
certainly. But my determination to quit your house, to have no longer
anything in common with you, is irrevocable."

"And will you at least say why?"

He made a negative sign; he would not say.

For once the Irishman felt a genuine impulse of anger. His whole
face assumed a cunning, savage expression which would have very much
astonished those that only knew the good and loyal Jenkins; but he took
good care not to push further an explanation which he feared perhaps as
much as he desired it.

"Adieu," said he, half turning his head on the threshold. "And never
apply to us."

"Never," replied his stepson in a firm voice.

This time, when the doctor had said to Joey, "Place Vendome," the horse,
as though he had understood that they were going to the Nabob's, gave a
proud shake to his glittering curb-chains, and the brougham set off at
full speed, transforming each axle of its wheels into sunshine. "To
come so far to get a reception like that! A celebrity of the time to be
treated thus by that Bohemian! One may try indeed to do good!" Jenkins
gave vent to his anger in a long monologue of this character, then
suddenly rousing himself, exclaimed, "Ah, bah!" and what anxiety there
was remaining on his brow quickly vanished on the pavement of the Place
Vendome. Noon was striking everywhere in the sunshine. Issued forth from
behind its curtain of mist, luxurious Paris, awake and on its feet,
was commencing its whirling day. The shop-windows of the Rue de la
Paix shone brightly. The mansions of the square seemed to be ranging
themselves haughtily for the receptions of the afternoon; and, right at
the end of the Rue Castiglione with its white arcades, the Tuileries,
beneath a fine burst of winter sunshine, raised shivering statues, pink
with cold, amid the stripped trees.




A LUNCHEON IN THE PLACE VENDOME

There were scarcely more than a score of persons that morning in the
Nabob's dining-room, a dining-room in carved oak, supplied the previous
evening as it were by some great upholsterer, who at the same stroke had
furnished these suites of four drawing-rooms of which you caught sight
through an open doorway, the hangings on the ceiling, the objects of
art, the chandeliers, even the very plate on the sideboards and the
servants who were in attendance. It was obviously the kind of interior
improvised the moment he was out of the railway-train by a gigantic
_parvenu_ in haste to enjoy. Although around the table there was no
trace of any feminine presence, no bright frock to enliven it, its
aspect was yet not monotonous, thanks to the dissimilarity, the oddness
of the guests, people belonging to every section of society, specimens
of humanity detached from all races, in France, in Europe, in the entire
globe, from the top to the bottom of the social ladder. To begin with,
the master of the house--a kind of giant, tanned, burned by the sun,
saffron-coloured, with head in his shoulders. His nose, which was short
and lost in the puffiness of his face, his woolly hair massed like a
cap of astrakhan above a low and obstinate forehead, and his bristly
eyebrows with eyes like those of an ambushed chapard gave him the
ferocious aspect of a Kalmuck, of some frontier savage living by war and
rapine. Fortunately the lower part of the face, the fleshy and strong
lip which was lightened now and then by a smile adorable in its
kindness, quite redeemed, by an expression like that of a St. Vincent de
Paul, this fierce ugliness, this physiognomy so original that it was
no longer vulgar. An inferior extraction, however, betrayed itself yet
again by the voice, the voice of a Rhone waterman, raucous and thick,
in which the southern accent became rather uncouth than hard, and by two
broad and short hands, hairy at the back, square and nailless fingers
which, laid on the whiteness of the table-cloth, spoke of their past
with an embarrassing eloquence. Opposite him, on the other side of the
table at which he was one of the habitual guests, was seated the Marquis
de Monpavon, but a Monpavon presenting no resemblance to the painted
spectre of whom we had a glimpse in the last chapter. He was now a
haughty man of no particular age, fine majestic nose, a lordly bearing,
displaying a large shirt-front of immaculate linen crackling beneath
the continual effort of the chest to throw itself forward, and bulging
itself out each time with a noise like that made by a white turkey when
it struts in anger, or by a peacock when he spreads his tail. His name
of Monpavon suited him well.

Of great family and of a wealthy stock, but ruined by gambling and
speculation, the friendship of the Duc de Mora had secured him an
appointment as receiver-general in the first class. Unfortunately
his health had not permitted him to retain this handsome
position--well-informed people said his health had nothing to do with
it--and for the last year he had been living in Paris, awaiting his
restoration to health, according to his own account of the matter,
before resuming his post. The same people were confident that he
would never regain it, and that even were it not for certain exalted
influences--However, he was the important personage of the luncheon;
that was clear from the manner in which the servants waited upon him,
and the Nabob consulted him, calling him "Monsieur le Marquis," as at
the Comedie-Francaise, less almost out of deference than from pride, by
reason of the honour which it reflected upon himself. Full of disdain
for the people around him, M. le Marquis spoke little, in a very
high voice, and as though he were stooping towards those whom he was
honouring with his conversation. From time to time he would throw to the
Nabob across the table a few words enigmatical for all.

"I saw the duke yesterday. He was talking a great deal about you in
connection with that matter. You know, that thing--that business. What
was the name of it?"

"You really mean it? He spoke of me to you?" And the good Nabob, quite
proud, would look around him with movements of the head that were
supremely laughable, or perhaps assume the contemplative air of a
devotee who should hear the name of Our Lord pronounced.

"His excellency would have pleasure in seeing you take up the--ps, ps,
ps--the thing."

"He told you so?"

"Ask the governor if he did not--heard it like myself."

The person who was called the governor--Paganetti, to give him his
real name--was a little, expressive man, constantly gesticulating and
fatiguing to behold, so many were the different expressions which his
face would assume in the course of a single minute. He was managing
director of the Territorial Bank of Corsica, a vast financial
enterprise, and had now come to the house for the first time, introduced
by Monpavon; he occupied accordingly a place of honour. On the other
side of the Nabob was an old gentleman, buttoned up to the chin in a
frock-coat having a straight collar without lapels, like an Oriental
tunic, his face slashed by a thousand little bloodshot veins and wearing
a white moustache of military cut. It was Brahim Bey, the most valiant
colonel of the Regency of Tunis, aide-de-camp of the former Bey who had
made the fortune of Jansoulet. The glorious exploits of this warrior
showed themselves written in wrinkles, in blemishes wrought by
debauchery upon the nerveless under-lip that hung as it were relaxed,
and upon his eyes without lashes, inflamed and red. It was a head such
as one may see in the dock at certain criminal trials that are held with
closed doors. The other guests were seated pell-mell, just as they had
happened to arrive or to find themselves, for the house was open to
everybody, and the table was laid every morning for thirty persons.

There were present the manager of the theatre financed by the Nabob,
Cardailhac, renowned for his wit almost as much as for his insolvencies,
a marvellous carver who, while he was engaged in severing the limbs of
a partridge, would prepare one of his witticisms and deposit it with
a wing upon the plate which was presented to him. He worked up his
witticisms instead of improvising them, and the new fashion of serving
meats, _a la Russe_ and carved beforehand, had been fatal to him by its
removal of all excuse for a preparatory silence. Consequently it was the
general remark that his vogue was on the decline. Parisian, moreover,
a dandy to the finger tips, and, as he himself was wont to boast, "with
not one particle of superstition in his whole body," a characteristic
which permitted him to give very piquant details concerning the ladies
of his theatre to Brahim Bey--who listened to him as one turns over the
pages of a naughty book--and to talk theology to the young priest who
was his nearest neighbour, a curate of some little southern village,
lean and with a complexion sunburnt till it matched the cloth of his
cassock in colour, with fiery patches above the cheek-bones, and the
pointed, forward-pushing nose of the ambitious man, who would remark
to Cardailhac very loudly, in a tone of protection and sacerdotal
authority:

"We are quite pleased with M. Guizot. He is doing very well--very well.
It is a conquest for the Church."

Seated next this pontiff, with a black neck-band, old Schwalbach, the
famous picture-dealer, displayed his prophet's beard, tawny in places
like a dirty fleece, his three overcoats tinged by mildew, all that
loose and negligent attire for which he was excused in the name of art,
and because, in a time when the mania for picture galleries had already
begun to cause millions to change hands, it was the proper thing to
entertain the man who was the best placed for the conduct of these
absurdly vain transactions. Schwalbach did not speak, contenting himself
with gazing around him through his enormous monocle, shaped like a
hand magnifying-glass, and with smiling in his beard over the singular
neighbours made by this unique assembly. Thus it happened that M. de
Monpavon had quite close to him--and it was a sight to watch how the
disdainful curve of his nose was accentuated at each glance in that
direction--the singer Garrigou, a fellow-countryman of Jansoulet, a
distinguished ventriloquist who sang Figaro in the dialect of the south,
and had no equal in his imitations of animals. Just beyond, Cabassu,
another compatriot, a little short and dumpy man, with the neck of a
bull and the biceps of a statue by Michel Angelo, who suggested at
once a Marseilles hairdresser and the strong man at a fair, a masseur,
pedicure, manicure, and something of a dentist, sat with elbows on the
table with the coolness of a charlatan whom one receives in the morning
and knows the little infirmities, the intimate distresses of the abode
in which he chances to find himself. M. Bompain completed this array
of subordinates, all alike in one respect at any rate, Bompain, the
secretary, the steward, the confidential agent, through whose hands the
entire business of the house passed; and it sufficed to observe that
solemnly stupid attitude, that indefinite manner, the Turkish fez placed
awkwardly on a head suggestive of a village school-master, in order to
understand to what manner of people interests like those of the Nabob
had been abandoned.

Finally, to fill the gaps among these figures I have sketched, the
Turkish crowd--Tunisians, Moors, Egyptians, Levantines; and, mingled
with this exotic element, a whole variegated Parisian Bohemia of ruined
nobleman, doubtful traders, penniless journalists, inventors of strange
products, people arrived from the south without a farthing, all the lost
ships needing revictualling, or flocks of birds wandering aimlessly in
the night, which were drawn by this great fortune as by the light of a
beacon. The Nabob admitted this miscellaneous collection of individuals
to his table out of kindness, out of generosity, out of weakness, by
reason of his easy-going manners, joined to an absolute ignorance and
a survival of that loneliness of the exile, of that need for expansion
which, down yonder in Tunis, in his splendid palace of the Bardo, had
caused him to welcome everybody who hailed from France, from the small
tradesman exporting Parisian wares to the famous pianist on tour and the
consul-general himself.

As one listened to those various accents, those foreign intonations,
gruff or faltering, as one gazed upon those widely different
physiognomies, some violent, barbarous, vulgar, others hyper-civilized,
worn, suggestive only of the Boulevard and as it were flaccid, one noted
that the same diversity was evident also among the servants who, some
apparently lads just out of an office, insolent in manner, with heads
of hair like a dentist's or a bath-attendant's, busied themselves among
Ethiopians standing motionless and shining like candelabra of black
marble, and it was impossible to say exactly where one was; in any case,
you would never have imagined yourself to be in the Place Vendome, right
in the beating heart and very centre of the life of our modern Paris.
Upon the table there was a like importation of exotic dishes, saffron or
anchovy sauces, spices mixed up with Turkish delicacies, chickens with
fried almonds, and all this taken together with the banality of the
interior, the gilding of the panels, the shrill ringing of the new
bells, gave the impression of a _table d'hote_ in some big hotel
in Smyrna or Calcutta, or of a luxurious dining-saloon on board a
transatlantic liner, the "Pereire" or the "Sinai."

It might seem that this diversity among the guests--I was about to say
among the passengers--ought to have caused the meal to be animated and
noisy. Far otherwise. They all ate nervously, watching each other out
of eye-corners, and even those most accustomed to society, those who
appeared the most at their ease, had in their glance the wandering look
and the distraction of a fixed idea, a feverish anxiety which caused
them to speak without relevance and to listen without understanding a
word of what was being said to them.

Suddenly the door of the dining-room opened.

"Ah, here comes Jenkins!" exclaimed the Nabob delightedly. "Welcome,
welcome, doctor. How are you, my friend?"

A smile to those around, a hearty shake of his host's hand, and Jenkins
sat down opposite him, next to Monpavon, before a place at the table
which a servant had just prepared in all haste and without having
received any order, exactly as at a _table d'hote_. Among those
preoccupied and feverish faces, this one at any rate stood out in
contrast by its good humour, its cheerfulness, and that loquacious and
flattering benevolence which makes the Irish in a way the Gascons of
England. And what a splendid appetite! With what heartiness, what ease
of conscience he used his white teeth as he talked!

"Well, Jansoulet, you have read it?"

"What?"

"How, then! you do not know? You have not read what the _Messenger_ says
about you this morning?"

Beneath the dark tan of his cheeks the Nabob blushed like a child, and,
his eyes shining with pleasure:

"Is it possible--the _Messenger_ has spoken of me?"

"Through two columns. How is it that Moessard has not shown it to you?"

"Oh," put in Moessard modestly, "it was not worth the trouble."

He was a little journalist, with a fair complexion and smart in his
dress, sufficiently good-looking, but with a face which presented
that worn appearance noticeable as the special mark of waiters in
night-restaurants, actors, and light women, and produced by conventional
grimacing and the wan reflection of gaslight. He was reputed to be the
paid lover of an exiled and profligate queen. The rumour was whispered
around him, and, in his own world, secured him an envied and despicable
position.

Jansoulet insisted on reading the article, impatient to know what had
been said of him. Unfortunately Jenkins had left his copy at the duke's.

"Let some one go fetch me a _Messenger_ quickly," said the Nabob to the
servant behind him.

Moessard intervened.

"It is needless. I must have the thing on me somewhere."

And with the absence of ceremony of the tavern _habitue_, of the
reporter who scribbles his paragraph with his glass beside him, the
journalist drew out a pocket-book, crammed full of notes, stamped
papers, newspaper cuttings, notes written on glazed paper with crests,
which he proceeded to litter over the table, pushing away his plate in
order to search for the proof of his article.

"There you are." He passed it over to Jansoulet; but Jenkins besought
him:

"No, no; read it aloud."

The company having echoed the request in chorus, Moessard took back his
proof and commenced to read in a loud voice, "The Bethlehem Society
and Mr. Bernard Jansoulet," a long dithyramb in favour of artificial
lactation, written from notes made by Jenkins, which were recognisable
through certain fine phrases much affected by the Irishman, such as "the
long martyrology of childhood," "the sordid traffic in the breast," "the
beneficent nanny-goat as foster-mother," and finishing, after a pompous
description of the splendid establishment at Nanterre, with a eulogy
of Jenkins and a glorification of Jansoulet: "O Bernard Jansoulet,
benefactor of childhood!" It was a sight to see the vexed, scandalized
faces of the guests. What an intriguer was this Moessard! What an
impudent piece of sycophantry! And the same envious, disdainful smile
quivered on every mouth. And the deuce of it was that a man had to
applaud, to appear charmed, the master of the house not being weary as
yet of incense, and taking everything very seriously, both the article
and the applause it provoked. His big face shone during the reading.
Often, down yonder, far away, had he dreamed a dream of having his
praises sung like this in the newspapers of Paris, of being somebody
in that society, the first among all, on which the entire world has its
eyes fixed as on the bearer of a torch. Now, that dream was becoming
a reality. He gazed upon all these people seated at his board, the
sumptuous dessert, this panelled dining-room as high, certainly, as the
church of his native village; he listened to the dull murmur of Paris
rolling along in its carriages and treading the pavements beneath his
windows, with the intimate conviction that he was about to become
an important piece in that active and complicated machine. And then,
through the atmosphere of physical well-being produced by the meal,
between the lines of that triumphant vindication, by an effect of
contrast, he beheld unfold itself his own existence, his youth,
adventurous as it was sad, the days without bread, the nights without
shelter. Then suddenly, the reading having come to an end, his joy
overflowing in one of those southern effusions which force thought
into speech, he cried, beaming upon his guests with that frank and
thick-lipped smile of his:

"Ah, my friends, my dear friends, if you could know how happy I am! What
pride I feel!"

Scarce six weeks had passed since he had landed in France. Excepting two
or three compatriots, those whom he thus addressed as his friends were
but the acquaintances of a day, and that through his having lent
them money. This sudden expansion, therefore, appeared sufficiently
extraordinary; but Jansoulet, too much under the sway of emotion to
notice anything, continued:

"After what I have just heard, when I behold myself here in this
great Paris, surrounded by all its wealth of illustrious names, of
distinguished intellects, and then call up the remembrance of my
father's booth! For I was born in a booth. My father used to sell old
nails at the corner of a boundary stone in the Bourg-Saint-Andeol. If we
had bread in the house every day and stew every Sunday it was the most
we had to expect. Ask Cabassu whether it was not so. He knew me in those
days. He can tell you whether I am not speaking the truth. Oh, yes, I
have known what poverty is." He threw back his head with an impulse
of pride as he savoured the odour of truffles diffused through the
suffocating atmosphere. "I have known it, and the real thing too, and
for a long time. I have been cold. I have known hunger--genuine hunger,
remember--the hunger that intoxicates, that wrings the stomach, sets
circles dancing in your head, deprives you of sight as if the inside of
your eyes was being gouged out with an oyster-knife. I have passed days
in bed for want of an overcoat to go out in; fortunate at that when
I had a bed, which was not always. I have sought my bread from every
trade, and that bread cost me such bitter toil, it was so black, so
tough, that in my mouth I keep still the flavour of its acrid and mouldy
taste. And thus until I was thirty. Yes, my friends, at thirty years
of age--and I am not yet fifty--I was still a beggar, without a sou,
without a future, with the remorseful thought of the poor old mother,
become a widow, who was half-dying of hunger away yonder in her booth,
and to whom I had nothing to give."

Around this Amphitryon recounting the story of his evil days the faces
of his hearers expressed curiosity. Some appeared shocked, Monpavon
especially. For him, this exposure of rags was in execrable taste, an
absolute breach of good manners. Cardailhac, sceptical and dainty, an
enemy to scenes of emotion, with face set as if it were hypnotized,
sliced a fruit on the end of his fork into wafers as thin as cigarette
papers.

The governor exhibited, on the contrary, a flatly admiring demeanour,
uttering exclamations of amazement and compassion; while, not far away,
in singular contrast, Brahmin Bey, the thunderbolt of war, upon whom
this reading followed by a lecture after a heavy meal had had the effect
of inducing a restorative slumber, slept with his mouth open beneath his
white moustache, his face congested by his collar, which had slipped
up. But the most general expression was one of indifference and boredom.
What could it matter to them, I ask you; what had they to do with
Jansoulet's childhood in the Bourg-Saint-Andeol, the trials he had
endured, the way in which he had trudged his path? They had not come to
listen to idle nonsense of that kind. Airs of interest falsely affected,
glances that counted the ovals of the ceiling or the bread-crumbs on the
table-cloth, mouths compressed to stifle a yawn, betrayed, accordingly,
the general impatience provoked by this untimely story. Yet he himself
seemed not to weary of it. He found pleasure in the recital of his
sufferings past, even as the mariner safe in port, remembering his
voyagings over distant seas, and the perils and the great shipwrecks.
There followed the story of his good luck, the prodigious chance that
had placed him suddenly upon the road to fortune. "I was wandering about
the quays of Marseilles with a comrade as poverty-stricken as myself,
who is become rich, he also, in the service of the Bey, and, after
having been my chum, my partner, is now my most cruel enemy. I may
mention his name, _pardi_! It is sufficiently well known--Hemerlingue.
Yes, gentlemen, the head of the great banking house. 'Hemerlingue &
Co.' had not in those days even the wherewithal to buy a pennyworth of
_clauvisses_ on the quay. Intoxicated by the atmosphere of travel that
one breathes down there, the idea came into our minds of starting out,
of going to seek our livelihood in some country where the sun shines,
since the lands of mist were so inhospitable to us. But where to go? We
did what sailors sometimes do in order to decide in what low hole they
will squander their pay. You fix a scrap of paper on the brim of your
hat. You make the hat spin on a walking-stick; when it stops spinning
you follow the pointer. In our case the paper needle pointed towards
Tunis. A week later I landed at Tunis with half a louis in my pocket,
and I came back to-day with twenty-five millions!"

An electric shock passed round the table; there was a gleam in every
eye, even in those of the servants. Cardailhac said, "Phew!" Monpavon's
nose descended to common humanity.

"Yes, my boys, twenty-five millions in liquidated cash, without speaking
of all that I have left in Tunis, of my two palaces at the Bardo, of my
vessels in the harbour of La Goulette, of my diamonds, of my precious
stones, which are worth certainly more than the double. And you know,"
he added, with his kindly smile and in his hoarse, plebeian voice, "when
that is done there will still be more."

The whole company rose to its feet, galvanized.

"Bravo! Ah, bravo!"

"Splendid!"

"Deuced clever--deuced clever!"

"Now, that is something worth talking about."

"A man like him ought to be in the Chamber."

"He will be, _per Bacco_! I answer for it," said the governor in a
piercing voice; and in the transport of admiration, not knowing how to
express his enthusiasm, he seized the fat, hairy hand of the Nabob and
on an unreflective impulse raised it to his lips. They are demonstrative
in his country. Everybody was standing up; no one sat down again.

Jansoulet, beaming, had risen in his turn, and, throwing down his
serviette: "Let us go and have some coffee," he said.

A glad tumult immediately spread through the salons, vast apartments in
which light, decoration, sumptuousness, were represented by gold alone.
It seemed to fall from the ceiling in blinding rays, it oozed from
the walls in mouldings, sashes, framings of every kind. A little of it
remained on your hands if you moved a piece of furniture or opened a
window; and the very hangings, dipped in this Pactolus, kept on their
straight folds the rigidity, the sparkle of a metal. But nothing bearing
the least personal stamp, nothing intimate, nothing thought out. The
monotonous luxury of the furnished flat. And there was a re-enforcement
of this impression of a moving camp, of a merely provisory home, in the
suggestion of travel which hovered like an uncertainty or a menace over
this fortune derived from far-off sources.

Coffee having been served, in the Eastern manner, with all its grounds,
in little cups filigreed with silver, the guests grouped themselves
round, making haste to drink, scalding themselves, keeping watchful eyes
on each other and especially on the Nabob as they looked out for the
favourable moment to spring upon him, draw him into some corner of those
immense rooms, and at length negotiate their loan. For this it was that
they had been awaiting for two hours; this was the object of their visit
and the fixed idea which gave them during the meal that absent, falsely
attentive manner. But here no more constraint, no more pretence. In that
peculiar social world of theirs it is of common knowledge that in the
Nabob's busy life the hour of coffee remains the only time free for
private audiences, and each desiring to profit by it, all having come
there in order to snatch a handful of wool from the golden fleece
offered them with so much good nature, people no longer talk, they no
longer listen, every man is absorbed in his own errand of business.

It is the good Jenkins who begins. Having drawn his friend Jansoulet
aside into a recess, he submits to him the estimates for the house at
Nanterre. A big purchase, indeed! A cash price of a hundred and fifty
thousand francs, then considerable expenses in connection with getting
the place into proper order, the personal staff, the bedding, the
nanny-goats for milking purposes, the manager's carriage, the omnibuses
going to meet the children coming by every train. A great deal of money.
But how well off and comfortable they will be there, those dear little
things! what a service rendered to Paris, to humanity! The Government
cannot fail to reward with a bit of red ribbon so disinterested, so
philanthropic a devotion. "The Cross, on the 15th of August." With these
magic words Jenkins will obtain everything he desires. In his merry,
guttural voice, which seems always as though it were hailing a boat in a
fog, the Nabob calls, "Bompain!"

The man in the fez, quickly leaving the liqueur-stand, walks
majestically across the room, whispers, moves away, and returns with
an inkstand and a counterfoil check-book from which the slips detach
themselves and fly away of their own accord. A fine thing, wealth!
To sign a check on his knee for two hundred thousand francs troubles
Jansoulet no more than to draw a louis from his pocket.

Furious, with noses in their cups, the others watch this little scene
from a distance. Then, as Jenkins takes his departure, bright, smiling,
with a nod to the various groups, Monpavon seizes the governor: "Now is
our chance." And both, springing on the Nabob, drag him off towards a
couch, oblige him almost forcibly to sit down, press upon each side of
him with a ferocious little laugh that seems to signify, "What shall we
do with him now?" Get the money out of him, the largest amount possible.
It is needed, to set afloat once more the Territorial Bank, for years
lain aground on a sand-bank, buried to the very top of its masts. A
superb operation, this re-flotation, if these two gentlemen are to be
believed, for the submerged bank is full of ingots, of precious things,
of the thousand various forms of wealth of a new country discussed by
everybody and known by none.

In founding this unique establishment, Paganetti of Porto-Vecchio had
as his aim to monopolize the commercial development of the whole of
Corsica: iron mines, sulphur mines, copper mines, marble quarries,
coral fisheries, oyster beds, water ferruginous and sulphurous, immense
forests of thuya, of cork-oak, and to establish for the facilitation of
this development a network of railways over the island, with a service
of packet-boats in addition. Such is the gigantic undertaking to which
he has devoted himself. He has sunk considerable capital in it, and it
is the new-comer, the workman of the last hour, who will gain the whole
profit.

While with his Italian accent and violent gestures the Corsican
enumerates the "splendours" of the affair, Monpavon, haughty, and with
an air calculated to command confidence, nods his head approvingly with
conviction, and from time to time, when he judges the moment propitious,
throws into the conversation the name of the Duc de Mora, which never
fails in its effect on the Nabob.

"Well, in short, how much would be required?"

"Millions," says Monpavon boldly, in the tone of a man who would have
no difficulty in addressing himself elsewhere. "Yes, millions; but the
enterprise is magnificent. And, as his excellency was saying, it would
provide even a political position. Just think! In that district without
a metallic currency, you might become counsellor-general, deputy." The
Nabob gives a start. And the little Paganetti, who feels the bait quiver
on his hook: "Yes, deputy. You will be that whenever I choose. At a sign
from me all Corsica is at your disposal." Then he launches out into an
astonishing improvisation, counting the votes which he controls, the
cantons which will obey his call. "You bring me your capital. I--I give
you an entire people." The cause is gained.

"Bompain, Bompain!" calls the Nabob, roused to enthusiasm. He has now
but one fear, that is lest the thing escape him; and in order to bind
Paganetti, who has not concealed his need of money, he hastens to
effect the payment of a first instalment to the Territorial bank. New
appearance of the man in red breeches with the check-book which he
carries clasped gravely to his chest, like a choir-boy moving the Gospel
from one side to the other. New inscription of Jansoulet's signature
upon a slip, which the governor pockets with a negligent air and which
operates on his person a sudden transformation. The Paganetti who was
so humble and spiritless just now, goes away with the assurance of a
man worth four hundred thousand francs, while Monpavon, carrying it even
higher than usual, follows after him in his steps, and watches over him
with a more than paternal solicitude.

"That's a good piece of business done," says the Nabob to himself. "I
can drink my coffee now."

But the borrowers are waiting for him to pass. The most prompt, the most
adroit, is Cardailhac, the manager, who lays hold of him and bears him
off into a side-room.

"Let us have a little talk, old friend. I must explain to you the
situation of affairs in connection with our theatre." Very complicated,
doubtless, the situation; for here is M. Bompain who advances once more,
and there are the slips of blue paper flying away from the check-book.
Whose turn now? There is the journalist Moessard coming to draw his
pay for the article in the _Messenger_; the Nabob will find out what it
costs to have one's self called "benefactor of childhood" in the morning
papers. There is the parish priest from the country who demands funds
for the restoration of his church, and takes checks by assault with the
brutality of a Peter the Hermit. There is old Schwalbach coming up with
nose in his beard and winking mysteriously.

"Sh! He had found a pearl for monsieur's gallery, an Hobbema from the
collection of the Duc de Mora. But several people are after it. It will
be difficult--"

"I must have it at any price," says the Nabob, hooked by the name of
Mora. "You understand, Schwalbach. I must have this Hobbema. Twenty
thousand francs for you if you secure it."

"I shall do my utmost, M. Jansoulet."

And the old rascal calculates, as he goes away, that the twenty thousand
of the Nabob added to the ten thousand promised him by the duke if he
gets rid of his picture for him, will make a nice little profit for
himself.

While these fortunate ones follow each other, others look on around,
wild with impatience, biting their nails to the quick, for all are come
on the same errand. From the good Jenkins, who opened the advance, to
the masseur Cabassu, who closes it, all draw the Nabob away to some
room apart. But, however far they lead him down this gallery of
reception-rooms, there is always some indiscreet mirror to reflect the
profile of the host and the gestures of his broad back. That back has
eloquence. Now and then it straightens itself up in indignation.
"Oh, no; that is too much." Or again it sinks forward with a comical
resignation. "Well, since it must be so." And always Bompain's fez in
some corner of the view.

When those are finished, others arrive. They are the small fry who
follow in the wake of the big eaters in the ferocious hunts of the
rivers. There is a continual coming and going through these handsome
white-and-gold drawing rooms, a noise of doors, an established current
of bare-faced and vulgar exploitation attracted from the four corners of
Paris and the suburbs by this gigantic fortune and incredible facility.

For these small sums, these regular distributions, recourse was not had
to the check-book. For such purposes the Nabob kept in one of his
rooms a mahogany chest of drawers, a horrible little piece of furniture
representing the savings of a house porter, the first that Jansoulet had
bought when he had been able to give up living in furnished apartments;
which he had preserved since, like a gambler's fetish; and the three
drawers of which contained always two hundred thousand francs in cash.
It was to this constant supply that he had recourse on the days of his
large receptions, displaying a certain ostentation in the way in which
he would handle the gold and silver, by great handfuls, thrusting it to
the bottom of his pockets to draw it out thence with the gesture of
a cattle dealer; a certain vulgar way of raising the skirts of his
frock-coat and of sending his hand "to the bottom and into the pile."
To-day there must be a terrible void in the drawers of the little chest.

After so many mysterious whispered confabulations, demands more or less
clearly formulated, chance entries and triumphant departures, the last
client having been dismissed, the chest of drawers closed and locked,
the flat in the Place Vendome began to empty in the uncertain light of
the afternoon towards four o'clock, that close of the November days so
exceedingly prolonged afterward by artificial light. The servants were
clearing away the coffee and the raki, and bearing off the open and
half-emptied cigar-boxes. The Nabob, thinking himself alone, gave a sigh
of relief. "Ouf! that's over." But no. Opposite him, some one comes out
from a corner that is already dark, and approaches with a letter in his
hand.

Another!

And at once, mechanically, the poor man made that eloquent,
horse-dealer's gesture of his. Instinctively, also, the visitor showed a
movement of recoil so prompt, so hurt, that the Nabob understood that he
was making a mistake, and took the trouble to examine the young man who
stood before him, simply but correctly dressed, of a dull complexion,
without the least sign of a beard, with regular features, perhaps a
little too serious and fixed for his age, which, aided by his hair of
pale blond colour, curled in little ringlets like a powdered wig, gave
him the appearance of a young deputy of the Commons under Louis XVI, the
head of a Barnave at twenty! This face, although the Nabob beheld it for
the first time, was not absolutely unknown to him.

"What do you desire, monsieur?"

Taking the letter which the young man held out to him, he went to a
window in order to see to read it.

"Te! It is from mamma."

He said it with so happy an air; that word "mamma" lit up all his face
with so young, so kind a smile, that the visitor, who had been at first
repulsed by the vulgar aspect of this _parvenu_, felt himself filled
with sympathy for him.

In an undertone the Nabob read these few lines written in an awkward
hand, incorrect and shaky, which contrasted with the large glazed
note-paper, with its heading "Chateau de Saint-Romans."

"My dear son, this letter will be delivered to you by the eldest son of
M. de Gery, the former justice of the peace for Bourg-Saint-Andeol, who
has shown us so much kindness."

The Nabob broke off his reading.

"I ought to have recognised you, M. de Gery. You resemble your father.
Sit down, I beg of you."

Then he finished running through the letter. His mother asked him
nothing precise, but, in the name of the services which the de Gery
family had rendered them in former years, she recommended M. Paul to
him. An orphan, burdened with the care of his two young brothers, he had
been called to the bar in the south, and was now coming to Paris to seek
his fortune. She implored Jansoulet to aid him, "for he needed it badly,
poor fellow," and she signed herself, "Thy mother who pines for thee,
Francoise."

This letter from his mother, whom he had not seen for six years, those
expressions of the south country of which he could hear the intonations
that he knew so well, that coarse handwriting which sketched for him an
adored face, all wrinkled, scored, and cracked, but smiling beneath its
peasant's head-dress, had affected the Nabob. During the six weeks
that he had been in France, lost in the whirl of Paris, the business of
getting settled in his new habitation, he had not yet given a thought
to his dear old lady at home; and now he saw all of her again in these
lines. He remained a moment looking at the letter, which trembled in his
heavy fingers.

Then, this emotion having passed:

"M. de Gery," said he, "I am glad of the opportunity which is about to
permit me to repay to you a little of the kindness which your family has
shown to mine. From to-day, if you consent, I take you into my house.
You are educated, you seem intelligent, you can be of great service
to me. I have a thousand plans, a thousand affairs in hand. I am being
drawn into a crowd of large industrial enterprises. I want some one who
will aid me; represent me at need. I have indeed a secretary, a steward,
that excellent Bompain, but the unfortunate fellow knows nothing of
Paris; he has been, as it were, bewildered ever since his arrival. You
will tell me that you also come straight from the country, but that
does not matter. Well brought up as you are, a southerner, alert and
adaptable, you will quickly pick up the routine of the Boulevard. For
the rest, I myself undertake your education from that point of view. In
a few weeks you will find yourself, I answer for it, as much at home in
Paris as I am."

Poor man! It was touching to hear him speak of his Parisian habits, and
of his experience; he whose destiny it was to be always a beginner.

"Now, that is understood, is it not? I engage you as secretary. You will
have a fixed salary which we will settle directly, and I shall provide
you with the opportunity to make your fortune rapidly."

And while de Gery, raised suddenly above all the anxieties of a
newcomer, of one who solicits a favour, of a neophyte, did not move for
fear of awaking from a dream:

"Now," said the Nabob to him in a gentle voice, "sit down there, next
me, and let us talk a little about mamma."




MEMOIRS OF AN OFFICE PORTER A MERE GLANCE AT THE TERRITORIAL BANK

I had just finished my frugal morning repast and, as my habit was,
placed the remains of my modest provisions in the board-room safe with a
secret lock, which has served me as a store-cupboard during four years,
almost, that I have been at the Territorial. Suddenly the governor walks
into the offices, with his face all red and eyes inflamed, as though
after a night's feasting, draws in his breath noisily, and in rude terms
says to me, with his Italian accent:

"But this place stinks, _Moussiou_ Passajon."

The place did not stink, if you like the word. Only--shall I say
it?--I had ordered a few onions to garnish a knuckle of veal which Mme.
Seraphine had sent down to me, she being the cook on the second floor,
whose accounts I write out for her every evening. I tried to explain the
matter to the governor, but he had flown into a temper, saying that to
his mind there was no sense in poisoning the atmosphere of an office in
that way, and that it was not worth while to maintain premises at a
rent of twelve thousand francs, with eight windows fronting full on the
Boulevard Malesherbes, in order to roast onions in them. I don't know
what he did not say to me in his passion. For my own part, naturally
I got angry at hearing myself addressed in that insolent manner. It is
surely the least a man can do to be polite with people in his service
whom he does not pay. What the deuce! So I answered him that it was
annoying, in truth, but that if the Territorial Bank paid me what it
owed me, namely, four years' arrears of salary, _plus_ seven thousand
francs personal advances made by me to the governor for expenses of
cabs, newspapers, cigars, and American grogs on board days, I would go
and eat decently at the nearest cookshop, and should not be reduced to
cooking, in the room where our board was accustomed to sit, a wretched
stew, for which I had to thank the public compassion of female cooks.
Take that!

In speaking thus I had yielded to an impulse of indignation very
excusable in the eyes of any person whatever acquainted with my position
here. Even so, I had said nothing improper and had confined myself
within the limits of language conformable to my age and education. (I
must have mentioned somewhere in the course of these memoirs that of the
sixty-five years I have lived I passed more than thirty as beadle to the
Faculty of Letters in Dijon. Hence my taste for reports and memoirs, and
those ideas of academical style of which traces will be found in many
passages of this lucubration.) I had, then, expressed myself in the
governor's presence with the most complete reserve, without employing
any one of those terms of abuse to which he is treated by everybody
here, from our two censors--M. de Monpavon, who, every time he comes,
calls him laughingly "Fleur-de-Mazas," and M. de Bois l'Hery, of the
Trumpet Club, coarse as a groom, who, for adieu, always greets him with,
"To your bedstead, bug!"--to our cashier, whom I have heard repeat a
hundred times, tapping on his big book, "That he has in there enough
to send him to the galleys when he pleases." Ah, well! All the same,
my simple observation produced an extraordinary effect upon him. The
circles round his eyes became quite yellow, and, trembling with
rage, one of those evil rages of his country, he uttered these words:
"Passajon, you are a blackguard. One word more, and I discharge you!"
Stupor nailed me to the floor when I heard them. Discharge me--_me!_ and
my four years' arrears, and my seven thousand francs of money lent!

As though he could read my thought before it was put into words, the
governor replied that all accounts were going to be settled, mine
included. "And as to that," he added, "summon these gentlemen to my
private room. I have important news to announce to them."

Upon that, he went into his office, banging the doors.

That devil of a man! In vain you may know him to the core--know him a
liar, a comedian--he manages always to get the better of you with his
stories. My account, mine!--mine! I was so affected by the thought that
my legs seemed to give way beneath me as I went to inform the staff.

According to the regulations, there are twelve of us employed at the
Territorial Bank, including the governor and the handsome Moessard,
manager of _Financial Truth_; but more than half of that number were
wanting. To begin with, since _Truth_ ceased to be issued--it is two
years since its last appearance--M. Moessard has not once set foot in
the place. It seems he moves amid honours and riches, has a queen for
his mistress--a real queen--who gives him all the money he desires. Oh,
what a Babylon, this Paris! The others come from time to time to learn
whether by chance anything new has happened at the bank; and, as nothing
ever has, we remain weeks without seeing them. Four or five faithful
ones, all poor old men like myself, persist in putting in an appearance
regularly every morning at the same hour, from habit, from want of
occupation, not knowing what else to do. Every one, however, busies
himself about things quite foreign to the work of the office. A man must
live, you know. And then, too, one cannot pass the day dragging one's
self from easy chair to easy chair, from window to window, to look out
of doors (eight windows fronting on the Boulevard). So one tries to do
some work as best one can. I myself, as I have said, keep the accounts
of Mme. Seraphine, and of another cook in the building. Also, I write
my memoirs, which, again, takes a good deal of my time. Our receipt
clerk--one who has not very hard work with us--makes line for a firm
that deals in fishing requisites. Of our two copying-clerks, one,
who writes a good hand, copies plays for a dramatic agency; the other
invents little halfpenny toys which the hawkers sell at street corners
about the time of the New Year, and manages by this means to keep
himself from dying of hunger during all the rest of the year. Our
cashier is the only one who does no outside work. He would believe
his honour lost if he did. He is a very proud man, who never utters a
complaint, and whose one dread is to have the appearance of being in
want of linen. Locked in his office, he is occupied from morning till
evening in the manufacture of shirt-fronts, collars, and cuffs of paper.
In this, he has attained very great skill, and his ever-dazzling linen
would deceive, if it were not that at the least movement, when he
walks, when he sits down, the stuff crackles upon him as though he had a
cardboard box under his waistcoat. Unfortunately all this paper does not
feed him; and he is so thin, has such a mien, that you ask yourself
on what he lives. Between ourselves, I suspect him of paying a visit
sometimes to my store-cupboard. He can do so with ease; for, as cashier,
he has the "word" which opens the safe with the secret lock, and I fancy
that when my back is turned he forages a little among my provisions.

These are certainly very extraordinary, very incredible internal
arrangements for a banking house. It is, however, the mere truth that
I am telling, and Paris is full of financial institutions after the
pattern of ours. Oh, if ever I publish my memoirs! But to take up the
interrupted thread of my story.

When he saw us all collected in his private room, the manager said to us
with solemnity:

"Gentlemen and dear comrades, the time of trials is ended. The
Territorial Bank inaugurates a new phase."

Upon this he commenced to speak to us of a superb _combinazione_--it is
his favourite word and he pronounces it in such an insinuating manner--a
_combinazione_ into which there was entering this famous Nabob, of whom
all the newspapers are talking. The Territorial Bank was therefore about
to find itself in a position which would enable it to acquit itself of
its obligations to its faithful servants, recognise acts of devotion,
rid itself of useless parasites. This for me, I imagine. And in
conclusion: "Prepare your statements. All accounts will be settled not
later than to-morrow." Unhappily he has so often soothed us with lying
words, that the effect of his speech was lost. Formerly these
fine promises were always swallowed. At the announcement of a new
_combinazione_, there used to be dancing, weeping for joy in the
offices, and men would embrace each other like shipwrecked sailors
discovering a sail.

Each one would prepare his account for the morrow, as he had said. But
on the morrow, no manager. The day following, still nobody. He had left
town on a little journey.

At length, one day when all would be there, exasperated, putting out our
tongues, maddened by the water which he had brought to our mouths, the
governor would arrive, let himself drop into an easy chair, his head in
his hands, and before one could speak to him: "Kill me," he would say,
"kill me. I am a wretched impostor. The _combinazione_ has failed. It
has failed, _Pechero!_ the _combinazione_." And he would cry, sob,
throw himself on his knees, pluck out his hair by handfuls, roll on the
carpet. He would call us by our Christian names, implore us to put an
end to his existence, speak of his wife and children whose ruin he had
consummated. And none of us would have the courage to protest in face of
a despair so formidable. What do I say? One always ended by sympathizing
with him. No, since theatres have existed, never has there been a
comedian of his ability. But to-day, that is all over, confidence is
gone. When he had left, every one shrugged his shoulders. I must admit,
however, that for a moment I had been shaken. That assurance about the
settling of my account, and then the name of the Nabob, that man so
rich----

"You actually believe it, you?" the cashier said to me. "You will be
always innocent, then, my poor Passajon. Don't disturb yourself. It
will be the same with the Nabob as it was with Moessard's Queen." And he
returned to the manufacture of his shirt-fronts.

What he had just said referred to the time when Moessard was making love
to his Queen, and had promised the governor that in case of success he
would induce her Majesty to put capital into our undertaking. At the
office, we were all aware of this new adventure, and very anxious,
as you may imagine, that it should succeed quickly, since our money
depended upon it. For two months this story held all of us breathless.
We felt some disquiet, we kept a watch on Moessard's face, considered
that the lady was inclined to insist upon a great deal of ceremony;
and our old cashier, with his dignified and serious air, when he was
questioned on the matter, would answer gravely, behind his wire screen:
"Nothing fresh," or "The thing is in a good way." Whereupon everybody
was contented. One would say to another, "It is making progress," as
though merely an ordinary enterprise was in question. No, in good truth,
there is only one Paris, where one can see such things. Positively it
makes your head turn sometimes. In a word, Moessard, one fine morning,
ceased coming to the office. He had succeeded, it appears, but the
Territorial Bank had not seemed to him a sufficiently advantageous
investment for the money of his mistress. Now, I ask you, was that
honest?

For that matter, the notion of honesty is lost so easily as hardly to
be believed. When I reflect that I, Passajon, with my white hair, my
venerable appearance, my so blameless past--thirty years of academical
services--am grown accustomed to living like a fish in the water, in the
midst of these infamies, this swindling! One might well ask what I am
doing here, why I remain, how I am come to this.

How I am come to it? Oh, _mon Dieu!_ very simply. Four years ago, my
wife being dead, my children married, I had just retired from my post
as hall-porter at the college, when an advertisement in the newspaper
chanced to meet my eye: "Wanted, an office-porter, middle-aged, at the
Territorial Bank, 56, Boulevard Malesherbes. Good references." Let me
confess it at the outset. The modern Babylon had always attracted me.
Then, too, I felt myself still a young man. I saw before me ten good
years during which I might earn a little money, a great deal, perhaps,
by means of investing my savings in the banking-house which I should
enter. So I wrote, inclosing my photograph, the one taken at Crespon's,
in the Market Place, which represents me with chin closely shaven, a
keen eye beneath my thick white eyebrows, my steel chain about my neck,
my ribbon as an academy official, "the air of a conscript father upon
his curule-chair," as M. Chalmette, our dean used to say. (He insisted
also that I much resembled the late King Louis XVIII; less strongly,
however.) I supplied, further, the best of references; the most
flattering recommendations from the gentlemen of the college. By return
of post, the governor replied that my appearance pleased him--I believe
it, _parbleu!_ an antechamber in the charge of a person with a striking
face like mine is a bait for the shareholder--and that I might come
when I liked. I ought, you may say to me, myself also to have made my
inquiries. Eh! no doubt. But I had to give so much information about
myself that it never occurred to me to ask for any about them. Besides,
how could a man be suspicious, seeing this admirable installation,
these lofty ceilings, these great safes, as big as cupboards, and these
mirrors, in which you can see yourself from head to knee? And then
those sonorous prospectuses, those millions that I seemed to hear flying
through the air, those colossal enterprises with their fabulous profits.
I was dazzled, fascinated. It must be mentioned, too, that at the time
the house did not bear quite the aspect which it has to-day. Certainly,
business was already going badly--our business always has gone
badly--the paper appeared only at irregular intervals. But a little
_combinazione_ of the governor's enabled him to save appearances.

He had conceived the idea, just imagine, of opening a patriotic
subscription for the purpose of erecting a statue to General Paolo
Paoli, or some such name; in any case, to a great countryman of his own.
Money flowed accordingly into the Territorial. Unfortunately, that state
of things did not last. By the end of a couple of months the statue was
eaten up before it had been made, and the series of protests and writs
recommenced. Nowadays I am accustomed to them. But in the days when I
had just come from the country, the Auvergnats at the door, caused me a
painful impression. In the house, nobody paid attention to such things
any longer. It was known that at the last moment there would always
arrive a Monpavon, a Bois l'Hery, to pacify the bailiffs; for all those
gentlemen, being deeply implicated in the concern, have an interest in
avoiding a bankruptcy. That is the very circumstance which saves him,
our wily governor. The others run after their money--we know the meaning
which that expression has in gaming--and they would not like all the
stock on their hands to become worthless save to sell for waste paper.

Small and great, that is the case of all of us who are connected with
the firm. From the landlord, to whom two years' rent is owing and who,
for fear of losing it all, allows us to stay for nothing, to us poor
employees, even to me, who am involved to the extent of my seven
thousand francs of savings and my four years of arrears, we are running
after our money. That is the reason why I remain obstinately here.

Doubtless, in spite of my advanced age, thanks to my good appearance,
to my education, to the care which I have always taken of my clothes,
I might have obtained some post under other management. There is one
person of excellent repute known to me, M. Joyeuse, a bookkeeper in the
firm of Hemerlingue & Son, the great bankers of the Rue Saint-Honore,
who, every time he meets me, never fails to remark:

"Passajon, my friend, don't stop in that den of brigands. You are wrong
to persist in remaining. You will never get a halfpenny out of them. So
come to Hemerlingue's. I undertake to find some little corner for you
there. You will earn less, but you will be paid much more."

I feel that he is quite right, that worthy fellow. But the thing is
stronger than I. I cannot make up my mind to leave. And yet it is by no
means gay, the life I lead here in these great, cold rooms, where no
one ever comes, where each man stows himself away in a corner without
speaking. What will you have? Each knows the other too well. Everything
has been said already.

Again, until last year, we used to have sittings of the board of
inspection, meetings of shareholders, stormy and noisy assemblies,
veritable battles of savages, from which the cries could be heard to
the Madeleine. Several times a week also there would call subscribers
indignant at no longer ever receiving any news of their money. It was
on such occasions that our governor shone. I have seen these people,
monsieur, go into his office furious as wolves thirsting for blood,
and, after a quarter of an hour, come out milder than sheep, satisfied,
reassured, and their pockets relieved of a few bank-notes. For, there
lay the acme of his cleverness; in the extraction of money from the
unlucky people who came to demand it. Nowadays the shareholders of the
Territorial Bank no longer give any sign of existence. I think they are
all dead or else resigned to the situation. The board never meets.
The sittings only take place on paper; it is I who am charged with the
preparation of a so-called report--always the same--which I copy out
afresh each quarter. We should never see a living soul, if, at
long intervals, there did not rise from the depths of Corsica some
subscribers to the statue of Paoli, curious to know how the monument
is progressing; or, it may be, some worthy reader of _Financial Truth_,
which died over two years ago, who calls to renew his subscription with
a timid air, and begs a little more regularity, if possible, in the
forwarding of the paper. There is a faith that nothing shakes. So, when
one of these innocents falls among our hungry band, it is something
terrible. He is surrounded, hemmed in, an attempt is made to secure his
name for one of our lists, and, in case of resistance, if he wishes to
subscribe neither to the Paoli monument nor to Corsican railways, these
gentlemen deal him what they call--my pen blushes to write it--what they
call, I say, "the drayman thrust."

Here is what it is: We always keep at the office a parcel prepared in
advance, a well-corded case which arrives nominally from the railway
station while the visitor is present. "There are twenty francs carriage
to pay," says the one among us who brings the thing in. (Twenty francs,
sometimes thirty, according to the appearance of the patient.) Every
one then begins to ransack his pockets: "Twenty francs carriage! but I
haven't got it." "Nor I either. What a nuisance!" Some one runs to the
cash-till. Closed. The cashier is summoned. He is out. And the gruff
voice of the drayman, growing impatient in the antechamber: "Come, come,
make haste." (It is generally I who play the drayman, because of the
strength of my vocal organs.) What is to be done now? Return the parcel?
That will vex the governor. "Gentlemen, I beg, will you permit me,"
ventures the innocent victim, opening his purse. "Ah, monsieur,
indeed--" He hands over his twenty francs, he is ushered to the door,
and, as soon as his heel is turned, we all divide the fruit of the
crime, laughing like highway robbers.

Fie! M. Passajon. At your age, such a trade! Eh! _mon Dieu!_ I well know
it. I know that I should do myself more honour in quitting this evil
place. But what! You would have me then renounce the hope of getting
back anything of all I have put in here. No, it is not possible. There
is urgent need on the contrary that I should remain, that I should be
on the watch, always at hand, ready to profit by any windfall, if one
should come. Oh, for example, I swear it upon my ribbon, upon my thirty
years of academical service, if ever an affair like this of the Nabob
allow me to recover my disbursements, I shall not wait another single
minute. I shall quickly be off to look after my pretty vineyard down
yonder, near Monbars, cured forever of my thoughts of speculation. But,
alas! that is a very chimerical hope. Exhausted, used up, known as we
are upon the Paris market, with our stocks which are no longer quoted on
the Bourse, our bonds which are near being waste paper, so many lies, so
many debts, and the hole that grows ever deeper and deeper. (We owe
at this moment three million five hundred thousand francs. It is not,
however, those three millions that worry us. On the contrary, it is they
that keep us going; but we have with the _concierge_ a little bill of a
hundred and twenty-five francs for postage-stamps, a month's gas bill,
and other little things. That is the really terrible part of it.) and we
are expected to believe that a man, a great financier like this Nabob,
even though he were just arrived from the Congo, or dropped from the
moon the same day, would be fool enough to put his money into a concern
like this. Come! Is the thing possible? You may tell that story to the
marines, my dear governor.




A DEBUT IN SOCIETY


"M. BERNARD JANSOULET!"

The plebeian name, accentuated proudly by the liveried servants, and
announced in a resounding voice, sounded in Jenkins's drawing-rooms like
the clash of a cymbal, one of those gongs which, in fairy pieces at
the theatre, are the prelude to fantastic apparitions. The light of the
chandeliers paled, every eye sparkled at the dazzling perspective of
the treasures of the Orient, of the showers of the sequins and of pearls
evoked by the magic syllables of that name, yesterday unknown.

He, it was he himself, the Nabob, the rich among the rich, the great
Parisian curiosity, spiced by that relish of adventure which is so
pleasing to the surfeited crowd. All heads turned, all conversations
were interrupted; near the door there was a pushing among the guests,
a crush as upon the quay of a seaport to witness the entry of a felucca
laden with gold.

Jenkins himself, so hospitable, so self-possessed, who was standing in
the first drawing-room receiving his guests, abruptly quitted the
group of men about him and hurried to place himself at the head of the
galleons bearing down upon the guest.

"You are a thousand times, a thousand times kind. Mme. Jenkins will be
so glad, so proud.--Come, let me conduct you!"

And in his haste, in his vainglorious delight, he bore Jansoulet off so
quickly that the latter had no time to present his companion, Paul de
Gery, to whom he was giving his first entry into society. The young man
welcomed this forgetfulness. He slipped away among the crowd of black
dress-coats constantly pressed back at each new arrival, buried himself
in it, seized by that wild terror which is experienced by every young
man from the country at his first introduction to a Paris drawing-room,
especially when he is intelligent and refined, and beneath his
breastplate of linen does not wear like a coat of mail the imperturbable
assurance of a boor.

All you, Parisians of Paris, who from the age of sixteen, in your first
dress-coat and with opera-hat against your thigh, have been wont to air
your adolescence at receptions of all kinds, you know nothing of that
anguish, compounded of vanity, of timidity, of recollections of romantic
readings, which keeps a young man from opening his mouth and so makes
him awkward and for a whole night pins him down to one spot in a
doorway, and converts him into a piece of furniture in a recess, a poor,
wandering and wretched being, incapable of manifesting his existence
save by an occasional change of place, dying of thirst rather than
approach the buffet, and going away without having uttered a word,
unless perhaps to stammer out one of those incoherent pieces of
foolishness which he remembers for months, and which make him, at night,
as he thinks of them, heave an "Ah!" of raging shame, with head buried
in the pillow.

Paul de Gery was that martyr. Away yonder in his country home he had
always lived a very retired existence with an old, pious, and gloomy
aunt, up to the time when the law-student, destined in the first
instance to the career in which his father had left an excellent
reputation, had found himself introduced to a few judges' drawing-rooms,
ancient, melancholy dwellings with faded pier-glasses, where he used to
go to make a fourth at whist with venerable shadows. Jenkins's evening
party was therefore a _debut_ for this provincial, of whom his very
ignorance and his southern adaptability made immediately an observer.

From the place where he stood, he watched the curious defile of
Jenkins's guests which had not yet come to an end at midnight; all the
clients of the fashionable physician; the fine flower of society;
a strong political and financial element, bankers, deputies, a few
artists, all the jaded people of Parisian "high life," wan-faced, with
glittering eyes, saturated with arsenic like greedy mice, but with
appetite insatiable for poison and for life. The drawing-room being
thrown open, the vast antechamber of which the doors had been removed to
be seen, laden with flowers at the sides, the principal staircase of the
mansion, over which swept, now shaken out to their full extent, the
long trains, whose silky weight seemed to give a backward pull to the
undraped busts of the women in the course of that pretty ascending
movement which brought them into view, little by little, till the
complete flower of their splendour was reached. The couples as they
gained the top seemed to be making an entry on the stage of a theatre;
and that was twice true, since each person left on the last step the
contracted eyebrows, the lines that marked preoccupation, the wearied
air, his vexations, his sorrows, to display instead a contented face, a
gay smile over the reposeful harmony of the features. The men exchanged
honest shakes of the hand, exhibitions of fraternal good-feeling;
the women, preoccupied with themselves, as they stood making little
caracoling movements, with trembling graces, play of eyes and shoulders,
murmured, without meaning anything, a few words of greeting:

"Thank you--oh, thank you! How kind you are!"

Then the couples would separate, for evening parties are no longer the
gatherings of charming wits, in which feminine delicacy was wont to
compel the character, the lofty knowledge, the genius, even, of men
to bow graciously before it; but these overcrowded routs, in which the
women, who alone are seated, chattering together like slaves in a harem,
have no longer aught save the pleasure of being beautiful or appearing
so. De Gery, after having wandered through the doctor's library, the
conservatory, the billiard-room, where men were smoking, weary of
serious and dry conversation which seemed to him out of place amid
surroundings so decorated and in the brief hour of pleasure--some one
had asked him carelessly, without looking at him, what the Bourse
was doing that day--made his way again towards the door of the large
drawing-room, which was barricaded by a wedged crowd of dress-coats, a
sea of heads bent sideways and peering past each other, watching.

This salon was a spacious apartment richly furnished with the artistic
taste which distinguished the host and hostess. There were a few
old pictures on the light background of the hangings. A monumental
chimneypiece, adorned by a handsome group in marble--"The Seasons," by
Sebastien Ruys--around which long green stems cut in lacework or of a
goffered bronze-like rigidity curved back towards the mirror as towards
the limpidity of a clear lake. On the low seats, women in close groups,
so close as almost to blend the delicate colours of their toilettes,
forming an immense basket of living flowers, above which there floated
the gleam of bare shoulders, of hair sown with diamonds that looked like
drops of water on the dark women, glittering reflections on the fair,
and the same heady perfume, the same confused and gentle hum, compact
of vibrant warmth and intangible wings, which, in summer, caresses a
garden-bed through all its flowering time. Now and then a little laugh,
rising into this luminous atmosphere, a quicker inspiration in the air,
which would cause aigrettes and curls to tremble, a handsome profile to
stand out suddenly. Such was the aspect of the drawing-room.

A few men were present, a very small number, however, and all of them
personages of note, laden with years and decorations. They were standing
about near couches, leaning over the backs of chairs, with that air of
condescension which men assume when speaking to children. But in the
peaceful buzz of these conversations, one voice rang out piercing and
brazen, that of the Nabob, who was tranquilly performing his evolutions
across this social hothouse with the assurance bestowed upon him by his
immense wealth, and a certain contempt for women which he had brought
back from the East.

At that moment, comfortably installed on a settee, his big hands in
yellow gloves crossed carelessly one over the other, he was talking with
a very handsome woman, whose original physiognomy--much vitality coupled
with severe features--stood out pale among the pretty faces about her,
just as her dress, all white, classic in its folds and following closely
the lines of her supple figure, contrasted with toilettes that were
richer, but among which none had that air of daring simplicity. From his
corner, de Gery admired the low and smooth forehead beneath its fringe
of downward combed hair, the well-opened eyes, deep blue in colour, an
abysmal blue, the mouth which ceased to smile only to relax its pure
curve into an expression that was weary and drooping. In sum, the rather
haughty mien of an exceptional being.

Somebody near him mentioned her name--Felicia Ruys. At once he
understood the rare attraction of this young girl, the continuer of
her father's genius, whose budding celebrity had penetrated even to the
remote country district where he had lived, with the aureole of reputed
beauty. While he stood gazing at her, admiring her least gestures, a
little perplexed by the enigma of her handsome countenance, he heard
whispers behind him.

"But see how pleasant she is with the Nabob! If the duke were to come
in!"

"The Duc de Mora is coming?"

"Certainly. It is for him that the party is given; to bring about a
meeting between him and Jansoulet."

"And you think that the duke and Mlle. Ruys----"

"Where have you come from? It is an intrigue known to all Paris. The
affair dates from the last exhibition, for which she did a bust of him."

"And the duchess?"

"Bah! it is not her first experience of that sort. Ah! there is Mme.
Jenkins going to sing."

There was a movement in the drawing-room, a more violent swaying of the
crowd near the door, and conversation ceased for a moment. Paul de
Gery breathed. What he had just heard had oppressed his heart. He felt
himself reached, soiled, by this mud flung in handfuls over the ideal
which in his own mind he had formed of that splendid adolescence,
matured by the sun of Art to so penetrating a charm. He moved away
a little, changed his place. He feared to hear again some whispered
infamy. Mme. Jenkins's voice did him good, a voice that was famous in
the drawing-rooms of Paris and that in spite of all its magnificence had
nothing theatrical about it, but seemed an emotional utterance vibrating
over unstudied sonorities. The singer, a woman of forty or forty-five,
had splendid ash-blond hair, delicate, rather nerveless features, a
striking expression of kindness. Still good-looking, she was dressed
in the costly taste of a woman who has not given up the thought of
pleasing. Indeed, she was far from having given it up. Married a dozen
years ago, for a second time, to the doctor, they seemed still to be
at the first months of their dual happiness. While she sang a popular
Russian melody, savage and sweet like the smile of a Slav, Jenkins was
ingenuously proud, without seeking to dissimulate the fact, his broad
face all beaming; and she, each time that she bent her head as she
regained her breath, glanced in his direction a timid, affectionate
smile that flew to seek him over the unfolded music. And then, when she
had finished amid an admiring and delighted murmur, it was touching to
notice how discreetly she gave her husband's hand a secret squeeze, as
though to secure to themselves a corner of private bliss in the midst of
her great triumph. Young de Gery was feeling cheered by the spectacle of
this happy couple, when quite close to him a voice murmured--it was not,
however, the same voice that he had heard just before:

"You know what they say--that the Jenkinses are not married."

"How absurd!"

"I assure you. It would seem that there is a veritable Mme. Jenkins
somewhere, but not the lady we know. Besides, have you noticed----"

The dialogue continued in an undertone. Mme. Jenkins advanced, bowing,
smiling, while the doctor, stopping a tray that was being borne
round, brought her a glass of claret with the alacrity of a mother, an
impresario, a lover. Calumny, calumny, ineffaceable defilement! To the
provincial young man, Jenkins's attentions now seemed exaggerated.
He fancied that there was something affected about them, something
deliberate, and, too, in the words of thanks which she addressed in
a low voice to her husband he thought he could detect a timidity, a
submissiveness, not consonant with the dignity of the legitimate spouse,
glad and proud in an assured happiness. "But Society is a hideous
affair!" said de Gery to himself, dismayed and with cold hands. The
smiles around him had upon him the effect of hypocritical grimaces.
He felt shame and disgust. Then suddenly revolting: "Come, it is not
possible." And, as though in reply to this exclamation, behind him
the scandalous tongue resumed in an easy tone: "After all, you know, I
cannot vouch for its truth. I am only repeating what I have heard. But
look! Baroness Hemerlingue. He gets all Paris, this Jenkins."

The baroness moved forward on the arm of the doctor, who had rushed to
meet her, and appeared, despite all his control of his facial muscles, a
little ill at ease and discomfited. He had thought, the good Jenkins, to
profit by the opportunity afforded by this evening party to bring
about a reconciliation between his friend Hemerlingue and his friend
Jansoulet, who were his two most wealthy clients and embarrassed him
greatly with their intestine feud. The Nabob was perfectly willing.
He bore his old chum no grudge. Their quarrel had arisen out of
Hemerlingue's marriage with one of the favourites of the last Bey. "A
story with a woman at the bottom of it, in short," said Jansoulet, and
a story which he would have been glad to see come to an end, since his
exuberant nature found every antipathy oppressive. But it seemed that
the baron was not anxious for any settlement of their differences; for,
notwithstanding his word passed to Jenkins, his wife arrived alone, to
the Irishman's great chagrin.

She was a tall, slender, frail person, with eyebrows that suggested a
bird's plumes, and a youthful intimidated manner. She was aged about
thirty but looked twenty, and wore a head-dress of grasses and ears of
corn drooping over very black hair peppered with diamonds. With her long
lashes against cheeks white with that transparency of complexion which
characterizes women who have long led a cloistered existence, and a
little ill at ease in her Parisian clothes, she resembled less one who
had formerly been a woman of the harem than a nun who, having renounced
her vows, was returning into the world.

An air of piety, of extreme devoutness, in her bearing, a certain
ecclesiastical trick of walking with downcast eyes, elbows close to
the body, hands crossed, mannerisms which she had acquired in the very
religious atmosphere in which she had lived since her conversion and
her recent baptism, completed this resemblance. And you can imagine
with what ardent curiosity that worldly assembly regarded this quondam
odalisk turned fervent Catholic, as she advanced escorted by a man with
a livid countenance like that of some spectacled sacristan, Maitre
le Merquier, deputy of Lyons, Hemerlingue's man of business, who
accompanied the baroness whenever the baron "was somewhat indisposed,"
as on this evening.

At their entry into the second drawing-room, the Nabob came straight up
to her, expecting to see appear in her wake the puffy face of his old
comrade to whom it was agreed that he should go and offer his hand. The
baroness perceived him and became still whiter. A flash as of steel shot
from beneath her long lashes. Her nostrils dilated, quivered, and, as
Jansoulet bowed, she quickened her step, carrying her head high and
erect, and letting fall from her thin lips an Arab word which no one
else could understand but of which the Nabob himself well appreciated
the insult; for, as he raised his head again, his tanned face was of the
colour of baked earthenware as it leaves the furnace. He stood for an
instant without moving, his huge fists clinched, his mouth swollen with
anger. Jenkins came up and rejoined him, and de Gery, who had followed
the whole scene from a distance, saw them talking together with
preoccupied air.

The thing was a failure. The reconciliation, so cunningly planned, would
not take place. Hemerlingue did not desire it. If only the duke, now,
did not fail to keep his engagement with them. This reflection was
prompted by the lateness of the hour. The Wauters who was to sing the
music of the Night from the _Enchanted Flute_, on her way home from her
theatre, had just entered, completely muffled in her hoods of lace.

And there was still no sign of the Minister.

It was, however, a clearly understood, definitely promised arrangement.
Monpavon was to call for him at the club. From time to time the good
Jenkins glanced at his watch, while applauding absently the bouquet of
brilliant notes which the Wauters was pouring forth from her fairy
lips, a bouquet costing three thousand francs, useless, like the other
expenses of the evening, if the duke did not come.

Suddenly the double doors were flung wide open:

"His excellency M. le Duc de Mora!"

A long quiver of excitement welcomed him, a respectful curiosity that
ranged itself in two rows instead of the mobbing crowd that flocked on
the heels of the Nabob.

None better than he knew how to bear himself in society, to walk across
a drawing-room with gravity, to endow futile things with an air of
seriousness, and to treat serious things lightly; that was the epitome
of his attitude in life, a paradoxical distinction. Still handsome,
despite his fifty-six years, with a comeliness compounded of elegance
and proportion, wherein the grace of the dandy was fortified by
something military about the figure and the haughtiness of the face; he
wore with striking effect his black dress-coat, on which, to do honour
to Jenkins, he had pinned a few of his decorations, which he was in the
habit of never wearing except upon official occasions. The reflection
from the linen, from the white cravat, the dull silver of the
decorations, the smoothness of the thin hair now turning gray, enhanced
the pallor of the features, more bloodless than all the bloodless faces
that were to be seen that evening in the Irishman's house.

He had led such a terrible life! Politics, play under all its forms,
from the Stock Exchange to the baccarat-table, and that reputation of a
man successful with women which had to be maintained at all costs. Oh,
this man was a true client of Jenkins; and this princely visit, he owed
it in good sooth to the inventor of those mysterious pills which gave
that fire to his glance, to his whole being that energy so vibrating and
extraordinary.

"My dear duke, permit me to----"

Monpavon, with solemn air and a great sense of his own importance,
endeavoured to effect the presentation so long looked forward to; but
his excellency, preoccupied, seemed not to hear, continued his progress
towards the large drawing-room, borne along by one of those electric
currents that break the social monotony. On his passage, and while he
greeted the handsome Mme. Jenkins, the ladies bent forward a little with
seductive airs, a soft laugh, concerned to please. But he noticed only
one among them, Felicia, on her feet in the centre of a group of men,
discussing some question as though she were in her studio, and watching
the duke come towards her, while tranquilly taking her sherbet. She
greeted him with perfect naturalness. Those near had discreetly retired
to a little distance. There seemed to exist between them, however,
notwithstanding what de Gery had overheard with regard to their presumed
relations, nothing more than a quite intellectual intimacy, a playful
familiarity.

"I called at your house, mademoiselle, on my way to the Bois."

"I was informed of it. You even went into the studio."

"And I saw the famous group--my group."

"Well?"

"It is very fine. The hound runs as though he were mad. The fox scampers
away admirably. Only I did not quite understand. You had told me that it
was our own story, yours and mine."

"Ah, there! Try. It is an apologue that I read in--You do not read
Rabelais, M. le Duc?"

"My faith, no. He is too coarse."

"Ah, well, his works were the text-book of my first reading lessons.
Very badly brought up, you know. Oh, exceedingly badly. My apologue,
then, is taken from Rabelais. Here it is: Bacchus created a wonderful
fox, impossible to capture. Vulcan, on the other hand, gave a dog of
his own creation the power to catch every animal that he should pursue.
'Now,' as my author has it, 'it happened that the two met.' You see
what a wild and interminable chase. It seems to me, my dear duke,
that destiny has in the same way brought us together, endowed with
conflicting attributes; you who have received from the gods the gift of
reaching all hearts, I whose heart will never be made prisoner."

She spoke these words, looking him full in the face, almost laughing,
but sheathed and erect in the white tunic which seemed to defend her
person against the liberties of his thought. He, the conqueror, the
irresistible, had never before met one of this audacious and headstrong
breed. He brought to bear upon her, therefore, all the magnetic currents
of his seductiveness, while around them the rising murmur of the _fete_,
the soft laughter, the rustle of satins and the rattling of pearls
formed the accompaniment to this duet of mundane passion and juvenile
irony. He resumed after a minute's pause:

"But how did the gods escape from that awkward situation?"

"By turning the two runners into stone."

"Upon my word," said he, "that is a solution which I do not at all
accept. I defy the gods ever to petrify my heart."

A fiery gleam shot for a moment from his eyes, extinguished immediately
by the thought that people were observing them.

In effect, people were observing them intently, but no one with so
much curiosity as Jenkins, who wandered round them a little way off,
impatient and fidgety, as though he were annoyed with Felicia for taking
private possession of the important personage of the assembly. The young
girl laughingly called the duke's attention to it.

"People will say that I am monopolizing you."

She pointed out to him Monpavon waiting, standing near the Nabob who,
from afar, was gazing at his excellency with the beseeching, submissive
eyes of a big, good-tempered mastiff. The Minister of State then
remembered the object which had brought him. He bowed to the young girl
and returned to Monpavon, who was able at last to present to him "his
honourable friend, M. Bernard Jansoulet." His excellency bowed slightly,
the _parvenu_ humbled himself lower than the earth, then they chatted
for a moment.

A group curious to observe. Jansoulet, tall, strong, with an air of the
people about him, a sunburned skin, his broad back arched as though made
round for ever by the low bowings of Oriental courtiery, his big, short
hands splitting his light gloves, his excessive gestures, his southern
exuberance chopping up his words like a puncher. The other, a high-bred
gentleman, a man of the world, elegance itself, easy in his least
gestures, though these, however, were extremely rare, carelessly letting
fall unfinished sentences, relieving by a half smile the gravity of his
face, concealing beneath an imperturbable politeness the deep contempt
which he had for man and woman; and it was in that contempt that his
strength lay. In an American drawing-room the antithesis would have been
less violent. The Nabob's millions would have re-established the balance
and even made the scale lean to his side. But Paris does not yet place
money above every other force, and to realize this, it was sufficient
to observe the great contractor wriggling amiably before the great
gentleman and casting under his feet, like the courtier's cloak of
ermine, the dense vanity of a newly rich man.

From the corner in which he had ensconced himself, de Gery was watching
the scene with interest, knowing what importance his friend attached to
this introduction, when the same chance which all through the evening
had so cruelly been giving the lie to the native simplicity of his
inexperience, caused him to distinguish a short dialogue near him, amid
that buzz of many conversations through which each hears just the word
that interests him.

"It is indeed the least that Monpavon can do, to enable him to make a
few good acquaintances. He has introduced him to so many bad ones. You
know that he has just put Paganetti and all his gang on his shoulders."

"Poor fellow! But they will devour him."

"Bah! It is only fair that he should be made to disgorge a little. He
has been such a thief himself away yonder among the Turks."

"Really, do you believe that is so?"

"Do I believe it? I am in possession of very precise details on the
point which I have from Baron Hemerlingue, the banker, who effected the
last Tunisian loan. He knows some stories about the Nabob, he does. Just
imagine."

And the infamous gossip commenced. For fifteen years Jansoulet had
exploited the former Bey in a scandalous fashion. Names of purveyors
were cited and tricks wonderful in their assurance, their effrontery;
for instance, the story of a musical frigate, yes, a veritable musical
box, like a dining-room picture, which he had bought for two hundred
thousand francs and sold again for ten millions; the cost price of a
throne sold at three millions for which the account could be seen in the
books of an upholsterer of the Faubourg Saint-Honore did not exceed a
hundred thousand francs; and the funniest part of it was that, the Bey
having changed his mind, the royal seat, fallen into disgrace before it
had even been unpacked, remained still nailed in its packing-case at the
custom-house in Tripoli.

Next, beyond these wildly extravagant commissions on the provision of
the least toy, they laid stress upon accusations more grave but no less
certain, since they also sprang from the same source. It seemed there
was, adjoining the seraglio, a harem of European women admirably
equipped for his Highness by the Nabob, who must have been a good
judge in such matters, having practised formerly, in Paris--before
his departure for the East--the most singular trades: vendor of
theatre-tickets, manager of a low dancing-hall, and of an establishment
more ill-famed still. And the whispering ended in a smothered laugh, the
coarse laugh of men chatting among themselves.

The first impulse of the young man from the country, as he heard these
infamous calumnies, was to turn round and exclaim:

"You lie!"

A few hours earlier he would have done it without hesitating; but, since
he had been there, he had learned distrust, scepticism. He contained
himself, therefore, and listened to the end, motionless in the same
place, having deep down within himself an unavowed desire to become
further acquainted with the man whose service he had entered. As for
the Nabob, the completely unconscious subject of this hideous recital,
tranquilly installed in a small room to which its blue hangings and two
shaded lamps gave a reposeful air, he was playing his game of _ecarte_
with the Duc de Mora.

O magic of Fortune's argosy! The son of the dealer in old iron seated
alone at a card-table opposite the first personage of the Empire!
Jansoulet could scarcely believe the Venetian mirror in which were
reflected his own bright countenance and the august head with its
parting down the middle. Accordingly, in order to show his appreciation
of this great honour, he sought to lose decently as many thousand-franc
notes as possible, feeling himself even so the winner of the game, and
quite proud to see his money pass into those aristocratic hands, whose
least gesture he studied as they dealt, cut, or held the cards.

A circle had formed around them, always keeping a distance, however,
the ten paces exacted for the salutation of a prince; it was the public
there to witness this triumph in which the Nabob was bearing his part
as in a dream, intoxicated by those fairy harmonies rather faint in the
distance, whose songs that reached him in snatches as over the resonant
obstacle of a pool, the perfume of flowers that seem to become full
blown in so singular fashion towards the end of Parisian balls, when
the late hour that confuses all notions of time and the weariness of
the sleepless nights communicate to brains soothed in a more nervous
atmosphere, as it were, a dizzy sense of enjoyment. The robust nature of
Jansoulet, civilized savage that he was, was more sensitive than another
to these unknown subtleties, and he had need of all his strength to
refrain from manifesting by some glad hurrah, by some untimely effusion
of gestures and speech, the impulse of physical gaiety which pervaded
his whole being, as happens to those great mountain dogs that are
thrown into epileptic fits of madness by the inhaling of a drop of some
essence.

"The sky is clear, the pavement dry. If you like, my dear boy, we
will send the carriage away and return on foot," said Jansoulet to his
companion as they left Jenkins's house.

De Gery accepted with eagerness. He felt that he required to walk, to
shake off in the open air the infamies and the lies of that comedy
of society which had left his heart cold and oppressed, with all his
life-blood driven to his temples where he could hear the swollen veins
beating. He staggered as he walked, like those unfortunate persons who,
having been operated upon for cataract, in the terror of sight regained,
do not dare put one foot before the other. But with what a brutal hand
the operation had been performed! So that great artist with the glorious
name, that pure and untamed beauty the sight alone of whom had troubled
him like an apparition, was only a courtesan. Mme. Jenkins, that stately
woman, of bearing at once so proud and so gentle, had no real title to
the name. That illustrious man of science with the open countenance, and
a manner so pleasant in his welcome, had the impudence thus to parade
a disgraceful concubinage. And Paris suspected it, but that did not
prevent it from running to their parties. And, finally, Jansoulet, so
kind, so generous, for whom he felt in his heart so much gratitude, he
knew him to be fallen into the hands of a gang of brigands, a brigand
himself and well worthy of the conspiracy organized to cause him to
disgorge his millions.

Was it possible, and how much of it was he to be obliged to believe?

A glance which he threw sideways at the Nabob, whose immense person
almost blocked the pavement, revealed to him suddenly in that walk
oppressed by the weight of his wealth, a something low and vulgar which
he had not previously remarked. Yes, he was indeed the adventurer
from the south, moulded of the slimy clay that covers the quays of
Marseilles, trodden down by all the nomads and wanderers of a seaport.
Kind, generous, forsooth! as harlots are, or thieves. And the gold,
flowing in torrents through that tainted and luxurious world, splashing
the very walls, seemed to him now to be loaded with all the dross, all
the filth of its impure and muddy source. There remained, then, for
him, de Gery, but one thing to do, to go away, to quit with all possible
speed this situation in which he risked the compromising of his good
name, the one heritage from his father. Doubtless. But the two little
brothers down yonder in the country. Who would pay for their board and
lodging? Who would keep up the modest home miraculously brought into
being once more by the handsome salary of the eldest son, the head of
the family? Those words, "head of the family," plunged him immediately
into one of those internal combats in which interest and conscience
struggled for the mastery--the one brutal, substantial, attacking
vigorously with straight thrusts, the other elusive, breaking away by
subtle disengagements--while the worthy Jansoulet, unconscious cause
of the conflict, walked with long strides close by his young friend,
inhaling the fresh air with delight at the end of his lighted cigar.

Never had he felt it such a happiness to be alive; and this evening
party at Jenkins's, which had been his own first real entry into society
as well as de Gery's, had left with him an impression of porticoes
erected as for a triumph, of an eagerly assembled crowd, of flowers
thrown on his path. So true is it that things only exist through the
eyes that observe them. What a success! the duke, as he took leave of
him inviting him to come to see his picture gallery, which meant the
doors of Mora House opened to him within a week. Felicia Ruys
consenting to do his bust, so that at the next exhibition the son of the
nail-dealer would have his portrait in marble by the same great
artist who had signed that of the Minister of State. Was it not the
satisfaction of all his childish vanities?

And each pondering his own thoughts, sombre or glad, they continued to
walk shoulder to shoulder, absorbed and so absent in mind that the Place
Vendome, silent and bathed in a blue and chilly light, rang under their
steps before a word had been uttered between them.

"Already?" said the Nabob. "I should not at all have minded walking a
little longer. What do you say?" And while they strolled two or three
times around the square, he gave vent in spasmodic bursts to the immense
joy which filled him.

"How pleasant the air is! How one can breathe! Thunder of God! I would
not have missed this evening's party for a hundred thousand francs.
What a worthy soul that Jenkins is! Do you like Felicia Ruys's style of
beauty? For my part, I dote on it. And the duke, what a great gentleman!
so simple, so kind. A fine place, Paris, is it not, my son?"

"It is too complicated for me. It frightens me," answered Paul de Gery
in a hollow voice.

"Yes, yes, I understand," replied the other with an adorable fatuity.
"You are not yet accustomed to it; but, never mind, one quickly becomes
so. See how after a single month I find myself at my ease."

"That is because it is not your first visit to Paris. You have lived
here."

"I? Never in my life. Who told you that?"

"Indeed! I thought--" answered the young man; and immediately, a host of
reflections crowding into his mind:

"What, then, have you done to this Baron Hemerlingue? It is a hatred to
the death between you."

For a moment the Nabob was taken aback. That name of Hemerlingue, thrown
suddenly into his glee, recalled to him the one annoying episode of the
evening.

"To him as to the others," said he in a saddened voice, "I have never
done anything save good. We began together in poverty. We made progress
and prospered side by side. Whenever he wished to try a flight on his
own wings, I always aided and supported him to the best of my ability.
It was I who during ten consecutive years secured for him the contracts
for the fleet and the army; almost his whole fortune came from that
source. Then one fine morning this slow-blooded imbecile of a Bernese
goes crazy over an odalisk whom the mother of the Bey had caused to be
expelled from the harem. The hussy was beautiful and ambitious, she made
him marry her, and naturally, after this brilliant match, Hemerlingue
was obliged to leave Tunis. Somebody had persuaded him to believe that I
was urging the Bey to close the principality to him. It was not true. On
the contrary, I obtained from his Highness permission for Hemerlingue's
son--a child by his first wife--to remain in Tunis in order to look
after their suspended interests, while the father came to Paris to found
his banking-house. Moreover, I have been well rewarded for my kindness.
When, at the death of my poor Ahmed, the Mouchir, his brother, ascended
the throne, the Hemerlingues, restored to favour, never ceased to work
for my undoing with the new master. The Bey still keeps on good terms
with me; but my credit is shaken. Well, in spite of that, in spite of
all the shabby tricks that Hemerlingue has played me, that he plays me
still, I was ready this evening to hold out my hand to him. Not only
does the blackguard refuse it, but he causes me to be insulted by his
wife, a savage and evil-disposed creature, who does not pardon me for
always having declined to receive her in Tunis. Do you know what she
called me just now as she passed me? 'Thief and son of a dog.' As free
in her language as that, the odalisk--That is to say, that if I did not
know my Hemerlingue to be as cowardly as he is fat--After all, bah! let
them say what they like. I snap my fingers at them. What can they do
against me? Ruin me with the Bey? That is a matter of indifference
to me. There is nothing any longer for me to do in Tunis, and I shall
withdraw myself from the place altogether as soon as possible. There
is only one town, one country in the world, and that is Paris--Paris
welcoming, hospitable, not prudish, where every intelligent man may find
space to do great things. And I, now, do you see, de Gery, I want to do
great things. I have had enough of mercantile life. For twenty years I
have worked for money; to-day I am greedy of glory, of consideration, of
fame. I want to be somebody in the history of my country, and that will
be easy for me. With my immense fortune, my knowledge of men and of
affairs, the things I know I have here in my head, nothing is beyond my
reach and I aspire to everything. Believe me, therefore, my dear boy,
never leave me"--one would have said that he was replying to the secret
thought of his young companion--"remain faithfully on board my ship. The
masts are firm; I have my bunkers full of coal. I swear to you that we
shall go far, and quickly, _nom d'un sort_!"

The ingenuous southerner thus poured out his projects into the night
with many expressive gestures, and from time to time, as they walked
rapidly to and fro in the vast and deserted square, majestically
surrounded by its silent and closed palaces, he raised his head towards
the man of bronze on the column, as though taking to witness that great
upstart whose presence in the midst of Paris authorizes all ambitions,
endows every chimera with probability.

There is in young people a warmth of heart, a need of enthusiasm which
is awakened by the least touch. As the Nabob talked, de Gery felt his
suspicion take wing and all his sympathy return, together with a shade
of pity. No, very certainly this man was not a rascal, but a poor,
illuded being whose fortune had gone to his head like a wine too heavy
for a stomach long accustomed to water. Alone in the midst of Paris,
surrounded by enemies and people ready to take advantage of him,
Jansoulet made upon him the impression of a man on foot laden with gold
passing through some evil-haunted wood, in the dark and unarmed. And
he reflected that it would be well for the _protege_ to watch,
without seeming to do so, over the protector, to become the discerning
Telemachus of the blind Mentor, to point out to him the quagmires, to
defend him against the highwaymen, to aid him, in a word, in his combats
amid all that swarm of nocturnal ambuscades which he felt were prowling
ferociously around the Nabob and his millions.




THE JOYEUSE FAMILY

Every morning of the year, at exactly eight o'clock, a new and almost
tenantless house in a remote quarter of Paris, echoed to cries, calls,
merry laughter, ringing clear in the desert of the staircase:

"Father, don't forget my music."

"Father, my crochet wool."

"Father, bring us some rolls."

And the voice of the father calling from below:

"Yaia, bring me down my portfolio, please."

"There you are, you see! He has forgotten his portfolio."

And there would be a glad scurry from top to bottom of the house, a
running of all those pretty faces confused by sleep, of all those heads
with disordered hair which the owners made tidy as they ran, until the
moment when, leaning over the baluster, half a dozen girls bade loud
good-bye to a little, old gentleman, neat and well-groomed, whose
reddish face and short profile disappeared at length in the spiral
perspective of the stairs. M. Joyeuse had departed for his office.
At once the whole band, escaped from their cage, would rush quickly
upstairs again to the fourth floor, and, the door having been opened,
group themselves at an open casement to gain one last glimpse of their
father. The little man used to turn round, kisses were exchanged across
the distance, then the windows were closed, the new and tenantless house
became quiet again, except for the posters dancing their wild saraband
in the wind of the unfinished street, as if made gay, they also, by all
these proceedings. A moment later the photographer on the fifth floor
would descend to hang at the door his showcase, always the same, in
which was to be seen the old gentleman in a white tie surrounded by his
daughters in various groups; he went upstairs again in his turn, and the
calm which succeeded immediately upon this little morning uproar left
one to imagine that the "father" and his young ladies had re-entered the
case of photographs, where they remained smiling and motionless until
evening.

From the Rue Saint-Ferdinand to the establishment of Hemerlingue &
Son, his employers, M. Joyeuse had a good three-quarters of an hour's
journey. He walked with head erect and straight, as though he had feared
to disarrange the smart knot of the cravat tied by his daughters, or his
hat put on by them, and when the eldest, ever anxious and prudent, just
as he went out raised his coat-collar to protect him against the
harsh gusts of the wind that blew round the street corner, even if the
temperature were that of a hothouse M. Joyeuse would not lower it again
until he reached the office, like the lover who, quitting his mistress's
arms, dares not to move for fear of losing the intoxicating perfume.

A widower for some years, this worthy man lived only for his children,
thought only of them, went through life surrounded by those fair little
heads that fluttered around him confusedly as in a picture of the
Assumption. All his desires, all his projects, bore reference to "those
young ladies," returned to them without ceasing, sometimes after long
circuits, for M. Joyeuse--this was connected no doubt with the fact that
he possessed a short neck and a small figure whereof his turbulent
blood made the circuit in a moment--was a man of fecund and astonishing
imagination. In his brain the ideas performed their evolutions with the
rapidity of hollow straws around a sieve. At the office, figures kept
his steady attention by reason of their positive quality; but, outside,
his mind took its revenge upon that inexorable occupation. The activity
of the walk, the habit that led him by a route where he was familiar
with the least incidents, allowed full liberty to his imaginative
faculties. He invented at these times extraordinary adventures, enough
of them to crank out a score of the serial stories that appear in the
newspapers.

If, for example, M. Joyeuse, as he went up the Faubourg Saint-Honore,
on the right-hand footwalk--he always took that one--noticed a heavy
laundry-cart going along at a quick pace, driven by a woman from the
country with a child perched on a bundle of linen and leaning over
somewhat:

"The child!" the terrified old fellow would cry. "Have a care of the
child!"

His voice would be lost in the noise of the wheels and his warning among
the secrets of Providence. The cart passed. He would follow it for a
moment with his eye, then resume his walk; but the drama begun in
his mind would continue to unfold itself there, with a thousand
catastrophes. The child had fallen. The wheels were about to pass over
him. M. Joyeuse dashed forward, saved the little creature on the very
brink of destruction; the pole of the cart, however, struck himself
full in the chest and he fell bathed in blood. Then he would see himself
borne to some chemists' shop through the crowd that had collected. He
was placed in an ambulance, carried to his own house, and then suddenly
he would hear the piercing cry of his daughters, his well-beloved
daughters, when they beheld him in this condition. And that agonized
cry touched his heart so deeply, he would hear it so distinctly, so
realistically: "Papa, my dear papa," that he would himself utter it
aloud in the street, to the great astonishment of the passers-by, in a
hoarse voice which would wake him from his fictitious nightmare.

Will you have another sample of this prodigious imagination? It is
raining, freezing; wretched weather. M. Joyeuse has taken the omnibus
to go to his office. Finding himself seated opposite a sort of colossus,
with the head of a brute and formidable biceps, M. Joyeuse, himself very
small, very puny, with his portfolio on his knees, draws in his legs in
order to make room for the enormous columns which support the monumental
body of his neighbour. As the vehicle moves on and as the rain beats on
the windows, M. Joyeuse falls into reverie. And suddenly the colossus
opposite, whose face is kind after all, is very much surprised to see
the little man change colour, look at him and grind his teeth, look at
him with ferocious eyes, an assassin's eyes. Yes, with the eyes of a
veritable assassin, for at that moment M. Joyeuse is dreaming a terrible
dream. He sees one of his daughters sitting there opposite him, by the
side of this giant brute, and the wretch has put his arm round her waist
under her cape.

"Remove your hand, sir!" M. Joyeuse has already said twice over. The
other has only sneered. Now he wishes to kiss Elise.

"Ah, rascal!"

Too feeble to defend his daughter, M. Joyeuse, foaming with rage, draws
his knife from his pocket, stabs the insolent fellow full in the breast,
and with head high goes off, strong in the right of an outraged father,
to make his declaration at the nearest police-station.

"I have just killed a man in an omnibus!" At the sound of his own voice
actually uttering these sinister words, but not in the police-station,
the poor fellow wakes us, guesses from the bewildered manner
of the passengers that he must have spoken the words aloud,
and very quickly takes advantage of the conductor's call,
"Saint-Philippe--Pantheon--Bastille--" to alight, feeling greatly
confused, amid general stupefaction.

This imagination constantly on the stretch, gave to M. Joyeuse a
singular physiognomy, feverish and worn, in strong contrast with the
general correct appearance of a subordinate clerk which he presented.
In one day he lived so many passionate existences. The race is more
numerous than one thinks of these waking dreamers, in whom a too
restricted fate compresses forces unemployed and heroic faculties.
Dreaming is the safety-valve through which all those expend themselves
with terrible ebullitions, as of the vapour of a furnace and floating
images that are forthwith dissipated into air. From these visions
some return radiant, others exhausted and discouraged, as they find
themselves once more on the every-day level. M. Joyeuse was of these
latter, rising without ceasing to heights whence a man cannot but
re-descend, somewhat bruised by the velocity of the transit.

Now, one morning that our "visionary" had left his house at his habitual
hour, and under the usual circumstances, he began at the turning of the
Rue Saint-Ferdinand one of his little private romances. As the end of
the year was at hand, perhaps it was the hammer-strokes on a wooden hut
which was being erected in the neighbouring timber-yard that caused his
thoughts to turn to "presents--New Year's Day." And immediately the word
bounty implanted itself in his mind as the first landmark of a marvelous
story. In the month of December all persons in Hemerlingue's service
received double pay, and you know that in small households there are
founded on windfalls of this kind a thousand projects, ambitious or
kind, presents to be made, a piece of furniture to be replaced, a little
sum of money to be saved in a drawer against the unforeseen.

In simple fact, M. Joyeuse was not rich. His wife, a Mlle. de
Saint-Armand, tormented with ideas of greatness and society, had set
this little clerk's household on a ruinous footing, and though since her
death three years had passed during which Bonne Maman had managed the
housekeeping with so much wisdom, they had not yet been able to save
anything, so heavy had proved the burden of the past. Suddenly it
occurred to the good fellow that this year the bounty would be larger
by reason of the increase of work which had been caused by the Tunisian
loan. The loan constituted a very fine stroke of business for the firm,
too fine even, for M. Joyeuse had permitted himself to remark in the
office that this time "Hemerlingue & Son had shaved the Turk a little
too close."

"Certainly, yes, the bounty will be doubled," reflected the visionary,
as he walked; and already he saw himself, a month thence, mounting with
his comrades, for the New Year's visit, the little staircase that led
to Hemerlingue's apartment. He announced the good news to them; then he
detained M. Joyeuse for a few words in private. And, behold, that master
habitually so cold in his manner, sheathed in his yellow fat as in
a bale of raw silk, became affectionate, paternal, communicative. He
desired to know how many daughters Joyeuse had.

"I have three; no, I should say, four, M. le Baron. I always confuse
them. The eldest is such a sensible girl."

Further he wished to know their ages.

"Aline is twenty, M. le Baron. She is the eldest. Then we have Elise,
who is preparing for the examination which she must pass when she is
eighteen. Henriette, who is fourteen, and Zara or Yaia who is only
twelve."

That pet name of Yaia intensely amused M. le Baron, who inquired next
what were the resources of this interesting family.

"My salary, M. le Baron; nothing else. I had a little money put aside,
but my poor wife's illness, the education of the girls--"

"What you are earning is not sufficient, my dear Joyeuse. I raise your
salary to a thousand francs a month."

"Oh, M. le Baron, it is too much."

But although he had uttered this last sentence aloud, in the ear of
a policeman who watched with a mistrustful eye the little man pass,
gesticulating and nodding his head, the poor visionary awoke not. With
admiration he saw himself returning home, announcing the news to his
daughters, taking them to the theatre in the evening in celebration of
the happy day. _Dieu!_ how pretty they looked in the front of their box,
the Demoiselles Joyeuse, what a bouquet of rosy faces! And then, the
next day, the two eldest asked in marriage by--Impossible to determine
by whom, for M. Joyeuse had just suddenly found himself once more
beneath the arch of the Hemerlingue establishment, before the swing-door
surmounted by a "counting-house" in letters of gold.

"I shall always be the same, it seems," said he to himself, laughing a
little and passing his hand over his forehead, on which the perspiration
stood in drops.

In a good humour as the result of this pleasant fancy and at the sight
of the fire crackling in the suite of parquet-floored offices, with
their screens of iron trellis-work and their air of secrecy in the cold
light of the ground floor, where one could count the pieces of gold
without dazzling his eyes, M. Joyeuse gave a gay greeting to the
other clerks and slipped on his working coat and his black velvet cap.
Suddenly, some one whistled from upstairs, and the cashier, applying his
ear to the tube, heard the oily and gelatinous voice of Hemerlingue,
the sole and veritable Hemerlingue--the other, the son, was always
absent--asking for M. Joyeuse.

What! Could the dream be continuing?

He was conscious of a great agitation; took the little inside staircase
which he had seen himself ascending just before so bravely, and found
himself in the banker's private room, a narrow apartment, with a very
high ceiling, furnished only with green curtains and enormous leather
easy chairs of a size proportioned to the terrific bulk of the head of
the house. He was there, seated at his desk which his belly prevented
him from approaching very closely, obese, ill-shaped, and so yellow that
his round face with its hooked nose, the head of a fat and sick owl,
suggested as it were a light at the end of the solemn and gloomy room. A
rich Moorish merchant grown mouldy in the damp of his little court-yard.
Beneath his heavy eyelids, raised with an effort, his glance glittered
for a second when the accountant entered; he signed to him to approach,
and slowly, coldly, pausing to take breath between his sentences,
instead of "M. Joyeuse, how many daughters have you?" he said this:

"Joyeuse, you have allowed yourself to criticise in the office our last
operations in the Tunis market. Useless to defend yourself. Your remarks
have been reported to me word for word. And as I am unable to admit them
from the mouth of one in my service, I give you notice that dating from
the end of this month you cease to be a member of my establishment."

A wave of blood mounted to the accountant's face, fell back, returned
again, bringing each time a confused whizzing into his ears, into his
brain a tumult of thoughts and images.

His daughters!

What was to become of them?

Employment is so hard to find at that period of the year.

Poverty appeared before his eyes and also the vision of an unfortunate
man falling at Hemerlingue's feet, supplicating him, threatening him,
springing at his throat in an access of despairing rage. All this
agitation passed over his features like a gust of wind which throws the
surface of a lake into ripples, fashioning there all manner of mobile
whirlpools; but he remained mute, standing in the same place, and upon
the master's intimation that he could withdraw, went down with tottering
step to resume his work in the counting-house.

In the evening when he went home to the Rue Saint-Ferdinand, M. Joyeuse
told his daughters nothing. He did not dare. The idea of darkening that
radiant gaiety which was the life of the house, of making dull with
heavy tears those pretty bright eyes, was insupportable to him.
Timorous, too, and weak, he was of those who always say, "Let us wait
till to-morrow." He waited therefore before speaking, at first until the
month of November should be ended, deluding himself with the vague hope
that Hemerlingue might change his mind, as though he did not know that
will as of some mollusk flabby and tenacious upon its ingot of gold.
Then when his salary had been paid up and another accountant had taken
his place before the high desk at which he had stood for so long, he
hoped to find something else quickly and repair his misfortune before
being obliged to confess it.

Every morning he feigned to start for the office, allowed himself to
be equipped and accompanied to the door as usual, his huge leather
portfolio all ready for the evening's numerous commissions. Although he
would forget some of them on purpose because of the approaching and
so problematical end of the month, he did not lack time now to execute
them. He had his day to himself, the whole of an interminable day which
he spent in rushing about Paris in search for an employment. People gave
him addresses, excellent recommendations. But in that terrible month of
December, so cold and with such short hours of daylight, bringing with
it so many expenses and preoccupations, employees need to take patience
and employers also. Each man tries to end the year in peace, postponing
to the month of January, to that great leap of time towards a fresh
halting-place, any changes, ameliorations, attempts at a new life.

In every house where M. Joyeuse presented himself, he beheld faces
suddenly grow cold as soon as he explained the object of his visit.

"What! You are no longer with Hemerlingue & Son? How is that?"

He would explain the matter as best he could through a caprice of the
head of the firm, the ferocious Hemerlingue whom Paris knew; but he
was conscious of a coldness, a mistrust in the uniform reply which he
received: "Call on us again after the holidays." And, timid as he was to
begin with, he reached a point at which he could no longer bring himself
to call on any one, a point at which he could walk past the same door
a score of times and never have crossed its threshold at all had it not
been for the thought of his daughters. This alone pushed him along by
the shoulders, put heart in his legs, despatched him in the course
of the same day to the opposite extremities of Paris, to very vague
addresses given to him by comrades, to a great manufactory of animal
black at Aubervilliers, where he was made to return for nothing three
days in succession.

Oh, the journeys in the rain, in the frost, the closed doors, the master
who is out or engaged, the promises given and immediately withdrawn,
the hopes deceived, the enervation of hours of waiting, the humiliations
reserved for every man who asks for work, as though it were a shameful
thing to lack it. M. Joyeuse knew all these melancholy things and, too,
the good will that tires and grows discouraged before the persistence of
evil fortune. And you may imagine how the hard martyrdom of "the man who
seeks a place" was rendered tenfold more bitter by the mirages of his
imagination, by those chimeras which rose before him from the Paris
pavements as over them he journeyed along on foot in every direction.

For a month he was one of those woeful puppets, talking in monologue,
gesticulating on the footways, from whom every chance collision with the
crowd wrests an exclamation as of one walking in his sleep. "I told you
so," or "I have no doubt of it, sir." One passes by, almost one would
laugh, but one is seized with pity before the unconsciousness of those
unhappy men possessed by a fixed idea, blind whom the dream leads, drawn
along by an invisible leash. The terrible thing was that after those
long, cruel days of inaction and fatigue, when M. Joyeuse returned home,
he had perforce to play the comedy of the man returning from his work,
to recount the incidents of the day, the things he had heard, the gossip
of the office with which he had been always wont to entertain his girls.

In humble homes there is always a name which comes up more often than
all others, which is invoked in days of stress, which is mingled with
every wish, with every hope, even with the games of the children,
penetrated as they are with its importance, a name which sustains in
the dwelling the part of a sub-Providence, or rather of a household
divinity, familiar and supernatural. In the Joyeuse family, it was
Hemerlingue, always Hemerlingue, returning ten times, twenty times a
day in the conversation of the girls, who associated it with all their
plans, with the most intimate details of their feminine ambitions.
"If Hemerlingue would only----" "All that depends on Hemerlingue." And
nothing could be more charming than the familiarity with which these
young people spoke of that enormously wealthy man whom they had never
seen.

They would ask for news of him. Had their father spoken to him? Was he
in a good temper? And to think that we all of us, whatever our position,
however humble we be, however weighed down by fate, we have always
beneath us unfortunate beings more humble, yet more weighed down, for
whom we are great, for whom we are as gods, and in our quality of gods,
indifferent, disdainful, or cruel.

One imagines the torture of M. Joyeuse, obliged to invent stories and
anecdotes about the wretch who had so ruthlessly discharged him after
ten years of good service. He played his little comedy, however, so well
as completely to deceive everybody. Only one thing had been remarked,
and that was that father when he came home in the evening always sat
down to table with a great appetite. I believe it! Since he lost his
place the poor man had gone without his luncheon.

The days passed. M. Joyeuse found nothing. Yes, one place as accountant
in the Territorial Bank, which he refused, however, knowing too much
about banking operations, about all the corners and innermost recesses
of the financial Bohemia in general, and of the Territorial bank in
particular, to set foot in that den.

"But," said Passajon to him--for it was Passajon who, meeting the honest
fellow and hearing that he was out of employment, had suggested to
him that he should come to Paganetti's--"but since I repeat that it is
serious. We have lots of money. They pay one. I have been paid. See how
prosperous I look."

In effect, the old office porter had a new livery, and beneath his tunic
with its buttons of silver-gilt his paunch protruded, majestic. All
the same M. Joyeuse had not allowed himself to be tempted, even after
Passajon, opening wide his shallow-set blue eyes, had whispered into his
ear with emphasis these words rich in promises:

"The Nabob is in the concern."

Even after that, M. Joyeuse had had the courage to say No. Was it not
better to die of hunger than to enter a fraudulent house of which
he might perhaps one day be summoned to report upon the books in the
courts?

So he continued to wander; but, discouraged, he no longer sought employ.
As it was necessary that he should absent himself from home, he used
to linger over the stalls on the quays, lean for hours on the parapets,
watch the water flow and the unladening of the vessels. He became one of
those idlers whom one sees in the first rank whenever a crowd collects
in the street, taking shelter from the rain under the porches, warming
himself at the stoves where, in the open air, the tar of the asphalters
reeks, sinking on a bench of some boulevard when his legs could no
longer carry him.

To do nothing! What a fine way of making life seem longer!

On certain days, however, when M. Joyeuse was too weary or the sky
too unkind, he would wait at the end of the street until his daughters
should have closed their window again and, returning to the house,
keeping close to the walls, would mount the staircase very quickly, pass
before his own door holding his breath, and take refuge in the apartment
of the photographer Andre Maranne, who, aware of his ill-fortune, always
gave him that kindly welcome which the poor have for each other. Clients
are rare so near the outskirts of the town. He used to remain long hours
in the studio, talking in a very low voice, reading at his friend's
side, listening to the rain on the window-panes or the wind that blew
as it does on the open sea, shaking the old doors and the window-sashes
below in the wood-sheds. Beneath him he could hear sounds well known
and full of charm, songs that escaped in the satisfaction of work
accomplished, assembled laughter, the pianoforte lesson being given by
Bonne Maman, the tic-tac of the metronome, all the delicious household
stir that pleased his heart. He lived with his darlings, who certainly
never could have guessed that they had him so near them.

Once, when Maranne was out, M. Joyeuse keeping faithful watch over the
studio and its new apparatus, heard two little strokes given on the
ceiling of the apartment below, two separate, very distinct strokes,
then a cautious pattering of fingers, like the scamper of mice. The
friendliness of the photographer with his neighbours sufficiently
authorized these communications like those of prisoners. But what did
they mean? How reply to what seemed a call? Quite at hazard, he repeated
the two strokes, the light tapping, and the conversation ended there. On
the return of Andre Maranne he learned the explanation of the incident.
It was very simple. Sometimes, in the course of the day, the young
ladies below, who only saw their neighbour in the evening, would inquire
how things were going with him, whether any clients were coming in. The
signal he had heard meant, "Is business good to-day?" And M. Joyeuse had
replied, obeying only an instinct without any knowledge, "Fairly well
for the season." Although young Maranne was very red as he made this
affirmation, M. Joyeuse accepted his word at once. Only this idea of
frequent communications between the two households made him afraid for
the secrecy of his position, and from that time forward he cut himself
off from what he used to call his "artistic days." Moreover, the
moment was approaching when he would no longer be able to conceal his
misfortune, the end of the month arriving, complicated by the ending of
the year.

Paris was already assuming the holiday appearance which it wears during
the last weeks of December. In the way of national or popular rejoicing
it had little left but that. The follies of the Carnival died with
Gavarni, the religious festivals with their peals of bells which one
scarcely hears amid the noise of the streets confine themselves within
their heavy church-doors, the 15th of August has never been anything but
the Saint Charles-the-Great of the barracks; but Paris has maintained
its observance of New Year's Day.

From the beginning of December an immense childishness begins to
permeate the town. You see hand-carts pass laden with gilded drums,
wooden horses, playthings by the dozen. In the industrial quarters, from
top to bottom of the five-storied houses, the old private residences
still standing in that low-lying district, where the warehouses have
such lofty ceilings and majestic double doors, the nights are passed in
the making up of gauze flowers and spangles, in the gumming of labels
upon satin-lined boxes, in sorting, marking, packing, the thousand
details of the toy, that great branch of commerce on which Paris places
the seal of its elegance. There is a smell about of new wood, of fresh
paint, glossy varnish, and, in the dust of garrets, on the wretched
stairways where the poor leave behind them all the dirt through which
they have passed, there lie shavings of rosewood, scraps of satin and
velvet, bits of tinsel, all the _debris_ of the luxury whose end is to
dazzle the eyes of children. Then the shop-windows are decorated. Behind
the panes of clear glass the gilt of presentation-books rises like a
glittering wave under the gaslight, the stuffs of various and tempting
colours display their brittle and heavy folds, while the young ladies
behind the counter, with their hair dressed tapering to a point and with
a ribbon beneath their collar, tie up the article, little finger in the
air, or fill bags of moire into which the sweets fall like a rain of
pearls.

But, over against this kind of well-to-do business, established in
its own house, warmed, withdrawn behind its rich shop-front, there is
installed the improvised commerce of those wooden huts, open to the
wind of the streets, of which the double row gives to the boulevards
the aspect of some foreign mall. It is in these that you find the true
interest and the poetry of New Year's gifts. Sumptuous in the district
of the Madeleine, well-to-do towards the Boulevard Saint-Denis, of more
"popular" order as you ascend to the Bastille, these little sheds adapt
themselves according to their public, calculate their chances of success
by the more or less well-lined purses of the passers-by. Among these,
there are set up portable tables, laden with trifling objects, miracles
of the Parisian trade that deals in such small things, constructed out
of nothing, frail and delicate, and which the wind of fashion sometimes
sweeps forward in its great rush by reason of their very triviality.
Finally, along the curbs of the footways, lost in the defile of the
carriage traffic which grazes their wandering path, the orange-girls
complete this peripatetic commerce, heaping up the sun-coloured fruit
beneath their lanterns of red paper, crying "La Valence" amid the fog,
the tumult, the excessive haste which Paris displays at the ending of
its year.

Ordinarily, M. Joyeuse was accustomed to make one of the busy crowd
which goes and comes with the jingle of money in its pocket and parcels
in every hand. He would wander about with Bonne Maman at his side on the
lookout for New Year's presents for his girls, stop before the booths of
the small dealers, who are accustomed to do much business and excited
by the appearance of the least important customer, have based upon
this short season hopes of extraordinary profits. And there would be
colloquies, reflections, an interminable perplexity to know what to
select in that little complex brain of his, always ahead of the present
instant and of the occupation of the moment.

This year, alas! nothing of that kind. He wandered sadly through the
town in its rejoicing, time seeming to hang all the heavier for the
activity around him, jostled, hustled, as all are who stand obstructing
the way of active folk, his heart beating with a perpetual fear, for
Bonne Maman for some days past, in conversation with him at table,
had been making significant allusions with regard to the New Year's
presents. Consequently he avoided finding himself alone with her and had
forbidden her to come to meet him at the office at closing-time. But
in spite of all his efforts he knew the moment was drawing near when
concealment would be impossible and his grievous secret be unveiled.
Was, then, a very formidable person, Bonne Maman, that M. Joyeuse should
stand in such fear of her? By no means. A little stern, that was all,
with a pretty smile that instantly forgave one. But M. Joyeuse was
a coward, timid from his birth; twenty years of housekeeping with a
masterful wife, "a member of the nobility," having made him a slave for
ever, like those convicts who, after their imprisonment is over, have to
undergo a period of surveillance. And for him this meant all his life.

One evening the Joyeuse family was gathered in the little drawing-room,
last relic of its splendour, still containing two upholstered chairs,
many crochet decorations, a piano, two lamps crowned with little green
shades, and a what-not covered with bric-a-brac.

True family life exists in humble homes.

For the sake of economy, there was lighted for the whole household but
one fire and a single lamp, around which the occupations and amusements
of all were grouped. A fine big family lamp, whose old painted
shade--night scenes pierced with shining dots--had been the astonishment
and the joy of every one of those young girls in her early childhood.
Issuing softly from the shadow of the room, four young heads were bent
forward, fair or dark, smiling or intent, into that intimate and warm
circle of light which illumined them as far as the eyes, seemed to feed
the fire of their glance, to shelter them, protect them, preserve them
from the black cold blowing outside, from phantoms, from snares, from
miseries and terrors, from all the sinister things that a winter night
in Paris brings forth in the remoteness of its quiet suburbs.

Thus, drawn close together in a small room at the top of the lonely
house, in the warmth, the security of their comfortable home, the
Joyeuse household seems like a nest right at the top of a lofty
tree. The girls sew, read, chat a little. A leap of the lamp-flame,
a crackling of fire, is what you may hear, with from time to time an
exclamation from M. Joyeuse, a little removed from his small circle,
lost in the shadow where he hides his anxious brow and all the
extravagance of his imagination. Just now he is imagining that in
the distress into which he finds himself driven beyond possibility
of escape, in that absolute necessity of confessing everything to his
children, this evening, at latest to-morrow, an unhoped-for succour may
come to him. Hemerlingue, seized with remorse, sends to him, as to
all those who took part in the work connected with the Tunis loan, his
December gratuity. A tall footman brings it: "On behalf of M. le Baron."
The visionary says those words aloud. The pretty faces turn towards him;
the girls laugh, move their chairs, and the poor fellow awakes suddenly
to reality.

Oh, how angry he is with himself now for his delay in confessing all,
for that false security which he has maintained around him and which he
will have to destroy at a blow. What need had he, too, to criticise that
Tunis loan? At this moment he even reproaches himself for not having
accepted a place in the Territorial Bank. Had he the right to refuse?
Ah, the sorry head of a family, without strength to keep or to defend
the happiness of his own! And, glancing at the pretty group within
the circle of the lamp-shade, whose reposeful aspect forms so great a
contrast with his own internal agitation, he is seized by a remorse so
violent for the weakness of his soul that his secret rises to his lips,
is about to escape him in a burst of sobs, when the ring of a bell--no
chimera, that--gives them all a start and arrests him at the very moment
when he was about to speak.

Whoever could it be, coming at this hour? They had lived in retirement
since the mother's death and saw almost nobody. Andre Maranne, when
he came down to spend a few minutes with them, tapped like a familiar
friend. Profound silence in the drawing-room, long colloquy on the
landing. Finally, the old servant--she had been in the family as long as
the lamp--showed in a young man, complete stranger, who stopped, struck
with admiration at the charming picture of the four darlings gathered
round the table. This made his entrance timid, rather awkward. However,
he explained clearly the object of his visit. He had been referred to M.
Joyeuse by an honest fellow of his acquaintance, old Passajon, to take
lessons in bookkeeping. One of his friends happened to be engaged in
large financial transactions in connection with an important joint-stock
company. He wished to be of service to him in keeping an eye on the
employment of the capital, the straightforwardness of the operations;
but he was a lawyer, little familiar with financial methods, with the
terms employed in banking. Could not M. Joyeuse in the course of a few
months, with three or four lessons a week--

"Yes, indeed, sir, yes, indeed," stammered the father, quite overcome by
this unlooked-for piece of good luck. "Assuredly I can undertake, in a
few months, to qualify you for such auditing work. Where shall we have
our lessons?"

"Here, at your own house, if you are agreeable," said the young man,
"for I am anxious that no one should know that I am working at the
subject. But I shall be grieved if I always frighten everybody away as I
have this evening."

For, at the first words of the visitor, the four curly heads had
disappeared, with little whisperings, and with rustlings of skirts, and
the drawing-room looked very bare now that the big circle of white light
was empty.

Always quick to take offence, where his daughters were concerned, M.
Joyeuse replied that "the young girls were accustomed to retire early
every evening," and the words were spoken in a brief, dry tone which
very clearly signified: "Let us talk of our lessons, young man, if you
please." Days were then fixed, free hours in the evening.

As for the terms, they would be whatever monsieur desired.

Monsieur mentioned a sum.

The accountant became quite red. It was the amount he used to earn at
Hemerlingue's.

"Oh, no, that is too much."

But the other was no longer listening. He was seeking for words, as
though he had something very difficult to say, and suddenly, making up
his mind to it:

"Here is your first month's salary."

"But, monsieur--"

The young man insisted. He was a stranger. It was only fair that he
should pay in advance. Evidently, Passajon has told his secret.

M. Joyeuse understood, and in a low voice said, "Thank you, oh, thank
you," so deeply moved that words failed him. Life! it meant life,
several months of life, the time to turn round, to find another place.
His darlings would want for nothing. They would have their New Year's
presents. Oh, the mercy of Providence!

"Till Wednesday, then, M. Joyeuse."

"Till Wednesday, monsieur--"

"De Gery--Paul de Gery."

And they separated, both delighted, fascinated, the one by the
apparition of this unexpected saviour, the other by the adorable picture
of which he had only a glimpse, all those young girls grouped round the
table covered with books, exercise-books, and skeins of wool, with an
air of purity, of industrious honesty. This was a new Paris for Paul de
Gery, a courageous, home-like Paris, very different from that which he
already knew, a Paris of which the writers of stories in the newspapers
and the reporters never speak, and which recalled to him his own country
home, with an additional charm, that charm which the struggle and tumult
around lend to the tranquil, secured refuge.




FELICIA RUYS

"And your son, Jenkins. What are you doing with him? Why does one never
see him now at your house? He seemed a nice fellow."

As she spoke in that tone of disdainful bluntness which she almost
always used when speaking to the Irishman, Felicia was at work on the
bust of the Nabob which she had just commenced, posing her model, laying
down and taking up the boasting-tool, quickly wiping her fingers with
the little sponge, while the light and peace of a fine Sunday afternoon
fell on the top-light of the studio. Felicia "received" every Sunday,
if to receive were to leave her door open to allow people to come in,
go out, sit down for a moment, without stirring from her work or even
interrupting the course of a discussion to welcome the new arrivals.
They were artists, with refined heads and luxuriant beards; here and
there you might see among them white-haired friends of Ruys, her father;
then there were society men, bankers, stock-brokers, and a few young men
about town, come to see the handsome girl rather than her sculpture, in
order to be able to say at the club in the evening, "I was at Felicia's
to-day." Among them was Paul de Gery, silent, absorbed in an admiration
which each day sunk into his heart a little more deeply, trying to
understand the beautiful sphinx draped in purple cashmere and ecru lace,
who worked away bravely amid her clay, a burnisher's apron reaching
nearly to her neck, allowing her small, proud head to emerge with those
transparent tones, those gleams of veiled radiance of which the sense,
the inspiration bring the blood to the cheek as they pass. Paul always
remembered what had been said of her in his presence, endeavoured to
form an opinion for himself, doubted, worried himself, and was charmed,
vowing to himself each time that he would come no more and never missing
a Sunday. A little woman with gray, powdered hair was always there in
the same place, her pink face like a pastel somewhat worn by years, who,
in the discrete light of a recess, smiled sweetly, with her hands lying
idly on her knees, motionless as a fakir. Jenkins, amiable, with his
open face, his black eyes, and his apostolical manner, moved on from one
group to another, liked and known by all. He did not miss, either, one
of Felicia's days; and, indeed, he showed his patience in this, all the
snubs of his hostess both as artist and pretty woman being reserved for
him alone. Without appearing to notice them, with ever the same smiling,
indulgent serenity, he continued to pay his visits to the daughter of
his old Ruys, of the man whom he had so loved and tended to his last
moments.

This time, however, the question which Felicia had just addressed to him
respecting his son appeared extremely disagreeable to him, and it was
with a frown and a real expression of annoyance that he replied:
"Ma foi! I know no more than yourself what he is doing. He has quite
deserted us. He was bored at home. He cares only for his Bohemia."

Felicia gave a jump that made them all start, and with flashing eyes and
nostrils that quivered, said:

"That is too absurd. Ah, now, come, Jenkins. What do you mean by
Bohemia? A charming word, by-the-bye, and one that ought to recall long
days of wandering in the sun, halts in woody nooks, all the freshness of
fruits gathered by the open road. But since you have made a reproach of
the name, to whom do you apply it? To a few poor devils with long hair,
in love with liberty in rags, who starve to death in a fifth-floor
garret, or seek rhymes under tiles through which the rain filters;
to those madmen, growing more and more rare, who, from horror of the
customary, the traditional, the stupidity of life, have put their feet
together and made a jump into freedom? Come, that is too old a story.
It is the Bohemia of Murger, with the workhouse at the end, terror of
children, boon of parents, Red Riding-Hood eaten by the wolf. It was
worn out a long time ago, that story. Nowadays, you know well that
artists are the most regular people in their habits on earth, that they
earn money, pay their debts, and contrive to look like the first man you
may meet on the street. The true Bohemians exist, however; they are the
backbone of our society; but it is in your own world especially that
they are to be found. _Parbleu!_ They bear no external stamp and
nobody distrusts them; but, so far as uncertainty, want of substantial
foundation in their lives is concerned, they have nothing to wish for
from those whom they call so disdainfully 'irregulars.' Ah! if we
knew how much turpitude, what fantastic or abominable stories, a black
evening-coat, the most correct of your hideous modern garments, can
mask. Why, see, Jenkins, the other evening at your house I was amusing
myself by counting them--all these society adventurers--"

The little old lady, pink and powdered, put in gently from her place:

"Felicia, take care!"

But she continued, without listening:

"What do you call Monpavon, doctor? And Bois l'Hery? And de Mora
himself? And--" She was going to say "and the Nabob?" but stopped
herself.

"And how many others! Oh, truly, you may well speak of Bohemia with
contempt. But your fashionable doctor's clientele, oh sublime Jenkins,
consists of that very thing alone. The Bohemia of commerce, of finance,
of politics; unclassed people, shady people of all castes, and the
higher one ascends the more you find of them, because rank gives
impunity and wealth can pay for rude silence."

She spoke with a hard tone, greatly excited, with lip curled by a savage
disdain. The doctor forced a laugh and assumed a light, condescending
tone, repeating: "Ah, feather-brain, feather-brain!" And his glance,
anxious and beseeching, sought the Nabob, as though to demand his pardon
for all these paradoxical impertinences.

But Jansoulet, far from appearing vexed, was so proud of posing to this
handsome artist, so appreciative of the honour that was being done him,
that he nodded his head approvingly.

"She is right, Jenkins," said he at last, "she is right. It is we who
are the true Bohemia. Take me, for example; take Hemerlingue, two of the
men who handle the most money in Paris. When I think of the point from
which we started, of all the trades through which we have made our way.
Hemerlingue, once keeper of a regimental canteen. I, who have carried
sacks of wheat in the docks of Marseilles for my living. And the strokes
of luck by which our fortunes have been built up--as all fortunes,
moreover, in these times are built up. Go to the Bourse between three
and five. But, pardon, mademoiselle, see, through my absurd habit of
gesticulating when I speak, I have lost the pose. Come, is this right?"

"It is useless," said Felicia. A true daughter of an artist, of a genial
and dissolute artist, thoroughly in the romantic tradition, as was
Sebastien Ruys. She had never known her mother. She was the fruit of one
of those transient loves which used to enter suddenly into the bachelor
life of the sculptor like swallows into a dovecote of which the door is
always open, and who leave it again because no nest can be built there.

This time, the lady, ere she flew away, had left to the great artist,
then about forty years of age, a beautiful child whom he had brought
up, and who became the joy and the passion of his life. Until she
was thirteen, Felicia had lived in her father's house, introducing a
childish and tender note into that studio full of idlers, models, and
huge greyhounds lying at full length on the couches. There was a corner
reserved for her, for her attempts at sculpture, a whole miniature
equipment, a tripod, wax, etc., and old Ruys would cry to those who
entered:

"Don't go there. Don't move anything. That is the little one's corner."

So it came about that at ten years old she scarcely knew how to read and
could handle the boasting-tool with marvellous skill. Ruys would have
liked to keep always with him this child whom he never felt to be in the
way, a member of the great brotherhood from her earliest years. But
it was pitiful to see the little girl amid the free behaviour of the
frequenters of the house, the constant going and coming of the models,
the discussions of an art, so to speak, entirely physical, and even at
the noisy Sunday dinner-parties, sitting among five or six women, to all
of whom her father spoke familiarly. There were actresses, dancers or
singers, who, after dinner, would settle themselves down to smoke with
their elbows on the table absorbed in the indecent stories so keenly
relished by their host. Fortunately, childhood is protected by a
resisting candour, by an enamel over which all impurities glide. Felicia
became noisy, turbulent, ill-behaved, but without being touched by all
that passed over her little soul so near to earth.

Every year, in the summer, she used to go to stay for a few days with
her godmother, Constance Crenmitz, the elder Crenmitz, whom all Europe
had called for so long "the famous dancer," and who lived in peaceful
retirement at Fontainebleau.

The arrival of the "little demon" used to bring into the life of the old
dancer an element of disturbance from which she had afterward all the
year to recover. The frights which the child caused her by her daring
in climbing, in jumping, in riding, all the passionate transports of
her wild nature made this visit for her at once delicious and terrible;
delicious for she adored Felicia, the one family tie that remained to
this poor old salamander in retirement after thirty years of fluttering
in the glare of the footlights; terrible, for the demon used to upset
without pity the dancer's house, decorated, carefully ordered, perfumed,
like her dressing-room at the opera, and adorned with a museum of
souvenirs dated from every stage in the world.

Constance Crenmitz was the one feminine element in Felicia's childhood.
Futile, limited in mind, she had at least a coquettish taste, agile
fingers that knew how to sew, to embroider, to arrange things, to leave
in every corner of the room their dainty and individual trace. She
alone undertook to train up the wild young plant, and to awaken with
discretion the woman in this strange being on whom cloaks, furs,
everything elegant devised by fashion, seemed to take odd folds or look
curiously awkward.

It was the dancer again--in what neglect must she not have lived, this
little Ruys--who, triumphing over the paternal selfishness, insisted
upon a necessary separation, when Felicia was twelve or thirteen years
old; and she took also the responsibility of finding a suitable school,
a school which she selected of deliberate purpose, very comfortable and
very respectable, right at the upper end of an airy road, occupying a
roomy, old-world building surrounded by high walls, big trees, a sort of
convent without its constraint and contempt of serious studies.

Much work, on the contrary, was done in Mme. Belin's institution,
where the pupils went out only on the principal holidays and had no
communication with outside except the visits of relatives on Thursdays,
in a little garden planted with flowering shrubs or in the immense
parlour with carved and gilded work over its doors. The first entry
of Felicia into this almost monastic house caused indeed a certain
sensation; her dresses chosen by the Austrian dancer, her hair curling
to her waist, her gait free and easy like a boy's, aroused some
hostility, but she was a Parisian and could adapt herself quickly to
every situation and to all surroundings. A few days later, she looked
better than any one in the little black apron, to which the more
coquettish were wont to hang their watches, the straight skirt--a severe
and hard prescription at that period when fashion expanded women's
figures with an infinity of flounces--the regulation coiffure, two
plaits tied rather low, at the neck, after the manner of the Roman
peasants.

Strange to say, the regularity of the classes, their calm exactitude,
suited Felicia's nature, intelligent and quick, in which the taste
for study was relieved by a juvenile expansion at ease in the noisy
good-humour of playtime. She was popular. Among those daughters of
wealthy businessmen, of Parisian lawyers or of gentlemen-farmers, a
respectable and rather affectedly serious world, the well-known name
of old Ruys, the respect with which at Paris an artist's reputation is
surrounded, created for Felicia a greatly envied position, rendered more
brilliant still by her successes in the school-work, a genuine talent
for drawing, and her beauty, that superiority which asserts its
power even among young girls. In the wholesale atmosphere of the
boarding-school, she was conscious of an extreme pleasure as she grew
feminized, in resuming her sex, in learning to know order, regularity,
otherwise than these were taught by that amiable dancer whose kisses
seemed always to keep the taste of paint and her embraces somewhat
artificial in the curving of her arms. Ruys, her father, was enraptured
each time that he came to see his daughter, to find her more grown,
womanly, knowing how to enter, to walk, and to leave a room with that
pretty courtesy which caused all Mme. Belin's pupils to long for the
trailing rustle of a long skirt.

At first he came often, then, as he had not time enough for all his
commissions, accepted and undertaken, the advances on which went to pay
for the scrapes, the pleasures of his existence, he was seen more seldom
in the parlour. Finally, sickness intervened. Stricken by an incurable
anaemia, he would remain for weeks without leaving his house, without
doing any work. Thereupon he wished to have his daughter with him again;
and from the boarding-school, sheltered by so healthy a tranquility,
Felicia returned once more to her father's studio, haunted still by the
same boon companions, the parasites which swarm around every celebrity,
into the midst of which sickness had introduced a new personage, Dr.
Jenkins.

His fine open countenance, the air of candour, of serenity that seemed
to dwell about the person of this physician, already famous, who was
wont to speak of his art so carelessly and yet seemed to work miraculous
cures, the care with which he surrounded her father, these things made
a great impression on the young girl. Jenkins became immediately her
friend, confidant, a vigilant and kind guardian. Occasionally, when,
in the studio, somebody--her father most likely of all--uttered a risky
jest, the Irishman would contract his eyebrows, give a little click of
the tongue, or perhaps distract Felicia's attention.

He often used to take her to pass the day with Mme. Jenkins,
endeavouring to prevent her from becoming again the wild young thing she
was before going to school, or even something worse, as she threatened
to do in the moral neglect, sadder than all other, in which she was
left.

But the young girl had as a protection something even better than the
irreproachable and worldly example of the handsome Mme. Jenkins: the art
that she adored, the enthusiasm which it implanted in her nature wholly
occupied with outside things, the sentiment of beauty, of truth, which,
from her thoughtful brain, full of ideas, passed into her fingers with
a little quivering of the nerves, a desire of the idea accomplished, of
the realized image. All day long she would work at her sculpture, giving
shape to her dreams with that happiness of instinctive youth which
lends so much charm to early work; this prevented her from any excessive
regret for the austerity of the Belin institution, sheltering and light
as the veil of a novice before her vows, and preserved her also from
dangerous conversations, unheard amid her unique preoccupation.

Ruys was proud of this talent growing up at his side. Growing every day
feebler, already at that stage in which the artist regrets himself, he
found in following Felicia's progress a certain consolation for his
own ended career. He saw the boasting-tool, which trembled in his hand,
taken up again under his eye with a virile firmness and assurance,
tempered by all those delicacies of her being which a woman can apply to
the realization of an art. A strange sensation, this double paternity,
this survival of genius as it abandons the man whose day is over to pass
into him who is at his dawn, like those beautiful, familiar birds which,
on the eve of a death, will desert the menaced roof to fly away to a
less mournful lodging.

During the last period of her father's life, Felicia--a great artist and
still a mere child--used to execute half of his works; and nothing was
more touching than this collaboration of father and daughter, in the
same studio, around the same group. The operation did not always proceed
peaceably; although her father's pupil, Felicia already felt her
own personality rebel against any despotic direction. She had those
audacities of the beginner, those intuitions of the future which are the
heritage of young talents, and, in opposition to the romantic traditions
of Sebastien Ruys, a tendency to modern realism, a need to plant that
glorious old flag upon some new monument.

These things were the occasion of terrible arguments, of discussions
from which the father came out beaten, conquered by his daughter's
logic, astonished at the progress made by the young, while the old, who
have opened the way for them, remain motionless at the point from which
they started. When she was working for him, Felicia would yield more
easily; but, where her own sculpture was concerned she was found to
be intractable. Thus the _Joueur de Boules_, her first exhibited work,
which obtained so great a success at the Salon of 1862, was the subject
of violent scenes between the two artists, of contradictions so strong,
that Jenkins had to intervene and help to secure the safety of the
plaster-cast which Ruys had threatened to destroy.

Apart from such little dramas, which in no way affected the tenderness
of their hearts, these two beings adored each other with the
presentiment and, gradually, the cruel certitude of an approaching
separation, when suddenly there occurred in Felicia's life a horrible
event. One day, Jenkins had taken her to dine at his house, as often
happened. Mme. Jenkins was away on a couple of days' visit, as also her
son; but the doctor's age, his semi-paternal intimacy, allowed him to
have with him, even in his wife's absence, this young girl whose fifteen
years, the fifteen years of an Eastern Jewess glorious in her precocious
beauty, left her still near childhood.

The dinner was very gay, and Jenkins pleasant and cordial as usual.
Afterwards they went into the doctor's study, and suddenly, on the
couch, in the middle of an intimate and quite friendly conversation
about her father, his health, their work together, Felicia felt as it
were the chill of a gulf between herself and this man, then the brutal
grasp of a faun. She beheld an unknown Jenkins, wild-looking, stammering
with a besotted laugh and outraging hands. In the surprise, the
unexpectedness of this bestial attack, any other than Felicia--a child
of her own age, really innocent, would have been lost. As for her, poor
little thing! what saved her was her knowledge. She had heard so many
stories of this kind of thing at her father's table! and then art,
and the life of the studio--She was not an _ingenue_. In a moment she
understood the object of this grasp, struggled, sprang up, then, not
being strong enough, cried out. He was afraid, released his hold, and
suddenly she found herself standing up, free, with the man on his knees
weeping and begging forgiveness. He had yielded to a fit of madness.
She was so beautiful; he loved her so much. For months he had been
struggling. But now it was over, never again, oh, never again! Not
even would he so much as touch the hem of her dress. She made no reply,
trembled, put her hair and her clothes straight again with the fingers
of a woman demented. To go home--she wished to go home instantly, quite
alone. He sent a servant with her; and, quite low, as she was getting
into the carriage, whispered:

"Above all, not a word. It would kill your father."

He knew her so well, he was so sure of his power over her through that
suggestion, the blackguard! that he returned on the morrow looking
bright as ever and with loyal face as though nothing had happened. In
fact, she never spoke of the matter to her father, nor to any one. But,
dating from that day, a change came over her, a sudden development, as
it were, of her haughty ways. She was subject to caprices, wearinesses,
a curl of disgust in her smile, and sometimes quick fits of anger
against her father, a glance of contempt which reproached him for not
having known how to watch over her.

"What is the matter with her?" Ruys, her father, used to say; and
Jenkins, with the authority of a doctor, would put it down to her age
and some physical disturbance. He avoided speaking to the girl herself,
counting on time to efface the sinister impression, and not despairing
of attaining his end, for he desired it still, more than ever, prey to
the exasperated love of a man of forty-seven to one of those incurable
passions of maturity; and that was this hypocrite's punishment. This
unusual condition of his daughter was a real grief to the sculptor; but
this grief was of short duration. Without warning, Ruys flickered out of
life, fell to pieces in a moment, as was the way with all the Irishman's
patients. His last words were:

"Jenkins, I beg you to look after my daughter."

They were so ironically mournful that Jenkins could not prevent himself
from turning pale.

Felicia was even more stupefied than grief-stricken. To the amazement
caused by death, which she had never seen and which now came before her
wearing features so dear, there was joined the sense of a vast solitude
surrounded by darkness and perils.

A few of the sculptor's friends gathered together as a family council
to consider the future of this unfortunate child without relatives or
fortune. Fifty francs had been discovered in the box where Sebastien
used to put his money, on a piece of the studio furniture well known to
its needy frequenters and visited by them without scruple. There was
no other inheritance, at least in cash; only a quantity of artistic
and curious furniture of the most sumptuous description, a few valuable
pictures, and a certain amount of money owing but scarcely sufficing
to cover numberless debts. It was proposed to organize a sale. Felicia,
when she was consulted, replied that she would not care if everything
were sold, but, for God's sake, let them leave her in peace.

The sale did not take place, however, thanks to the godmother, the
excellent Crenmitz, who suddenly made her appearance, calm and gentle as
usual.

"Don't listen to them, my child. Sell nothing. Your old Constance has
an income of fifteen thousand francs, which was destined to come to you
later on. You will take advantage of it at once, that is all. We will
live here together. You will see, I shall not be in the way. You will
work at your sculpture, I shall manage the house. Does that suit you?"

It was said so tenderly, with that childishness of accent which
foreigners have when expressing themselves in French, that the girl
was deeply moved. Her heart that had seemed turned to stone opened, a
burning flood came pouring from her eyes, and she rushed, flung herself
into the arms of the dancer. "Ah, godmother, how good you are to me!
Yes, yes, don't leave me any more. Stay with me always. Life frightens
and disgusts me. I see so much hypocrisy in it, so much falsehood." And
the old woman arranged for herself a silken and embroidered nest in this
house so like a traveller's camp laden with treasures from every land,
and the suggested dual life began for these two different natures.

It was no small sacrifice that Constance had made for the dear demon in
quitting her Fontainebleau retreat for Paris, which inspired her with
terror. Ever since the day when this dancer, with her extravagant
caprices, who made princely fortunes flow and disappear through her five
open fingers, had descended from her triumphant position, a little of
its dazzling glitter still in her eyes, and had attempted to resume
an ordinary existence, to manage her little income and her modest
household, she had been the object of a thousand impudent exploitations,
of frauds that were easy in view of the ignorance of this poor butterfly
that was frightened by reality and came into collision with all its
unknown difficulties. Living in Felicia's house, the responsibility
became still more serious by reason of the wastefulness introduced long
ago by the father and continued by the daughter, two artists knowing
nothing of economy. She had, moreover, other difficulties to conquer.
She found the studio insupportable with its permanent atmosphere of
tobacco smoke, an impenetrable cloud for her, in which the discussions
on art, the analysis of ideas, were lost and which infallibly gave her a
headache. "Chaff," above all, frightened her. As a foreigner, as at
one time a divinity of the green-room, brought up on out-of-date
compliments, on gallantries _a la Dorat_, she did not understand it,
and would feel terrified in the presence of the wild exaggerations, the
paradoxes of these Parisians refined by the liberty of the studio.

That kind of thing was intimidating to her who had never possessed wit
save in the vivacity of her feet, and reduced her simply to the rank of
a lady-companion; and, seeing this amiable old dame sitting, silent and
smiling, her knitting in her lap, like one of Chardin's _bourgeoises_,
or hastening by the side of her cook up the long Rue de Chaillot, where
the nearest market happened to be, one would never have guessed that
that simple old body had ruled kings, princes, the whole class
of amorous nobles and financiers, at the caprice of her step and
pirouettings.

Paris is full of such fallen stars, extinguished by the crowd.

Some of these famous ones, these conquerors of a former day, cherish a
rage in their heart; others, on the contrary, enjoy the past blissfully,
digest in an ineffable content all their glorious and ended joys, asking
only repose, silence, shadow, good enough for memory and contemplations,
so that when they die people are quite astonished to learn that they had
been still living.

Constance Crenmitz was among these fortunate ones. The household of
these two women was a curious one. Both were childlike, placing side by
side in a common domain, inexperience and ambition, the tranquility of
an accomplished destiny and the fever of a life plunged in struggle,
all the different qualities manifest even in the serene style of dress
affected by this blonde who seemed all white like a faded rose,
with something beneath her bright colours that vaguely suggested the
footlights, and that brunette with the regular features, who almost
always clothed her beauty in dark materials, simple in fold, a
semblance, as it were, of virility.

Things unforeseen, caprices, ignorance of even the least important
details, led to an extreme disorder in the finances of the household,
disorder which was only rectified by dint of privations, by the
dismissal of servants, by reforms that were laughable in their
exaggeration. During one of these crises, Jenkins had made veiled
delicate offers, which, however, were repulsed with contempt by Felicia.

"It is not nice of you," Constance would remark to her, "to be so
hard on the poor doctor. After all, there was nothing offensive in his
suggestion. An old friend of your father."

"He, any one's friend! Ah, the hypocrite!"

And Felicia, hardly able to contain herself, would give an ironical turn
to her wrath, imitating Jenkins with his oily manner and his hand on his
heart; then, puffing out her cheeks, she would say in a loud, deep voice
full of lying unction:

"Let us be humane, let us be kind. To do good without hope of reward!
That is the whole point."

Constance used to laugh till the tears came, in spite of herself. The
resemblance was so perfect.

"All the same, you are too hard. You will end by driving him away
altogether."

"Little fear of that," a shake of the girl's head would reply.

In effect he always came back, pleasant, amiable, dissimulating his
passion, which was visible only when it grew jealous of newcomers,
paying assiduous attention to the old dancer, who, in spite of
everything, found his good-nature pleasing and recognised in him a man
of her own time, of the time when one accosted a woman with a kiss on
her hand, with a compliment on her appearance.

One morning, Jenkins having called in the course of his round, found
Constance alone and doing nothing in the antechamber.

"You see, doctor, I am on guard," she remarked tranquilly.

"How is that?"

"Felicia is at work. She wishes not to be disturbed; and the servants
are so stupid, I am myself seeing that her orders are obeyed."

Then, seeing that the Irishman made a step towards the studio:

"No, no, don't go in. She told me very particularly not to let any one
go in."

"But I?"

"I beg you not. You would get me a scolding."

Jenkins was about to take his leave when a burst of laughter from
Felicia, coming through the curtains, made him prick up his ears.

"She is not alone, then?"

"No, the Nabob is with her. They are having a sitting for the portrait."

"And why this mystery? It is a very singular thing." He commenced to
walk backward and forward, evidently very angry, but containing his
wrath.

At last he burst forth.

It was an unheard-of impropriety to let a girl thus shut herself in with
a man.

He was surprised that one so serious, so devoted as Constance--What did
it look like?

The old lady looked at him with stupefaction. As though Felicia were
like other girls! And then what danger was there with the Nabob, so
staid a man and so ugly? Besides, Jenkins ought to know quite well that
Felicia never consulted anybody, that she always had her own way.

"No, no, it is impossible! I cannot tolerate this," exclaimed the
Irishman.

And, without paying any further heed to the dancer, who raised her arms
to heaven as a call upon it to witness what was about to happen, he
moved towards the studio; but, instead of entering immediately, he
softly half-opened the door and raised a corner of the hangings, whereby
the portion of the room in which the Nabob was posing became visible to
him, although at a considerable distance.

Jansoulet, seated without cravat and with his waist-coat open, was
talking apparently in some agitation and in a low voice. Felicia was
replying in a similar tone, in laughing whispers. The sitting was very
animated. Then a silence, a silken rustle of skirts, and the artist,
going up to her model, turned down his linen collar all round with
familiar gesture, allowing her light hand to run over the sun-tanned
skin.

That Ethiopian face on which the muscles stood out in the very
intoxication of health, with its long drooping eyelashes as of some deer
being gently stroked in its sleep; the bold profile of the girl as she
leaned over those strange features in order to verify their proportions;
then a violent, irresistible gesture, clutching the delicate hand as it
passed and pressing it to two thick, passionate lips. Jenkins saw all
that in one red flash.

The noise that he made in entering caused the two personages instantly
to resume their respective positions, and, in the strong light which
dazzled his prying eyes, he saw the young girl standing before him,
indignant, stupefied.

"Who is that? Who has taken the liberty?" and the Nabob, on his
platform, with his collar turned down, petrified, monumental.

Jenkins, a little abashed, frightened by his own audacity, murmured some
excuses. He had something very urgent to say to M. Jansoulet, a piece of
news which was most important and would suffer no delay. "He knew upon
the best authority that certain decorations were to be bestowed on the
16th of March."

Immediately the face of the Nabob, that for a moment had been frowning,
relaxed.

"Ah! can it be true?"

He abandoned his pose. The thing was worth the trouble, _que diable!_
M. de la Perriere, a secretary of the department involved had been
commissioned by the Empress to visit the Bethlehem Refuge. Jenkins had
come in search of the Nabob to take him to see the secretary at the
Tuileries and to appoint a day. This visit to Bethlehem, it meant the
cross for him.

"Quick, let us start, my dear doctor. I follow you."

He was no longer angry with Jenkins for having disturbed him, and he
knotted his cravat feverishly, forgetting in his new emotions how he had
been upset a moment earlier, for ambition with him came before all else.

While the two men were talking in a half-whisper, Felicia, standing
motionless before them, with quivering nostrils and her lip curled in
contempt, watched them with an air of saying, "Well, I am waiting."

Jansoulet apologized for being obliged to interrupt the sitting; but a
visit of the most extreme importance--She smiled in pity.

"Don't mention it, don't mention it. At the point which we have reached
I can work without you."

"Oh, yes," said the doctor, "the work is almost completed."

He added with the air of a connoisseur:

"It is a fine piece of work."

And, counting upon covering his retreat with this compliment, he made
for the door with shoulders drooped; but Felicia detained him abruptly.

"Stay, you. I have something to say to you."

He saw clearly from her look that he would have to yield, on pain of an
explosion.

"You will excuse me, _cher ami_? Mademoiselle has a word for me. My
brougham is at the door. Get in. I will be with you immediately."

As soon as the door of the studio had closed on that heavy, retreating
foot, each of them looked at the other full in the face.

"You must be either drunk or mad to have allowed yourself to behave in
this way. What! you dare to enter my house when I am not at home? What
does this violence mean? By what right--"

"By the right of a despairing and incurable passion."

"Be silent, Jenkins, you are saying words that I will not hear. I allow
you to come here out of pity, from habit, because my father was fond of
you. But never speak to me again of your--love"--she uttered the word in
a very low voice, as though it were shameful--"or you shall never see me
again, even though I should have to kill myself in order to escape you
once and for all."

A child caught in mischief could not bend its head more humbly than did
Jenkins, as he replied:

"It is true. I was in the wrong. A moment of madness, of blindness--But
why do you amuse yourself by torturing my heart as you do?"

"I think of you often, however."

"Whether you think of me or not, I am there, I see what goes on, and
your coquetry hurts me terribly."

A touch of red mounted to her cheeks at this reproach.

"A coquette, I? And with whom?"

"With that," said the Irishman, indicating the ape-like and powerful
bust.

She tried to laugh.

"The Nabob? What folly!"

"Don't tell an untruth about it now. Do you think I am blind, that I
do not notice all your little manoeuvres? You remain alone with him for
very long at a time. Just now, I was there. I saw you." He dropped his
voice as though breath had failed him. "What do you want, strange and
cruel child? I have seen you repulse the most handsome, the most noble,
the greatest. That little de Gery devours you with his eyes; you take no
notice. The Duc de Mora himself has not been able to reach your heart.
And it is that man there who is ugly, vulgar, who had no thought of you,
whose head is full of quite other matters than love. You saw how he went
off just now. What can you mean? What do you expect from him?"

"I want--I want him to marry me. There!"

Coldly, in a softened tone, as though this avowal had brought her
nearer the level of the man whom she so much despised, she explained her
motives. The life which she led was pushing her into a situation from
which there was no way out. She had luxurious and expensive tastes,
habits of disorder which nothing could conquer and which would bring her
inevitably to poverty, both her and that good Crenmitz, who was allowing
herself to be ruined without saying a word. In three years, four years
at the outside, all would be over with them. And then the wretched
expedients, the debts, the tatters and old shoes of poor artists'
households. Or, indeed, the lover, the man who keeps a mistress--that is
to say, slavery and infamy.

"Come, come," said Jenkins. "And what of me, am I not here?"

"Anything rather than you," she exclaimed, stiffening. "No, what I
require, what I want, is a husband who will protect me from others and
from myself, who will save me from many terrible things of which I am
afraid in my moments of ennui, from the gulfs in which I feel that I may
perish, some one who will love me while I am at work and relieve my poor
old wearied fairy of her sentry duty. This man here suits my purpose,
and I thought of him from the first time I met him. He is ugly, but he
has a kind manner; then, too, he is ridiculously rich, and wealth, upon
that scale, must be amusing. Oh, I know well enough. No doubt there
is in his life some blemish that has brought him luck. All that money
cannot be made honestly. But come, truly now, Jenkins, with your hand
on that heart you so often invoke, do you think me a wife who should be
very attractive to an honest man? See: among all these young men who ask
permission as a favour to be allowed to come here, which one has dreamed
of offering me marriage? Never a single one. De Gery no more than the
rest. I am attractive, but I make men afraid. It is intelligible enough.
What can one imagine of a girl brought up as I have been, without a
mother, among my father's models and mistresses? What mistresses, _mon
Dieu_! And Jenkins for sole guardian. Oh, when I think, when I think!"

And from that far-off memory things surged up that stirred her to a
deeper wrath.

"Ah, yes, _parbleu_! I am a daughter of adventure, and this adventurer
is, of a truth, the fit husband for me."

"You must wait at least till he is a widower," replied Jenkins calmly.
"And, in that case, you run the risk of having a long time to wait, for
his Levantine seems to enjoy excellent health."

Felicia Ruys turned pale.

"He is married?"

"Married? certainly, and father of a bevy of children. The whole camp of
them landed a couple of days ago."

For a minute she remained overwhelmed, looking into space, her cheeks
quivering. Opposite her, the Nabob's large face, with its flattened
nose, its sensual and weak mouth, spoke insistently of life and reality
in the gloss of its clay. She looked at it for an instant, then made a
step forward and, with a gesture of disgust, overturned, with the high
wooden stool on which it stood, the glistening and greasy block, which
fell on the floor shattered to a heap of mud.




JANSOULET AT HOME

Married he was and had been so for twelve years, but he had mentioned
the fact to no one among his Parisian acquaintances, through Eastern
habit, that silence which the people of those countries preserve upon
affairs of the harem. Suddenly it was reported that madame was coming,
that apartments were to be prepared for herself, her children, and her
female attendants. The Nabob took the whole second floor of the house
on the Place Vendome, the tenant of which was turned out at an expense
worthy of a Nabob. The stables also were extended, the staff doubled;
then, one day, coachmen and carriages went to the Gare de Lyon to meet
madame, who arrived by train heated expressly for her during the journey
from Marseilles and filled by a suite of negresses, serving-maids, and
little negro boys.

She arrived in a condition of frightful exhaustion, utterly worn out
and bewildered by her long railway journey, the first of her life, for,
after being taken to Tunis while still quite a child, she had never left
it. From her carriage, two negroes carried her into her apartments on an
easy chair which, subsequently, always remained downstairs beneath
the entrance porch, in readiness for these difficult removals. Mme.
Jansoulet could not mount the staircase, which made her dizzy; she
would not have lifts, which creaked under her weight; besides, she
never walked. Of enormous size, bloated to such a degree that it was
impossible to assign to her any particular age between twenty-five and
forty, with a rather pretty face but grown shapeless in its features,
dull eyes beneath lids that drooped, vulgarly dressed in foreign
clothes, laden with diamonds and jewels after the fashion of a Hindu
idol, she was as fine a sample as could be found of those transplanted
European women called Levantines--a curious race of obese creoles whom
speech and costume alone attach to our world, but whom the East wraps
round with its stupefying atmosphere, with the subtle poisons of its
drugged air in which everything, from the tissues of the skin to the
waists of garments, even to the soul, is enervated and relaxed.

This particular specimen of it was the daughter of an immensely rich
Belgian who was engaged in the coral trade at Tunis, and in whose
business Jansoulet, after his arrival in the country, had been employed
for some months. Mlle. Afchin, in those days a delicious little doll of
twelve years old, with radiant complexion, hair, and health, used often
to come to fetch her father from the counting-house in the great chariot
with its yoke of mules which carried them to their fine villa at La
Marsu, in the vicinity of Tunis. This mischievous child with splendid
bare shoulders, had dazzled the adventurer as he caught glimpses of
her amid her luxurious surroundings, and, years afterward, when, having
become rich and the favourite of the Bey, he began to think of settling
down, it was to her that his thoughts went. The child had grown into a
fat young woman, heavy and white. Her intelligence, dull in the first
instance, had become still more obscured through the inertia of a
dormouse's existence, the carelessness of a father given over to
business, the use of opium-saturated tobacco and of preserves made from
rose-leaves, the torpor of her Flemish blood, re-enforced by Oriental
indolence. Furthermore, she was ill-bred, gluttonous, sensual, arrogant,
a Levantine jewel in perfection.

But Jansoulet saw nothing of all this.

For him she was, and remained, up to the time of her arrival in Paris, a
superior creature, a lady of the most exalted rank, a Demoiselle Afchin.
He addressed her with respect, in her presence maintained an attitude
which was a little constrained and timid, gave her money without
counting, satisfied her most costly fantasies, her wildest caprices, all
the strange desires of a Levantine's brain disordered through boredom
and idleness. One word alone excused everything. She was a Demoiselle
Afchin. Beyond this, no intercourse between them; he always at the
Kasbah or the Bardo, courting the favour of the Bey, or else in his
counting-houses; she passing her days in bed, wearing in her hair a
diadem of pearls worth three hundred thousand francs which she never
took off, befuddling her brain with smoking, living as in a harem,
admiring herself in the glass, adorning herself, in company with a few
other Levantines, whose supreme distraction consisted in measuring with
their necklaces arms and legs which rivalled each other in plumpness,
and bearing children about whom she never gave herself the least
trouble, whom she never used to see, who had not even cost her a pang,
for she gave birth to them under chloroform. A lump of white flesh
perfumed with musk. And, as Jansoulet used to say with pride: "I married
a Demoiselle Afchin!"

Under the sky of Paris and its cold light the disillusion began.
Determined to settle down, to receive, to give entertainments, the Nabob
had brought his wife over with the idea of setting her at the head of
the establishment; but when he saw the arrival of that display of gaudy
draperies of Palais-Royal jewelry, and all the strange paraphernalia in
her suite, he had the vague impression of a Queen Pomare in exile.
The fact was that now he had seen real women of the world, and he made
comparisons. After having planned a great ball to celebrate her arrival,
he prudently changed his mind. Besides, Mme. Jansoulet desired to see
nobody. Here her natural indolence was increased by the home-sickness
which she suffered, from the first hour of her coming, by the chilliness
of a yellow fog and the dripping rain. She passed several days without
getting up, weeping aloud like a child, saying that it was in order to
cause her death that she had been brought to Paris, and not permitting
her women to do even the least thing for her. She lay there bellowing
among the laces of her pillow, with her hair bristling in disorder about
her diadem, the windows of the room closed, the curtains drawn close,
the lamps lighted night and day, crying out that she wanted to go
away-y, to go away-y; and it was pitiful to see, in that funeral gloom,
the half-unpacked trunks scattered over the carpets, the frightened
maids, the negresses crouched around their mistress in her nervous
attack, they also groaning, with haggard eyes like those dogs of artic
travellers that go mad without the sun.

The Irish doctor, called in to deal with all this trouble, had no
success with his fatherly manners, the pretty phrases that issued from
his compressed lips. The Levantine would have nothing to do at any price
with the arsenic pearls as a tonic. The Nabob was in consternation.
What was to be done? Send her back to Tunis with the children? It was
scarcely possible. He was decidedly in disgrace in that quarter. The
Hemerlingues were triumphant. A last affront had filled up the
measure. At Jansoulet's departure, the Bey had commissioned him to have
gold-pieces struck at the Paris Mint of a new design to the value of
several millions; then the order, suddenly withdrawn, had been given
to Hemerlingue. Publicly outraged, Jansoulet had replied by a public
demonstration, offering for sale all his possessions, his palace at
the Bardo given to him by the former Bey, his villas of La Marsu all of
white marble, surrounded by splendid gardens, his counting-houses which
were the largest and the most sumptuous in the city, and, charging,
finally, the intelligent Bompain to bring over to him his wife and
children in order to make a clear affirmation of a definitive departure.
After such an uproar, it was no easy thing for him to return there;
this was what he endeavoured to make evident to Mlle. Afchin, who only
replied to him by deep groans. He tried to console her, to amuse her,
but what distraction could be found to appeal to that monstrously
apathetic nature? And then, could he change the sky of Paris, restore to
the unhappy Levantine her _patio_ paved with marble, where she used to
pass long hours in a cool, delicious sleepiness, listening to the water
as it dripped on the great alabaster fountain with its three basins, one
over the other, and her gilded barge, with its awning of crimson, which
eight Tripolitan boatmen supple and vigorous rowed after sunset on the
beautiful lake of El-Baheira? However luxurious the apartment of the
Place Vendome might be, it could not compensate for the loss of these
marvels. And then she would be more miserable than ever. At last, a man
who was a frequent visitor to the house succeeded in lifting her out
of her despair. This was Cabassu, the man who described himself on his
cards as "professor of massage," a big, dark, thick-set man, smelling
of garlic and pomade, square-shouldered, hairy to the eyes, and who
knew stories of Parisian seraglios, tales within the reach of madame's
intelligence. Having once come to massage her, she wished to see him
again, retained him. He had to give up all his other clients, and
became, at the salary of a senator, the masseur of this stout lady, her
page, her reader, her body-guard. Jansoulet, delighted to see his wife
contented, was unconscious of the ridicule attached to this intimacy.

Cabassu was now seen in the Bois, seated beside the favourite maid in
the huge and sumptuous open carriage, also at the back of the theatre
boxes taken by the Levantine, for she began to go out, since she had
grown less torpid under the treatment of her masseur and was determined
to amuse herself. The theatre pleased her, especially farces or
melodramas. The apathy of her large body found a stimulus in the false
glare of the footlights. But it was to Cardailhac's theatre that she
went for preference. There, the Nabob found himself in his own house.
From the chief superintendent to the humblest _ouvreuse_, the whole
staff was under his control. He had a key which enabled him to pass from
the corridors on to the stage; and the small drawing-room communicating
with his box was decorated in Oriental manner, with a concave ceiling
like a beehive, its couches covered in camel's hair, the flame of the
gas inclosed in a little Moorish lantern. Here one could enjoy a siesta
during rather long intervals between the acts; a gallant attention on
the part of the manager to the wife of his partner. Nor did that ape of
a Cardailhac stop at this. Remarking the taste of the Demoiselle Afchin
for the drama, he had ended by persuading her that she also possessed
the intuition, the knowledge of it, and by begging her when she had
nothing better to do to glance over and let him know what she thought
of the pieces that were submitted to him. A good way of cementing the
partnership more firmly.

Poor manuscripts in your blue or yellow covers, bound by hope with
fragile ribbons, that set out full of ambition and dreams, who knows
what hands may touch you, turn over your pages, what indiscreet fingers
deflower your charm, the charm of the unknown, that glittering dust
which lies on new ideas? Who may judge you and who condemn? Sometimes,
before dining out, Jansoulet, mounting to his wife's room, would find
her on her lounge, smoking, her head thrown back, bundles of manuscripts
by her side, and Cabassu, armed with a blue pencil, reading in his thick
voice and with the Bourg-Saint-Andeol accent, some dramatic lucubration
which he cut and scored without pity at the least criticism from the
lady.

"Don't disturb yourselves," the good Nabob would signal with his hand,
entering on tiptoe. He would listen, shake his head with an admiring
air, as he watched his wife: "She is astonishing!" for he himself
understood nothing about literature, and there, at least, he could
discover once again the superiority of Mlle. Afchin.

"She had the instinct of the stage," as Cardailhac used to say; but, on
the other hand, the maternal instinct was wanting in her. Never did
she take any interest in her children, abandoning them to the hands of
strangers, and, when they were brought to her once a month, contenting
herself with offering to them the flaccid and inanimate flesh of
her cheeks between two puffs of cigarette-smoke, without making any
inquiries into those details of their bringing up and of their health
which perpetuate the physical bond of maternity and make the hearts of
true mothers bleed at the least suffering of their children.

They were three big, dull and apathetic boys of eleven, nine, and seven
years, having, with the sallow complexion and the precocious bloatedness
of the Levantine, the kind, black, velvety eyes of their father. They
were ignorant as young lords of the middle ages. At Tunis, M. Bompain
had directed their studies; but at Paris, the Nabob, anxious to give
them the benefit of a Parisian education, had sent them to that smartest
and most expensive of boarding-schools, the College Bourdaloue, managed
by good priests who sought less to instruct their pupils than to make of
them good-mannered and right-thinking men of the world, and succeeded
in turning them out affectedly grave and ridiculous little prigs,
disdainful of games, absolutely ignorant, without anything spontaneous
or boyish about them, and of a desperate precocity. The little
Jansoulets were not very happy in this forcing-house, notwithstanding
the immunities which they enjoyed by reason of their immense wealth;
they were, indeed, utterly left to themselves. Even the creoles in the
charge of the institution had some friend whom they visited and people
who came to see them; but the Jansoulets were never summoned to the
parlour, no one knew any of their relatives; from time to time they
received basketfuls of sweetmeats, piles of confectionery, and that was
all. The Nabob, doing some shopping in Paris, would strip for them the
whole of a pastry-cook's window and send the spoils to the college, with
that generous impulse of the heart mingled with negro ostentation
which characterized all his actions. It was the same in the matter
of playthings. They were always too pretty, tricked out too finely,
useless--those toys that are for show but which the Parisian does not
buy. But that which above all attracted to the little Jansoulets the
respect both of pupils and masters, were their purses heavy with gold,
ever ready for school subscriptions, for the professors' birthdays,
and the charity visits, those famous visits organized by the College
Bourdaloue, one of the tempting things in the prospectus, the marvel of
sensitive souls.

Twice a month, turn and turn about, the pupils who were members of the
miniature Society of St. Vincent de Paul founded in the college upon the
model of the great one, went in little squads, alone, as though they had
been grown-up, to bear succour and consolation into the deepest recesses
of the more densely populated quarters of the town. This was designed
to teach them a practical charity, the art of knowing the needs, the
miseries of the lower classes, and to heal these heart-rending evils
by a nostrum of kind words and ecclesiastical maxims. To console, to
evangelize the masses by the help of childhood, to disarm religious
incredulity by the youth and _naivete_ of the apostles, such was the aim
of this little society; an aim entirely missed, moreover. The children,
healthy, well-dressed, well-fed, calling only at addresses previously
selected, found poor persons of good appearance, sometimes rather
unwell, but very clean, already on the parish register and in receipt of
aid from the wealthy organization of the Church. Never did they
chance to enter one of those nauseous dwellings wherein hunger, grief,
humiliation, all physical and moral ills are written in leprous mould on
the walls, in indelible lines on the brows. Their visits were prepared
for, like that of the sovereign who enters a guard-room to taste the
soldiers' soup: the guard-room is warmed and the soup seasoned for
the royal palate. Have you seen those pictures in pious books, where a
little communicant, with candle in hand, and perfectly groomed, comes
to minister to a poor old man lying sick on his straw pallet and turning
the whites of his eyes to heaven? These visits of charity had the same
conventionality of setting and of accent. To the measured gestures of
the little preachers were corresponding words learned by heart and
false enough to make one squint. To the comic encouragement, to the
"consolations lavished" in prize-book phrases by the voices of young
urchins with colds, were the affecting benedictions, the whining and
piteous mummeries of a church-porch after vespers. And the moment the
young visitors departed, what an explosion of laughter and shouting in
the garret, what a dance in a circle round the present brought, what an
upsetting of the arm-chair in which one had pretended to be lying ill,
of the medicine spilt in the fire, a fire of cinders very artistically
prepared!

When the little Jansoulets went out to visit their parents at home,
they were intrusted to the care of the man with the red fez, the
indispensable Bompain. It was Bompain who conducted them to the
Champs-Elysees, clad in English jackets, bowler hats of the latest
fashion--at seven years old!--and carrying little canes in their
dog-skin-gloved hands. It was Bompain who stuffed the race-wagonette
with provisions. Here he mounted with the children, who, with their
entrance-cards stuck in their hats round which green veils were twisted,
looked very like those personages in Liliputian pantomimes whose entire
funniness lies in the enormous size of their heads compared with their
small legs and dwarf-like gestures. They smoked and drank; it was a
painful sight. Sometimes the man in the fez, hardly able to hold himself
upright, would bring them home frightfully sick. And yet Jansoulet was
fond of them, the youngest especially, who, with his long hair, his
doll-like manner, recalled to him the little Afchin passing in her
carriage. But they were still of the age when children belong to the
mother, when neither the fashionable tailor, nor the most accomplished
masters, nor the smart boarding-school, nor the ponies girthed specially
for the little men in the stable, nor anything else can replace
the attentive and caressing hand, the warmth and the gaiety of the
home-nest. The father could not give them that; and then, too, he was so
busy!

A thousand irons in the fire: the Territorial Bank, the installation
of the picture gallery, drives to Tattersall's with Bois l'Hery,
some _bibelot_ to inspect, here or there, at the houses of collectors
indicated by Schwalbach, hours passed with trainers, jockeys, dealers
in curiosities, the encumbered and multiple existence of a _bourgeois
gentilhomme_ in modern Paris. This rubbing of shoulders with all sorts
and conditions of people brought him improvement, in that each day he
was becoming a little more Parisianized; he was received at Monpavon's
club, in the green-room of the ballet, behind the scenes at the
theatres, and presided regularly at his famous bachelor luncheons, the
only receptions possible in his household. His existence was really a
very busy one, and de Gery relieved him of the heaviest part of it, the
complicated department of appeals and of charities.

The young man now became acquainted with all the audacious and burlesque
inventions, all the serio-comic combinations of that mendicancy of great
cities, organized like a department of state, innumerable as an army,
which subscribes to the newspapers and knows its _Bottin_ by heart. He
received the blonde lady, bold, young, and already faded, who only asks
for a hundred napoleons, with the threat that she will throw herself
into the river when she leaves if they are not given to her, and the
stout matron of prepossessing and unceremonious manner, who says, as she
enters: "Sir, you do not know me. Neither have I the honour of knowing
you. But we shall soon make each other's acquaintance. Be kind enough to
sit down and let us have a chat." The merchant at bay, on the verge of
bankruptcy--sometimes it is true--who comes to entreat you to save his
honour, with a pistol ready to shoot himself, bulging out the pocket
of his overcoat--sometimes it is only his pipe-case. And often genuine
distresses, wearisome and prolix, of people who are unable even to tell
how little competent they are to earn a livelihood. Side by side with
this open begging, there was that which wears various kinds of disguise:
charity, philanthropy, good works, the encouragement of projects of art,
the house-to-house begging for infant asylums, parish churches, rescued
women, charitable societies, local libraries. Finally, those who wear
a society mask, with tickets for concerts, benefit performances,
entrance-cards of all colours, "platform, front seats, reserved seats."
The Nabob insisted that no refusals should be given, and it was a
concession that he no longer burdened his own shoulders with such
matters. For quite a long time, in generous indifference, he had gone
on covering with gold all that hypocritical exploitation, paying
five hundred francs for a ticket for the concert of some Wurtemberg
cithara-player or Languedocian flutist, which at the Tuileries or at the
Duc de Mora's might have fetched ten francs. There were days when the
young de Gery issued from these audiences nauseated. All the honesty of
his youth revolted; he approached the Nabob with schemes of reform. But
the Nabob's face, at the first word, would assume the bored expression
of weak natures when they have to make a decision, or he would perhaps
reply: "But that is Paris, my dear boy. Don't get frightened or
interfere with my plans. I know what I am doing and what I want."

At that time he wanted two things: a deputyship and the cross of the
Legion of Honour. These were for him the first two stages of the great
ascent to which his ambition pushed him. Deputy he would certainly be
through the influence of the Territorial Bank, at the head of which he
stood. Paganetti of Porto-Vecchio was often saying it to him: "When the
day arrives, the island will rise and vote for you as one man."

It is not enough, however, to control electors; it is necessary also
that there be a seat vacant in the Chamber, and the representation of
Corsica was complete. One of its members, however, the old Popolusca,
infirm and in no condition to do his work, might perhaps, upon certain
conditions, be willing to resign his seat. It was a difficult matter to
negotiate, but quite feasible, the old fellow having a numerous family,
estates which produced little or nothing, a palace in ruins at Bastia,
where his children lived on _polenta_, and a furnished apartment at
Paris in an eighteenth-rate lodging-house. If a hundred or two hundred
thousand francs were not a consideration, one ought to be able to
obtain a favourable decision from this honourable pauper who, sounded
by Paganetti, would say neither yes nor no, tempted by the large sum
of money, held back by the vainglory of his position. The matter had
reached that point, it might be decided from one day to another.

As for the cross, things were going still better. The Bethlehem Society
had assuredly made the devil of a noise at the Tuileries. They were now
only waiting until after the visit of M. de la Perriere and his report,
which could not be other than favorable, before inscribing on the list
for the 16th March, on the date of an imperial anniversary, the glorious
name of Jansoulet. The 16th March; that was to say, within a month. What
would the fat Hemerlingue find to say of this signal favour, he who for
so long had had to content himself with the Nisham? And the Bey, who had
been misled into believing that Jansoulet was cut by Parisian society,
and the old mother, down yonder at Saint-Romans, ever so happy in
the successes of her son! Was that not worth a few millions cleverly
squandered along the path of glory which the Nabob was treading like a
child, all unconscious of the fate that lay waiting to devour him at its
end? And in these external joys, these honours, this consideration so
dearly bought, was there not a compensation for all the troubles of this
Oriental won back to European life, who desired a home and possessed
only a caravansary, looked for a wife and found only a Levantine?




THE BETHLEHEM SOCIETY

BETHLEHEM! Why did it give one such a chill to see written in letters
of gold over the iron gate that historic name, sweet and warm like the
straw of the miraculous stable! Perhaps it was partly to be accounted
for by the melancholy of the landscape, that immense gloomy plain which
stretches from Nanterre to Saint Cloud, broken only by a few clumps
of trees or the smoke of factory chimneys. Possibly also by the
disproportion that existed between the humble little straggling village
which you expected to find and the grandiose establishment, this country
mansion in the style of Louis XIII, an agglomeration of mortar looking
pink through the branches of its leafless park, ornamented with wide
pieces of water thick with green weeds. What is certain is that as you
passed this place your heart was conscious of an oppression. When you
entered it was still worse. A heavy inexplicable silence weighed on the
house, and the faces you might see at the windows had a mournful air
behind the little, old-fashioned greenish panes. The goats scattered
along the paths nibbled languidly at the new spring grass, with "baas"
at the woman who was tending them, and looked bored, as she followed the
visitors with a lack-lustre eye. A mournfulness was over the place, like
the terror of a contagion. Yet it had been a cheerful house, and one
where even recently there had been high junketings. Replanted with
timber for the famous singer who had sold it to Jenkins, it revealed
clearly the kind of imagination which is characteristic of the
opera-house in a bridge flung over the miniature lake, with its
broken punt half filled with mouldy leaves, and in its pavilion all
of rockery-work, garlanded by ivy. It had witnessed gay scenes, this
pavilion, in the singer's time; now it looked on sad ones, for the
infirmary was installed in it.

To tell the truth, the whole establishment was one vast infirmary. The
children had hardly arrived when they fell ill, languished, and ended
by dying, if their parents did not quickly take them away and put them
again under the protection of home. The cure of Nanterre had to go so
often to Bethlehem with his black vestments and his silver cross, the
undertaker had so many orders from the house, that it became known
in the district, and indignant mothers shook their fists at the model
nurse; from a long way off, it is true, for they might chance to have in
their arms pink-and-white babies to be preserved from all the contagions
of the place. It was these things that gave to the poor place so
heart-rending an aspect. A house in which children die cannot be gay;
you cannot see trees break into flower there, birds building, streams
flowing like rippling laughter.

The thing seemed altogether false. Excellent in itself, Jenkins's scheme
was difficult, almost impracticable in its application. Yet, God knows,
the affair had been started and carried out with the greatest enthusiasm
to the last details, with as much money and as large a staff as were
requisite. At its head, one of the most skilful of practitioners, M.
Pondevez, who had studied in the Paris hospitals; and by his side, to
attend to the more intimate needs of the children, a trusty matron, Mme.
Polge. Then there were nursemaids, seamstresses, infirmary-nurses. And
how many the arrangements and how thorough was the maintenance of the
establishment, from the water distributed by a regular system from fifty
taps to the omnibus trotting off with jingling of its posting bells
to meet every train of the day at Rueil station! Finally, magnificent
goats, Thibetan goats, silky, swollen with milk. In regard to
organization, everything was admirable; but there was a point where
it all failed. This artificial feeding, so greatly extolled by the
advertisements, did not agree with the children. It was a singular piece
of obstinacy, a word which seemed to have been passed between them by
a signal, poor little things! for they couldn't yet speak, most of them
indeed were never to speak at all: "Please, we will not suck the goats."
And they did not suck them, they preferred to die one after another
rather than suck them. Was Jesus of Bethlehem in his stable suckled by a
goat? On the contrary, did he not press a woman's soft breast, on which
he could go to sleep when he was satisfied? Who ever saw a goat between
the ox and the ass of the story on that night when the beasts spoke to
each other? Then why lie about it, why call the place Bethlehem?

The director had been moved at first by the spectacle of so many
victims. This Pondevez, a waif of the life of the "Quarter," mere
student still after twenty years, and well known in all the resorts of
the Boulevard St. Michel under the name of Pompon, was not an unkind
man. When he perceived the small success of the artificial feeding, he
simply brought in four or five vigorous nurses from the district around
and the children's appetites soon returned. This humane impulse went
near costing him his place.

"Nurses at Bethlehem!" said Jenkins, furious, when he came to pay his
weekly visit. "Are you out of your mind? Well! why then have we goats
at all, and meadows to pasture them; what becomes of my idea, and the
pamphlets upon my idea? What happens to all that? But you are going
against my system. You are stealing the founder's money."

"All the same, _mon cher maitre_," the student tried to reply, passing
his hands through his long red beard, "all the same, they will not take
this nourishment."

"Well, then, let them go without, but let the principle of artificial
lactation be respected. That is the whole point. I do not wish to have
to repeat it to you again. Send off these wretched nurses. For the
rearing of our children we have goats' milk, cows' milk in case of
absolute necessity. I can make no further concession in the matter."

He added, with an assumption of his apostle's air: "We are here for the
demonstration of a philanthropic idea. It must be made to triumph, even
at the price of some sacrifices."

Pondevez insisted no further. After all the place was a good one, near
enough to Paris to allow of descents upon Nanterre of a Sunday from
the Quarter, or to allow the director to pay a visit to his old
_brasseries_. Mme. Polge, to whom Jenkins always referred as "our
intelligent superintendent," and whom he had placed there to superintend
everything, and chiefly the director himself, was not so austere, as her
prerogatives might have led one to suppose, and submitted willingly to a
few liqueur-glasses of cognac or to a game of bezique. He dismissed
the nurses, therefore, and endeavoured to harden himself in advance to
everything that could happen. What did happen? A veritable Massacre
of the Innocents. Consequently the few parents in fairly easy
circumstances, workpeople or suburban tradesfolk, who, tempted by the
advertisements, had severed themselves from their children, very soon
took them home again, and there only remained in the establishment some
little unfortunates picked up on doorsteps or in out-of-the-way places,
sent from the foundling hospitals, doomed to all evil things from their
birth. As the mortality continued to increase, even these came to be
scarce, and the omnibus which had posted to the railway station would
return bouncing and light as an empty hearse. How long would the thing
last? How long would the twenty-five or thirty little ones who remained
take to die? This was what Monsieur the Director, or rather, to give
him the nickname which he had himself invented, Monsieur the
Grantor-of-Certificates-of-death Pondevez, was asking himself one
morning as he sat opposite Mme. Polge's venerable ringlets, taking a
hand in this lady's favourite game.

"Yes, my good Mme. Polge, what is to become of us? Things cannot go on
much longer as they are. Jenkins will not give way; the children are as
obstinate as mules. There is no denying it, they will all slip through
our fingers. There is the little Wallachian--I mark the king, Mme.
Polge--who may die from one moment to another. Just think, the poor
little chap for the last three days has had nothing in his stomach. It
is useless for Jenkins to talk. You cannot improve children like snails
by making them go hungry. It is disheartening all the same not to be
able to save one of them. The infirmary is full. It is really a wretched
outlook. Forty and bezique."

A double ring at the entrance gate interrupted his monologue. The
omnibus was returning from the railway station and its wheels were
grinding on the sand in an unusual manner.

"What an astonishing thing," remarked Pondevez, "the conveyance is not
empty."

Indeed it did draw up at the foot of the steps with a certain pride, and
the man who got out of it sprang up the staircase at a bound. He was
a courier from Jenkins bearing a great piece of news. The doctor would
arrive in two hours to visit the Home, accompanied by the Nabob and
a gentleman from the Tuileries. He urgently enjoined that everything
should be ready for their reception. The thing had been decided at such
short notice that he had not had the time to write; but he counted on M.
Pondevez to do all that was necessary.

"That is good!--necessary!" murmured Pondevez in complete dismay. The
situation was critical. This important visit was occurring at the worst
possible moment, just as the system had utterly broken down. The poor
Pompon, exceedingly perplexed, tugged at his beard, thoughtfully gnawing
wisps of it.

"Come," said he suddenly to Mme. Polge, whose long face had grown still
longer between her ringlets, "we have only one course to take. We must
remove the infirmary and carry all the sick into the dormitory. They
will be neither better nor worse for passing another half-day there. As
for those with the rash, we will put them out of the way in some corner.
They are too ugly, they must not be seen. Come along, you up there! I
want every one on the bridge."

The dinner-bell being violently rung, immediately hurried steps are
heard. Seamstresses, infirmary-nurses, servants, goatherds, issue from
all directions, running, jostling each other across the court-yards.
Others fly about, cries, calls; but that which dominates is the noise
of a mighty cleansing, a streaming of water as though Bethlehem had been
suddenly attacked by fire. And those groanings of sick children snatched
from the warmth of their beds, all those little screaming bundles
carried across the damp park, their coverings fluttering through the
branches, powerfully complete the impression of a fire. At the end of
two hours, thanks to a prodigious activity, the house is ready from top
to bottom for the visit which it is about to receive, all the staff at
their posts, the stove lighted, the goats picturesquely sprinkled over
the park. Mme. Polge has donned her green silk dress, the director a
costume somewhat less _neglige_ than usual, but of which the simplicity
excluded all idea of premeditation. The Departmental Secretary may come.

And here he is.

He alights with Jenkins and Jansoulet from a splendid coach with the
red and gold livery of the Nabob. Feigning the deepest astonishment,
Pondevez rushes forward to meet his visitors.

"Ah, M. Jenkins, what an honour! What a surprise!"

Greetings are exchanged on the flight of steps, bows, shakings of hands,
introductions. Jenkins with his flowing overcoat wide open over
his loyal breast, beams his best and most cordial smile; there is
a significant wrinkle on his brow, however. He is uneasy about the
surprises which may be held in store for them by the establishment, of
the distressful condition of which he is better aware than any one. If
only Pondevez had taken proper precautions. Things begin well, at any
rate. The rather theatrical view from the entrance, of those white
fleeces frisking about among the bushes, have enchanted M. de la
Perriere, who himself, with his honest eyes, his little white beard,
and the continual nodding of his head, resembles a goat escaped from its
tether.

"In the first place, gentlemen, the apartment of principal importance
in the house, the nursery," said the director, opening a massive door at
the end of the entrance-hall. His guests follow him, go down a few
steps and find themselves in an immense, low room, with a tiled floor,
formerly the kitchen of the mansion. The most striking object on
entering is a lofty and vast fireplace built on the antique model,
of red brick, with two stone benches opposite one another beneath the
chimney, and the singer's coat of arms--an enormous lyre barred with
a roll of music--carved on the monumental pediment. The effect is
startling; but a frightful draught comes from it, which joined to the
coldness of the tile floor and the dull light admitted by the little
windows on a level with the ground, may well terrify one for the
health of the children. But what was do be done? The nursery had to
be installed in this insalubrious spot on account of the sylvan and
capricious nurses, accustomed to the unconstraint of the stable. You
only need to notice the pools of milk, the great reddish puddles drying
up on the tiles, to breathe in the strong odour that meets you as
you enter, a mingling of whey, of wet hair, and of many other things
besides, in order to be convinced of the absolute necessity of this
arrangement.

The gloomy-walled apartment is so large that to the visitors at first
the nursery seems to be deserted. However, at the farther end, a group
of creatures, bleating, moaning, moving about, is soon distinguished.
Two peasant women, hard and brutalized in appearance, with dirty faces,
two "dry-nurses," who well deserve the name, are seated on mats,
each with an infant in her arms and a big nanny-goat in front of her,
offering its udder with legs parted. The director seems pleasantly
surprised.

"Truly, gentlemen, this is lucky. Two of our children are having their
little luncheon. We shall see how well the nurses and infants understand
each other."

"What can he be doing? He is mad," said Jenkins to himself in
consternation.

But the director on the contrary knows very well what he is doing and
has himself skilfully arranged the scene, selecting two patient and
gentle beasts and two exceptional subjects, two little desperate mortals
who want to live at any price and open their mouths to swallow, no
matter what food, like young birds still in the nest.

"Come nearer, gentlemen, and observe."

Yes, they are indeed sucking, these little cherubs! One of them, lying
close to the ground, squeezed up under the belly of the goat, is going
at it so heartily that you can hear the gurglings of the warm milk
descending, it would seem, even into the little limbs that kick with
satisfaction at the meal. The other, calmer, lying down indolently,
requires some little encouragement from his Auvergnoise attendant.

"Suck, will you suck then, you little rogue!" And at length, as though
he had suddenly come to a decision, he begins to drink with such avidity
that the woman leans over to him, surprised by this extraordinary
appetite, and exclaims laughing:

"Ah, the rascal, is he not cunning?--it is his thumb that he is sucking
instead of the goat."

The angel has hit on that expedient so that he may be left in peace.
The incident does not create a bad impression. M. de la Perriere is much
amused by this notion of the nurse that the child was trying to
take them all in. He leaves the nursery, delighted. "Positively
de-e-elighted," he repeats, nodding his head as they ascend the great
staircase with its echoing walls decorated with the horns of stags,
leading to the dormitory.

Very bright, very airy, is this vast room, running the whole length of
one side of the house, with numerous windows and cots, separated one
from another by a little distance, hung with fleecy white curtains like
clouds. Women go and come through the large arch in the centre, with
piles of linen on their arms, or keys in their hands, nurses with the
special duty of washing the babies.

Here too much has been attempted and the first impression of the
visitors is a bad one. All this whiteness of muslin, this polished
parquet, the brightness of the window-panes reflecting the sky sad at
beholding these things, seem to throw into bold relief the thinness, the
unhealthy pallor of these dying little ones, already the colour of their
shrouds. Alas! the oldest are only aged some six months, the youngest
barely a fortnight, and already there is in all these faces, these faces
in embryo, a disappointed expression, a scowling, worn look, a suffering
precocity visible in the numerous lines on those little bald foreheads,
cramped by linen caps edged with poor, narrow hospital lace. What are
they suffering? What diseases can they have? They have everything,
everything that one can have: diseases of children and diseases of
men. The fruit of vice and poverty, they bring into the world hideous
phenomena of heredity at their very birth. This one has a perforated
palate, and this great copper-coloured patches on the forehead, all
of them rickety. Then they are dying of hunger. Notwithstanding the
spoonfuls of milk, of sweetened water, which are forced down their
throats, notwithstanding the feeding-bottle employed now and then,
though against orders, they perish of inanition. These little
creatures, worn out before birth, require the most tender and the most
strengthening food; the goats might perhaps be able to give it, but
apparently they have sworn not to suck the goats. And this is what
makes the dormitory mournful and silent, not one of those little
clinched-fisted tempers, one of those cries showing the pink and firm
gums in which the child makes trial of his lungs and strength; only a
plaintive moaning, as it were the disquiet of a soul that turns over
and over in a little sick body, without being able to find a comfortable
place to rest there.

Jenkins and the director, who have seen the bad impression produced on
their guests by this inspection of the dormitory, try to put a little
life into the situation, talk very loudly in a good-natured, complacent,
satisfied way. Jenkins shakes hands warmly with the superintendent.

"Well, Mme. Polge, and how are our little nurslings getting on?"

"As you see, M. le Docteur," she replies, pointing to the beds.

This tall Mme. Polge is funereal in her green dress, the ideal of
dry-nurses. She completes the picture.

But where has Monsieur the Departmental Secretary gone? He has stopped
before a cot which he examines sadly, as he stands nodding his head.

"_Bigre de bigre!_" says Pompon in a low voice to Mme. Polge. "It is the
Wallachian."

The little blue placard hung over the cot, as in the foundling
hospitals, states the child's nationality: "Moldo, Wallachian." What a
piece of ill-luck that Monsieur the Secretary's attention should have
been attracted to that particular child! Oh, that poor little head lying
on the pillow, its linen cap askew, with pinched nostrils, and mouth
half opened by a quick, panting respiration, the breathing of the newly
born, of those also who are about to die.

"Is he ill?" asked Monsieur the Secretary softly of the director, who
has come up to him.

"Not the least in the world," the shameless Pompon replies, and,
advancing to the side of the cot, he tries to make the little one laugh
by tickling him with his finger, straightens the pillow, and says in a
hearty voice, somewhat overcharged with tenderness: "Well, old fellow?"
Shaken out of his torpor, escaping for a moment from the shades which
already are closing on him, the child opens his eyes on those faces
leaning over him, glances at them with a gloomy indifference, then,
returning to his dream which he finds more interesting, clinches his
little wrinkled hands and heaves an elusive sigh. Mystery! Who shall say
for what end that baby had been born into life? To suffer for two months
and to depart without having seen anything, understood anything, without
any one even knowing the sound of his voice.

"How pale he is!" murmurs M. de la Perriere, very pale himself. The
Nabob is livid also. A cold breath seems to have passed over the place.
The director assumes an air of unconcern.

"It is the reflection. We are all of us green here."

"Yes, yes, that is so," remarks Jenkins, "it is the reflection of the
lake. Come and look, Monsieur the Secretary." And he draws him to the
window to point out to him the large sheet of water with its dipping
willows, while Mme. Polge makes haste to draw over the eternal dream of
the little Wallachian the parted curtains of his cradle.

The inspection of the establishment must be continued very quickly in
order to destroy this unfortunate impression.

To begin with, M. de la Perriere is shown a splendid laundry, with
stoves, drying-rooms, thermometers, immense presses of polished walnut,
full of babies' caps and frocks, labelled and tied up in dozens. When
the linen has been warmed, the linen-room maid passes it out through
a little door in exchange for the number left by the nurse. A perfect
order reigns, one can see, and everything, down to its healthy smell of
soap-suds, gives to this apartment a wholesome and rural aspect. There
is clothing here for five hundred children. That is the number which
Bethlehem can accommodate, and everything has been arranged upon a
corresponding scale; the vast pharmacy, glittering with bottles and
Latin inscriptions, pestles and mortars of marble in every corner, the
hydropathic installation, its large rooms built of stone, with gleaming
baths possessing a huge apparatus including pipes of all dimensions for
douches, upward and downward, spray, jet, or whip-lash, and the kitchens
adorned with superb kettles of copper, and with economical coal and gas
ovens. Jenkins wished to institute a model establishment; and he found
the thing easy, for the work was done on a large scale, as it can be
when funds are not lacking. You feel also over it all the experience and
the iron hand of "our intelligent superintendent," to whom the director
cannot refrain from paying a public tribute. This is the signal for
general congratulations. M. de la Perriere, delighted with the manner in
which the establishment is equipped, congratulates Dr. Jenkins upon his
fine creations, Jenkins compliments his friend Pondevez, who, in his
turn, thanks the Departmental secretary for having consented to honour
Bethlehem with a visit. The good Nabob makes his voice heard in this
chorus of eulogy, finds a kind word for each one, but is a little
surprised all the same that he has not been congratulated himself, since
they were about it. It is true that the best of congratulations awaits
him on the 16th March on the front page of the _Official Journal_ in
a decree which flames in advance before his eyes and makes him glance
every now and then at his buttonhole.

These pleasant words are exchanged as the party passes along a big
corridor in which the voices ring out in all their honest accents; but
suddenly a frightful noise interrupts the conversation and the advance
of the visitors. It seems to be made up of the mewing of cats in
delirium, of bellowings, of the howlings of savages performing a
war-dance, an appalling tempest of human cries, reverberated, swelled,
and prolonged by the echoing vaults. It rises and falls, ceases
suddenly, then goes on again with an extraordinary effect of unanimity.

Monsieur the Director begins to be uneasy, makes an inquiry. Jenkins
rolls furious eyes.

"Let us go on," says the director, rather anxious this time. "I know
what it is."

He knows what it is; but M. de la Perriere wishes to know also what it
is, and, before Pondevez has had the time to unfasten it, he pushes open
the massive door whence this horrible concert proceeds.

In a sordid kennel which the great cleansing has passed over, for, in
fact, it was not intended to be exhibited, on mattresses ranged on the
floor, a dozen little wretches are laid, watched over by an empty chair
on which the beginning of a knitted vest lies with an air of dignity,
and by a little broken saucepan, full of hot wine, boiling on a smoky
wood fire. These are the children with ringworm, with rashes, the
disfavoured of Bethlehem, who had been hidden in this retired corner
with recommendation to their dry-nurse to rock them, to soothe them, to
sit on them, if need were, in order to keep them from crying; but whom
this country-woman, stupid and inquisitive, had left alone there in
order to see the fine carriage standing in the court-yard. Her back
turned, the infants had very quickly grown weary of their horizontal
position; and then all these little scrofulous patients raised their
lusty concert, for they, by a miracle, are strong, their malady saves
and nourishes them. Bewildered and kicking like beetles when they are
turned on their backs, helping themselves with their hips and their
elbows, some fallen on one side and unable to regain their balance,
others raising in the air their little benumbed, swaddled legs,
spontaneously they cease their gesticulations and cries as they see the
door open; but M. de la Perrier's nodding goatee beard reassures them,
encourages them anew, and in the renewed tumult the explanation given
by the director is only heard with difficulty: "Children kept
separate--Contagion--Skin-diseases." This is quite enough for Monsieur
the Departmental Secretary; less heroic than Bonaparte on his visit to
the plague-stricken of Jaffa, he hastens towards the door, and in his
timid anxiety, wishing to say something and yet not finding words,
murmurs with an ineffable smile: "They are char-ar-ming."

Next, the inspection at an end, see them all gathered in the salon on
the ground floor, where Mme. Polge has prepared a little luncheon. The
cellar of Bethlehem is well stocked. The keen air of the table-land,
these climbs up and downstairs have given the old gentleman from the
Tuileries an appetite such as he has not known for a long time, so that
he chats and laughs as if he were at a picnic, and at the moment of
departure, as they are all standing, raises his glass, nodding his head,
to drink, "To Be-Be-Bethlehem!" Those present are moved, glasses are
touched, then, at a quick trot, the carriage bears the party away down
the long avenue of limes, over which a red and cold sun is just setting.
Behind them the park resumes its dismal silence. Great dark masses
gather in the depths of the copses, surround the house, gain little by
little the paths and open spaces. Soon all is lost in gloom save the
ironical letters embossed above the entrance-gate, and, away over
yonder, at a first-floor window, one red and wavering spot, the light of
a candle burning by the pillow of the dead child.

     "By a decree dated the 12th March, 1865, issued upon the proposal
     of the Minister of the Interior, Monsieur the Doctor Jenkins,
     President and Founder of the Bethlehem Society is named a
     Chevalier of the Imperial Order of the Legion of Honour. Great
     devotion to the cause of humanity."

As he read these words on the front page of the _Official Journal_, on
the morning of the 16th, the poor Nabob felt dazed.

Was it possible?

Jenkins decorated, and not he!

He read the paragraph twice over, distrusting his own eyes. His ears
buzzed. The letters danced double before his eyes with those great red
rings round them which they have in strong sunlight. He had been so
confident of seeing his name in this place; Jenkins, only the evening
before, had repeated to him with so much assurance, "It is already
done!" that he still thought his eyes must have deceived him. But no,
it was indeed Jenkins. The blow was heavy, deep, prophetic, as it were a
first warning from destiny, and one that was felt all the more intensely
because for years this man had been unaccustomed to failure. Everything
good in him learned mistrust at the same time.

"Well," said he to de Gery as he came as usual every morning into his
room, and found him visibly affected, holding the newspaper in his hand,
"have you seen? I am not in the _Official_."

He tried to smile, his features puckered like those of a child
restraining his tears. Then, suddenly, with that frankness which was
such a pleasing quality in him: "It is a great disappointment to me. I
was looking forward to it too confidently."

The door opened upon these words, and Jenkins rushed in, out of breath,
stammering, extraordinarily agitated.

"It is an infamy, a frightful infamy! The thing cannot be, it shall not
be!"

The words stumbled over each other in disorder on his lips, all trying
to get out at once; then he seemed to despair of finding expression for
his thoughts and in disgust threw on the table a small box and a large
envelope, both bearing the stamp of the chancellor's office.

"There are my cross and my brevet. They are yours, friend. I could not
keep them."

At bottom the words did not signify much. Jansoulet adorning himself
with Jenkins's ribbon might very well have been guilty of illegality.
But a piece of theatrical business is not necessarily logical; this one
brought about between the two men an effusion of feeling, embraces, a
generous battle, at the end of which Jenkins replaced the objects in his
pocket, speaking of protests, letters to the newspapers. The Nabob was
again obliged to check him.

"Be very careful you do no such thing. To begin with, it would be to
injure my chances for another time--who knows, perhaps on the 15th of
August, which will soon be here."

"Oh, as to that," said Jenkins, jumping at this idea, and stretching out
his arm as in the _Oath_ of David, "I solemnly swear it."

The matter was dropped at this point. At luncheon the Nabob was as gay
as usual. This good humour was maintained all day, and de Gery, for whom
the scene had been a revelation of the true Jenkins, the explanation of
the ironies and the restrained wrath of Felicia Ruys whenever she spoke
of the doctor, asked himself in vain how he could enlighten his dear
patron about such hypocrisy. He should have been aware, however, that
in southerners, with all their superficiality and effusion, there is no
blindness, no enthusiasm, so complete as to remain insensible before
the wisdom of reflection. In the evening the Nabob had opened a shabby
little letter-case, worn at the corners, in which for ten years he had
been accustomed to work out the calculations of his millions, writing
down in hieroglyphics understood only by himself his receipts and
expenditures. He buried himself in his accounts for a moment, then
turning to de Gery:

"Do you know what I am doing, my dear Paul?" he asked.

"No, sir."

"I am just calculating"--and his mocking glance thoroughly
characteristic of his race, rallied the good nature of his smile--"I
am just calculating that I have spend four hundred and thirty thousand
francs to get a decoration for Jenkins."

Four hundred and thirty thousand francs! And that was not the end.




BONNE MAMAN

Paul de Gery went three times a week in the evening to take his lesson
in bookkeeping in the Joyeuses' dining-room, not far from that little
parlour in which he had seen the family the first day, and while with
his eyes fixed on his teacher he was being initiated into all the
mysteries of "debtor and creditor," he used to listen, in spite of
himself, for the light sounds coming from the industrious group behind
the door, with thoughts dwelling regretfully on the vision of all those
pretty brows bent in the lamplight. M. Joyeuse never said a word of his
daughters; jealous of their charms as a dragon watching over beautiful
princesses in a tower, and excited by the fantastic imaginings of his
excessive affection for them, he would answer with marked brevity the
inquiries of his pupil regarding the health of "the young ladies," so
that at last the young man ceased to mention them.

He was surprised, however, at not once seeing that Bonne Maman whose
name was constantly recurring in the conversation of M. Joyeuse,
entering into the least details of his existence, hovering over the
household like the emblem of its perfect ordering and of its peace.

So great a reserve on the part of a venerable lady who must assuredly
have passed the age at which the interest of young men is to be feared,
seemed to him exaggerated. The lessons, however, were good ones,
given with great clearness, the teacher having an excellent system
of demonstration, and only one fault, that of becoming absorbed in
silences, broken by sudden starts and exclamations let off like rockets.
Apart from this, he was the best of masters, intelligent, patient, and
conscientious, and Paul learned to know his way through the complex
labyrinth of commercial books and resigned himself to ask nothing
beyond.

One evening, towards nine o'clock, as the young man had risen to go, M.
Joyeuse asked him if he would do him the honour of taking a cup of tea
with his family, a custom dating from the time when Mme. Joyeuse, _nee_
de Saint-Amand, was alive, she having been used to receive her friends
on Thursdays. Since her death and the change in the financial position,
the friends had become dispersed; but his little weekly function had
been kept up.

Paul having accepted, the good old fellow opened the door and called:

"Bonne Maman!"

An alert footstep in the passage, and immediately the face of a girl of
twenty, in a halo of abundant brown hair, made its appearance.

De Gery, stupefied, looked at M. Joyeuse.

"Bonne Maman?"

"Yes, it is a name that we gave her when she was a little girl. With her
frilled cap, her authority as the eldest child, she had a quaint little
air. We thought her like her grandmother. The name has clung to her."

From the honest fellow's tone as he spoke thus, one felt that to him
this grandparent's title applied to such an embodiment of attractive
youth seemed the most natural thing in the world. Every one else thought
as he did on the point; both her sisters, who had hastened to their
father's side, grouping themselves round him somewhat as in the portrait
exhibited in the window on the ground floor, and the old servant
who placed on the table in the little drawing-room a magnificent
tea-service, a relic of the former splendours of the household. Every
one called the girl "Bonne Maman" without her ever once having grown
tired of it, the influence of that sacred title touching the affection
of each one with a deference which flattered her and gave to her ideal
authority a singular gentleness of protection.

Whether or not it were by reason of this appellation of grandmother
which as a child he had learned to reverence, de Gery felt an
inexpressible attraction towards this young girl. It was not like the
sudden shock which he had received from that other, that emotional
agitation in which were mingled the desire to flee, to escape from a
possession and the persistent melancholy of the morrow of a festivity,
extinguished candles, the lost refrains of songs, perfumes vanished
into the night. In the presence of this young girl as she stood
superintending the family table, seeing if anything were wanting,
enveloping her children, her grandchildren, with the active tenderness
of her eyes, there came to him a longing to know her, to be counted
among her old friends, to confide to her things which he confessed only
to himself; and when she offered him his cup of tea without any of the
mincings of society or drawing-room affectations, he would have liked to
say with the rest a "Thank you, Bonne Maman," in which he would have put
all his heart.

Suddenly, a cheerful knock at the door made everybody start.

"Ah, here comes M. Andre. Elise, a cup quickly. Jaia, the little cakes."
At the same time, Mlle. Henriette, the third of M. Joyeuse's daughters,
who had inherited from her mother, _nee_ de Saint-Amand, a certain
instinct for society, observing the number of visitors who seemed likely
to crowd their rooms that evening, rushed to light the two candles on
the piano.

"My fifth act is finished," cried the newcomer as he entered, then he
stopped short. "Ah, pardon," and his face assumed a rather discomfited
expression in the presence of the stranger. M. Joyeuse introduced
them to each other: "M. Paul de Gery--M. Andre Maranne," not without
a certain solemnity. He remembered the receptions held formerly by
his wife, and the vases on the chimneypiece, the two large lamps, the
what-not; the easy chairs grouped in a circle had an air of joining in
this illusion, and seemed more brilliant by reason of this unaccustomed
throng.

"So your play is finished?"

"Finished, M. Joyeuse, and I hope to read it to you one of these
evenings."

"Oh, yes, M. Andre. Oh, yes," said all the girls in chorus.

Their neighbour was in the habit of writing for the stage, and no one
here doubted of his success. Photography, in any case, promised fewer
profits. Clients were very rare, passers-by little disposed to business.
To keep his hand in and to save his new apparatus from rusting, M. Andre
was accustomed to practise anew on the family of his friends on
each succeeding Sunday. They lent themselves to his experiments
with unequalled long-suffering; the prosperity of this suburban
photographer's business was for them all an affair of _amour propre_,
and awakened, even in the girls, that touching confraternity of feeling
which draws together the destinies of people as insignificant in
importance as sparrows on a roof. Andre Maranne, with the inexhaustible
resources of his great brow full of illusion, used to explain without
bitterness the indifference of the public. Sometimes the season was
unfavourable, or, again, people were complaining of the bad state of
business generally, and he would always end with the same consoling
reflection, "When _Revolt_ is produced!" That was the title of his play.

"It is surprising all the same," said the fourth of M. Joyeuse's
daughters, twelve years old, with her hair in a pigtail, "it is
surprising that with such a good balcony so little business should
result."

"And, if he were established on the Boulevard des Italiens," remarks M.
Joyeuse thoughtfully, and he is launched forth!--riding his chimera
till it is brought to the ground suddenly with a gesture and these words
uttered sadly: "Closed on account of bankruptcy." In the space of a
moment the terrible visionary has just installed his friend in splendid
quarters on the Boulevard, where he gains enormous sums of money, at the
same time, however, increasing his expenditure to so disproportionate an
extent that a fearful failure in a few months engulfs both photographer
and his photography. They laugh heartily when he gives this explanation;
but all agree that the Rue Saint-Ferdinand, although less brilliant, is
much more to be depended upon than the Boulevard des Italiens. Besides,
it happens to be quite near the Bois de Boulogne, and if once the
fashionable world got into the way of passing through it--That exalted
society which was so much sought by her mother, is Mlle. Henriette's
fixed idea, and she is astonished that the thought of receiving "le
high-life" in his little apartment on the fifth floor makes their
neighbour laugh. The other week, however, a carriage with livery had
called on him. Only just now, too, he had a very "swell" visit.

"Oh, quite a great lady!" interrupts Bonne Maman. "We were at the window
on the lookout for father. We saw her alight from her carriage and look
at the show-frame; we made sure that her visit was for you."

"It was for me," said Andre, a little embarrassed.

"For a moment we were afraid that she was going to pass on like so many
others, on account of your five flights of stairs. So all four of us
tried to attract her without her knowing it, by the magnetism of our
four staring pairs of eyes. We drew her gently by the feathers of her
hat and the laces of her cape. 'Come up then, madame, come up,' and
finally she entered. There is so much magnetism in eyes that are kindly
disposed."

Magnetism she certainly had, the dear creature, not only in her glances,
indeterminate of colour, veiled or gay like the sky of her Paris, but in
her voice, in the draping of her dress, in everything about her, even to
the long curl, falling over the neck erect and delicate as a statue's.

Tea having been served, while the gentlemen finished their cups and
talked--old Joyeuse was always very long over everything he did, by
reason of his sudden expeditions to the moon--the girls brought out
their work, the table became covered with wicker baskets, embroideries,
pretty wools that rejuvenated with their bright tints the faded flowers
of the old carpet, and the group of the other evening gathered once
more within the bright circle defined by the lamp-shade, to the great
satisfaction of Paul de Gery. It was the first evening of the kind that
he had spent in Paris; it recalled to him others of a like sort very far
away, lulled by the same innocent laughter, the peaceful sound produced
by scissors as they are put down on the table, by a needle as it pierces
through linen, or the rustle of a page turned over, and dear faces,
disappeared for ever, gathered also around the family lamp, alas! so
abruptly extinguished.

Having been admitted to this charming intimacy, he remained in it, took
his lessons in the presence of the girls and was encouraged to chat with
them when the good old man closed his big book. Here everything rested
him after the whirl of that life into which he was thrown by the
luxurious social existence of the Nabob; he come to renew his strength
in this atmosphere of honesty, of simplicity, tried, too, to find
healing there for the wounds with which a hand more indifferent than
cruel stabbed his heart mercilessly.

"Some women have hated me, other women have loved me. She who has hurt
me most never either loved or hated me." Paul had met that woman of whom
Henri Heine speaks. Felicia was full of welcome and cordiality for him.
There was no one whom she treated with more favour. She used to reserve
for him a special smile wherein one felt the kindliness of an artist's
eye arrested by and dwelling on a pleasing type, and the satisfaction of
a jaded mind amused by anything new, however simple in appearance it may
be. She liked that reserve, suggestive in a southerner, the honesty
of that judgment, independent of every artistic or social formula and
enlivened by a touch of provincial accent. These things were a change
for her from the zigzag stroke of the thumb illustrating a eulogy with
its gesture of the studio, from the compliments of comrades on the way
in which she would snub some old fellow, or again from those affected
admirations, from the "char-ar-ming, very nice indeed's" with which
young men about town, sucking the knobs of their canes, were accustomed
to regale her. This young man at any rate did not say such things as
that to her. She had nicknamed him Minerva, on account of his apparent
tranquility and the regularity of his profile; and the moment she saw
him, however far-off, she would call:

"Ah, here comes Minerva. Hail, beautiful Minerva! Put down your helmet
and let us have a chat."

But this familiar, almost fraternal, tone convinced the young man that
he would make no further advance into that feminine comradeship in
which tenderness was wanting, and that he lost each day something of
his charm--the charm of the unforeseen--in the eyes of that woman born
weary, who seemed to have already lived her life and found in all that
she heard or saw the insipidity of a repetition. Felicia was bored.
Her art alone could distract her, carry her away, transport her into a
dazzling fairyland, whence she would fall back worn out, surprised
each time by this awakening like a physical fall. She used to draw
a comparison between herself and those jelly-fish whose transparent
brilliancy, so much alive in the cool movements of the waves, drift to
their death on the shore in little gelatinous pools. During those
times devoid of inspiration, when the artist's hand was heavy on
his instrument, Felicia, deprived of the one moral support of her
intellectual being, became unsociable, unapproachable, a tormenting
mocker--the revenge taken of human weakness on the tired brains of
genius. After having brought tears to the eyes of every one who cared
for her, raking up painful recollections or enervating anxieties, she
reached the lowest depths of her fatigue, and as there was always some
fun in her, even in her _ennui_ in a kind of caged wild-beast's howl,
which she called "the cry of the jackal in the desert," and which used
to make the good Crenmitz turn pale.

Poor Felicia! That life of hers was indeed a frightful desert when art
did not beguile it with its illusions; a desert mournful and flat, where
everything was lost, reduced to one level, beneath the same monotonous
immensity, the naive love of a child of twenty, a passionate duke's
caprice, in which all was overwhelmed by an arid sand driven by blasting
fates. Paul was conscious of that void, desired to escape it; but
something held him back, like a weight which unrolls a chain, and in
spite of the calumnies he heard, and notwithstanding the odd whims of
the strange creature, he dallied deliciously after her, at the price
of bearing away with him from this long lover's contemplation only the
despair of a believer reduced to the adoring of images alone.

The refuge lay down there, in that remote quarter of the town where the
wind blew so hard, yet without preventing the flame from mounting white
and straight--it was the family circle presided over by Bonne Maman. Oh!
she at least was not bored, she never uttered the cry of the "jackal
in the desert." Her life was far too full; the father to encourage, to
sustain, the children to teach, all the material cares of a home where
the mother's hand is wanting, those preoccupations that awake with the
dawn and are put to sleep by the evening, unless indeed it bring them
back in dream, one of those devotions, tireless but without apparent
effort, very pleasant for poor human egotism, because they dispense from
all gratitude and hardly make themselves felt, so light is their hand.
She was not the courageous daughter who works to support her parents,
gives private lessons from morning to night, forgets in the excitement
of a profession all the troubles of the household. No, she had
understood her task in a different sense, a sedentary bee restricting
her cares to the hive, without once humming out of doors in the open air
among the flowers. A thousand functions: tailoress, milliner, mender
of clothes, bookkeeper also for M. Joyeuse, who, incapable of all
responsibility, left to her the free disposal of their means, to be
pianoforte-teacher, governess.

As it happens in families that have been in a good position, Aline,
as the eldest daughter, had been educated at one of the best
boarding-schools in Paris. Elise had been with her there for two years;
but the last two, born too late, and sent to small day-schools in the
locality, had all their studies yet to complete, and this was no easy
matter, the youngest laughing upon every occasion from sheer good
health, warbling like a lark intoxicated with the delight of green corn,
and flying away far out of sight of desk and exercises, while Mlle.
Henriette, ever haunted by her ideas of grandeur, her love of luxurious
things, took to work hardly less unwillingly. This young person of
fifteen, to whom her father had transmitted something of his imaginative
faculties, was already arranging her life in advance and declared
formally that she should marry one of the nobility, and would never
have more than three children: "A boy to inherit the name and two little
girls--so as to be able to dress them alike."

"Yes, that's right," Bonne Maman would say, "you shall dress them alike.
In the meantime, let us attend to our participles a little."

But the one who caused the most concern was Elise, with her examination
taken thrice without success, always failing in history and preparing
herself anew, seized by a deep fear and a mistrust of herself which
made her carry about with her everywhere and open every moment that
unfortunate history of France, in the omnibus, in the street, even at
the luncheon-table; she was already a grown girl and very pretty, and
she no longer possessed that little mechanical memory of childhood
wherein dates and events lodge themselves for the whole of one's life.
Beset by other preoccupations, the lesson was forgotten in an instant,
despite the apparent application of the pupil, with her long lashes
fringing her eyes, her curls sweeping over the pages, and her rosy
mouth animated by a little quiver of attention, repeating ten times in
succession: "Louis, surnamed le Hutin, 1314-1316; Philip V, surnamed
the Long, 1316-1322. Ah, Bonne Maman, it's no good; I shall never know
them." Whereupon Bonne Maman would come to her assistance, help her
to concentrate her attention, to store up a few of those dates of the
Middle Ages, barbarous and sharp as the helmets of the warriors of the
period. And in the intervals of these occupations, of this general
and constant superintendence, she yet found time to do some pretty
needlework, to extract from her work-basket some delicate crochet lace
or a piece of tapestry on which she was engaged and to which she clung
as closely as the young Elise to her history of France. Even when she
talked, her fingers never remained unoccupied for a moment.

"Do you never take any rest?" said de Gery to her, as she counted under
her breath the stitches of her tapestry, "three, four, five," to secure
the right variation in the shading of the colours.

"But this is a rest from work," she answered. "You men cannot understand
how good needlework is for a woman's mind. It gives order to the
thoughts, fixes by a stitch the moment that passes what would otherwise
pass with it. And how many griefs are calmed, anxieties forgotten,
thanks to this wholly physical act of attention, to this repetition of
an even movement, in which one finds--of necessity and very quickly--the
equilibrium of one's whole being. It does not hinder me from following
the conversation around me, from listening to you still better than I
should if I were doing something. Three, four, five."

Oh, yes, she listened. That was apparent in the animation of her face,
in the way in which she would suddenly straighten herself as she sat,
needle in air, the thread taut over her raised little finger. Then she
would quickly resume her work, sometimes after putting in a thoughtful
word, which agreed generally with the opinions of friend Paul.

An affinity of nature, responsibilities and duties similar in character,
drew these two young people together, interested each of them in the
other's occupations. She knew the names of his two brothers Pierre and
Louis, his plans for their future when they should have left school.
Pierre wanted to be a sailor. "Oh, no, not a sailor," Bonne Maman would
say, "it will be much better for him to come to Paris with you." And
when he admitted that he was afraid of Paris for them, she laughed at
his fears, called him provincial, full of affection for the city
in which she had been born, in which she had grown to chaste young
womanhood, and that gave her in return those vivacities, those natural
refinements, that jesting good-humour which incline one to believe
that Paris, with its rain, its fogs, its sky which is no sky, is the
veritable fatherland of woman, whose nerves it heals gently and whose
qualities of intelligence and patience it develops.

Each day Paul de Gery came to appreciate Mlle. Aline better--he was the
only person in the house who so called her--and, strange circumstance,
it was Felicia who completed the cementing of their intimacy. What
relations could there exist between the artist's daughter, moving in the
highest spheres, and this little middle-class girl buried in the
depths of a suburb? Relations of childhood and of friendship, common
recollections, the great court-yard of the Institution Belin, where
they had played together for three years. Paris is full of these
juxtapositions. A name uttered by chance in the course of a conversation
brought out suddenly the bewildered question:

"You know her then?"

"Do I know Felicia? Why, our desks were next each other in the first
form. We had the same garden. Such a nice girl, and so handsome and
clever!"

And, observing the pleasure with which she was listened to, Aline used
to recall the times which already formed a past for her, seductive and
melancholy like all pasts. She was very much alone in life, the little
Felicia. On Thursdays, when the visitors' names were called out in the
parlour, there was no one for her; except from time to time a good but
rather absurd lady, formerly a dancer, it was said, whom Felicia called
the Fairy. In the same way she used to have pet names for all the people
she cared for and whom she transformed in her imaginations. In the
holidays they used to see each other. Mme. Joyeuse, while she refused to
allow Aline to visit the studio of M. Ruys, used to invite Felicia over
for whole days, very short days they seemed, minglings of study, music,
dual dreams, young intimate conversations. "Oh, when she used to talk to
me of her art, with that enthusiasm which she put into everything, how
delighted I was to listen to her! How many things I have understood
through her, of which I should never have had any idea. Even now when we
go to the Louvre with papa, or to the exhibition of the 1st of May,
that special feeling I have about a beautiful piece of sculpture, a good
picture, carries me back immediately to Felicia. In my early girlhood
she represented art to me, and it corresponded with her beauty. Her
nature was a little vague, but so kind, I always felt she was something
superior to myself, that bore me to great heights without frightening
me. Suddenly she stopped coming to see me. I wrote to her; no reply.
Later on, fame came to her; to me great sorrows, absorbing duties. And
of all that friendship, which was very deep, however, since I cannot
speak of it without--'three, four, five'--nothing now remains except old
memories like dead ashes."

Bending over her work, the brave girl made haste to count her stitches,
to imprison her regret in the capricious designs of her tapestry, while
de Gery, moved as he heard the testimony of those pure lips against the
calumnies of rejected young dandies or of jealous comrades, felt himself
raised, restored to the proud dignity of his love. This sensation was
so sweet to him that he returned in search of it very often, not only
on the evenings of the lessons, but on other evenings, too, and almost
forgot to go to see Felicia for the pleasure of hearing Aline talk about
her.

One evening, as he was leaving the Joyeuses' home, Paul met the
neighbour, M. Andre, on the landing, who was waiting for him and took
his arm feverishly.

"Monsieur de Gery," he said in a trembling voice, with eyes that
glittered behind their spectacles, the one feature of his face that was
visible in the darkness. "I have an explanation to ask from you. Will
you come up to my rooms for a moment?"

There had only been between this young man and himself the banal
relations of two persons accustomed to frequent the same house, whom no
tie unites, who seem ever separated by a certain antipathy of nature, of
manner of life. What explanation could there be called for between them?
He followed him with much perplexed curiosity.

The aspect of the little studio, chilly under its top-light, the empty
fireplace, the wind blowing as though they were out of doors and making
the candle flicker, the solitary light on the scene of the night's
labour of a poor and lonely man, reflected on sheets of paper scribbled
over and scattered about, in short, this atmosphere of habitations
wherein the soul of the inhabitants lives on its own aspirations, caused
de Gery to understand the visionary air of Andre Maranne, his long hair
thrown back and streaming loose, that somewhat excessive appearance,
very excusable when it is paid for by a life of sufferings and
privations, and his sympathy immediately went out to this courageous
fellow whose intrepidity of spirit he guessed at a glance. But the
other was too deeply moved by emotion to notice the progress of these
reflections. As soon as the door was closed upon them, he said, with the
accent of a stage hero addressing the perfidious seducer, "M. de Gery, I
am not yet a Cassandra."

And seeing the stupefaction of de Gery:

"Yes, yes," he went on, "we understand each other. I have known
perfectly well what it is that draws you to M. Joyeuse's house, and
the eager welcome with which you are received there has not escaped my
notice either. You are rich, you are of noble birth, there can be no
hesitation between you and the poor poet who follows a ridiculous trade
in order to give himself full time to reach a success which perhaps will
never come. But I shall not allow my happiness to be stolen from me.
We must fight, monsieur, we must fight," he repeated, excited by the
peaceful calm of his rival. "For long I have loved Mlle. Joyeuse. That
love is the end, the joy, and the strength of an existence which is very
hard, in many respects painful. I have only it in the world, and I would
rather die than give it up."

Strangeness of the human soul! Paul did not love the charming Aline. His
whole heart belonged to the other. He thought of her simply as a friend,
the most adorable of friends. But the idea that Maranne was interested
in her, that she no doubt returned this regard, gave him the jealous
shiver of an annoyance, and it was with some considerable sharpness that
he inquired whether Mlle. Joyeuse was aware of this sentiment of Andre's
and had in any way authorized him thus to proclaim his rights.

"Yes, monsieur, Mlle. Elise knows that I love her, and before your
frequent visits--"

"Elise? It is of Elise you are speaking?"

"And of whom, then, should I be speaking? The two others are too young."

He fully entered into the traditions of the family, this Andre. For him,
Bonne Maman's age of twenty years, her triumphant grace, were obscured
by a surname full of respect and the attributes of a Providence which
seemed to cling to her.

A very brief explanation having calmed Andre Maranne's mind, he offered
his apologies to de Gery, begged him to sit down in the arm-chair
of carved wood which was used by his sitters, and their conversation
quickly assumed an intimate and sympathetic character, brought about by
the so abrupt avowal at its opening. Paul confessed that he, too, was in
love, and that he came so often to M. Joyeuse's only in order to speak
of her whom he loved with Bonne Maman, who had known her formerly.

"That is my case, too," said Andre. "Bonne Maman knows all my secrets;
but we have not yet ventured to say anything to the father. My position
is too unsatisfactory. Ah, when I shall have got _Revolt_ produced!"

Then they talked of that famous drama, _Revolt_, upon which he had been
at work for six months, day and night, which had kept him warm all the
winter, a very severe winter, but whose rigours the magic of composition
had tempered in the little studio, which it transformed. It was there,
within that narrow space, that all the heroes of his piece had appeared
to his poet's vision like familiar gnomes dropped from the roof or
riding moon-beams, and with them the gorgeous tapestries, the glittering
chandeliers, the park scenes with their gleaming flights of steps, all
the luxurious circumstance expected in stage effects, as well as
the glorious tumult of his first night, the applause of which was
represented for him by the rain beating on the glass roof and the boards
rattling in the door, while the wind, driving below over the murky
timber-yard with a noise as of far-off voices, borne near and anew
carried off into the distance, resembled the murmurs from the boxes
opened on the corridor to let the news of his success circulate among
the gossip and wonderment of the crowd. It was not only fame and money
that it was destined to procure him, this thrice-blessed play, but
something also more precious still. With what care accordingly did he
not turn over the leaves of the manuscript in five thick books, all
bound in blue, books like those that the Levantine was accustomed to
strew about on the divan where she took her siestas, and that she marked
with her managerial pencil.

Paul, having in his turn approached the table in order to examine the
masterpiece had his glance attracted by a richly framed portrait of a
woman, which, placed so near to the artist's work, seemed to be there to
preside over it. Elise, doubtless? Oh, no, Andre had not yet the right
to bring out from its protecting case the portrait of his little friend.
This was a woman of about forty, gentle of aspect, fair, and extremely
elegant. As he perceived her, de Gery could not suppress an exclamation.

"You know her?" asked Andre Maranne.

"Why, yes. Mme. Jenkins, the wife of the Irish doctor. I have had supper
at their house this winter."

"She is my mother." And the young man added in a lower tone:

"Mme. Maranne made a second marriage with Dr. Jenkins. You are
surprised, are you not, to see me in these poor surroundings, while my
relatives are living in the midst of luxury? But, you know, the chances
of family life sometimes group together natures that differ very widely.
My stepfather and I have never been able to understand each other. He
wished to make me a doctor, whereas my only taste was for writing. So at
last, in order to avoid the continual discussions which were painful to
my mother, I preferred to leave the house and plough my furrow alone,
without the help of anybody. A rough business. Funds were wanting. The
whole fortune has gone to that--to M. Jenkins. The question was to
earn a livelihood, and you are aware what a difficult thing that is for
people like ourselves, supposed to be well brought-up. To think that
among all the accomplishments gained from what we are accustomed to call
a complete education, this child's play was the only thing I could find
by which I could hope to earn my bread. A few savings, my own purse,
slender like that of most young men, served to buy my first outfit and
I installed myself here far away, in the remotest region of Paris, in
order not to embarrass my relatives. Between ourselves, I don't expect
to make a fortune out of photography. The first days especially were
very difficult. Nobody came, or if by chance some unfortunate wight did
mount, I made a failure of him, got on my plate only an image blurred
and vague as a phantom. One day, at the very beginning, a wedding-party
came up to me, the bride all in white, the bridegroom with a
waistcoat--like that! And all the guests in white gloves, which they
insisted on keeping on for the portrait on account of the rarity of such
an event with them. No, I thought I should go mad. Those black
faces, the great white patches made by the dresses, the gloves, the
orange-blossoms, the unlucky bride, looking like a queen of Niam-niam
under her wreath merging indistinguishably into her hair. And all of
them so full of good-will, of encouragements to the artist. I began them
over again at least twenty times, and kept them till five o'clock in the
evening. And then they only left me because it was time for dinner. Can
you imagine that wedding-day passed at a photographer's?"

While Andre was recounting to him with this good humour the troubles of
his life, Paul recalled the tirade of Felicia that day when Bohemians
had been mentioned, and all that she had said to Jenkins of their lofty
courage, avid of privations and trials. He thought also of Aline's
passion for her beloved Paris, of which he himself was only acquainted,
for his part, with the unwholesome eccentricities, while the great city
hid in its recesses so many unknown heroisms and noble illusions. This
last impression, already experienced within the sheltered circle of the
Joyeuse's great lamp, he received perhaps still more vividly in this
atmosphere, less warm, less peaceful, wherein art also entered to add
its despairing or glorious uncertainty; and it was with a moved heart
that he listened to Andre Maranne as he spoke to him of Elise, of
the examinations which it was taking her so long to pass, of the
difficulties of photography, of all that unforeseen element in his life
which would end certainly "when he could have secured the production
of _Revolt_," a charming smile accompanying on the poet's lips this so
often expressed hope, which he was wont himself to hasten to make fun
of, as though to deprive others of the right to do so.




MEMOIRS OF AN OFFICE PORTER SERVANTS

Truly Fortune in Paris has bewildering turns of the wheel!

To have seen the Territorial Bank as I have seen it, the rooms without
fires, never swept, the desert with its dust, protested bills piled high
as _that_ on the desks, every week a notice of sale posted at the door,
my stew spreading throughout the whole place the odour of a poor man's
kitchen; and then to witness now the reconstitution of our company in
its newly furnished halls, in which I have orders to light fires big
enough for a Government department, amid a busy crowd, blowings of
whistles, electric bells, gold pieces piled up till they fall over; it
savours of miracle. I need to look at myself in the glass before I can
believe it, to see in the mirror my iron-gray coat, trimmed with silver,
my white tie, my usher's chain like the one I used to wear at the
Faculty on the days when there were sittings. And to think that to work
this transformation, to bring back to our brows gaiety, the mother of
concord, to restore to our scrip its value ten times over, to our dear
governor the esteem and confidence of which he had been so unjustly
deprived, one man has sufficed, the being of supernatural wealth whom
the hundred voices of renown designate by the name of the Nabob.

Oh, the first time that he came to the office, with his fine presence,
his face a little worn perhaps, but so distinguished, his manners of one
accustomed to frequent courts, upon terms of the utmost familiarity with
all the princes of the Orient--in a word, that indescribable quality of
assurance and greatness which is bestowed by immense wealth--I felt my
heart bursting beneath the double row of buttons on my waistcoat. People
may mouth in vain their great words of equality and fraternity; there
are men who stand so surely above the rest that one would like to
bow one's self down flat in their presence, to find new phrases of
admiration in order to compel them to take a practical interest in one.
Let us hasten to add that I had need of nothing of the kind to attract
the attention of the Nabob. As I rose at his passage--moved to some
emotion, but with dignity, you may trust Passajon for that--he looked
at me with a smile and said in an undertone to the young man who
accompanied him: "What a fine head, like a--" Then there came a word
which I did not catch very well, a word ending in _art_, something like
_leopard_. No, however, it cannot have been that. _Jean-Bart_, perhaps,
although even then I hardly see the connection. However that be, in
any case he did say, "What a fine head," and this condescension made me
proud. Moreover, all the directors show me a marked degree of kindness
and politeness. It seems that there was a discussion with regard to me
at the meeting of the board, to determine whether I should be kept or
dismissed like our cashier, that ill-tempered fellow who was always
talking of getting everybody sent to the galleys, and whom they have
now invited to go elsewhere to manufacture his cheap shirt-fronts.
Well done! That will teach him to be rude to people. So far as I
am concerned, Monsieur the Governor kindly consented to overlook my
somewhat hasty words, in consideration of my record of service at the
Territorial and elsewhere; and at the conclusion of the board meeting,
he said to me with his musical accent: "Passajon, you remain with us."
It may be imagined how happy I was and how profuse in the expression
of my gratitude. But just think! I should have left with my few pence
without hope of ever saving any more; obliged to go and cultivate my
vineyard in that little country district of Montbars, a very narrow
field for a man who has lived in the midst of all the financial
aristocracy of Paris, and among those great banking operations by which
fortunes are made at a stroke. Instead of that, here I am established
afresh in a magnificent situation, my wardrobe renewed, and my savings,
which I spent a whole day in fingering over, intrusted to the kind
care of the governor, who has undertaken to invest them for me
advantageously. I think that is a manoeuvre which he is the very man
to execute successfully. And no need for the least anxiety. Every fear
vanishes before the word which is in vogue just now at all the councils
of administration, in all shareholders' meetings, on the Bourse, the
boulevards, and everywhere: "The Nabob is in the affair." That is to
say, gold is being poured out abundantly, the worst _combinazioni_ are
excellent.

He is so rich, that man!

Rich to a degree one cannot imagine. Has he not just lent fifteen
million francs as a simple loan passing from hand to hand, to the Bey
of Tunis? I repeat, fifteen millions. It was a trick he played on the
Hemerlingues, who wished to embroil him with that monarch and cut the
grass under his feet in those fine regions of the Orient where it grows
golden, high, and thick. It was an old Turk whom I know, Colonel Brahim,
one of our directors at the Territorial, who arranged the affair.
Naturally, the Bey, who happened to be, it appears, short of
pocket-money, was very much touched by the alacrity of the Nabob to
oblige him, and he has just sent him through Brahim a letter of thanks
in which he announces that upon the occasion of his next visit to
Vichy, he will stay a couple of days with him at that fine Chateau de
Saint-Romans, which the former Bey, the brother of this one, honoured
with a visit once before. You may fancy, what an honour! To receive a
reigning prince as a guest! The Hemerlingues are in a rage. They who had
manoeuvred so carefully--the son at Tunis, the father in Paris--to get
the Nabob into disfavour. And then it is true that fifteen millions is
a big sum. And do not say, "Passajon is telling us some fine tales." The
person who acquainted me with the story has held in his hands the paper
sent by the Bey in an envelope of green silk stamped with the royal
seal. If he did not read it, it was because this paper was written in
Arabic, otherwise he would have made himself familiar with its contents
as in the case of all the rest of the Nabob's correspondence. This
person is his _valet de chambre_, M. Noel, to whom I had the honour
of being introduced last Friday at a small evening-party of persons in
service which he gave to all his friends. I record an account of this
function in my memoirs as one of the most curious things which I have
seen in the course of my four years of sojourn in Paris.

I had thought at first when M. Francis, Monpavon's _valet de chambre_,
spoke to me of the thing, that it was a question of one of those little
clandestine junketings such as are held sometimes in the garrets of our
boulevards with the fragments of food brought up by Mlle. Seraphine and
the other cooks in the building, at which you drink stolen wine, and
gorge yourself, sitting on trunks, trembling with fear, by the light
of a couple of candles which are extinguished at the least noise in the
corridors. These secret practices are repugnant to my character. But
when I received, as for the regular servants' ball, an invitation
written in a very beautiful hand upon pink paper:

"M. Noel rekwests M---- to be present at his evenin-party on the 25th
instent. Super will be provided"

I saw clearly, not withstanding the defective spelling, that it was a
question of something serious and authorized. I dressed myself therefore
in my newest frock-coat, my finest linen, and arrived at the Place
Vendome at the address indicated by the invitation.

For the giving of his party, M. Noel had taken advantage of a
first-night at the opera, to which all fashionable society was
thronging, thus giving the servants a free rein, and putting the entire
place at our disposal until midnight. Notwithstanding this, the host
had preferred to receive us upstairs in his own bed-chamber, and this I
approved highly, being in that matter of the opinion of the old fellow
in the rhyme:

     Fie on the pleasure
     That fear may corrupt!

But my word, the luxury on the Place Vendome! A felt carpet on the
floor, the bed hidden away in an alcove, Algerian curtains with red
stripes, an ornamental clock in green marble on the chimneypiece, the
whole lighted by lamps of which the flames can be regulated at will. Our
oldest member, M. Chalmette, is not better lodged at Dijon. I arrived
about nine o'clock with Monpavon's old Francis, and I must confess that
my entry made a sensation, preceded as I was by my academical past, my
reputation for politeness, and great knowledge of the world. My fine
presence did the rest, for it must be said that I know how to go into a
room. M. Noel, in a dress-coat, very dark skinned and with mutton-chop
whiskers, came forward to meet us.

"You are welcome, M. Passajon," said he, and taking my cap with silver
galloons which, according to the fashion, I had kept in my right hand
while making my entry, he gave it to a gigantic negro in red and gold
livery.

"Here, Lakdar, hang that up--and that," he added by way of a joke,
giving him a kick in a certain region of the back.

There was much laughter at this sally, and we began to chat together
in very friendly fashion. An excellent fellow, this M. Noel, with his
accent of the Midi, his pronounced style of dress, the smoothness and
the simplicity of his manners. He reminded me of the Nabob, without
his distinction, however. I noticed, moreover, that evening, that these
resemblances are frequently to be observed in _valets de chambre_ who,
living in the intimacy of their masters, by whom they are always a
little dazzled, end by acquiring their manners and habits. Thus, M.
Francis has a certain way of straightening his body when displaying his
linen-front, a mania for raising his arms in order to pull his cuffs
down--it is Monpavon to a T. Now one, for instance, who bears no
resemblance to his master is Joey, the coachman of Dr. Jenkins. I call
him Joey, but at the party every one called him Jenkins; for, in that
world, the stable folk among themselves give to each other the names
of their masters, call each other Bois l'Hery, Monpavon, and Jenkins,
without ceremony. Is it in order to degrade their superiors, to raise
the status of menials? Every country has its customs; it is only a fool
who will be surprised by them. To return to Joey Jenkins, how can the
doctor, affable as he is, so polished in every particular, keep in his
service that brute, bloated with _porter_ and _gin_, who will remain
silent for hours at a time, then, at the first mounting of liquor to
his head, begins to howl and to wish to fight everybody, as witness the
scandalous scene which had just occurred when we entered?

The marquis's little groom, Tom Bois l'Hery, as they call him here, had
desired to have a jest with this uncouth creature of an Irishman, who
had replied to a bit of Parisian urchin's banter with a terrible Belfast
blow of his fist right in the lad's face.

"A sausage with paws, I! A sausage with paws, I!" repeated the coachman,
choking with rage, while his innocent victim was being carried into the
adjoining room, where the ladies and girls found occupation in bathing
his nose. The disturbance was quickly appeased, thanks to our arrival,
thanks also to the wise words of M. Barreau, a middle-aged man, sedate
and majestic, with a manner resembling my own. He is the Nabob's cook,
a former _chef_ of the Cafe Anglais, whom Cardailhac, the manager of
the Nouveautes, has procured for his friend. To see him in a dress-coat,
with white tie, his handsome face full and clean-shaven, you would have
taken him for one of the great functionaries of the Empire. It is true
that a cook in an establishment where the table is set every morning
for thirty persons, in addition to madame's special meal, and all eating
only the very finest and most delicate of food, is not the same as the
ordinary preparer of a _ragout_. He is paid the salary of a colonel,
lodged, boarded, and then the perquisites! One has hardly a notion
of the extent of the perquisites in a berth like this. Every one
consequently addressed him respectfully, with the deference due to a man
of his importance. "M. Barreau" here, "My dear M. Barreau" there. For
it is a great mistake to imagine that servants among themselves are all
cronies and comrades. Nowhere do you find a hierarchy more prevalent
than among them. Thus at M. Noel's party I distinctly noticed that the
coachmen did not fraternize with their grooms, nor the valets with the
footmen and the lackeys, any more than the steward or the butler would
mix with the lower servants; and when M. Barreau emitted any little
pleasantry it was amusing to see how exceedingly those under his orders
seemed to enjoy it. I am not opposed to this kind of thing. Quite on
the contrary. As our oldest member used to say, "A society without
a hierarchy is like a house without a staircase." The observation,
however, seems to me one worth setting down in these memoirs.

The party, I need scarcely say, did not shine with its full splendour
until after the return of its most beauteous ornaments, the ladies and
girls who had gone to nurse the little Tom, ladies'-maids with shining
and pomaded hair, chiefs of domestic departments in bonnets adorned with
ribbons, negresses, housekeepers, a brilliant assembly in which I was
immediately given great prestige, thanks to my dignified bearing and to
the surname of "Uncle" which the younger among these delightful persons
saw fit to bestow upon me.

I fancy there was in the room a good deal of second-hand frippery in
the way of silk and lace, rather faded velvet, even, eight-button
gloves that had been cleaned several times, and perfumes abstracted from
madame's dressing-table, but the faces were happy, thoughts given wholly
to gaiety, and I was able to make a little corner for myself, which was
very lively, always within the bounds of propriety--that goes without
saying--and of a character suitable for an individual in my position.
This was, moreover, the general tone of the party. Until towards the end
of the entertainment I heard none of those unseemly jests, none of those
scandalous stories which give so much amusement to the gentlemen of
our Board; and I take pleasure in remarking that Bois l'Hery the
coachman--to cite only one example--is much more observant of the
proprieties than Bois l'Hery the master.

M. Noel alone was conspicuous by his familiar tone and by the liveliness
of his repartees. In him you have a man who does not hesitate to call
things by their names. Thus he remarked aloud to M. Francis, from one
end of the room to the other: "I say, Francis, that old swindler of
yours has made a nice thing out of us again this week." And as the other
drew himself up with a dignified air, M. Noel began to laugh.

"No offence, old chap. The coffer is solid. You will never get to the
bottom of it."

And it was on this that he told us of the loan of fifteen millions, to
which I alluded above.

I was surprised, however, to see no sign of preparation for the supper
which was mentioned on the cards of invitation, and I expressed my
anxiety on the point to one of my charming nieces, who replied:

"They are waiting for M. Louis."

"M. Louis?"

"What! you do not know M. Louis, the _valet de chambre_ of the Duc de
Mora?"

I then learned who this influential personage was, whose protection is
sought by prefects, senators, even ministers, and who must make them pay
stiffly for it, since with his salary of twelve hundred francs from
the duke he has saved enough to produce him an income of twenty-five
thousand, sends his daughters to the convent school of the Sacre Coeur,
his son to the College Bourdaloue, and owns a chalet in Switzerland
where all his family goes to stay during the holidays.

At this juncture the personage in question arrived; but nothing in his
appearance would have suggested the unique position in Paris which is
his. Nothing of majesty in his deportment, a waistcoat buttoned up to
the collar, a mean-looking and insolent manner, and a way of speaking
without moving the lips which is very impolite to those who are
listening to you.

He greeted the assembly with a slight nod of the head, extended a finger
to M. Noel, and we were sitting there looking at each other, frozen by
his grand manners, when a door opened at the farther end of the room and
we beheld the supper laid out with all kinds of cold meats, pyramids
of fruit, and bottles of all shapes beneath the light falling from two
candelabra.

"Come, gentlemen, give the ladies your hands." In a minute we were at
table, the ladies seated next the eldest or the most important among
us all, the rest on their feet, serving, chattering, drinking from
everybody's glass, picking a morsel from any plate. I had M. Francis
for my neighbour and I had to listen to his grudges against M. Louis, of
whose place he was envious, so brilliant was it in comparison with that
which he occupied under the noble but worn-out old gambler who was his
master.

"He is a _parvenu_," he muttered to me in a low voice. "He owes his
fortune to his wife, to Mme. Paul."

It appears that this Mme. Paul is a housekeeper, who has been in the
duke's establishment for twenty years, and who excels beyond all others
in the preparation for him of a certain ointment for an affection to
which he is subject. She is indispensable to Mora. Recognising this, M.
Louis made love to the old lady, married her though much younger than
she, and in order not to lose his sick-nurse and her ointments, his
excellency engaged the husband as _valet de chambre_. At bottom, in
spite of what I said to M. Francis, for my own part I thought the
proceeding quite praiseworthy and conformable to the loftiest morality,
since the mayor and the priest had a finger in it. Moreover, that
excellent meal, composed of delicate and very expensive foods with
which I was unacquainted even by name, had strongly disposed my mind to
indulgence and good-humour. But every one was not similarly inclined,
for from the other side of the table I could hear the bass voice of M.
Barreau, complaining:

"Why can he not mind his own business? Do I go pushing my nose into
his department? To begin with, the thing concerns Bompain, not him. And
then, after all, what is it that I am charged with? The butcher sends me
five baskets of meat every morning. I use only two of them and sell the
three others back to him. Where is the _chef_ who does not do the same?
As if, instead of coming to play the spy in my basement, he would not
do better to look after the great leakage up there. When I think that
in three months that gang on the first floor has smoked twenty-eight
thousand francs' worth of cigars. Twenty-eight thousand francs! Ask
Noel if I am not speaking the truth. And on the second floor, in the
apartments of madame, that is where you should look to see a fine
confusion of linen, of dresses thrown aside after being worn once,
jewels by the handful, pearls that you crush on the floor as you walk.
Oh, but wait a little. I shall get my own back from that same little
gentleman."

I understood that the allusion was to M. de Gery, that young secretary
of the Nabob who often comes to the Territorial, where he is always
occupied rummaging into the books. Very polite, certainly, but a very
haughty young man, who does not know how to push himself forward. From
all round the table there came nothing but a concert of maledictions
on him. M. Louis himself addressed some remarks to the company upon the
subject with his grand air:

"In our establishment, my dear M. Barreau, the cook quite recently had
an affair, similar to yours, with the chief of his excellency's Cabinet,
who had permitted himself to make some comments upon the expenditure.
The cook went up to the duke's apartments upon the instant in his
professional costume, and with his hand on the strings of his apron,
said, 'Let your excellency choose between monsieur and myself.' The duke
did not hesitate. One can find as many Cabinet leaders as one desires,
while the good cooks, you can count them. There are in Paris four
altogether. I include you, my dear Barreau. We dismissed the chief
of our Cabinet, giving him a prefecture of the first class by way of
consolation; but we kept the _chef_ of our kitchen."

"Ah, you see," said M. Barreau, who rejoiced to hear this story,
"you see what it is to serve in the house of a _grand seigneur_. But
_parvenus_ are _parvenus_--what will you have?"

"And that is all Jansoulet is," added M. Francis, tugging at his cuffs.
"A man who used to be a street porter at Marseilles."

M. Noel took offence at this.

"Hey, down there, old Francis, you are very glad all the same to have
him to pay your card-debts, the street porter of La Cannebriere. You may
well be embarrassed by _parvenus_ like us who lend millions to kings,
and whom _grand seigneurs_ like Mora do not blush to admit to their
tables."

"Oh, in the country," chuckled M. Francis, with a sneer that showed his
old tooth.

The other rose, quite red in the face. He was about to give way to his
anger when M. Louis made a gesture with his hand to signify that he had
something to say, and M. Noel sat down immediately, putting his hand to
his ear like all the rest of us in order to lose nothing that fell from
those august lips.

"It is true," remarked the personage, speaking with the slightest
possible movement of his mouth and continuing to take his wine in little
sips, "it is true that we received the Nabob at Grandbois the other
week. There even happened something very funny on the occasion. We have
a quantity of mushrooms in the second park, and his excellency amuses
himself sometimes by gathering them. Now at dinner was served a large
dish of fungi. There were present, what's his name--I forget, what is
it?--Marigny, the Minister of the Interior, Monpavon, and your master,
my dear Noel. The mushrooms went the round of the table, they looked
nice, the gentlemen helped themselves freely, except M. le Duc, who
cannot digest them and out of politeness feels it his duty to remark to
his guests: 'Oh, you know, it is not that I am suspicious of them. They
are perfectly safe. It was I myself who gathered them.'

"'_Sapristi!_' said Monpavon, laughing, 'then, my dear Auguste, allow me
to be excused from tasting them.' Marigny, less familiar, glanced at his
plate out of the corner of his eye.

"'But, yes, Monpavon, I assure you. They look extremely good, these
mushrooms. I am truly sorry that I have no appetite left.'

"The duke remained very serious.

"'Come, M. Jansoulet, I sincerely hope that you are not going to offer
me this affront, you also. Mushrooms selected by myself.'

"'Oh, Excellency, the very idea of such a thing! Why, I would eat them
with my eyes closed.'

"So you see what sort of luck he had, the poor Nabob, the first time
that he dined with us. Duperron, who was serving opposite him, told us
all about it in the pantry. It seems there could have been nothing more
comic than to see the Jansoulet stuffing himself with mushrooms, and
rolling terrified eyes, while the others sat watching him curiously
without touching their plates. He sweated under the effort, poor wretch.
And the best of it was that he took a second portion, he actually found
the courage to take a second portion. He kept drinking off glasses of
wine, however, like a mason, between each mouthful. Ah, well, do you
wish to hear my opinion? What he did there was very clever, and I am no
longer surprised that this fat cow-herd should have become the
favourite of sovereigns. He knows where to flatter them in those little
pretensions which no man avows. In brief, the duke has been crazy over
him since that day."

This little story caused much laughter and scattered the clouds which
had been raised by a few imprudent words. So then, since the wine had
untied people's tongues, and they knew each other better, elbows were
leaned on the table and the conversation fell on masters, on the places
in which each of them had served, on the amusing things he had seen in
them. Ah! of how many such adventures did I not hear, how much of the
interior life of those establishments did I not see pass before me.
Naturally I also made my own little effect with the story of my larder
at the Territorial, the times when I used to keep my stew in the empty
safe, which circumstance, however, did not prevent our old cashier, a
great stickler for forms, from changing the key-word of the lock every
two days, as though all the treasures of the Bank of France had been
inside. M. Louis appeared to find my anecdote entertaining. But the
most astonishing was what the little Bois l'Hery, with his Parisian
street-boy's accent, related to us concerning the household of his
employers.

Marquis and Marquise de Bois l'Hery, second floor, Boulevard Haussmann.
Furniture rich as at the Tuileries, blue satin on all the walls,
Chinese ornaments, pictures, curiosities, a veritable museum, indeed,
overflowing even on to the stairway. The service very smart: six
men-servants, chestnut livery in winter, nankeen livery in summer.
These people are seen everywhere at the small Mondays, at the races, at
first-nights, at embassy balls, and their name always in the newspapers
with a remark upon the handsome toilettes of Madame, and Monsieur's
remarkable chic. Well! all that is nothing at all but pretence, plated
goods, show, and when the marquis wants five francs nobody would
lend them to him upon his possessions. The furniture is hired by
the fortnight from Fitily, the upholsterer of the demi-monde. The
curiosities, the pictures, belong to old Schwalbach, who sends his
clients round there and makes them pay doubly dear, since people don't
bargain when they think they are dealing with a marquis, an amateur.
As for the toilettes of the marquise, the milliner and the dressmaker
provide her with them each season gratis, get her to wear the new
fashions, a little ridiculous sometimes but which society subsequently
adopts because Madame is still a very handsome woman and reputed for
her elegance; she is what is called a _launcher_. Finally, the servants!
Makeshifts like the rest, changed each week at the pleasure of the
registry office which sends them there to do a period of probation by
way of preliminary to a serious engagement. If you have neither sureties
nor certificates, if you have just come out of prison or anything of
that kind, Glanand, the famous agent of the Rue de la Paix, sends you
off to the Boulevard Haussmann. You remain in service there for a
week or two, just the time necessary to buy a good reference from the
marquis, who, of course, it is understood, pays you nothing and barely
boards you; for in that house the kitchen-ranges are cold most of the
time, Monsieur and Madame dining out nearly every evening or going to
balls, where a supper is included in the entertainment. It is positive
fact that there are people in Paris who take the sideboard seriously and
make the first meal of their day after midnight. The Bois l'Herys, in
consequence, are well-informed with regard to the houses that provide
refreshments. They will tell you that you get a very good supper at the
Austrian Embassy, that the Spanish Embassy rather neglects the wines,
and that it is at the Foreign Office again that you find the best
_chaud-froid de volailles_. And that is the life of this curious
household. Nothing that they possess is really theirs; everything is
tacked on, loosely fastened with pins. A gust of wind and the whole
thing blows away. But at least they are certain of losing nothing. It is
this assurance which gives to the marquis that air of raillery worthy of
a Father Tranquille which he has when he looks at you with both hands in
his pockets, as much as to say: "Ah, well, and what then? What can they
do to me?"

And the little groom, in the attitude which I have just mentioned, with
his head like that of a prematurely old and vicious child, imitated his
master so well that I could fancy I saw himself as he looks at our board
meetings, standing in front of the governor and overwhelming him with
his cynical pleasantries. All the same, one must admit that Paris is
a tremendously great city, for a man to be able to live thus, through
fifteen, twenty years of tricks, artifice, dust thrown in people's eyes,
without everybody finding him out, and for him still to be able to make
a triumphal entry into a drawing-room in the rear of his name announced
loudly and repeatedly, "Monsieur le Marquis de Bois l'Hery."

No, look you, the things that are to be learned at a servants' party,
what a curious spectacle is presented by the fashionable world of Paris,
seen thus from below, from the basements, you need to go to one
before you can realize. Here, for instance, is a little fragment of
conversation which, happening to find myself between M. Francis and M.
Louis, I overheard about the worthy sire de Monpavon.

"You are making a mistake, Francis. You are in funds just now. You
ought to take advantage of the occasion to restore that money to the
Treasury."

"What will you have?" replied M. Francis with a despondent air. "Play is
devouring us."

"Yes, I know it well. But take care. We shall not always be there. We
may die, fall from power. Then you will be asked for accounts by the
people down yonder. And it will be a terrible business."

I had often heard whispered the story of a forced loan of two hundred
thousand francs which the marquis was reputed to have secured from the
State at the time when he was Receiver-General; but the testimony of his
_valet de chambre_ was worse than all. Ah! if masters had any suspicion
of how much servants know, of all the stories that are told in the
servants' hall, if they could see their names dragged among the
sweepings of the house and the refuse of the kitchen, they would never
again dare to say even "shut the door" or "harness the horses." Why, for
instance, take Dr. Jenkins, with the most valuable practice in Paris,
ten years of life in common with a magnificent woman, who is sought
after everywhere; it is in vain that he has done everything to
dissimulate his position, announced his marriage in the newspapers after
the English fashion, admitted to his house only foreign servants knowing
hardly three words of French. In those three words, seasoned with vulgar
oaths and blows of his fist on the table, his coachman Joey, who hates
him, told us his whole history during supper.

"She is going to kick the bucket, his Irish wife, the real one. Remains
to be seen now whether he will marry the other. Forty-five, she is, Mrs.
Maranne, and not a shilling. You should see how afraid she is of being
left in the lurch. Whether he marries her or whether he does not marry
her--kss, kss--we shall have a good laugh."

And the more drink he was given, the more he told us about her, speaking
of his unfortunate mistress as though she were the lowest of the low.
For my own part, I confess that she interested me, this false Mme.
Jenkins, who goes about weeping in every corner, implores her lover
as though he were the executioner, and runs the chance of being thrown
overboard altogether, when all society believes her to be married,
respectable, and established in life. The others only laughed over the
story, the women especially. Dame! it is amusing when one is in service
to see that the ladies of the upper ten have their troubles also and
torments that keep them awake at night.

Our festal board at this stage presented the most lively aspect, a
circle of gay faces stretched towards this Irishman whose story was
adjudged to have won the prize. The fact excited envy; the rest sought
and hunted through their memories for whatever they might hold in the
way of old scandals, adventures of deceived husbands, of those intimate
privacies which are emptied on the kitchen-table along with the scraps
from the plates and the dregs from the bottles. The champagne was
beginning to claim its own among the guests. Joey wanted to dance a jig
on the table-cloth. The ladies, at the least word that was a little gay,
threw themselves back with the piercing laughter of people who are being
tickled, allowing their embroidered skirts to trail beneath the table,
loaded with the remains of the food and covered with spilt grease. M.
Louis had discreetly retired. Glasses were filled up before they had
been emptied; one of the housekeepers dipped a handkerchief in hers,
filled with water, and bathed her forehead with it, because her head was
swimming, she said. It was time that the festivity should end; and,
in fact, an electric bell ringing in the corridor warned us that the
footman, on duty at the theatre, had come to summon the coachmen.
Thereupon Monpavon proposed the health of the master of the house,
thanking him for his little party. M. Noel announced that he proposed
to give another at Saint-Romans, in honour of the visit of the Bey, to
which most of those present would probably be invited. And I was about
to rise in my turn, being sufficiently accustomed to social banquets
to know that on such an occasion the oldest man present is expected to
propose the health of the ladies, when the door opened abruptly, and
a tall footman, bespattered with mud, a dripping umbrella in his hand,
perspiring, out of breath, cried to us, without respect for the company:

"But come on then, you set of idiots! What are you sticking here for?
Don't you know it is over?"




THE FESTIVITIES IN HONOUR OF THE BEY

In the regions of the Midi, of bygone civilization, historical castles
still standing are rare. Only at long intervals on the hillsides some
old abbey lifts its tottering and dismembered front, perforated by holes
that once were windows, whose empty spaces look now only to the sky.
A monument of dust, burnt up by the sun, dating from the time of the
Crusades or of the Courts of Love, without a trace of man among its
stones, where even the ivy no longer clings nor the acanthus, but which
the dried lavenders and the ferns embalm. In the midst of all those
ruins the castle of Saint-Romans is an illustrious exception. If you
have travelled in the Midi you have seen it, and you are to see it again
now. It is between Valence and Montelimart, on a site just where the
railway runs alongside the Rhone, at the foot of the rich slopes
of Baume, Raucoule, and Mercurol, where the far-famed vineyards of
l'Ermitage, spreading out for five miles in close-planted rows of vines,
which seem to grow as one looks, roll down almost into the river, which
is there as green and full of islands as the Rhine at Basle, but under
a sun the Rhine has never known. Saint-Romans is opposite on the other
side of the river; and, in spite of the brevity of the vision, the
headlong rush of the train, which seems trying to throw itself madly
into the Rhone at each turning, the castle is so large, so well situated
on the neighbouring hill, that it seems to follow the crazy race of the
train, and stamps on your mind forever the memory of its terraces, its
balustrades, its Italian architecture; two low stories surmounted by a
colonnaded gallery and flanked by two slate-roofed pavilions dominating
the great slopes where the water of the cascades rebounds, the network
of gravel walks, the perspective of long hedges, terminated by some
white statue which stands out against the blue sky as on the luminous
ground of a stained-glass window. Quite at the top, in the middle of the
vast lawns whose green turf shines ironically under the scorching sun,
a gigantic cedar uplifts its crested foliage, enveloped in black and
floating shadows--an exotic silhouette, upright before this former
dwelling of some Louis XIV farmer of revenue, which makes one think of a
great negro carrying the sunshade of a gentleman of the court.

From Valence to Marseilles, throughout all the Valley of the Rhone,
Saint-Romans of Bellaignes is famous as an enchanted palace; and,
indeed, in that country burnt up by the fiery wind, this oasis of
greenness and beautiful rushing water is a true fairy-land.

"When I am rich, mamma," Jansoulet used to say, as quite a small boy,
to his mother whom he adored, "I shall give you Saint-Romans of
Bellaignes." And as the life of the man seemed the fulfilment of a story
from the Arabian Nights, as all his wishes came true, even the most
disproportionate, as his maddest chimeras came to lie down before him,
to lick his hands like familiar and obedient spaniels, he had bought
Saint-Romans to offer it, newly furnished and grandiosely restored, to
his mother. Although it was ten years since then, the dear old woman was
not yet used to her splendid establishment. "It is the palace of Queen
Jeanne that you have given me, my dear Bernard," she wrote to her son.
"I shall never live there." She never did live there, as a matter of
fact, having stayed at the steward's house, an isolated building of
modern construction, situated quite at the other end of the grounds,
so as to overlook the outbuildings and the farm, the sheepfolds and the
oil-mills, with their rural horizon of stacks, olive-trees and vines,
extending over the plain as far as one could see. In the great castle
she would have imagined herself a prisoner in one of those enchanted
dwellings where sleep seizes you in the midst of your happiness and
does not let you go for a hundred years. Here, at least, the
peasant-woman--who had never been able to accustom herself to
this colossal fortune, come too late, from too far, and like a
thunder-clap--felt herself linked to reality by the coming and going of
the work-people, the letting-out and taking-in of the cattle, their slow
movement to the drinking pond, all that pastoral life which woke her by
the familiar call of the cocks and the sharp cries of the peacocks, and
brought her down the corkscrew staircase of the pavilion before dawn.
She looked upon herself only as the trustee of this magnificent estate,
which she was taking care of for her son, and wished to give back to him
in perfect condition on the day when, rich enough and tired of living
with the Turks, he would come, according to his promise, to live with
her beneath the shade of Saint-Romans.

Then, too, what universal and indefatigable supervision! Through the
mists of early morning the farm-servants heard her rough and husky
voice: "Olivier, Peyrol, Audibert. Come on! It is four o'clock." Then
she would hasten to the immense kitchen, where the maids, heavy with
sleep, were heating the porridge over the crackling, new-lit fire.
They gave her a little dish of red Marseilles-ware full of boiled
chestnuts--frugal breakfast of bygone times, which nothing would have
induced her to change. At once she was off, hurrying with great strides,
her large silver keyring at her belt, whence jingled all her keys, her
plate in her hand, balanced by the distaff which she held, in working
order, under her arm, for she spun all day long, and did not stop even
to eat her chestnuts. On the way, a glance at the stables, still dark,
where the animals were moving duly, at the stifling pens with their rows
of impatient and outstretched muzzles; and the first glimmers of light
creeping over the layers of stones that supported the embankment of the
park, lit up the figure of the old woman, running in the dew, with the
lightness of a girl, despite her seventy years--verifying exactly each
morning all the wealth of the domain, anxious to make sure that the
night had not taken away the statues and the vases, uprooted the
hundred-year-old quincunx, dried up the springs which filtered into
their resounding basins. Then the full sunlight of midday, humming and
vibrating, showed still, on the sand of an alley, against the white wall
of a terrace, the long figure of the old woman, elegant and straight
as her spindle, picking up bits of dead wood, breaking off some uneven
branch of a shrub, careless of the shock it caused her and the sweat
which broke out over her skin. Towards this hour another figure was to
be seen in the park also--less active, less noisy, dragging rather than
walking, leaning against the walls and railings--a poor round-shouldered
being, shaky and stiff, a figure from which life seemed to have gone
out, never speaking, when he was tired giving a little plaintive cry
towards the servant, who was always near, who helped him to sit down, to
crouch upon some step, where he would stay for hours, motionless, mute,
his mouth hanging, his eyes blinking, hushed by the strident monotony of
the grasshopper's cry--a blotch of humanity in the splendid horizon.

This, this was the first-born, Bernard's brother, the darling child of
his father and mother, the glorious hope of the nail-maker's family.
Slaves, like so many others in the Midi, to the superstition of the
rights of primogeniture, they had made every possible sacrifice to send
to Paris their fine, ambitious lad, who set out assured of success, the
admiration of all the young women of the town; and Paris, after having
for six years, beaten, twisted, and squeezed in its great vat the
brilliant southern stripling, after having burnt him with all its
vitriol, rolled him in all its mud, finished by sending him back in
this state of wreckage, stupefied and paralyzed--killing his father with
sorrow, and forcing his mother to sell her all, and live as a sort of
char-woman in the better-class houses of her own country-side. Lucky it
was that just then, when this broken piece of humanity, discharged
from all the hospitals of Paris, was sent back by public charity to
Bourg-Saint-Andeol, Bernard--he whom they called Cadet, as in these
southern families, half Arab as they are, the eldest always takes the
family name, and the last-comer that of Cadet--Bernard was at Tunis
making his fortune, and sending home money regularly. But what pain it
was for the poor mother to owe everything, even the life, the comfort
of the sad invalid, to the robust and courageous boy whom his father and
she had loved without any tenderness; who, since he was five years old,
they had treated as a "hand," because he was very strong, woolly-headed,
and ugly, and even then knew better than any one in the house how to
deal in old nails. Ah! how she longed to have him near her, her Cadet,
to make some return to him for all the good he did, to pay at last the
debt of love and motherly tenderness that she owed him!

But, you see, these princely fortunes have the burdens, the wearinesses
of royal lives. This poor mother, in her dazzling surroundings, was very
like a real queen: familiar with long exiles, cruel separations, and the
trials which detract from greatness; one of her sons forever stupefied,
the other far away, seldom writing, absorbed in his business, saying,
"I will come," and never coming. She had only seen him once in twelve
years, and then in the whirl of a visit of the Bey to Saint-Romans--a
rush of horses and carriages, of fireworks, and of banquets. He had gone
in the suite of his monarch, having scarcely time to say good-bye to his
old mother, to whom there remained of this great joy only a few pictures
in the illustrated papers, showing Bernard Jansoulet arriving at the
castle with Ahmed, and presenting his mother. Is it not thus that kings
and queens have their family feelings exploited in the journals? There
was also a cedar of Lebanon, brought from the other end of the world, a
regular mountain of a tree, whose transport had been as difficult and as
costly as that of Cleopatra's needle, and whose erection as a souvenir
of the royal visit by dint of men, money, and teams had shaken the very
foundations. But this time, at least, knowing him to be in France for
several months--perhaps for good--she hoped to have her Bernard to
herself. And now he returned to her, one fine evening, enveloped in the
same triumphant glory, in the same official display, surrounded by a
crowd of counts, of marquises, of fine gentlemen from Paris, filling,
they and their servants, the two large wagonettes she had sent to meet
them at the little station of Giffas on the other side of the Rhone.

"Come, give me a kiss, my dear mother. There is nothing to be ashamed
of in giving a good hug to the boy you haven't seen all these years.
Besides, all these gentlemen are our friends. This is the Marquis
de Monpavon, the Marquis de Bois d'Hery. Ah! the time is past when
I brought you to eat vegetable soup with us, little Cabassu and
Jean-Batiste Bompain. You know M. de Gery? With my old friend
Cardailhac, whom I now present, that makes the first batch. There are
others to come. Prepare yourself for a fine upsetting. We entertain the
Bey in four days."

"The Bey again!" said the old woman, astounded. "I thought he was dead."

Jansoulet and his guests could not help laughing at this comical terror,
accentuated by her southern intonation.

"It is another, mamma. There is always a Bey--thank goodness. But
don't be afraid. You won't have so much bother this time. Our friend
Cardailhac has undertaken everything. We are going to have magnificent
celebrations. In the meantime, quick--dinner and our rooms. Our
Parisians are worn out."

"Everything is ready, my son," said the old lady quietly, stiff and
straight under her Cambrai cap, the head-dress with its yellowing flaps,
which she never left off even for great occasions. Good fortune had not
changed her. She was a true peasant of the Rhone valley, independent and
proud, without any of the sly humilities of Balzac's country folk, too
artless to be purse-proud. One pride alone she had--that of showing her
son with what scrupulous care she had discharged her duties as guardian.
Not an atom of dust, not a trace of damp on the walls. All the splendid
ground-floor, the reception-rooms with their hangings of iridescent silk
new out of the dust sheets, the long summer galleries cool and sonorous,
paved with mosaics and furnished with a flowery lightness in the
old-fashioned style, with Louis XIV sofas in cane and silk, the immense
dining-room decorated with palms and flowers, the billiard-room with its
rows of brilliant ivory balls, its crystal chandeliers and its suits
of armour--all the length of the castle, through its tall windows, wide
open to the stately terrace, lay displayed for the admiration of the
visitors. The marvellous beauty of the horizon and the setting sun, its
own serene and peaceful richness, were reflected in the panes of glass
and in the waxed and polished wood with the same clearness as in the
mirror-like ornamental lakes, the pictures of the poplars and the swans.
The setting was so lovely, the whole effect so grand, that the clamorous
and tasteless luxury melted away, disappeared, even to the most
hypercritical eyes.

"There is something to work on," said Cardailhac, the manager, his glass
in his eye, his hat on one side, combining already his stage-effect.
And the haughty air of Monpavon, whom the head-dress of the old woman
receiving them on the terrace had shocked, gave way to a condescending
smile. Here was something to work on, certainly, and, guided by persons
of taste, their friend Jansoulet could really give his Moorish Highness
an exceedingly suitable reception. All the evening they talked of
nothing else. In the sumptuous dining-room, their elbows on the table,
full of meat and drink, they planned and discussed. Cardailhac, who had
great ideas, had already his plan complete.

"First of all, you give me _carte-blanche_, don't you, Nabob?
_Carte-blanche_, old fellow, and make that fat Hemerlingue burst with
envy."

Then the manager explained his scheme. The festivities were to be
divided into days, as at Vaux, when Fouquet entertained Louis XIV. One
day a play; another day Provencal games, dances, bull-fights,
local bands; the third day--And already the manager's hand sketched
programmes, announcements; while Bois l'Hery slept, his hands in his
pockets, his chair tilted back, his cigar sunk in the corner of
his sneering mouth; and the Marquis de Monpavon, always on his best
behaviour, straightened his shirt-front to keep himself awake.

De Gery had left them early. He had sought refuge beside the old
mother--who had known him as a boy, him and his brothers--in the humble
parlour of the brightly decorated, white-curtained house, where the
Nabob's mother tried to perpetuate her humble past with the help of a
few relics saved from its wreck.

Paul chatted quietly with the fine old woman, admiring her severe and
regular features, her white hair massed together like the hemp of her
distaff, as she sat holding herself straight in her seat--never in her
life having leaned back or sat in an arm-chair--a little green shawl
folded tightly across her flat breast. He called her Francoise, and she
called him M. Paul. They were old friends. And guess what they talked
about? Of her grandchildren, of Bernard's three sons, whom she did not
know and so much longed to know.

"Ah, M. Paul, if you knew how I long to see them! I should have been
so happy if he had brought them, my three little ones, instead of these
fine gentlemen. Think, I have never seen them, only their portraits
which are over there. I am a little afraid of their mother, she is quite
a great lady, a Miss Afchin. But them, the children, I am sure they are
not proud, and they would love their old granny. It would be like having
their father a little boy again, and I would give to them what I did not
give to him. You see, M. Paul, parents are not always just. They have
their favourites. But God is just, he is. The ones that are most petted
and spoiled at the expense of the others, you should see what he does to
them for you! And the favour of the old often brings misfortune to the
young!"

She sighed, looking towards the large recess from behind the curtains of
which there came, at intervals, a long sobbing breath like the sleeping
wail of a beaten child who has cried bitterly.

A heavy step on the staircase, a loud, sweet voice saying, very softly,
"It is I; don't move," and Jansoulet appeared. He knew his mother's
habits, how her lamp was the last to go out, so when every one in the
castle was in bed, he came to see her, to chat with her for a little, to
rejoice her heart with an affection he could not show before the others.
"Oh, stay, my dear Paul; we don't mind you," and once more a child in
his mother's presence, with loving gestures and words that were really
touching, the huge man threw himself on the ground at her feet. She was
very happy to have him there, so dearly near, but she was just a little
shy. She looked upon him as an all-powerful being, extraordinary,
raising him, in her simplicity, to the greatness of an Olympian
commanding the thunder and lightning. She spoke to him, asking about his
friends, his business, but not daring to put the question she had asked
de Gery: "Why haven't my grandchildren come?" But he spoke of them
himself. "They are at school, mother. Whenever the holidays begin they
shall be sent with Bompain. You remember Jean-Baptiste Bompain? And you
shall keep them for two long months. They will come to you and make you
tell them stories, and they will go to sleep with their heads on your
lap--there, like that."

And he himself, putting his heavy, woolly head on her knee, remembered
the happy evenings of his childhood when he would go to sleep so, if she
would let him, and his brother had not taken up all the room. He tasted
for the first time since his return to France a few minutes of delicious
peace away from his restless and artificial life, as he lay pressed to
his old mother's heart, in the deep silence of night and of the country
which one feels hovering over him in limitless space; the only sounds
the beating of that old faithful heart and the swing of the pendulum of
the ancient clock in the corner. Suddenly came the same long sigh, as of
a child fallen asleep sobbing. Jansoulet lifted his head and looked at
his mother, and softly asked: "Is it--?" "Yes," she said, "I make him
sleep there. He might need me in the night."

"I would like to see him, to embrace him."

"Come, then." She rose very gravely, took the lamp and went to the
alcove, of which she softly drew the large curtain, making a sign to her
son to draw near quietly.

He was sleeping. And no doubt something lived in him while he slept that
was not there when he waked, for instead of the flaccid immobility in
which he was congealed all day, he was now shaken by sudden starts, and
on the inexpressive and death-like face there were lines of pain and the
contractions of suffering life. Jansoulet, much affected, looked long
at those wasted features, faded and sickly, where the beard grew with a
surprising vigour. Then he bent down, put his lips to the damp brow, and
feeling him move, said very gravely and respectfully, as one speaks to
the head of the family, "Good-night, my brother." Perhaps the captive
soul had heard it from the depths of its dark and abject limbo. For the
lips moved and a long moan answered him, a far-away wail, a despairing
cry, which filled with helpless tears the glance exchanged between
Francoise and her son, and tore from them both the same cry in which
their sorrow met, "Pecaire," the local word which expressed all pity and
all tenderness.

The next day, from early morning, the commotion began with the arrival
of the actors, an avalanche of hats and wigs and big boots, of short
skirts and affected cries, of floating veils and fresh make-ups. The
women were in a great majority, as Cardailhac thought that for a Bey
the play was of little consequence, and that all that was needful was to
have catchy tunes in pretty mouths, to show fine arms and shapely legs
in the easy costume of light opera. All the well-made celebrities of his
theatre were there, Amy Ferat at the head of them, a bold young woman
who had already had her teeth in the gold of several crowns. There
were two or three well-known men whose pale faces made the same kind of
chalky and spectral spots amid the green of the trees as the plaster of
the statues. All these people, enlivened by the journey, the surprise of
the country, the overflowing hospitality, as well as the hope of making
something out of this sojourn of Beys and Nabobs and other gilded fools,
wanted only to play, to jest and sing with the vulgar boisterousness
of a crew of freshly discharged Seine boatmen. But Cardailhac meant
otherwise. No sooner were they unpacked, freshened up, and luncheon over
than, quick, the parts, the rehearsals! There was no time to lose. They
worked in the small drawing-room next the summer gallery, where the
theatre was already being fitted up; and the noise of hammers, the songs
from the burlesque, the shrill voices, the conductor's fiddle, mingled
with the loud trumpet-like calls of the peacocks, and rose upon the hot
southern wind, which, not recognising it as only the mad rattle of its
own grasshoppers, shook it all disdainfully on the trailing tip of its
wings.

Seated in the centre of the terrace, as in the stage-box of his theatre,
Cardailhac watched the rehearsals, gave orders to a crowd of workmen
and gardeners, had trees cut down as spoiling the view, designed the
triumphal arches, sent off telegrams, express messengers to mayors, to
sub-prefects, to Arles--to arrange for a deputation of girls in national
costume; to Barbantane, where the best dancers are; to Faraman, famous
for its wild bulls and Camargue horses. And as the name of Jansoulet,
joined to that of the Bey of Tunis, flared at the end of all these
messages, on all sides they hastened to obey; the telegraph wires were
never still, messengers wore out horses on the roads. And this little
Sardanapalus of the stage called Cardailhac repeated ever, "There's
something to work on here," happy to scatter gold at random like
handfuls of seed, to have a stage of forty leagues to stir about--the
whole of Provence, of which this rabid Parisian was a native and whose
picturesque resources he knew to the core.

Dispossessed of her office, the old mother never appeared. She occupied
herself with the farm, and her invalid. She was terrified by this crowd
of visitors, these insolent servants whom it was difficult to know from
the masters, these women with their impudent and elegant airs, these
clean-shaven men who looked like bad priests--all these mad-caps who
chased each other at night in the corridors with pillows, with wet
sponges, with curtain tassels they had torn down, for weapons. Even
after dinner she no longer had her son; he was obliged to stay with his
guests, whose number grew each day as the _fetes_ approached; not even
the resource of talking to M. Paul about her grandchildren was left, for
Jansoulet, a little embarrassed by the seriousness of his friend,
had sent him to spend a few days with his brothers. And the careful
housekeeper, to whom they came every minute asking the keys for linen,
for a room, for extra silver, thought of her piles of beautiful dishes,
of the sacking of her cupboards and larders, remembered the state
in which the old Bey's visit had left the castle, devastated as by a
cyclone, and said in her _patois_ as she feverishly wet the linen on her
distaff: "May lightning strike them, this Bey and all the Beys!"

At last the day came, the great day which is still spoken of in all the
country-side. Towards three o'clock in the afternoon, after a sumptuous
luncheon at which the old mother presided, this time in a new cap, over
a company composed of Parisian celebrities, prefects, deputies, all in
full uniform, mayors with their sashes, priests newshaven, Jansoulet in
full dress stepped out on to the terrace surrounded by his guests. He
saw before him in that splendid frame of magnificent natural scenery, in
the midst of flags and arches and coats of arms, a vast swarm of people,
a flare of brilliant costumes in rows on the slopes, at corners of the
walks; here, grouped in beds, like flowers on a lawn, the prettiest
girls of Arles, whose little dark heads showed delicately from beneath
their lace fichus; farther down were the dancers from Barbantane--eight
tambourine players in a line, ready to begin, their hands joined,
ribbons flying, hats cocked, and the red scarves round their hips;
beyond them, on the succeeding terraces were the choral societies in
rows, dressed in black with red caps, their standard-bearer in front,
grave, important, his teeth clinched, holding high his carved staff;
farther down still, on a vast circular space now arranged as an
amphitheatre, were the black bulls, and the herdsmen from Camargue
seated on their long-haired white horses, their high boots over their
knees, at their wrists an uplifted spear; then more flags, helmets,
bayonets, and decorations right down to the triumphal arch at the gates;
as far as the eye could see, on the other side of the Rhone (across
which the two railways had made a pontoon bridge that they might
come straight from the station to Saint-Romans), whole villages were
assembling from every side, crowding to the Giffas road in a cloud of
dust and a confusion of cries, sitting at the hedge-sides, clinging to
the elms, squeezed in carts--a living wall for the procession. Above all
a great white sun which scintillated in every direction--on the copper
of a tambourine, on the point of a trident, on the fringe of a banner;
and in the midst the great proud Rhone carrying to the sea the moving
picture of this royal feast. Before these marvels, where shone all the
gold of his coffers, the Nabob had a sudden feeling of admiration and of
pride.

"This is beautiful," he said, paling; and behind him his mother
murmured, "It is too beautiful for man. It is as if God were coming."
She was pale, too, but with an unutterable fear.

The sentiment of the old Catholic peasant was indeed that which was
vaguely felt by all those people massed upon the roads as though for the
passing of a gigantic Corpus Christi procession, and whom this visit
of an Eastern prince to a child of their own country reminded of the
legends of the Magi, or the advent of Gaspard the Moor, bringing to the
carpenter's son myrrh and the triple crown.

As Jansoulet was being warmly congratulated by every one, Cardailhac,
who had not been seen since morning, suddenly appeared, triumphant and
perspiring. "Didn't I tell you there was something to work on! Eh? Isn't
it fine? What a scene! I bet our Parisians would pay dear to be at such
a first performance as this!" And lowering his voice, on account of the
mother who was quite near, "Have you seen our country girls? No? Examine
them more closely--the first, the one in front, who is to present the
bouquet."

"Why, it is Amy Ferat!"

"Just so. You see, old fellow, if the Bey should throw his handkerchief
amid that group of loveliness there must be some one to pick it up. They
wouldn't understand, these innocents. Oh, I have thought of everything,
you will see. Everything is prepared and regulated just as on the stage.
Garden side--farm side."

Here, to give an idea of the perfect organization, the manager raised
his stick. Immediately his gesture was repeated from the top to the
bottom of the park, and from the choral societies, from the brass bands,
from the tambourines, there burst forth the majestic strains of the
popular southern song, _Grand Soleil de la Provence_. Voices and
instruments rose in the sunlight, the banners filled, the dancers swayed
to their first movement, while on the other side of the river a report
flew like a breeze that the Bey had arrived unexpectedly by another
route. The manager made another gesture, and the immense orchestra was
hushed. The response was slower this time, there were little delays, a
hail of words lost in the leaves; but one could not expect more from a
concourse of three thousand people. Just then the carriages appeared,
the state coaches which had been used on the occasion of the last Bey's
visit--two large chariots, pink and gold as at Tunis. Mme. Jansoulet
had tended them almost as holy relics, and they had come out of their
coverings, with their panels, their hangings and their gold fringes,
as shining and new as the day they were made. Here again Cardailhac's
ingenuity had been freely exercised. He had thought horses looked too
heavy for those unreal fragilities, so he had harnessed instead eight
mules, with white reins, decorated with bows and pompons and bells, and
caparisoned from head to foot in that marvellous Esparto work--an art
Provence has borrowed from the Moors and perfected. How could the Bey
not be pleased!

The Nabob, Monpavon, the prefect, and one of the generals got into the
first coach; the others filled the succeeding carriages. The priests and
the mayors, swelling with importance, rushed to the head of the choral
societies of their villages which were to go in front, and all moved off
along the road to Giffas.

The weather was magnificent, but hot and heavy, three months in advance
of the season, as often happens in this impetuous country, where
everything is in a hurry and comes too soon. Although there was not a
cloud to be seen, the stillness of the atmosphere--the wind had
fallen suddenly like a loose sail--dazzling and heated white, a silent
solemnity hanging over all, foretold a storm brewing in some corner
of the horizon. The immense torpor of things gradually influenced the
living beings. One heard too distinctly the tinkling mule-bells, the
heavy steps in the dust of the band of singers whom Cardailhac was
placing at regular distances in the seething human hedge which bordered
the road and was lost in the distance; a sudden call, children's voices,
and the cry of the water-seller, that necessary accompaniment of all
open-air festivals in the Midi.

"Open your window, general, it is stifling," said Monpavon, crimson,
fearing for his paint, and the lowered windows exposed to the populace
these high functionaries mopping their august faces, strained, agonized,
by the same expression of waiting--waiting for the Bey, for the storm,
waiting for something, in short.

Still another trimphal arch. It was at Giffas, its long, stony street
strewn with green palms, and its sordid houses gay with flowers and
bright hangings. The station was outside the village, white and square,
stuck like a thimble on the roadside--true type of a little country
station, lost in the midst of vineyards, never having any one in it
except perhaps sometimes an old woman and her parcels waiting in a
corner, come three hours before the time.

In honour of the Bey this slight building had been rigged out with
flags, adorned with rugs and divans; a splendid buffet had been fitted
up with sherbets, all ready for his Highness. Once there and out of the
carriage the Nabob tried to dispel the feeling of uneasiness which he,
too, had begun to suffer from. Prefects, generals, deputies, people
in dress-coats and uniforms, were standing about on the platform in
imposing groups, their faces solemn, their mouths pursed, their bodies
swaying and jerking in the knowing way of public functionaries who feel
people are looking at them. And you can imagine how noses were flattened
against the windows to see all this hierarchical swelldom. There
was Monpavon, his shirt-front bulging like a whipped egg. Cardailhac
breathlessly giving his last orders, and the honest face of Jansoulet,
whose sparkling eyes, set over his fat, sunburnt cheeks, looked like two
gold nails in a goffering of Spanish leather. Suddenly an electric
bell rang. The station-master, in a new uniform, ran down the line:
"Gentlemen, the train is signalled. It will be here in eight minutes."
Every one started, and with the same instinctive movement pulled out
their watches. Only six minutes more. Then in the great silence some one
said: "Look over there!" To the right, on the side from which the train
was to come, two great slopes, covered with vines, made a sort of funnel
into which the track disappeared as though swallowed up. Just then all
this hollow was as black as ink, darkened by an enormous cloud, a bar of
gloom, cutting the blue of the sky perpendicularly, throwing out banks
that resembled cliffs of basalt on which the light broke all white like
moonshine. In the solemnity of the deserted track, over the lines of
silent rails where one felt that everything was ready for the coming
of the prince, it was terrifying to see this aerial crag approaching,
throwing its shadow before it, to watch the play of the perspective
which gave the cloud a slow, majestic movement, and the shadow the
rapidity of a galloping horse. "What a storm we shall have directly!"
was the thought which came to every one, but none had voice to express
it, for a strident whistle sounded and the train appeared at the end of
the dark funnel. A real royal train, rapid and short, and decorated with
flags. The smoking, roaring engine carried a large bouquet of roses on
its breastplate, like a bridesmaid at some leviathan wedding.

It came out of the funnel at full speed, but slowed down as it
approached. The functionaries grouped themselves, straightened their
backs, hitched their swords and eased their collars, while Jansoulet
went down the track to meet the train, an obsequious smile on his lips,
his back curved ready for the "Salam Alek." The train proceeded very
slowly. Jansoulet thought it had stopped, and put his hand on the door
of the royal carriage, glittering with gold under the black sky. But,
doubtless, the impetus had been too strong, and the train continued to
advance, the Nabob walking beside it, trying to open the accursed door
which was stuck fast, and making signs to the engine-driver. The
engine was not answering. "Stop, stop, there!" It did not stop. Losing
patience, he jumped on to the velvet-covered step, and in that fiery,
impulsive manner of his which had so delighted the old Bey, he cried,
his woolly head at the door, "Saint-Romans station, your Highness."

You know the sort of vague light there is in dreams, the colourless
empty atmosphere where everything has the look of a phantom. Jansoulet
was suddenly enveloped in this, stricken, paralyzed. He wanted to speak,
words would not come, his nerveless hand held the door so feebly that
he almost fell backward. What had he seen? On a divan at the back of
the saloon, reposing on his elbow, his beautiful dark head with its
long silky beard leaning on his hand, was the Bey, close wrapped in
his Oriental coat, without other ornaments than the large ribbon of the
Legion of Honour across his breast and the diamond in the aigrette
of his fez. He was fanning himself impassively with a little fan of
gold-embroidered strawwork. Two aides-de-camp and an engineer of the
railway company were standing beside him. Opposite, on another divan,
in a respectful attitude, but favoured evidently, as they were the only
ones seated in the Bey's presence, were two owl-like men, their long
whiskers falling on their white ties, one fat and the other thin. They
were the Hemerlingues, father and son, who had won over his Highness
and were bearing him off in triumph to Paris. What a horrible dream! All
three men, who knew Jansoulet well, looked at him coldly as though his
face recalled nothing. Piteously white, his forehead covered with sweat,
he stammered, "But, your Highness, are you not going to--" A vivid flash
of lightning, followed by a terrible peal of thunder, stopped the
words. But the lightning in the eyes of his sovereign seemed to him as
terrible. Sitting up, his arm outstretched, in guttural voice as of one
accustomed to roll the hard Arab syllables, but in pure French, the
Bey struck him down with the slow, carefully prepared words: "Go home,
swindler. The feet go where the heart guides. Mine will never enter the
house of the man who has cheated my country."

Jansoulet tried to say something. The Bey made a sign: "Go on." The
engineer pressed a button, a whistle replied, the train, which had never
really stopped, seemed to stretch itself, making all its iron muscles
crack, to take a bound and start off at full speed, the flags fluttering
in the storm-wind, and the black smoke meeting the lightning flashes.

Jansoulet, left standing on the track, staggering, stunned, ruined,
watched his fortune fly away and disappear, oblivious of the large
drops of rain which were falling on his bare head. Then, when the others
rushed upon him, surrounded him, rained questions upon him, he stuttered
some disconnected words: "Court intrigues--infamous plot." And suddenly,
shaking his fist after the train, with eyes that were bloodshot, and a
foam of rage upon his lips, he roared like a wild beast, "Blackguards!"

"You forget yourself, Jansoulet, you forget yourself." You guess who it
was that uttered those words, and, taking the Nabob's arm, tried to pull
him together, to make him hold his head as high as his own, conducted
him to the carriage through the rows of stupefied people in uniform,
and made him get in, exhausted and broken, like a near relation of the
deceased that one hoists into a mourning-coach after the funeral. The
rain began to fall, peals of thunder followed one another. Every one now
hurried into the carriages, which quickly took the homeward road. Then
there occurred a heart-rending yet comical thing, one of the cruel
farces played by that cowardly destiny which kicks its victims after
they are down. In the falling day and the growing darkness of the
cyclone, the crowd, squeezed round the approaches of the station,
thought they saw his Highness somewhere amid the gorgeous trappings, and
as soon as the wheels started an immense clamour, a frightful bawling,
which had been hatching for an hour in all those breasts, burst out,
rose, rolled, rebounded from side to side and prolonged itself in the
valley. "Hurrah, hurrah for the Bey!" This was the signal for the first
bands to begin, the choral societies started in their turn, and the
noise growing step by step, the road from Giffas to Saint-Romans was
nothing but an uninterrupted bellow. Cardailhac and all the gentlemen,
Jansoulet himself, leant in vain out of the windows making desperate
signs, "That will do! That's enough!" Their gestures were lost in the
tumult and the darkness; what the crowd did see seemed to act only as
an excitant. And I promise you there was no need of that. All these
meridionals, whose enthusiasm had been carefully led since early
morning, excited the more by the long wait and the storm, shouted with
all the force of their voices and the strength of their lungs, mingling
with the song of Provence the cry of "Hurrah for the Bey!" till it
seemed a perpetual chorus. Most of them had no idea what a Bey was,
did not even think about it. They accentuated the appellation in an
extraordinary manner as though it had three b's and ten y's. But it made
no difference, they excited themselves with the cry, holding up their
hands, waving their hats, becoming agitated as a result of their own
activity. Women wept and rubbed their eyes. Suddenly, from the top of an
elm, the shrill voice of a child made itself heard: "Mamma, mamma--I see
him!" He saw him! They all saw him, for that matter! Now even, they will
all swear to you they saw him!

Confronted by such a delirium, in the impossibility of imposing silence
and calm on such a crowd, there was only one thing for the people in the
carriages to do: to leave them alone, pull up the windows and dash along
at full speed. It would at least shorten a bitter martyrdom. But this
was even worse. Seeing the procession hurrying, all the road began to
gallop with it. To the dull booming of their tambourines the dancers
from Barbantane, hand in hand, sprang--a living garland--round the
carriage doors. The choral societies, breathless with singing as they
ran, but singing all the same, dragged on their standard-bearers, the
banners now hanging over their shoulders; and the good, fat priests, red
and panting, shoving their vast overworked bellies before them, still
found strength to shout into the very ear of the mules, in an unctuous,
effusive voice, "Long live our noble Bey!" The rain on all this, the
rain falling in buckets, discolouring the pink coaches, precipitating
the disorder, giving the appearance of a rout to this triumphal return,
but a comic rout, mingled with songs and laughs, mad embraces, and
infernal oaths. It was something like the return of a religious
procession flying before a storm, cassocks turned up, surplices over
heads, and the Blessed Sacrament put back in all haste, under a porch.

The dull roll of the wheels over the wooden bridge told the poor Nabob,
motionless and silent in a corner of his carriage, that they were almost
there. "At last!" he said, looking through the clouded windows at the
foaming waters of the Rhone, whose tempestuous rush seemed calm after
what he had just suffered. But at the end of the bridge, when the first
carriage reached the great triumphal arch, rockets went off, drums beat,
saluting the monarch as he entered the estates of his faithful subject.
To crown the irony, in the gathering darkness a gigantic flare of gas
suddenly illuminated the roof of the castle, and in spite of the wind
and the rain, these fiery letters could still be seen very plainly,
"Long liv' th' B'Y 'HMED!"

"That--that is the wind-up," said the poor Nabob, who could not help
laughing, though it was a very piteous and bitter laugh. But no, he was
mistaken. The end was the bouquet waiting at the castle door. Amy Ferat
came to present it, leaving the group of country maidens under the
veranda, where they were trying to shelter the shining silks of their
skirts and the embroidered velvets of their caps as they waited for
the first carriage. Her bunch of flowers in her hand, modest, her eyes
downcast, but showing a roguish leg, the pretty actress sprang forward
to the door in a low courtesy, almost on her knees, a pose she had
worked at for a week. Instead of the Bey, Jansoulet got out, stiff and
troubled, and passed without even seeing her. And as she stayed there,
bouquet in hand, with the silly look of a stage fairy who has missed her
cue, Cardailhac said to her with the ready chaff of the Parisian who
is never at a loss: "Take away your flowers, my dear. The Bey is not
coming. He had forgotten his handkerchief, and as it is only with that
he speaks to ladies, you understand--"


Now it is night. Everything is asleep at Saint-Romans after the
tremendous uproar of the day. Torrents of rain continue to fall; and in
the park, where the triumphal arches and the Venetian masts still lift
vaguely their soaking carcasses, one can hear streams rushing down the
slopes transformed into waterfalls. Everything streams or drips. A noise
of water, an immense noise of water. Alone in his sumptuous room, with
its lordly bed all hung with purple silks, the Nabob is still awake,
turning over his own black thoughts as he strides to and fro. It is not
the affront, that public outrage before all these people, that occupies
him, it is not even the gross insult the Bey had flung at him in the
presence of his mortal enemies. No, this southerner, whose sensations
were all physical and as rapid as the firing of new guns, had already
thrown off the venom of his rancour. And then, court favourites, by
famous examples, are always prepared for these sudden falls. What
terrifies him is that which he guesses to lie behind this affront.
He reflects that all his possessions are over there, firms,
counting-houses, ships, all at the mercy of the Bey, in that lawless
East, that country of the ruler's good-pleasure. Pressing his burning
brow to the streaming windows, his body in a cold sweat, his hands icy,
he remains looking vaguely out into the night, as dark, as obscure as
his own future.

Suddenly a noise of footsteps, of precipitate knocks at the door.

"Who is there?"

"Sir," said Noel, coming in half dressed, "it is a very urgent telegram
that has been sent from the post-office by special messenger."

"A telegram! What can there be now?"

He takes the envelope and opens it with shaking fingers. The god, struck
twice already, begins to feel himself vulnerable, to know the fears,
the nervous weakness of other men. Quick--to the signature. MORA! Is
it possible? The duke--the duke to him! Yes, it is indeed--M-O-R-A.
And above it: "Popolasca is dead. Election coming in Corsica. You are
official candidate."

Deputy! It was salvation. With that, nothing to fear. No one dares treat
a representative of the great French nation as a mere swindler. The
Hemerlingues were finely defeated.

"Oh, my duke, my noble duke!"

He was so full of emotion that he could not sign his name. Suddenly:
"Where is the man who brought this telegram?"

"Here, M. Jansoulet," replied a jolly south-country voice from the
corridor.

He was lucky, that postman.

"Come in," said the Nabob. And giving him the receipt, he took in a
heap from his pockets--ever full--as many gold pieces as his hands could
hold, and threw them into the cap of the poor fellow, who stuttered,
distracted and dazzled by the fortune showered upon him, in the night of
this fairy palace.




A CORSICAN ELECTION

Pozzonegro--near Sartene.

At last I can give you my news, dear M. Joyeuse. During the five days
we have been in Corsica we have rushed about so much, made so many
speeches, so often changed carriages and mounts--now on mules, now on
asses, or even on the backs of men for crossing the torrents--written so
many letters, noted so many requests, visited so many schools,
presented chasubles, altar-cloths, renewed cracked bells, and founded
kindergartens; we have inaugurated so many things, proposed so many
toasts, listened to so many harangues, consumed so much Talano wine and
white cheese, that I have not found time to send even a greeting to the
little family circle round the big table, from which I have been missing
these two months. Happily my absence will not be for much longer, as we
expect to leave the day after to-morrow, and are coming straight back
to Paris. From the electioneering point of view, I think our journey has
been a success. Corsica is an admirable country, indolent and poor, a
mixture of poverty and pride, which makes both the nobles and the middle
classes strive to keep up an appearance of easy circumstances at the
price of the most painful privations. They speak quite seriously of
Popolasca's fortune--that needy deputy whom death robbed of the four
thousand pounds his resignation in favour of the Nabob would have
brought him. All these people have, as well, an administrative mania, a
thirst for places which give them any sort of uniform, and a cap to
wear with the words "Government official" written on it. If you gave a
Corsican peasant the choice between the richest farm in France and the
shabbiest sword-belt of a village policeman, he would not hesitate and
would take the belt. In that conditions of things, you may imagine
what chances of election a candidate has who can dispose of a personal
fortune and the Government favours. Thus, M. Jansoulet will be elected;
and especially if he succeeds in his present undertaking, which has
brought us here to the only inn of a little place called Pozzonegro
(black well). It is a regular well, black with foliage, consisting of
fifty small red-stone houses clustered round a long Italian church, at
the bottom of a ravine between rigid hills and coloured sandstone rocks,
over which stretch immense forests of larch and juniper trees. From my
open window, at which I am writing, I see up above there a bit of blue
sky, the orifice of the well; down below on the little square--which
a huge nut-tree shades as though the shadows were not already thick
enough--two shepherds clothed in sheep-skins are playing at cards, with
their elbows on the stone of a fountain. Gambling is the bane of this
land of idleness, where they get men from Lucca to do their harvesting.
The two poor wretches I see probably haven't a farthing between them,
but one bets his knife against a cheese wrapped up in vine leaves, and
the stakes lie between them on the bench. A little priest smokes his
cigar as he watches them, and seems to take the liveliest interest in
their game.

And that is not all. Not a sound anywhere except the drops of water on
the stone, the oaths of one of the players who swears by the _sango
del seminaro_, and from underneath my room in the inn parlour the eager
voice of our friend mingling with the sputterings of the illustrious
Paganetti, who is interpreter, in his conversation with the not less
illustrious Piedigriggio.

M. Piedigriggio (gray feet) is a local celebrity. He is a tall, old man
of seventy-five, with a flowing beard and a straight back. He wears a
little pilot coat, a brown wool Catalonian cap on his white locks. At
his belt he carries a pair of scissors to cut the long leaves of the
green tobacco he smokes into the hollow of his hand. A venerable-looking
person in fact, and when he crossed the square, shaking hands with
the priest, smiling protectingly at the gamblers, I would never have
believed that I was looking at the famous brigand Piedigriggio, who held
the woods in Monte-Rotondo from 1840 to 1860, outwitted the police and
the military, and who to-day, thanks to the proscription by which he
benefits, after seven or eight cold-blooded murders, moves peaceably
about the country which witnessed his crimes, and enjoys a considerable
importance. This is why: Piedigriggio has two sons who, nobly following
in his footsteps, have taken to the carbine and the woods, in their
turn not to be found, not to be caught, as their father was, for twenty
years; warned by the shepherds of the movements of the police, when the
latter leave a village, they make their appearance in it. The eldest,
Scipio, came to mass last Sunday at Pozzonegro. To say they love them,
and that the bloody hand-shake of those wretches is a pleasure to all
who harbour them, would be to calumniate the peaceful inhabitants of
this parish. But they fear them, and their will is law.

Now, these Piedigriggios have taken it into their heads to favour our
opponent in the election. And their influence is a formidable power, for
they can make two whole cantons vote against us. They have long
legs, the rascals, as long in proportion as the reach of their guns.
Naturally, we have the police on our side, but the brigands are far more
powerful. As our innkeeper said this morning: "The police, they go away;
_ma_ the _banditti_ they stay." In the face of this logical reasoning
we understood that the only thing to be done was to treat with the
Gray-feet, to try a "job," in fact. The mayor said something of this to
the old man, who consulted his sons, and it is the conditions of this
treaty they are discussing downstairs. I hear the voice of our general
director, "Come, my dear fellow, you know I am an old Corsican myself,"
and then the other's quiet replies, broken, like his tobacco, by the
irritating noise of his scissors. The "dear fellow" does not seem to
have much confidence, and until the coin is ringing upon the table I
fancy there will not be any advance.

You see, Paganetti is known in his native country. The worth of his word
is written on the square in Corte, still waiting for the monument to
Paoli, on the vast fields of carrots which he has managed to plant
on the Island of Ithaca, in the gaping empty purses of all those
unfortunate small tradesmen, village priests, and petty nobility, whose
poor savings he has swallowed up dazzling their eyes with chimerical
_combinazioni_. Truly, for him to dare to come back here, it needed all
his phenomenal audacity, as well as the resources now at his disposal to
satisfy all claims.

And, indeed, what truth is there in the fabulous works undertaken by the
Territorial Bank?

None.

Mines, which produce nothing and never will produce anything, for they
exist only on paper; quarries, which are still innocent of pick or
dynamite, tracts of uncultivated sandy land that they survey with a
gesture, telling you, "We begin here, and we go right over there, as
far as you like." It is the same with the forests. The whole of a wooded
hill in Monte-Rotondo belongs to us, it seems, but the felling of the
trees is impossible unless aeronauts undertake the woodman's work. It is
the same with the watering-places, among which this miserable hamlet
of Pozzonegro is one of the most important, with its fountain whose
astonishing ferruginous properties Paganetti advertises. Of the
streamers, not a shadow. Stay--an old, half-ruined Genoese tower on the
shore of the Gulf of Ajaccio bears on a tarnished escutcheon, above
its hermetically sealed doors, this inscription: "Paganetti's Agency.
Maritime Company. Inquiry Office." Fat, gray lizards tend the office in
company with an owl. As for the railways, all these honest Corsicans to
whom I spoke of it smiled knowingly, replied with winks and mysterious
hints, and it was only this morning that I had the exceedingly
buffoonish explanation of all this reticence.

I had read among the documents which the director-general flaunts in our
eyes from time to time, like a fan to puff up his impostures, the bill
of sale of a marble quarry at a place said to be "Taverna," two hours'
distance from Pozzonegro. Profiting by our stay here, I got on a mule
this morning, without telling any one, and guided by a tall scamp of
a fellow with legs like a deer--true type of a Corsican poacher or
smuggler, his thick, red pipe in his mouth, his gun in a bandoleer--I
went to Taverna. After a fearful progress across cracked rocks and bogs,
past abysses of unsoundable depths--on the very edges of which my
mule maliciously walked as though to mark them out with her shoes--we
arrived, by an almost perpendicular descent, at the end of our journey.
It was a vast desert of rocks, absolutely bare, all white with the
droppings of gulls and sea-fowl, for the sea is at the bottom, quite
near, and the silence of the place was broken only by the flow of the
waves and the shrill cries of the wheeling circles of birds. My guide,
who has a holy horror of excisemen and the police, stayed above on the
cliff, because of a little coastguard station posted like a watchman on
the shore. I made for a large red building which still maintained, in
this burning solitude its three stories, in spite of broken windows
and ruinous tiles. Over the worm-eaten door was an immense sign-board:
"Territorial Bank. Carr----bre----54." The wind, the sun, the rain, have
wiped out the rest.

There has been there, certainly, a commencement of operations, for a
large square, gaping hole, cut out with a punch, is still open in the
ground, showing along its crumbling sides, like a leopard's spots, red
slabs with brown veins, and at the bottom, in the brambles, enormous
blocks of the marble, called in the trade "black-heart" (marble spotted
with red and brown), condemned blocks that no one could make anything of
for want of a road leading to the quarry or a harbour to make the coast
accessible for freight ships, and for want, above all, of subsidies
considerable enough to carry out one or the other of these two projects.
So the quarry remains abandoned, at a few cable-lengths from the
shore, as cumbrous and useless as Robinson Crusoe's canoe in the same
unfortunate circumstances. These details of the heart-rending story of
our sole territorial wealth were furnished by a miserable caretaker,
shaking with fever, whom I found in the low-ceilinged room of the yellow
house trying to roast a piece of kid over the acrid smoke of a pistachio
bush.

This man, who in himself is the whole staff of the Territorial Bank in
Corsica, is Paganetti's foster-father, an old lighthouse-keeper upon
whom the solitude does not weigh. Our director-general leaves him there
partly for charity and partly because letters dated from the Taverna
quarry, now and again, make a good show at the shareholders' meetings.
I had the greatest difficulty extracting a little information from this
poor creature, three parts savage, who looked upon me with cautious
mistrust, half hidden behind the long hair of his goat-skin _pelone_. He
told me, however, without intending it, what the Corsicans understand by
the word "railway," and why they put on mysterious airs when they speak
of it. As I was trying to find out if he knew anything about the scheme
for a railway in the country, this old man, instead of smiling knowingly
like his compatriots, said, quite naturally, in passable French, his
voice rusty and benumbed like an ancient, little-used lock:

"Oh, sir, no need of a railway here."

"But it would be most valuable, most useful; it would facilitate
communications."

"I don't say no; but with the police we have enough here."

"The policemen?"

"Certainly."

This _quid pro quo_ went on for some five minutes before I discovered
that here the secret police service is called "the railway." As there
are many Corsican policemen on the Continent they use this euphemism to
designate the ignoble calling they follow. You inquire of the relations,
"Where is your brother Ambrosini? What is your uncle Barbicaglia doing?"
They will answer with a little wink, "He has a place on the railway,"
and every one knows what that means. Among the people, the peasants,
who have never seen a railway and don't know what it is, it is quite
seriously believed that the great occult administration of the Imperial
police has no other name than that. Our principal agent in the country
shares this touching simplicity of belief. It shows you the real
state of the "Line from Ajaccio to Bastia, passing by Bonifacio, Porto
Vecchio, etc.," as it is written on the big, green-backed books of
the house of Paganetti. In fact all the goods of the Territorial Bank
consist of a few sign-boards and two ruins, the whole not worthy of
lying in the "old materials" yard in the Rue Saint-Ferdinand; every
night as I go to sleep I hear the old vanes grating and the old doors
banging on emptiness.

But in this case, where have gone, where are going now, the enormous
sums M. Jansoulet has spent during the last five months--not to count
what came from the outside, attracted by the magic of his name? I
thought, as you did, that all these soundings, borings, purchasings of
land that the books set forth in fine round-hand were exaggerated beyond
measure. But who could suspect such effrontery? This is why the director
was so opposed to the idea of bringing me on the electioneering trip.
I don't want to have an explanation now. My poor Nabob has quite enough
trouble in this election. Only, whenever we get back, I shall lay before
him all the details of my long inquiry, and, whether he wants it or not,
I will get him out of this den of thieves. They have finished below.
Old Piedigriggio is crossing the square, pulling up the slip-knot of
his long peasant's purse, which looks to me well filled. The bargain is
made, I conclude. Good-bye, hurriedly, my dear M. Joyeuse; remember me
to your daughters and ask them to keep a tiny little place for me round
the work-table.

PAUL DE GERY.

The electioneering whirlwind which had enveloped them in Corsica,
crossed the sea behind them like a blast of the sirocco and filled the
flat in the Place Vendome with a mad wind of folly. It was overrun from
morning to night by the habitual element, augmented now by a constant
arrival of little dark men, brown as the locust-bean, with regular
features and thick beards, some turbulent and talkative, like Paganetti,
others silent, self-contained and dogmatic: the two types of the race
upon which the same climate produces different effects. All these
famished islanders, in the depths of their savage country, promised
each other to meet at the Nabob's table. His house had become an inn, a
restaurant, a market-place. In the dining-room, where the table was
kept constantly laid, there was always to be found some newly arrived
Corsican, with the bewildered and greedy appearance of a country cousin,
having something to eat.

The boasting, clamorous race of election agents is the same everywhere;
but these were unusually fiery, had a zeal even more impassioned and
the vanity of turkey-cocks, all worked up to white heat. The most
insignificant recorder, inspector, mayor's secretary, village
schoolmaster, spoke as if he had the whole country behind him, and the
pockets of his threadbare black coat full of votes. And it is a fact,
in Corsican parishes (Jansoulet had seen it for himself) families are
so old, have sprung from so little, have so many ramifications, that any
poor fellow breaking stones on the road is able to claim relationship
with the greatest personages of the island, and is thereby able to exert
a serious influence. These complications are aggravated still more
by the national temperament, which is proud, secretive, scheming, and
vindictive; so it follows that one has to be careful how one walks amid
the network of threads stretching from one extremity of the people to
the other.

The worst was that all these people were jealous of each other,
detested each other, and quarrelled across the table about the election,
exchanging black looks and grasping the handles of their knives at the
least contradiction. They spoke very loud and all at once, some in the
hard, sonorous Genoese dialect, and others in the most comical French,
all choking with suppressed oaths. They threw in each other's teeth
names of unknown villages, dates of local scandals, which suddenly
revived between two fellow guests two centuries of family hatreds. The
Nabob was afraid of seeing his luncheons end tragically, and strove to
calm all this violence and conciliate them with his large good-natured
smile. But Paganetti reassured him. According to him, the vendetta,
though still existing in Corsica, no longer employs the stiletto or the
rifle except very rarely, and among the lowest classes. The anonymous
letter had taken their place. Indeed, every day unsigned letters were
received at the Place Vendome written in this style:

"M. Jansoulet, you are so generous that I cannot do less than point out
to you that the Sieur Bornalinco (Ange-Marie) is a traitor, bought by
your enemies. I could say very differently about his cousin Bornalinco
(Louis-Thomas), who is devoted to the good cause, etc."

Or again:

"M. Jansoulet, I fear your chances of election will come to nothing, and
are on a poor foundation for success if you continue to employ one named
Castirla (Josue), of the parish of Omessa. His relative, Luciani, is the
man you need."

Although he no longer read any of these missives, the poor candidate
suffered from the disturbing effect of all these doubts and of all these
unchained passions. Caught in the gearing of those small intrigues, full
of fears, mistrustful, curious, feverish, he felt in every aching nerve
the truth of the Corsican proverb, "The greatest ill you can wish your
enemy is an election in his house."

It may be imagined that the check-book and the three deep drawers in
the mahogany cabinet were not spared by this hoard of devouring locusts
which had fallen upon "Moussiou Jansoulet's" dwelling. Nothing could
be more comic than the haughty manner in which these good islanders
effected their loans, briskly, and with an air of defiance. At the same
time it was not they who were the worst--except for the boxes of cigars
which sank in their pockets as though they all meant to open a "Civette"
on their return to their own country. For just as the very hot
weather inflames and envenoms old sores, so the election had given
an astonishing new growth to the pillaging already established in the
house. Money was demanded for advertising expenses, for Moessard's
articles, which were sent to Corsica in bales of thousands of copies,
with portraits, biographies, pamphlets--all the printed clamour that
it was possible to raise round a name. And always the usual work of the
suction-pumps went on, those pumps now fixed to this great reservoir of
millions. Here, the Bethlehem Society, a powerful machine working with
regular, slow-recurring strokes, full of impetus; the Territorial Bank,
a marvellous exhauster, indefatigable, with triple and quadruple rows
of pumps, several thousand horse-power, the Schwalbach pump, the Bois
l'Hery pump, and how many others as well? Some enormous and noisy
with screaming pistons, some quite dumb and discreet with clack-valves
knowingly oiled, pumps with tiny valves, dear little pumps as fine
as the sting of insects, and like them, leaving a poison in the place
whence they have drawn life; all working together and bound to bring
about if not a complete drought, at least a serious lowering of level.

Already evil rumours, vague as yet, were going the round of the Bourse.
Was this a move of the enemy? For Jansoulet was waging a furious money
war against Hemerlingue, trying to thwart all his financial operations,
and was losing considerable sums at the game. He had against him his own
fury, his adversary's coolness, and the blunderings of Paganetti, who
was his man of straw. In any case his golden star was no longer in
the ascendant. Paul de Gery knew this through Joyeuse, who was now a
stock-broker's accountant and well up in the doings on the Bourse. What
troubled him most, however, was the Nabob's singular agitation, his need
of constant distraction which had succeeded his former splendid calm of
strength and security, the loss, too, of his southern sobriety. He kept
himself in a continual state of excitement, drinking great glasses
of _raki_ before his meals, laughing long, talking loud, like a rough
sailor ashore. You felt that here was a man overdoing himself to escape
from some heavy care. It showed, however, in the sudden contraction of
all the muscles of his face, as some unhappy thought crossed his
mind, or when he feverishly turned the pages of his little gilt-edged
note-book. The serious interview that Paul wanted so much Jansoulet
would not give him at any price. He spent his nights at the club, his
mornings in bed, and from the moment he awoke his room was full of
people who talked to him as he dressed, and to whom he replied, sponge
in hand. If, by a miracle, de Gery caught him alone for a second, he
fled, stopping his words with a "Not now, not now, I beg of you." In the
end the young man had recourse to drastic measures.

One morning, towards five o'clock, when Jansoulet came home from his
club, he found a letter on the table near his bed. At first he took it
to be one of the many anonymous denunciations he received daily. It
was indeed a denunciation, but it was signed and undisguised; and it
breathed in every word the loyalty and the earnest youthfulness of him
who wrote it. De Gery pointed out very clearly all the infamies and all
the double dealing which surrounded him. With no beating about the bush
he called the rogues by their names. There was not one of the usual
guests whom he did not suspect, not one who came with any other object
than to steal and to lie. From the top to the bottom of the house all
was pillage and waste. Bois l'Hery's horses were unsound, Schwalbach's
gallery was a swindle, Moessard's articles a recognised blackmail. De
Gery had made a long detailed memorandum of these scandalous abuses,
with proofs in support of it. But he specially recommended to
Jansoulet's attention the accounts of the Territorial Bank as the real
danger of the situation. Attracted by the Nabob's name, as chairman
of the company, hundreds of shareholders had fallen into the infamous
trap--poor seekers of gold, following the lucky miner. In the other
matters it was only money he lost; here his honour was at stake.
He would discover what a terrible responsibility lay upon him if he
examined the papers of the business, which was only deception and
cheatery from one end to the other.

"You will find the memorandum of which I speak," said Paul de Gery, at
the end of his letter, "in the top drawer of my desk along with sundry
receipts. I have not put them in your room, because I mistrust Noel
like the rest. When I go away to-night I will give you the key. For I
am going away, my dear benefactor and friend, I am going away full of
gratitude for the good you have done me, and heartbroken that your blind
confidence has prevented me from repaying you even in part. As things
are now, my conscience as an honest man will not let me stay any longer
useless at my post. I am looking on at a disaster, at the sack of a
palace, which I can do nothing to prevent. My heart burns at all I see.
I give handshakes which shame me. I am your friend, and I seem their
accomplice. And who knows that if I went on living in such an atmosphere
I might not become one?"

This letter, which he read slowly and carefully, even between the lines
and through the words, made so great an impression on the Nabob that,
instead of going to bed, he went at once to find his young secretary. De
Gery had a study at the end of the row of public rooms where he slept on
a sofa. It had been a provisional arrangement, but he had preferred not
to change it.

The house was still asleep. As he was crossing the lofty rooms, filled
with the vague light of a Parisian dawn (those blinds were never
lowered, as no evening receptions were held there), the Nabob stopped,
struck by the look of sad defilement his luxury wore. In the heavy
odour of tobacco and various liqueurs which hung over everything, the
furniture, the ceilings, the woodwork could be seen, already faded and
still new. Spots on the crumpled satins, ashes staining the beautiful
marbles, dirty footmarks on the carpets. It reminded one of a huge
first-class railway carriage incrusted with all the laziness, the
impatience, the boredom of a long journey, and all the wasteful,
spoiling disdain of the public for a luxury for which it has paid.
In the middle of this set scene, still warm from the atrocious comedy
played there every day, his own image, reflected in twenty cold and
staring looking-glasses, stood out before him, forbidding yet comical,
in absolute contrast to his elegant clothes, his eyes swollen, his face
bloated and inflamed.

What an obvious and disenchanting to-morrow to the mad life he was
leading!

He lost himself for a moment in dreary thought; then he gave his
shoulders a vigorous shake, a movement frequent with him--it was like a
peddler shifting his pack--as though to rid himself of too cruel cares,
and again took up the burden every man carried with him, which bows his
back, more or less, according to his courage or his strength, and went
into de Gery's room, who was already up, standing at his desk sorting
papers.

"First of all, my friend," said Jansoulet, softly shutting the door for
their interview, "answer me frankly. Is it really for the motives given
in your letter that you have resolved to leave me? Is there not, beneath
it all, one of those scandals that I know are being circulated in Paris
against me? I am sure you would be loyal enough to warn me and to give
me the opportunity of--of clearing myself to you."

Paul assured him that he had no other reasons for going, but that those
were surely sufficient, since it was a matter of conscience.

"Then, my boy, listen to me, and I am sure of keeping you. Your letter,
so eloquent of honesty and sincerity, has told me nothing that I have
not been convinced of for three months. Yes, my dear Paul, you were
right. Paris is more complicated than I thought. What I needed, when I
arrived, was an honest and disinterested cicerone to put me on my guard
against people and things. I met only swindlers. Every worthless rascal
in the town has left the mud of his boots on my carpets. I was looking
at them just now--my poor drawing-rooms. They need a fine sweeping out.
And I swear to you they shall have it, by God, and with no light hand!
But I must wait for that until I am a deputy. All these scoundrels are
of use to me for the election, and this election is far too necessary
now for me to risk losing the smallest chance. In a word, this is the
situation: Not only does the Bey mean to keep the money I lent him three
months ago, but he has replied to my summons by a counter action for
eighty millions, the sum out of which he says I cheated his brother. It
is a frightful theft, an audacious libel. My fortune is mine, my own. I
made it by my trade as a merchant. I had Ahmed's favour; he gave me the
opportunity of becoming rich. It is possible I may have put on the screw
a little tightly sometimes. But one must not judge these things from
a European standpoint. Over there, the enormous profits the Levantines
make is an accepted fact--a known thing. It is the ransom those savages
pay for the western comfort we bring them. That wretch Hemerlingue, who
is suggesting all this persecution against me, has done just as much.
But what is the use of talking? I am in the lion's jaws. While waiting
for me to go to defend myself at his tribunals--and how I know it,
justice of the Orient!--the Bey has begun by putting an embargo on all
my goods, ships, and palaces, and what they contain. The affair was
conducted quite regularly by a decree of the Supreme Court. Young
Hemerlingue had a hand in that, you can see. If I am made a deputy, it
is only a joke. The court takes back its decree and they give me back
my treasure with every sort of excuse. If I am not elected I lose
everything, sixty, eighty millions, even the possibility of making
another fortune. It is ruin, disgrace, dishonour. Are you going to
abandon me in such a crisis? Think--I have only you in the whole world.
My wife--you have seen her, you know what help, what support she is
to her husband. My children--I might as well not have any. I never see
them; they would scarcely know me in the street. My horrible wealth
has killed all affection around me and has enveloped me with shameless
self-seeking. I have only my mother to love me, and she is far away, and
you who came to me from my mother. No, you will not leave me alone amid
all the scandals that are creeping around me. It is awful--if you only
knew! At the club, at the play, wherever I go I seem to see the little
viper's head of the Baroness Hemerlingue, I hear the echo of her hiss,
I feel the venom of her bite. Everywhere mocking looks, conversation
stopped when I appear, lying smiles, or kindness mixed with a little
pity. And then the deserters, and the people who keep out of the way as
at the approach of a misfortune. Look at Felicia Ruys: just as she had
finished my bust she pretends that some accident, I know not what, has
happened to it, in order to avoid having to send it to the _Salon_. I
said nothing, I affected to believe her. But I understood that there
again was some new evil report. And it is such a disappointment to me.
In a crisis as grave as this everything has its importance. My bust in
the exhibition, signed by that famous name, would have helped me greatly
in Paris. But no, everything falls away, every one fails me. You see now
that I cannot do without you. You must not desert me."




A DAY OF SPLEEN

Five o'clock in the afternoon. Rain since morning and a gray sky low
enough to be reached with an umbrella; the close weather which sticks.
Mess, mud, nothing but mud, in heavy puddles, in shining trails in the
gutters, vainly chased by the street-scrapers and the scavengers, heaved
into enormous carts which carry it slowly towards Montreuil--promenading
it in triumph through the streets, always moving, and always springing
up again, growing through the pavements, splashing the panels of the
carriages, the breasts of the horses, the clothes of the passers-by,
spattering the windows, the door-steps, the shop-fronts, till one feared
that the whole of Paris would sink and disappear under this sorrowful,
miry soil where everything dissolves and is lost in mud. And it moves
one to pity to see the invasion of this dirt on the whiteness of the new
houses, on the parapets of the quays, and on the colonnades of the stone
balconies. There is some one, however, who rejoices at the sight, a
poor, sick, weary being, lying all her length on a silk-embroidered
divan, her chin on her clinched fists. She is looking out gladly through
the dripping windows and delighting in all the ugliness.

"Look, my fairy! this is indeed the weather I wanted to-day. See them
draggling along! Aren't they hideous? Aren't they dirty? What mire! It
is everywhere--in the streets, on the quays, right down to the Seine,
right up to the heavens. I tell you, mud is good when one is sad. I
would like to play in it, to make sculpture with it--a statue a hundred
feet high, that should be called 'My weariness.'"

"But why are you so miserable, dearest?" said the old dancer gently,
amiable and pink, and sitting straight in her seat for fear of
disarranging her hair, which was even more carefully dressed than usual.
"Haven't you everything to make you happy?" And for the hundredth time
she enumerated in her tranquil voice the reasons for her happiness: her
glory, her genius, her beauty, all the men at her feet, the handsomest,
the greatest--oh! yes, the very greatest, as this very day--But a
terrible howl, like the heart-rending cry of the jackal exasperated by
the monotony of his desert, suddenly made all the studio windows shake,
and frightened the old and startled little chrysalis back into her
cocoon.

A week ago, Felicia's group was finished and sent to the exhibition,
leaving her in a state of nervous prostration, moral sickness, and
distressful exasperation. It needs all the tireless patience of the
fairy, all the magic of her memories constantly evoked, to make life
supportable beside this restlessness, this wicked anger, which growls
beneath the girl's long silences and suddenly bursts out in a bitter
word or in an "Ugh!" of disgust at everything. All the critics are
asses. The public? An immense goitre with three rows of chains. And yet,
the other Sunday, when the Duc de Mora came with the superintendent of
the art section to see her exhibits in the studio, she was so happy, so
proud of the praise they gave her, so fully delighted with her own work,
which she admired from the outside, as though the work of some one else,
now that her tools no longer created between her and her work that bond
which makes impartial judgment so hard for the artist.

But it is like this every year. The studio stripped of her recent work,
her glorious name once again thrown to the unexpected caprice of the
public, Felicia's thoughts, now without a visible object, stray in the
emptiness of her heart and in the hollowness of her life--that of the
woman who leaves the quiet groove--until she be engrossed in some new
work. She shuts herself up and will see no one, as though she mistrusted
herself. Jenkins is the only person who can help her during these
attacks. He seems even to court them, as though he expected something
therefrom. She is not pleasant with him, all the same, goodness knows.
Yesterday, even, he stayed for hours beside this wearied beauty without
her speaking to him once. If that be the welcome she is keeping for the
great personage who is doing them the honour of dining with them--Here
the good Crenmitz, who is quietly turning over all these thoughts as she
gazes at the bows on the pointed toes of her slippers, remembers that
she has promised to make a dish of Viennese cakes for the dinner of the
personage in question, and goes out of the studio, silently, on the tips
of her little feet.

The rain falls, the mud deepens; the beautiful sphinx lies still, her
eyes lost in the dull horizon. What is she thinking of? What does she
see coming there, over those filthy roads, in the falling night, that
her lip should take that curve of disgust and her brow that frown? Is
she waiting for her fate? A sad fate, that sets forth in such weather,
fearless of the darkness and the dirt.

Some one comes into the studio with a heavier tread than the mouse-like
step of Constance--the little servant, doubtless; and, without looking
round, Felicia says roughly, "Go away! I don't want any one in."

"I should have liked to speak to you very much, all the same," says a
friendly voice.

She starts, sits up. Mollified and almost smiling at this unexpected
visitor, she says:

"What--you, young Minerva! How did you get in?"

"Very easily. All the doors are open."

"I am not surprised. Constance is crazy, since this morning, over her
dinner."

"Yes, I saw. The anteroom is full of flowers. Who is coming?"

"Oh! a stupid dinner--an official dinner. I don't know how I could--Sit
down here, near me. I am so glad to see you."

Paul sat down, a little disturbed. She had never seemed to him so
beautiful. In the dusk of the studio, amid the shadowy brilliance of the
works of art, bronzes, and tapestries, her pallor was like a soft light,
her eyes shone like precious stones, and her long, close-fitting gown
revealed the unrestraint of her goddess-like body. Then, she spoke so
affectionately, she seemed so happy because he had come. Why had he
stayed away so long? It was almost a month since they had seen him. Were
they no longer friends? He excused himself as best he could--business,
a journey. Besides, if he hadn't been there, he had often spoken of
her--oh, very often, almost every day.

"Really? And with whom?"

"With----"

He was going to say "With Aline Joyeuse," but a feeling of restraint
stopped him, an undefinable sentiment, a sense of shame at pronouncing
her name in the studio which had heard so many others. There are things
that do not go together, one scarcely knows why. Paul preferred to reply
with a falsehood, which brought him at once to the object of his visit.

"With an excellent fellow to whom you have given very unnecessary pain.
Come, why have you not finished the poor Nabob's bust? It was a great
joy to him, such a very proud thing for him, to have that bust in the
exhibition. He counted upon it."

At the Nabob's name she was slightly troubled.

"It is true," she said, "I broke my word. But what do you expect? I am
made of caprice. See, the cover is over it; all wet, so that the clay
does not harden."

"And the accident? You know, we didn't believe in it."

"Then you were wrong. I never lie. It had a fall, a most awful upset;
only the clay was fresh, and I easily repaired it. Look!"

With a sweeping gesture she lifted the cover. The Nabob suddenly
appeared before them, his jolly face beaming with the pleasure of being
portrayed; so like, so tremendously himself, that Paul gave a cry of
admiration.

"Isn't it good?" she said artlessly. "Still a few touches here and
there--" She had taken the chisel and the little sponge and pushed the
stand into what remained of the daylight. "It could be done in a few
hours. But it couldn't go to the exhibition. To-day is the 22nd; all the
exhibits have been in a long time."

"Bah! With influence----"

She frowned, and her bad expression came back, her mouth turning down.

"That's true. The _protege_ of the Duc de Mora. Oh! you have no need to
apologize. I know what people say, and I don't care _that_--" and she
threw a little ball of clay at the wall, where it stuck, flat. "Perhaps
men, by dint of supposing the thing which is not--But let us leave these
infamies alone," she said, holding up her aristocratic head. "I really
want to please you, Minerva. Your friend shall go to the _Salon_ this
year."

Just then a smell of caramel and warm pastry filled the studio, where
the shadows were falling like a fine gray dust, and the fairy appeared,
a dish of sweetmeats in her hand. She looked more fairy-like than ever,
bedecked and rejuvenated; dressed in a white gown which showed her
beautiful arms through sleeves of old lace; they were beautiful still,
for the arm is the beauty that fades last.

"Look at my _kuchen_, dearie; they are such a success this time. Oh! I
beg your pardon. I did not see you had friends. And it is M. Paul! How
are you M. Paul? Taste one of my cakes."

And the charming old lady, whose dress seemed to lend her an
extraordinary vivacity, came towards him, balancing the plate on the
tips of her tiny fingers.

"Don't bother him. You can give him some at dinner," said Felicia
quietly.

"At dinner?"

The dancer was so astonished that she almost upset her pretty pastries,
which looked as light and airy and delicious as herself.

"Yes, he is staying to dine with us. Oh! I beg it of you," she added,
with a particular insistence as she saw he was going to refuse, "I beg
you to stay. Don't say no. You will be rendering me a real service by
staying to-night. Come--I didn't hesitate a few minutes ago."

She had taken his hand; and in truth might have been struck by a strange
disproportion between her request and the supplicating, anxious tone in
which it was made. Paul still attempted to excuse himself. He was not
dressed. How could she propose it!--a dinner at which she would have
other guests.

"My dinner? But I will countermand it! That is the kind of person I am.
We shall be alone, just the three of us, with Constance."

"But, Felicia, my child, you can't really think of such a thing. Ah,
well! And the--the other who will be coming directly.

"I am going to write to him to stay at home, _parbleu_!"

"You unlucky being, it is too late."

"Not at all. It is striking six o'clock. The dinner was for half past
seven. You must have this sent to him quickly."

She was writing hastily at a corner of the table.

"What a strange girl, _mon Dieu! mon Dieu!_" murmured the dancer in
bewilderment, while Felicia, delighted, transfigured, was joyously
sealing her letter.

"There! my excuse is made. Headaches have not been invented for Kadour."

Then, the letter having been despatched:

"Oh, how pleased I am! What a jolly evening we shall have! Do kiss me,
Constance! It will not prevent us from doing honour to your _kuchen_,
and we shall have the pleasure of seeing you in a pretty toilette which
makes you look younger than I do."

This was more than was required to cause the dancer to forgive this new
caprice of her dear demon, and the crime of _lese-majeste_ in which she
had just been involved against her will. To treat so great a personage
so cavalierly! There was no one like her in the world--there was no one
like her. As for Paul de Gery, he no longer tried to resist, under the
spell once more of that attraction from which he had been able to fancy
himself released by absence, but which, from the moment he crossed the
threshold of the studio, had put chains on his will, delivered him over,
bound and vanquished, to the sentiment which he was quite resolved to
combat.

Evidently the dinner--a repast for a veritable _gourmet_, superintended
by the Austrian lady in its least details--had been prepared for a guest
of great mark. From the lofty Kabyle chandelier with its seven branches
of carved wood, which cast its light over the table-cloth covered with
embroidery, to the long-necked decanters holding the wines within their
strange and exquisite form, the sumptuous magnificence of the service,
the delicacy of the meats, to which edge was given by a certain
unusualness in their selection, revealed the importance of the expected
visitor, the anxiety which there had been to please him. The table was
certainly that of an artist. Little silver, but superb china, much unity
of effect, without the least attempt at matching. The old Rouen, the
pink Sevres, the Dutch glass mounted in old filigree pewter met on this
table as on a sideboard devoted to the display of rare curios collected
by a connoisseur exclusively for the satisfaction of his taste. A little
disorder naturally, in this household equipped at hazard, as choice
things could be picked up. The wonderful cruet-stand had lost its
stoppers. The chipped salt-cellar allowed its contents to escape on the
table-cloth, and at every moment you would hear, "Why! what is become of
the mustard-pot?" "What has happened to this fork?" This embarrassed de
Gery a little on account of the young mistress of the house, who for her
part took no notice of it.

But something made Paul feel still more ill at ease--his anxiety,
namely, to know who the privileged guest might be whom he was replacing
at this table, who could be treated at once with so much magnificence
and so complete an informality. In spite of everything, he felt
him present, an offence to his personal dignity, that visitor whose
invitation had been cancelled. It was in vain that he tried to forget
him; everything brought him back to his mind, even the fine dress of the
good fairy sitting opposite him, who still maintained some of the grand
airs with which she had equipped herself in advance for the solemn
occasion. This thought troubled him, spoiled for him the pleasure of
being there.

On the other hand, by contrast, as it happens in all friendships
between two people who meet very rarely, never had he seen Felicia so
affectionate, in such happy temper. It was an overflowing gaiety that
was almost childish, one of those warm expansions of feeling that are
experienced when a danger has been passed, the reaction of a bright
roaring fire after the emotion of a shipwreck. She laughed heartily,
teased Paul about his accent and what she called his _bourgeois_ ideas.
"For you are a terrible _bourgeois_, you know. But it is that that I
like in you. It is an effect of contraries, doubtless; it is because I
myself was born under a bridge, in a gust of wind, that I have always
liked sedate, reasonable natures."

"Oh, my child, what are you going to have M. Paul think, that you were
born under a bridge?" said the good Crenmitz, who could not accustom
herself to the exaggeration of certain metaphors, and always took
everything literally.

"Let him think what he likes, my fairy. We are not trying to catch him
for a husband. I am sure he would not want one of those monsters who are
known as female artists. He would think he was marrying the devil. You
are quite right, Minerva. Art is a despot. One has to give one's self
entirely up to him. To toil in his service, one devotes all the ideal,
all the energy, honesty, conscience, that one possesses, so that you
have none of these things left for real life, and the completed labour
throws you down, strengthless and without a compass, like a dismantled
hulk at the mercy of every wave. A sorry acquisition, such a wife!"

"And yet," the young man hazarded timidly, "it seems to me that art,
however exigent it be, cannot for all that entirely absorb a woman.
What would she do with her affections, of that need to love, to devote
herself, which in her, much more than in us, is the spring of all her
actions?"

She mused a moment before replying.

"Perhaps you are right, wise Minerva. It is true that there are days
when my life rings terribly hollow. I am conscious of abysses, profound
chasms in it. Everything that I throw in to fill it up disappears. My
finest enthusiasms of the artist are engulfed there and die each time
in a sigh. And then I think of marriage. A husband; children--a swarm of
children, who would roll about the studio; a nest to look after for them
all; the satisfaction of that physical activity which is lacking in
our existences of artists; regular occupations; high spirits, songs,
innocent gaieties, which would oblige you to play instead of thinking in
the air, in the dark--to laugh at a wound to one's self-love, to be
only a contented mother on the day when the public should see you as a
worn-out, exhausted artist."

And before this tender vision the girl's beauty took on an expression
which Paul had never seen in it before, an expression which gripped his
whole being, and gave him a mad longing to carry off in his arms that
beautiful wild bird, dreaming of the home-cote, to protect and shelter
it in the sure love of an honest man.

She, without looking at him, continued:

"I am not so erratic as I appear; don't think it. Ask my good godmother
if, when she sent me to boarding-school, I did not observe the rules.
But what a muddle in my life afterward. If you knew what sort of an
early youth I had; how precocious an experience tarnished my mind, in
the head of the little girl I was, what a confusion of the permitted and
the forbidden, of reason and folly! Art alone, extolled and discussed,
stood out boldly from among it all, and I took refuge in it. That is
perhaps why I shall never be anything but an artist, a woman apart
from others, a poor Amazon with heart imprisoned in her iron cuirass,
launched into the conflict like a man, and as a man condemned to live
and die."

Why did he not say to her, at this:

"Beauteous lady-warrior, lay down your arms, resume the flowing robe and
the graces of the woman's sphere. I love you! Marry me, I implore you,
and win happiness both for yourself and for me."

Ah, there it is! He was afraid lest the other--you know him, the man who
was to have come to dinner that evening and who remained between them
despite his absence--should hear him speak thus and be in a position to
jest at or to pity him for that fine outburst.

"In any case, I firmly swear one thing," she resumed, "and it is that if
ever I have a daughter, I will try to make a true woman of her, and not
a poor lonely creature like myself. Oh! you know, my fairy, it is not
for you that I say that. You have always been kind to your demon, full
of attentions and tenderness. But just see how pretty she is, how young
she looks this evening."

Animated by the meal, the bright lights, one of those white dresses the
reflection from which effaces wrinkles, the Crenmitz, leaning back
in her chair, held up on a level with her half-closed eyes a glass of
Chateau-Yquem, come from the cellar of the neighbouring Moulin-Rouge;
and her dainty little rosy face, her flowing garments, like those you
might see in some pastel, reflected in the golden wine, which lent to
them its own piquant fervour, recalled to mind the quondam heroine of
gay little suppers after the theatre, the Crenmitz of the brave old
days--not an audacious creature after the manner of the stars of our
modern opera, but unconscious, and wrapped in her luxury like a fine
pearl in the delicate whiteness of its shell. Felicia, who decidedly
that evening was anxious to please everybody, turned her mind gently
to the chapter of recollections; got her to recount once more her great
triumphs in _Gisella_, in the _Peri_, and the ovations of the public;
the visit of the princes to her dressing-room; the present of Queen
Amelia, accompanied by such a charming little speech. The recalling of
these glories intoxicated the poor fairy; her eyes shone; they heard
her little feet moving impatiently under the table as though seized by
a dancing frenzy. And in effect, dinner over, when they had returned to
the studio, Constance began to walk backward and forward, now and
then half executing a step, a pirouette, while continuing to talk,
interrupting herself to hum some ballad air of which she would keep
the rhythm with a movement of the head; then suddenly she bent herself
double, and with a bound was at the other end of the studio.

"Now she is off!" said Felicia in a low voice to de Gery. "Watch! It is
worth your while; you are going to see the Crenmitz dance."

It was charming and fairy-like. Against the background of the immense
room lost in shadow and receiving almost no light save through the
arched glass roof over which the moon was climbing in a pale sky of
night blue, a veritable sky of the opera, the silhouette of the famous
dancer stood out all white, like a droll little shadow, light and
imponderable, which seemed rather to be flying in the air than springing
over the floor; then, erect upon the tips of her toes, supported in the
air only by her extended arms, her face lifted in an elusive pose, which
left nothing visible but the smile, she advanced quickly towards the
light or fled away with little rushes so rapid that you were constantly
expecting to hear a slight shivering of glass and to see her thus mount
backward the slope of the great moonbeam that lay aslant the studio.
That which added a charm, a singular poetry, to this fantastic ballet
was the absence of music, the sound alone of the rhythmical beat the
force of which was accentuated by the semi-darkness, of that quick and
light tapping not heavier on the parquet floor than the fall, petal by
petal, of a dahlia going out of bloom.

Thus it went on for some minutes, at the end of which they knew, by
hearing her shorter breathing, that she was becoming fatigued.

"Enough! enough! Sit down now," said Felicia. Thereupon the little white
shadow halted beside an easy chair, and there remained posed, ready
to start off again, smiling and breathless, until sleep overcame her,
rocking and balancing her gently without disturbing her pretty pose,
as of a dragon-fly on the branch of a willow dipping in the water and
swayed by the current.

While they watched her, dozing on her easy chair:

"Poor little fairy!" said Felicia, "hers is what I have had best and
most serious in my life in the way of friendship, protection, and
guardianship. Can you wonder now at the zig-zags, the erratic nature of
my mind? Fortunate at that, to have gone no further."

And suddenly, with a joyous effusion of feeling:

"Ah, Minerva, Minerva, I am very glad that you came this evening! But
you must not leave me to myself for so long again, mind. I need to have
near me an honest mind like yours, to see a true face among the masks
that surround me. A fearful _bourgeois_, all the same," she added,
laughing, "and a provincial into the bargain. But no matter! It is you,
for all that, whom it gives me the most pleasure to see. And I believe
that my liking for you is due especially to one thing: you remind me of
some one who was the great affection of my youth, a sedate and sensible
little being she also, chained to the matter-of-fact side of existence,
but tempering it with that ideal element which we artists set aside
exclusively for the profit of our work. Certain things which you say
seem to me as though they had come from her. You have the same mouth,
like an antique model's. Is it that that gives this resemblance to your
words? I have no idea, but most certainly you are like each other. You
shall see."

On the table laden with sketches and albums, at which she was sitting
facing him, she drew, as she talked, with brow inclined and her rather
wild curly hair shading her graceful little head. She was no longer the
beautiful couchant monster, with the anxious and gloomy countenance,
condemning her own destiny, but a woman, a true woman, in love, and
eager to beguile. This time Paul forgot all his mistrusts in presence
of so much sincerity and such passing grace. He was about to speak, to
persuade. The minute was decisive. But the door opened and the little
page appeared. M. le Duc had sent to inquire whether mademoiselle was
still suffering from her headache of earlier in the evening.

"Still just as much," she said with irritation.

When the servant had gone out, a moment of silence fell between them,
a glacial coldness. Paul had risen. She continued her sketch, with her
head still bowed.

He took a few paces in the studio; then, having come back to the table,
he asked quietly, astonished to feel himself so calm:

"It was the Duc de Mora who was to have dined here?"

"Yes. I was bored--a day of spleen. Days of that kind are bad for me."

"Was the duchess to have come?"

"The duchess? No. I don't know her."

"Well, in your place I would never receive in my house, at my table, a
married man whose wife I did not meet. You complain of being deserted;
why desert yourself? When one is without reproach, one should avoid the
very suspicion of it. Do I vex you?"

"No, no, scold me, Minerva. I have no objection to your ethics. They
are honest and frank, yours; they do not blink uncertain, like those of
Jenkins. I told you, I need some one to guide me."

And tossing over to him the sketch which she had just finished:

"See, that is the friend of whom I was speaking to you. A profound and
sure affection, which I was foolish enough to allow to be lost to me,
like the bungler I am. She it was to whom I appealed in moments of
difficulty, when a decision required to be taken, some sacrifice made. I
used to say to myself, 'What will she think of this?' just as we artists
may stop in the midst of a piece of work to refer it mentally to some
great man, one of our masters. I must have you take her place for me.
Will you?"

Paul did not answer. He was looking at the portrait of Aline. It was
she, herself to the letter; her pure profile, her mocking and kindly
mouth, and the long curl like a caress on the delicate neck. Felicia had
ceased to exist for him.

Poor Felicia, endowed with superior talents, she was indeed like those
magicians who knot and unknot the destinies of men, without possessing
any power over their own happiness.

"Will you give me this sketch?" he said in a low, quivering voice.

"Most willingly. She is nice--isn't she? Ah! her indeed, if you should
meet, love her, marry her. She is worth more than all the rest of
womankind together. And yet, failing her--failing her----"

And the beautiful sphinx, tamed, raised to him, moist and laughing, her
great eyes, in which an enigma had ceased to be indecipherable.




THE EXHIBITION


"SUPERB!"

"A tremendous success! Barye has never done anything so good before."

"And the bust of the Nabob! What a marvel. How happy Constance Crenmitz
is! Look at her trotting about!"

"What! That little old lady in the ermine cape is the Crenmitz? I
thought she had been dead twenty years ago."

Oh, no! Very much alive, on the contrary. Delighted, made young again
by the triumph of her goddaughter, who had made what is decidedly the
success of the exhibition, she passes about among the crowd of artists
and fashionable people, who, wedged together and stifling themselves in
order to get a look at the two points where the works sent by Felicia
are exhibited, form as it were two solid masses of black backs and
jumbled dresses. Constance, ordinarily so timid, edges her way into the
front rank, listens to the discussions, catches, as they fly, disjointed
phrases, formulas which she takes care to remember, approves with a
nod, smiles, raises her shoulders when she hears a stupid remark made,
inclined to murder the first person who should not admire.

Whether it be the good Crenmitz or another, you will always see it at
every opening of the _Salon_, that furtive silhouette, prowling near
wherever a conversation is going on, with an anxious manner and alert
ear; sometimes a simple old fellow, some father, whose glance thanks you
for any kind word said in passing, or assumes a grieved expression by
reason of some epigram, flung at the work of art, that may wound some
heart behind you. A figure not to be forgotten, certainly, if ever
it should occur to any painter with a passion for modernity to fix on
canvas that very typical manifestation of Parisian life, the opening of
an exhibition in that vast conservatory of sculpture, with its paths
of yellow sand, and its immense glass roof beneath which, half-way up,
stand out the galleries of the first floor, lined by heads bent over to
look down, and decorated with improvised flowing draperies.

In a rather cold light, made pallid by those green curtains that
hang all around, in which one would fancy that the light-rays become
rarefied, in order to give to the vision of the people walking about
the room a certain contemplative justice, the slow crowd goes and comes,
pauses, disperses itself over the seats in serried groups, and yet
mixing up different sections of society more thoroughly than any other
assembly, just as the weather, uncertain and changeable at this time of
the year, produces a confusion in the world of clothes, causes to brush
each other as they pass, the black laces, the imperious train of the
great lady come to see how her portrait looks, and the Siberian furs of
the actress just back from Russia and anxious that everybody should know
it.

Here, no boxes, no stalls, no reserved seats, and it is this that gives
to this _premiere_ in full daylight so great a charm of curiosity.
Genuine ladies of fashion are able to form an opinion of those painted
beauties who receive so much commendation in an artificial light;
the little hat, following a new mode of the Marquise de Bois l'Hery,
confronts the more than modest toilette of some artist's wife or
daughter; while the model who posed for that beautiful Andromeda at the
entrance, goes by victoriously, clad in too short a skirt, in wretched
garments that hide her beauty beneath all the false lines of fashion.
People observe, admire, criticise each other, exchange glances
contemptuous, disdainful, or curious, interrupted suddenly at the
passage of a celebrity, of that illustrious critic whom we seem still to
see, tranquil and majestic, his powerful head framed in its long hair,
making the round of the exhibits in sculpture followed by a dozen young
disciples eager to hear the verdict of his kindly authority. If the
sound of voices is lost beneath that immense dome, sonorous only under
the two vaults of the entrance and the exit, faces take on there an
astonishing intensity, a relief of movement and animation concentrated
especially in the huge, dark bay where refreshments are served, crowded
to overflowing and full of gesticulation, the brightly coloured hats
of the women and the white aprons of the waiters gleaming against the
background of dark clothes, and in the great space in the middle where
the oval swarming with visitors makes a singular contrast with
the immobility of the exhibited statues, producing the insensible
palpitation with which their marble whiteness and their movements as of
apotheosis are surrounded.

There are wings poised in giant flight, a sphere supported by four
allegorical figures whose attitude of turning suggests some vague
waltz-measure--a total effect of equilibrium well conveying the illusion
of the sweeping onward of the earth; and there are arms raised to give
the signal, bodies heroically risen, containing an allegory, a symbol
which stamps them with death and immortality, secures to them a place in
history, in legend, in that ideal world of museums which is visited by
the curiosity or the admiration of the nations.

Although Felicia's group in bronze had not the proportions of these
large pieces, its exceptional merit had caused it to be selected to
adorn one of the open spaces in the middle, from which at this moment
the public was holding itself at a respectful distance, watching, over
the hedge of custodians and policemen, the Bey of Tunis and his suite,
an array of long bernouses falling in sculptural folds, which had the
effect of placing living statues opposite the other ones.

The Bey, who had been in Paris since a few days before, and was the
lion of all the _premieres_, had desired to see the opening of the
exhibition. He was "an enlightened prince, a friend of art," who
possessed at the Bardo a gallery of remarkable Turkish paintings and
chromo-lithographic reproductions of all the battles of the First
Empire. The moment he entered, the sight of the big Arab greyhound
had struck him as he passed. It was the _sleughi_ all over, the true
_sleughi_, delicate and nervous, of his own country, the companion of
all his hunting expeditions. He laughed in his black beard, felt the
loins of the animal, stroked its muscles, seemed to want to urge it on
still faster, while with nostrils open, teeth showing, all its
limbs stretched out and unwearying in their vigorous elasticity, the
aristocratic beast, the beast of prey, ardent in love and the chase,
intoxicated with their double intoxication, its eyes fixed, was already
enjoying a foretaste of its capture with a little end of its tongue
which hung and seemed to sharpen the teeth with a ferocious laugh. When
you only looked at the hound you said to yourself, "He has got him!" But
the sight of the fox reassured you immediately. Beneath the velvet of
his lustrous coat, cat-like almost lying along the ground, covering it
rapidly without effort, you felt him to be a veritable fairy; and his
delicate head with its pointed ears, which as he ran he turned towards
the hound, had an expression of ironical security which clearly marked
the gift received from the gods.

While an Inspector of Fine Arts, who had rushed up in all haste, with
his official dress in disorder, and a head bald right down to his back,
explained to Mohammed the apologue of "The Dog and the Fox," related in
the descriptive catalogue with these words inscribed beneath, "Now it
happened that they met," and the indication, "The property of the Duc
de Mora," the fat Hemerlingue, perspiring and puffing by his Highness's
side, had great difficulty to convince him that this masterly piece
of sculpture was the work of the beautiful young lady whom they had
encountered the previous evening riding in the Bois. How could a woman,
with her feeble hands, thus mould the hard bronze, and give to it the
very appearance of the living body? Of all the marvels of Paris, this
was the one which caused the Bey the most astonishment. He inquired
consequently from the functionary if there was nothing else to see by
the same artist.

"Yes, indeed, monseigneur, another masterpiece. If your Highness will
deign to step this way I will conduct you to it."

The Bey commenced to move on again with his suite. They were all
admirable types, with chiselled features and pure lines, warm pallors of
complexion of which even the reflections were absorbed by the whiteness
of their _haiks_. Magnificently draped, they contrasted with the busts
ranged on either side of the aisle they were following, which, perched
on their high columns, looking slender in the open air, exiled from
their own home, from the surroundings in which doubtless they would
have recalled severe labours, a tender affection, a busy and courageous
existence, had the sad aspect of people gone astray in their path, and
very regretful to find themselves in their present situation. Excepting
two or three female heads, with opulent shoulders framed in petrified
lace, and hair rendered in marble with that softness of touch which
gives it the lightness of a powdered wig, excepting, too, a few profiles
of children with their simple lines, in which the polish of the stone
seems to resemble the moistness of the living flesh, all the rest
were only wrinkles, crow's-feet, shrivelled features and grimaces, our
excesses in work and in movement, our nervousness and our feverishness,
opposing themselves to that art of repose and of beautiful serenity.

The ugliness of the Nabob had at least energy in its favour, the vulgar
side of him as an adventurer, and that expression of benevolence, so
well rendered by the artist, who had taken care to underlay her plaster
with a layer of ochre, which gave it almost the weather-beaten and
sunburned tone of the model. The Arabs, when they saw it, uttered a
stifled exclamation, "Bou-Said!" (the father of good fortune). This was
the surname of the Nabob in Tunis, the label, as it were, of his luck.
The Bey, for his part, thinking that some one had wished to play a trick
on him in thus leading him to inspect the bust of the hated trader,
regarded his guide with mistrust.

"Jansoulet?" said he in his guttural voice.

"Yes, Highness: Bernard Jansoulet, the new deputy for Corsica."

This time the Bey turned to Hemerlingue, with a frown on his brow.

"Deputy?"

"Yes, monseigneur, since this morning; but nothing is yet settled."

And the banker, raising his voice, added with a stutter:

"No French Chamber will ever admit that adventurer."

No matter. The stroke had fallen on the blind faith of the Bey in his
baron financier. The latter had so confidently affirmed to him that the
other would never be elected and that their action with regard to him
need not be fettered or in any way hampered by the least fear. And
now, instead of a man ruined and overthrown, there rose before him
a representative of the nation, a deputy whose portrait in stone the
Parisians were coming to admire; for in the eyes of the Oriental, an
idea of distinction being mingled in spite of everything with this
public exhibition, that bust had the prestige of a statue dominating
a square. Still more yellow than usual, Hemerlingue internally accused
himself of clumsiness and imprudence. But how could he ever have dreamed
of such a thing? He had been assured that the bust was not finished. And
in fact it had been there only since morning, and seemed quite at
home, quivering with satisfied pride, defying its enemies with the
good-tempered smile of its curling lip. A veritable silent revenge for
the disaster of Saint-Romans.

For some minutes the Bey, cold and impassible as the sculptured image,
gazed at it without saying anything, his forehead divided by a straight
crease wherein his courtiers alone could read his anger; then, after
two quick words in Arabic, to order the carriages and to reassemble his
scattered suite, he directed his steps gravely towards the door of exit,
without consenting to give even a glance to anything else. Who shall
say what passes in these august brains surfeited with power? Even our
sovereigns of the West have incomprehensible fantasies; but they are
nothing compared with Oriental caprices. Monsieur the Inspector of Fine
Arts, who had made sure of taking his Highness all round the
exhibition and of thus winning the pretty red-and-green ribbon of the
Nicham-Iftikahr, never knew the secret of this sudden flight.

At the moment when the white _haiks_ were disappearing under the porch,
just in time to see the last wave of their folds, the Nabob made his
entry by the middle door. In the morning he had received the news,
"Elected by an overwhelming majority"; and after a sumptuous luncheon,
at which the new deputy for Corsica had been extensively toasted, he
came, with some of his guests, to show himself, to see himself also, to
enjoy all his new glory.

The first person whom he saw as he arrived was Felicia Ruys, standing,
leaning on the pedestal of a statue, surrounded by compliments and
tributes of admiration, to which he made haste to add his own. She was
simply dressed, clad in a black costume embroidered and trimmed with
jet, tempering the severity of her attire with a glittering of reflected
lights, and with a delightful little hat all made of downy plumes, the
play of colour in which her hair, curled delicately on her forehead and
drawn back to the neck in great waves, seemed to continue and to soften.

A crowd of artists and fashionable people were assiduous in their
attentions to so great a genius allied to so much beauty; and Jenkins,
bareheaded, and puffing with warm effusiveness, was going from one to
the other, stimulating their enthusiasm but widening the circle around
this young fame of which he constituted himself at once the guardian and
the trumpeter. His wife during this time was talking to the young girl.
Poor Mme. Jenkins! She had heard that savage voice, which she alone
knew, say to her, "You must go and greet Felicia." And she had gone to
do so, controlling her emotion; for she knew now what it was that hid
itself at the bottom of that paternal affection, although she avoided
all discussion of it with the doctor, as if she had been fearful of the
issue.

After Mme. Jenkins, it is the turn of the Nabob to rush up, and taking
the artist's two long, delicately-gloved hands between his fat paws, he
expresses his gratitude with a cordiality which brings the tears to his
own eyes.

"It is a great honour that you have done me, mademoiselle, to associate
my name with yours, my humble person with your triumph, and to prove
to all this vermin gnawing at my heels that you do not believe the
calumnies which have been spread with regard to me. Yes, truly, I shall
never forget it. In vain I may cover this magnificent bust with gold and
diamonds, I shall still be your debtor."

Fortunately for the good Nabob, with more feeling than eloquence, he is
obliged to make way for all the others attracted by a dazzling talent,
the personality in view; extravagant enthusiasms which, for want of
words to express themselves, disappear as they come; the conventional
admirations of society, moved by good-will, by a lively desire to
please, but of which each word is a douche of cold water; and then the
hearty hand-shakes of rivals, of comrades, some very frank, others that
communicate to you the weakness of their grasp; the pretentious great
booby, at whose idiotic eulogy you must appear to be transported with
gladness, and who, lest he should spoil you too much, accompanies it
with "a few little reserves," and the other, who, while overwhelming
you with compliments, demonstrates to you that you have not learned the
first word of your profession; and the excellent busy fellow, who stops
just long enough to whisper in your ear "that so-and-so, the famous
critic, does not look very pleased." Felicia listened to it all with the
greatest calm, raised by her success above the littleness of envy, and
quite proud when a glorious veteran, some old comrade of her father,
threw to her a "You've done very well, little one!" which took her back
to the past, to the little corner reserved for her in the old days in
her father's studio, when she was beginning to carve out a little glory
for herself under the protection of the renown of the great Ruys. But,
taken altogether, the congratulations left her rather cold, because
there lacked one which she desired more than any other, and which she
was surprised not to have yet received. Decidedly he was more often in
her thoughts than any other man had ever been. Was it love at last, the
great love which is so rare in an artist's soul, incapable as that is
of giving itself entirely up to the sway of sentiment, or was it perhaps
simply a dream of honest _bourgeoise_ life, well sheltered against
_ennui_, that spiritless _ennui_, the precursor of storms, which she had
so much reason to dread? In any case, she was herself taken in by it,
and had been living for some days past in a state of delicious trouble,
for love is so strong, so beautiful a thing, that its semblances, its
mirages, allure and can move us as deeply as itself.

Has it ever happened to you in the street, when you have been
preoccupied with thoughts of some one dear to you, to be warned of his
approach by meeting persons with a vague resemblance to him, preparatory
images, sketches of the type to appear directly afterward, which stand
out for you from the crowd like successive appeals to your overexcited
attention? Such presentiments are magnetic and nervous impressions at
which one should not be too disposed to smile, since they constitute
a faculty of suffering. Already, in the moving and constantly renewed
stream of visitors, Felicia had several times thought to recognise the
curly head of Paul de Gery, when suddenly she uttered a cry of joy. It
was not he, however, this time again, but some one who resembled him
closely, whose regular and peaceful physiognomy was always now connected
in her mind with that of her friend Paul through the effect of a
likeness more moral than physical, and the gentle authority which both
exercised over her thoughts.

"Aline!"

"Felicia!"

If nothing is more open to suspicion than the friendship of two
fashionable ladies sharing the prerogatives of drawing-room royalty and
lavishing on each other epithets, and the trivial graces of feminine
fondness, the friendships of childhood keep in the grown woman
a frankness of manner which distinguishes them, and makes them
recognisable among all others, bonds woven naively and firm as the
needlework of little girls in which an experienced hand had been
prodigal of thread and big knots; plants reared in fresh soil, in
flower, but with strong roots, full of vitality and new shoots. And what
a joy, hand in hand--you glad dances of boarding-school days, where are
you?--to retrace some steps of one's way with somebody who has an equal
acquaintance with it and its least incidents, and the same laugh of
tender retrospection. A little apart, the two girls, for whom it has
been sufficient to find themselves once more face to face to forget five
years of separation, carry on a rapid exchange of recollections, while
the little _pere_ Joyeuse, his ruddy face brightened by a new cravat,
straightens himself in pride to see his daughter thus warmly welcomed by
such an illustrious person. Proud certainly he had reason to be, for
the little Parisian, even in the neighbourhood of her brilliant friend,
holds her own in grace, youth, fair candour, beneath her twenty smooth
and golden years, which the gladness of this meeting brings to fresh
bloom.

"How happy you must be! For my part, I have seen nothing yet; but I hear
everybody saying it is so beautiful."

"Happy above all to see you again, little Aline. It is so long--"

"I should think so, you naughty girl! Whose the fault?"

And from the saddest corner of her memory, Felicia recalls the date of
the breaking off of their relations, coinciding for her with another
date on which her youth came to its end in an unforgettable scene.

"And what have you been doing, darling, all this time?"

"Oh, I, always the same thing--or, nothing to speak of."

"Yes, yes, we know what you call doing nothing, you brave little thing!
Giving your life to other people, isn't it?"

But Aline was no longer listening. She was smiling affectionately to
some one straight in front of her; and Felicia, turning round to see who
it was, perceived Paul de Gery replying to the shy and tender greeting
of Mlle. Joyeuse.

"You know each other, then?"

"Do I know M. Paul! I should think so, indeed. We talk of you very
often. He has never told you, then?"

"Never. He must be a terribly sly fellow."

She stopped short, her mind enlightened by a flash; and quickly without
heed to de Gery, who was coming up to congratulate her on her triumph,
she leaned over towards Aline and spoke to her in a low voice. That
young lady blushed, protested with smiles and words under her breath:
"How can you think of such a thing? At my age--a 'grandmamma'!" and
finally seized her father's arm in order to escape some friendly
teasing.

When Felicia saw the two young people going off together, when she had
realized the fact, which they had not yet grasped themselves, that they
were in love with each other, she felt as it were a crumbling all
around her. Then upon her dream, now fallen to the ground in a thousand
fragments, she set herself to stamp furiously. After all, he was quite
right to prefer this little Aline to herself. Would an honest man
ever dare to marry Mlle. Ruys? She, a home, a family--what nonsense! A
harlot's daughter you are, my dear; you must be a harlot too if you want
to become anything at all.

The day wore on. The crowd, more active now that there were empty spaces
here and there, commenced to stream towards the door of exit after great
eddyings round the successes of the year, satisfied, rather tired, but
excited still by that air charged with the electricity of art. A great
flood of sunlight, such as sometimes occurs at four o'clock in the
afternoon, fell on the stained-glass rose-window, threw on the sand
tracks of rainbow-coloured lights, softly bathing the bronze or the
marble of the statues, imparting an iridescent hue to the nudity of a
beautiful figure, giving to the vast museum something of the luminous
life of a garden. Felicia, absorbed in her deep and sad reverie, did not
notice the man who advanced towards her, superb, elegant, fascinating,
through the respectfully opened ranks of the public, while the name of
"Mora" was everywhere whispered.

"Well, mademoiselle, you have made a splendid success. I only regret one
thing about it, and that is the cruel symbol which you have hidden in
your masterpiece."

As she saw the duke before her, she shuddered.

"Ah, yes, the symbol," she said, lifting her face towards his with a
smile of discouragement; and leaning against the pedestal of the large,
voluptuous statue near which they happened to be standing, with the
closed eyes of a woman who gives or abandons herself, she murmured low,
very low:

"Rabelais lied, as all men lie. The truth is that the fox is utterly
wearied, that he is at the end of his breath and his courage, ready to
fall into the ditch, and that if the greyhound makes another effort----"

Mora started, became a shade paler, all the blood he had in his body
rushing back to his heart. Two sombre flames met with their eyes, two
rapid words were exchanged by lips that hardly moved; then the duke
bowed profoundly, and walked away with a step gay and light, as though
the gods were bearing him.

At that moment there was in the palace only one man as happy as he, and
that was the Nabob. Escorted by his friends, he occupied, quite filled
up, the principal bay with his own party alone, speaking loudly,
gesticulating, proud to such a degree that he looked almost handsome, as
though by dint of naive and long contemplation of his bust he had been
touched by something of the splendid idealization with which the
artist had haloed the vulgarity of his type. The head, raised to the
three-quarters position, standing freely out from the wide, loose
collar, drew contradictory remarks on the resemblance from the
passers-by; and the name of Jansoulet, so many times repeated by the
electoral ballot-boxes, was repeated over again now by the prettiest
mouths, by the most authoritative voices, in Paris. Any other than the
Nabob would have been embarrassed to hear uttered, as he passed,
these expressions of curiosity which were not always friendly. But the
platform, the springing-board, well suited that nature which became
bolder under the fire of glances, like those women who are beautiful or
witty only in society, and whom the least admiration transfigures and
completes.

When he felt this delirious joy growing calmer, when he thought to
have drunk the whole of its proud intoxication, he had only to say to
himself, "Deputy! I am a Deputy!" And the triumphal cup foamed once more
to the brim. It meant the embargo raised from all his possessions, the
awakening from a nightmare that had lasted two months, the puff of cool
wind sweeping away all his anxieties, all his inquietudes, even to the
affront of Saint-Romans, very heavy though that was in his memory.

Deputy!

He laughed to himself as he thought of the baron's face when he learned
the news, of the stupefaction of the Bey when he had been led up to his
bust; and suddenly, upon the reflection that he was no longer merely
an adventurer stuffed with gold, exciting the stupid admiration of
the crowd, as might an enormous rough nugget in the window of a
money-changer, but that people saw in him, as he passed, one of the
men elected by the will of the nation, his simple and mobile face grew
thoughtful with a deliberate gravity, there suggested themselves to him
projects of a career, of reform, and the wish to profit by the lessons
that had been latterly taught by destiny. Already, remembering the
promise which he had given to de Gery, for the household troop that
wriggled ignobly at his heels, he made exhibition of certain disdainful
coldnesses, a deliberate pose of authoritative contradiction. He called
the Marquis de Bois l'Hery "my good fellow," imposed silence very
sharply on the governor, whose enthusiasm was becoming scandalous, and
made a solemn vow to himself to get rid as soon as possible of all that
mendicant and promising Bohemian set, when he should have occasion to
begin the process.

Penetrating the crowd which surrounded him, Moessard--the handsome
Moessard, in a sky-blue cravat, pale and bloated like a white embodiment
of disease, and pinched at the waist in a fine frock-coat--seeing that
the Nabob, after having gone twenty times round the hall of sculpture,
was making for the door, dashed forward, and passing his arm through
his, said:

"You are taking me with you, you know."

Especially of late, since the time of the election, he had assumed, in
the establishment of the Place Vendome, an authority almost equal to
that of Monpavon, but more impudent; for, in point of impudence, the
Queen's lover was without his equal on the pavement that stretches from
the Rue Drouot to the Madeleine. This time he had gone too far. The
muscular arm which he pressed was shaken violently, and the Nabob
answered very dryly:

"I am sorry, _mon cher_, but I have not a place to offer you."

No place in a carriage that was as big as a house, and which five of
them had come in!

Moessard gazed at him in stupefaction.

"I had, however, a few words to say to you which are very urgent. With
regard to the subject of my note--you received it, did you not?"

"Certainly; and M. de Gery should have sent you a reply this very
morning. What you ask is impossible. Twenty thousand francs! _Tonnerre
de Dieu!_ You go at a fine rate!"

"Still, it seems to me that my services--" stammered the beauty-man.

"Have been amply paid for. That is how it seems to me also. Two hundred
thousand francs in five months! We will draw the line there, if you
please. Your teeth are long, young man; you will have to file them down
a little."

They exchanged these words as they walked, pushed forward by the surging
wave of the people going out. Moessard stopped:

"That is your last word?"

The Nabob hesitated for a moment, seized by a presentiment as he looked
at that pale, evil mouth; then he remembered the promise which he had
given to his friend:

"That is my last word."

"Very well! We shall see," said the handsome Moessard, whose switch-cane
cut the air with the hiss of a viper; and, turning on his heel, he made
off with great strides, like a man who is expected somewhere on very
urgent business.

Jansoulet continued his triumphal progress. That day much more would
have been required to upset the equilibrium of his happiness; on the
contrary, he felt himself relieved by the so-quickly achieved fulfilment
of his purpose.

The immense vestibule was thronged by a dense crowd of people whom the
approach of the hour of closing was bringing out, but whom one of those
sudden showers, which seem inseparable from the opening of the _Salon_,
kept waiting beneath the porch, with its floor beaten down and sandy
like the entrance to the circus where the young dandies strut about. The
scene that met the eye was curious, and very Parisian.

Outside, great rays of sunshine traversing the rain, attaching to
its limpid beads those sharp and brilliant blades which justify the
proverbial saying, "It rains halberds"; the young greenery of the
Champs-Elysees, the clumps of rhododendrons, rustling and wet, the
carriages ranged in the avenue, the mackintosh capes of the coachmen,
all the splendid harness-trappings of the horses receiving from the
rain and the sunbeams an added richness and effect, and blue everywhere
looming out, the blue of a sky which is about to smile in the interval
between two downpours.

Within, laughter, gossip, greetings, impatience, skirts held up, satins
bulging out above the delicate folds of frills, of lace, of flounces
gathered up in the hands of their wearers in heavy, terribly frayed
bundles. Then, to unite the two sides of the picture, these prisoners
framed in by the vaulted ceiling of the porch and in the gloom of its
shadow, with the immense background in brilliant light, footmen running
beneath umbrellas, crying out names of coachmen or of masters, broughams
coming up at walking pace, and flustered couples getting into them.

"M. Jansoulet's carriage!"

Everybody turned round, but, as one knows, that did not embarrass him.
And while the good Nabob, waiting for his suite, stood posing a little
amid these fashionable and famous people, this mixed _tout Paris_ which
was there, with its every face bearing a well-known name, a nervous and
well-gloved hand was stretched out to him, and the Duc de Mora, on his
way to his brougham, threw to him, as he passed, these words, with that
effusion which happiness gives to the most reserved of men:

"My congratulations, my dear deputy."

It was said in a loud voice, and every one could hear it: "My dear
deputy."


There is in the life of all men one golden hour, one luminous peak,
whereon all that they can hope of prosperity, joy, triumph, waits for
them and is given into their hands. The summit is more or less lofty,
more or less rugged and difficult to climb, but it exists equally for
all, for powerful and humble alike. Only, like that longest day of the
year on which the sun has shone with its utmost brilliance, and of which
the morrow seems a first step towards winter, this _summum_ of human
existences is but a moment given to be enjoyed, after which one can but
redescend. This late afternoon of the first of May, streaked with rain
and sunshine, thou must forget it not, poor man--must fix forever its
changing brilliance in thy memory. It was the hour of thy full summer,
with its flowers in bloom, its fruits bending their golden boughs, its
ripe harvests of which so recklessly thou wast plucking the corn. The
star will now pale, gradually growing more remote and falling, incapable
ere long of piercing the mournful night wherein thy destiny shall be
accomplished.




MEMOIRS OF AN OFFICE PORTER IN THE ANTCHAMBER

Great festivities last Saturday in the Place Vendome. In honour of
his election, M. Bernard Jansoulet, the new deputy for Corsica, gave
a magnificent evening party, with municipal guards at the door,
illumination of the entire mansion, and two thousand invitations sent
out to fashionable Paris.

I owed to the distinction of my manners, to the sonority of my vocal
organ, which the chairman of the board had had occasion to notice at the
meetings at the Territorial Bank, the opportunity of taking part in
this sumptuous entertainment, at which, for three hours, standing in the
vestibule, amid the flowers and hangings, clad in scarlet and gold, with
that majesty peculiar to persons who are rather generously built, and
with my calves exposed for the first time in my life, I launched, like
a cannon-ball, through the five communicating drawing-rooms, the name
of each guest, which a glittering beadle saluted every time with the
"_bing_" of his halberd on the floor.

How many the curious observations which that evening again I was able
to make; how many the pleasant sallies, the high-toned jests exchanged
among the servants upon all that world as it passed by! Not with
the vine-dressers of Montbars in any case should I have heard such
drolleries. I should remark that the worthy M. Barreau, to begin with,
had caused to be served to us all in his pantry, filled to the ceiling
with iced drinks and provisions, a solid lunch well washed down, which
put each of us in a good humour that was maintained during the evening
by the glasses of punch and champagne pilfered from the trays when
dessert was served.

The masters, indeed, seemed in less joyous mood than we. So early as
nine o'clock, when I arrived at my post, I was struck by the uneasy
nervousness apparent on the face of the Nabob, whom I saw walking with
M. de Gery through the lighted and empty drawing-rooms, talking quickly
and making large gestures.

"I will kill him!" he said; "I will kill him!"

The other endeavoured to soothe him; then madame came in, and the
subject of their conversation was changed.

A mighty fine woman, this Levantine, twice as stout as I am, dazzling to
look at with her tiara of diamonds, the jewels with which her huge
white shoulders were laden, her back as round as her bosom, her waist
compressed within a cuirass of green gold, which was continued in long
braids down the whole length of her stiff skirt. I have never seen
anything so imposing, so rich. She suggested one of those beautiful
white elephants that carry towers on their backs, of which we read in
books of travel. When she walked, supporting herself with difficulty
by means of clinging to the furniture, her whole body quivered, her
ornaments clattered like a lot of old iron. Added to this, a small,
very piercing voice, and a fine red face which a little negro boy
kept cooling for her all the time with a white feather fan as big as a
peacock's tail.

It was the first time that this indolent and retiring person had showed
herself to Parisian society, and M. Jansoulet seemed very happy and
proud that she had been willing to preside over his party; which
undertaking, for that matter, did not cost the lady much trouble, for,
leaving her husband to receive the guests in the first drawing-room,
she went and lay down on the divan of the small Japanese room, wedged
between two piles of cushions, motionless, so that you could see her
from a distance right in the background, looking like an idol, beneath
the great fan which her negro waved regularly like a piece of clockwork.
These foreign women possess an assurance!

All the same, the Nabob's irritation had struck me, and seeing the
_valet de chambre_ go by, descending the staircase four steps at a time,
I caught him on the wing and whispered in his ear:

"What's the matter, then, with your governor, M. Noel?"

"It is the article in the _Messenger_," was his reply, and I had to
give up the idea of learning anything further for the moment, the
loud ringing of a bell announcing that the first carriage had arrived,
followed soon by a crowd of others.

Wholly absorbed in my occupation, careful to utter clearly the names
which were given to me, and to make them echo from salon to salon, I
had no longer a thought for anything besides. It is no easy business to
announce in a proper manner persons who are always under the impression
that their name must be known, whisper it under their breath as they
pass, and then are surprised to hear you murder it with the finest
accent, and are almost angry with you on account of those entrances
which, missing fire and greeted with little smiles, follow upon an
ill-made announcement. At M. Jansoulet's, what made the work still
more difficult for me was the number of foreigners--Turks, Egyptians,
Persians, Tunisians. I say nothing of the Corsicans, who were very
numerous that day, because during my four years at the Territorial I
have become accustomed to the pronunciation of those high-sounding,
interminable names, always followed by that of the locality: "Paganetti
de Porto Vecchio, Bastelica di Bonifacio, Paianatchi de Barbicaglia."

It was always a pleasure to me to modulate these Italian syllables, to
give them all their sonority, and I saw clearly, from the bewildered
airs of these worthy islanders, how charmed and surprised they were to
be introduced in such a manner into the high society of the Continent.
But with the Turks, these pashas, beys, and effendis, I had much
more trouble, and I must have happened often to fall on a wrong
pronunciation; for M. Jansoulet, on two separate occasions, sent word
to me to pay more attention to the names that were given to me, and
especially to announce in a more natural manner. This remark, uttered
aloud before the whole vestibule with a certain roughness, annoyed me
greatly, and prevented me--shall I confess it?--from pitying this rich
_parvenu_ when I learned, in the course of the evening, what cruel
thorns lay concealed in his bed of roses.

From half past ten until midnight the bell was constantly ringing,
carriages rolling up under the portico, guests succeeding one another,
deputies, senators, councillors of state, municipal councillors,
who looked much rather as though they were attending a meeting of
shareholders than an evening-party of society people. What could account
for this? I had not succeeded in finding an explanation, but a remark of
the beadle Nicklauss opened my eyes.

"Do you notice, M. Passajon," said that worthy henchman, as he stood
opposite me, halberd in hand, "do you notice how few ladies we have?"

That was it, egad! Nor were we the only two to observe the fact. As each
new arrival made his entry I could hear the Nabob, who was standing near
the door, exclaim, with consternation in his thick voice like that of a
Marseillais with a cold in his head:

"What! all alone?"

The guest would murmur his excuses. "Mn-mn-mn--his wife a trifle
indisposed. Certainly very sorry." Then another would arrive, and the
same question call forth the same reply.

By its constant repetition this phrase "All alone?" had eventually
become a jest in the vestibule; lackeys and footmen threw it at each
other whenever there entered a new guest "all alone!" And we laughed
and were put in good-humour by it. But M. Nicklauss, with his great
experience of the world, deemed this almost general abstention of the
fair sex unnatural.

"It must be the article in the _Messenger_," said he.

Everybody was talking about it, this rascally article, and before the
mirror garlanded with flowers, at which each guest gave a finishing
touch to his attire before entering, I surprised fragments of whispered
conversation such as this:

"You have read it?"

"It is horrible!"

"Do you think the thing possible?"

"I have no idea. In any case, I preferred not to bring my wife."

"I have done the same. A man can go everywhere without compromising
himself."

"Certainly. While a woman----"

Then they would go in, opera hat under arm, with that conquering air of
married men when they are unaccompanied by their wives.

What, then, could there be in this newspaper, this terrible article, to
menace to this degree the influence of so wealthy a man? Unfortunately,
my duties took up the whole of my time. I could go down neither to the
pantry nor to the cloak-room to obtain information, to chat with the
coachmen and valets and lackeys whom I could see standing at the foot
of the staircase, amusing themselves by jests upon the people who were
going up. What will you? Masters give themselves great airs also. How
not laugh to see go by with an insolent manner and an empty stomach the
Marquis and the Marquise de Bois l'Hery, after all that we have been
told about the traffickings of Monsieur and the toilettes of Madame? And
the Jenkins couple, so tender, so united, the doctor carefully putting
a lace shawl over his lady's shoulders for fear she should take cold
on the staircase; she herself smiling and in full dress, all in velvet,
with a great long train, leaning on her husband's arm with an air that
seems to say, "How happy I am!" when I happened to know that, in fact,
since the death of the Irishwoman, his real, legitimate wife, the doctor
is thinking of getting rid of the old woman who clings to him, in order
to be able to marry a chit of a girl, and that the old woman passes her
nights in lamentation, and in spoiling with tears whatever beauty she
has left.

The humorous thing is that not one of these people had the least
suspicion of the rich jests and jeers that were spat over their backs
as they passed, not a notion of the filth which those long trains drew
after them as they crossed the carpet of the antechamber, and they all
would look at you so disdainfully that it was enough to make you die of
laughing.

The two ladies whom I have just named, the wife of the governor, a
little Corsican, to whom her bushy eyebrows, her white teeth, and her
shining cheeks, dark beneath the skin, give the appearance of a woman of
Auvergne with a washed face, a good sort, for the rest, and laughing all
the time except when her husband is looking at other women; in addition,
a few Levantines with tiaras of gold or pearls, less perfect specimens
of the type than our own, but still in a similar style, wives of
upholsterers, jewellers, regular tradesmen of the establishment, with
shoulders as large as shop-fronts, and expensive toilettes; finally,
sundry ladies, wives of officials of the Territorial, in sorry, badly
creased dresses; these constituted the sole representation of the fair
sex in the assembly, some thirty ladies lost among a thousand black
coats--that is to say, practically none at all. From time to time
Cassagne, Laporte, Grandvarlet, who were serving the refreshments in
trays, stopped to inform us of what was passing in the drawing-rooms.

"Ah, my boys, if you could see it! it has a gloom, a melancholy. The men
don't stir from the buffets. The ladies are all at the back, seated in a
circle, fanning themselves and saying nothing. The fat old lady does
not speak to a soul. I fancy she is sulking. You should see the look on
Monsieur! Come, _pere_ Passajon, a glass of Chateau-Larose; it will pick
you up a bit."

They were charmingly kind to me, all these young people, and took a
mischievous pleasure in doing me the honours of the cellar so often and
so copiously, that my tongue commenced to become heavy, uncertain, and
as the young folk said to me, in their somewhat free language. "Uncle,
you are babbling." Happily the last of the effendis had just arrived,
and there was nobody else to announce; for it was in vain that I sought
to shake off the impression, every time I advanced between the curtains
to send a name hurtling through the air at random, I saw the chandeliers
of the drawing-rooms revolving with hundreds of dazzling lights, and the
floors slipping away with sharp and perpendicular slopes like Russian
mountains. I was bound to get my speech mixed, it is certain.

The cool night-air, sundry ablutions at the pump in the court-yard,
quickly got the better of this small discomfort, and when I entered the
cloak-room nothing of it was any longer apparent. I found a numerous and
gay company collected round a _marquise au champagne_, of which all
my nieces, wearing their best dresses, with their hair puffed out
and cravats of pink ribbon, took their full share notwithstanding
exclamations and bewitching little grimaces that deceived nobody.
Naturally, the conversation turned on the famous article, an article by
Moessard, it appears, full of frightful occupations which the Nabob was
alleged to have followed fifteen or twenty years ago, at the time of his
first sojourn in Paris.

It was the third attack of the kind which the _Messenger_ had published
in the course of the last week, and that rogue of a Moessard had the
spite to send the number each time done up in a packet to the Place
Vendome.

M. Jansoulet received it in the morning with his chocolate; and at the
same hour his friends and his enemies--for a man like the Nabob could
be regarded with indifference by none--would be reading, commenting,
tracing for themselves the relation to him a line of conduct designed to
save them from becoming compromised. Today's article must be supposed to
have struck hard all the same; for Jansoulet, the coachman, recounted
to us a few hours ago, in the Bois, his master had not exchanged ten
greetings in the course of ten drives round the lake, while ordinarily
his hat is as rarely on his head as a sovereign's when he takes the air.
Then, when they got back, there was another trouble. The three boys had
just arrived at the house, all in tears and dismay, brought home from
the College Bourdaloue by a worthy father in the interest of the poor
little fellows themselves, who had received a temporary leave of absence
in order to spare them from hearing in the parlour or the playground
any unkind story or painful allusion. Thereupon the Nabob flew into a
terrible passion, which caused him to destroy a service of porcelain,
and it appears that, had it not been for M. de Gery, he would have
rushed off at once to punch Moessard's head.

"And he would have done very well," remarked M. Noel, entering at these
last words, very much excited. "There is not a line of truth in that
rascal's article. My master had never been in Paris before last year.
From Tunis to Marseilles, from Marseilles to Tunis, those were his only
journeys. But this knave of a journalist is taking his revenge because
we refused him twenty thousand francs."

"There you acted very unwisely," observed M. Francis upon
this--Monpavon's Francis, Monpavon the old beau whose solitary tooth
shakes about in the centre of his mouth at every word he says, but whom
the young ladies regard with a favourable eye all the same on account of
his fine manners. "Yes, you were unwise. One must know how to conciliate
people, so long as they are in a position to be useful to us or to
injure us. Your Nabob has turned his back too quickly upon his friends
after his success; and between you and me, _mon cher_, he is not
sufficiently firmly established to be able to disregard attacks of this
kind."

I thought myself able here to put in a word in my turn:

"That is true enough, M. Noel, your governor is no longer the same since
his election. He has adopted a tone and manners which I can hardly but
describe as reprehensible. The day before yesterday, at the Territorial,
he raised a commotion which you can hardly imagine. He was heard to
exclaim before the whole board: 'You have lied to me; you have robbed
me, and made me a robber as much as yourselves. Show me your books, you
set of rogues!' If he has treated Moessard in the same sort of fashion,
I am not surprised any longer that the latter should be taking his
revenge in his newspaper."

"But what does this article say?" asked M. Barreau. "Who is present that
has read it?"

Nobody answered. Several had tried to buy it, but in Paris scandal sells
like bread. At ten o'clock in the morning there was not a single copy
of the _Messenger_ left in the office. Then it occurred to one of my
nieces--a sharp girl, if ever there was one--to look in the pocket of
one of the numerous overcoats in the cloak-room, folded carefully in
large pigeon-holes. At the first which she examined:

"Here it is!" exclaimed the charming child with an air of triumph, as
she drew out a _Messenger_ crumpled in the folding like a paper that has
just been read.

"Here is another!" cried Tom Bois l'Hery, who was making a search on his
own account. A third overcoat, a third _Messenger_. And in every one the
same thing: pushed down to the bottom of a pocket, or with its titlepage
protruding, the newspaper was everywhere, just as its article must
have been in every memory; and one could imagine the Nabob up above
exchanging polite phrases with his guests, while they could have reeled
off by heart the atrocious things that had been printed about him. We
all laughed much at this idea; but we were anxious to make acquaintance
in our own turn with this curious article.

"Come, _pere_ Passajon, read it aloud to us."

It was the general desire, and I assented.

I don't know if you are like me, but when I read aloud I gargle my
throat with my voice; I introduce modulations and flourishes to such an
extent that I understand nothing of what I am saying, like those singers
to whom the sense of the words matters little, provided the notes be
true. The thing was entitled "The Boat of Flowers"--a sufficiently
complicated story, with Chinese names, about a very rich mandarin, who
had at one time in the past kept a "boat of flowers" moored quite at the
far end of the town near a barrier frequented by the soldiers. At the
end of the article we were not farther on than at the beginning. We
tried certainly to wink at each other, to pretend to be clever; but,
frankly, we had no reason. A veritable puzzle without solution; and we
should still be stuck fast at it if old Francis, a regular rascal who
knows everything, had not explained to us that this meeting place of
the soldiers must stand for the Military School, and that the "boat of
flowers" did not bear so pretty a name as that in good French. And this
name, he said it aloud notwithstanding the presence of the ladies.
There was an explosion of cries, of "Ah's!" and "Oh's!" some saying, "I
suspected it!" others, "It is impossible!"

"Pardon me," added Francis, formerly a trumpeter in the Ninth
Lancers--the regiment of Mora and of Monpavon--"pardon me. Twenty years
ago, during the last half year of my service, I was in barracks in the
Military School, and I remember very well that near the fortifications
there was a dirty dancing-hall known as the Jansoulet Rooms, with a
little furnished flat above and bedrooms at twopence-halfpenny the hour,
to which one could retire between two quadrilles."

"You are an infamous liar!" said M. Noel, beside himself with rage--"a
thief and a liar like your master. Jansoulet has never been in Paris
before now."

Francis was seated a little outside our circle engaged in sipping
something sweet, because champagne has a bad effect on his nerves and
because, too, it is not a sufficiently distinguished beverage for him.
He rose gravely, without putting down his glass, and, advancing towards
M. Noel, said to him very quietly:

"You are wanting in manners, _mon cher_. The other evening I found
your tone coarse and unseemly. To insult people serves no good purpose,
especially in this case, since I happen to have been an assistant to a
fencing-master, and, if matters were carried further between us, could
put a couple of inches of steel into whatever part of your body I might
choose. But I am good-natured. Instead of a sword-thrust, I prefer to
give you a piece of advice, which your master will do well to follow.
This is what I should do in your place: I should go and find Moessard,
and I should buy him, without quibbling about price. Hemerlingue has
given him twenty thousand francs to speak; I would offer him thirty
thousand to hold his tongue."

"Never! never!" vociferated M. Noel. "I should rather go and knock the
rascally brigand's head off."

"You will do nothing of the kind. Whether the calumny be true or false,
you have seen the effect of it this evening. This is a sample of the
pleasures in store for you. What can you expect, _mon cher_? You have
thrown away your crutches too soon, and thought to walk by yourselves.
That is all very well when one is well set up and firm on the legs; but
when one had not a very solid footing, and has also the misfortune
to feel Hemerlingue at his heels, it is a bad business. Besides, your
master is beginning to be short of money; he has given notes of hand to
old Schwalbach--and don't talk to me of a Nabob who gives notes of hand.
I know well that you have millions over yonder, but your election must
be declared valid before you can touch them; a few more articles like
to-day's, and I answer for it that you will not secure that declaration.
You set yourselves up to struggle against Paris, _mon bon_, but you are
not big enough for such a match; you know nothing about it. Here we
are not in the East, and if we do not wring the necks of people who
displease us, if we do not throw them into the water in a sack, we have
other methods of effecting their disappearance. Noel, let your master
take care. One of these mornings Paris will swallow him as I swallow
this plum, without spitting out either the stone or skin."

He was terrible, this old man, and notwithstanding the paint on his
face, I felt a certain respect for him. While he was speaking, we could
hear the music upstairs, and the horses of the municipal guards shaking
their curb-chains in the square. From without, our festivities must have
seemed very brilliant, all lighted up by their thousands of candles,
and with the great portico illuminated. And when one reflected that ruin
perhaps lay beneath it all! We sat there in the vestibule like rats that
hold counsel with each other at the bottom of a ship's hold, when the
vessel is beginning to leak and before the crew has found it out, and I
saw clearly that all the lackeys and chambermaids would not be long in
decamping at the first note of alarm. Could such a catastrophe indeed be
possible? And in that case what would become of me, and the Territorial,
and the money I had advanced, and the arrears due to me?

That Francis has left me with a cold shudder down my back.




A PUBLIC MAN

The bright warmth of a clear May afternoon heated the lofty casement
windows of the Mora mansion to the temperature of a greenhouse. The
blue silk curtains were visible from outside through the branches of the
trees, and the wide terraces, where exotic flowers were planted out of
doors for the first time of the season, ran in borders along the whole
length of the quay. The raking of the garden paths traced the light
footprints of summer in the sand, while the soft fall of the water from
the hoses on the lawns was its refreshing song.

All the luxury of the princely residence lay sunning itself in the soft
warmth of the temperature, borrowing a beauty from the silence, the
repose of this noontide hour, the only hour when the roll of carriages
was not to be heard under the arches, nor the banging of the great doors
of the antechamber, and that perpetual vibration which the ringing of
bells upon arrivals or departures sent coursing through the very ivy on
the walls; the feverish pulse of the life of a fashionable house. It was
well known that up to three o'clock the duke held his reception at the
Ministry, and that the duchess, a Swede still benumbed by the snows
of Stockholm, had hardly issued from her drowsy curtains; consequently
nobody came to call, neither visitors or petitioners, and only the
footmen, perched like flamingoes on the deserted flight of steps in
front of the house, gave the place a touch of animation with the slim
shadows of their long legs and their yawning weariness of idlers.

As an exception, however, that day Jenkins's brougham was standing
waiting in a corner of the court-yard. The duke, unwell since the
previous evening, had felt worse after leaving the breakfast-table, and
in all haste had sent for the man of the pearls in order to question him
on his singular condition. Pain nowhere, sleep and appetite as usual;
only an inconceivable lassitude, and a sense of terrible chill which
nothing could dissipate. Thus at that moment, notwithstanding the
brilliant spring sunshine which flooded his chamber and almost
extinguished the fire flaming in the grate, the duke was shivering
beneath his furs, surrounded by screens; and while signing papers for an
_attache_ of his cabinet on a low table of gold lacquer, placed so near
to the fire that it frizzled, he kept holding out his numb fingers
every moment toward the blaze, which might have burned the skin without
restoring circulation.

Was it anxiety caused by the indisposition of his illustrious client?
Jenkins appeared nervous, disquieted, walked backward and forward with
long strides over the carpet, hunting about right and left, seeking
in the air something which he believed to be present, a subtle and
intangible something like the trace of a perfume or the invisible track
left by a bird in its flight. You heard the crackling of the wood in
the fireplace, the rustle of papers hurriedly turned over, the indolent
voice of the duke indicating in a sentence, always precise and clear, a
reply to a letter of four pages, and the respectful monosyllables of
the _attache_--"Yes, M. le Ministre," "No, M. le Ministre"; then the
scraping of a rebellious and heavy pen. Out of doors the swallows were
twittering merrily over the water, the sound of a clarinet was wafted
from somewhere near the bridges.

"It is impossible," suddenly said the Minister of State, rising. "Take
that away, Lartigues; you must return to-morrow. I cannot write. I am
too cold. See, doctor; feel my hands--one would think that they had just
come out of a pail of iced water. For the last two days my whole body
has been the same. Isn't it too absurd, in this weather!"

"I am not surprised," muttered the Irishman, in a sullen, curt tone,
rarely heard from that honeyed personage.

The door had closed upon the young _attache_, bearing off his papers
with majestic dignity, but very happy, I imagine, to feel himself free
and to be able to stroll for an hour or two, before returning to the
Ministry, in the Tuileries gardens, full of spring frocks and pretty
girls sitting near the still empty chairs round the band, under the
chestnut-trees in flower, through which from root to summit there ran
the great thrill of the month when nests are built. The _attache_ was
certainly not frozen.

Jenkins, silently, examined his patient, sounded him, and tapped his
chest; then, in the same rough tone which might be explained by his
anxious devotion, the annoyance of the doctor who sees his orders
transgressed:

"Ah, now, my dear duke, what sort of life have you been living lately?"

He knew from the gossip of the antechamber--in the case of his regular
clients the doctor did not disdain this--he knew that the duke had a new
favourite, that this caprice of recent date possessed him, excited him
in an extraordinary measure, and the fact, taken together with
other observations made elsewhere, had implanted in Jenkins's mind a
suspicion, a mad desire to know the name of this new mistress. It
was this that he was trying to read on the pale face of his patient,
attempting to fathom the depth of his thoughts rather than the origin
of his malady. But he had to deal with one of those faces which are
hermetically sealed, like those little coffers with a secret spring
which hold jewels and women's letters, one of those discreet natures
closed by a cold, blue eye, a glance of steel by which the most astute
perspicacity may be baffled.

"You are mistaken, doctor," replied his excellency tranquilly. "I have
made no changes in my habits."

"Very well, M. le Duc, you have done wrong," remarked the Irishman
abruptly, furious at having made no discovery.

And then, feeling that he was going too far, he gave vent to his bad
temper and to the severity of his diagnosis in words which were a tissue
of banalities and axioms. One ought to take care. Medicine was not
magic. The power of the Jenkins pearls was limited by human strength,
by the necessities of age, by the resources of nature, which,
unfortunately, are not inexhaustible. The duke interrupted him in an
irritable tone:

"Come, Jenkins, you know very well that I don't like phrases. I am not
all right, then? What is the matter with me? What is the reason of this
chilliness?"

"It is anaemia, exhaustion--a sinking of the oil in the lamp."

"What must I do?"

"Nothing. An absolute rest. Eat, sleep, nothing besides. If you could go
and spend a few weeks at Grandbois."

Mora shrugged his shoulders:

"And the Chamber--and the Council--and--? Nonsense! how is it possible?"

"In any case, M. le Duc, you must put the brake on; as somebody said,
renounce absolutely--"

Jenkins was interrupted by the entry of the servant on duty, who,
discreetly, on tiptoe, like a dancing-master, came in to deliver a
letter and a card to the Minister of State, who was still shivering
before the fire. At the sight of that satin-gray envelope of a peculiar
shape the Irishman started involuntarily, while the duke, having opened
and glanced over his letter, rose with new vigor, his cheeks wearing
that light flush of artificial health which all the heat of the stove
had not been able to bring there.

"My dear doctor, I must at any price--"

The servant still stood waiting.

"What is it? Ah, yes; this card. Take the visitor to the gallery. I
shall be there directly."

The gallery of the Duke de Mora, open to visitors twice a week, was for
himself, as it were, a neutral ground, a public place where he could see
any one without binding or compromising himself in any way. Then, the
servant having withdrawn:

"Jenkins, _mon bon_, you have already worked miracles for me. I ask you
for one more. Double the dose of my pearls; find something, whatever
you will. But I must be feeling young by Sunday. You understand me,
altogether young."

And on the little letter in his hand, his fingers, warm once more and
feverish, clinched themselves with a thrill of eager desire.

"Take care, M. le Duc," said Jenkins, very pale and with compressed
lips. "I have no wish to alarm you unnecessarily with regard to the
feeble state of your health, but it becomes my duty--"

Mora gave a smile of pretty arrogance:

"Your duty and my pleasure are two separate things, my worthy friend.
Let me burn the candle at both ends, if it amuses me. I have never had
so fine an opportunity as this time."

He started:

"The duchess!"

A door concealed behind a curtain had just opened to give passage to a
merry little head with fair curls in disorder, quite fairy-like amid the
laces and frills of a dressing-jacket worthy of a princess:

"What do I hear? You have not gone out? But do scold him, doctor. He is
wrong, isn't he, to have so many fancies about himself? Look at him--a
picture of health!"

"There--you see," said the duke, laughing, to the Irishman. "You will
not come in, duchess?"

"No, I am going to carry you off, on the contrary. My uncle d'Estaing
has sent me a cage full of tropical birds. I want to show them to you.
Wonderful creatures, of all colours, with little eyes like black pearls.
And so sensitive to cold--nearly as much so as you are."

"Let us go and have a look at them," said the minister. "Wait for me,
Jenkins. I shall be back in a moment."

Then, noticing that he still had his letter in his hand, he threw it
carelessly into the drawer of the little table at which he had been
signing papers, and left the room behind the duchess, with the fine
coolness of a husband accustomed to these changes of situation.

What prodigious mechanic, what incomparable manufacturer of toys,
must it have been who succeeded in endowing the human mask with its
suppleness, its marvellous elasticity! How interesting to observe
the face of this great seigneur surprised in the very planning of his
adultery, with cheeks flushed in the anticipation of promised delights,
calming down at a moment's notice into the serenity of conjugal
tenderness; how fine the devout obsequiousness, the paternal smile,
after the Franklin method, of Jenkins, in the presence of the duchess,
giving place suddenly, when he found himself alone, to a savage
expression of anger and hatred, the pallor of a criminal, the pallor of
a Castaing or of a Lapommerais hatching his sinister treasons.

One rapid glance towards each of the two doors, and he stood before the
drawer full of precious papers, the little gold key still remaining in
the lock with an arrogant carelessness, which seemed to say, "No one
will dare."

Jenkins dared.

The letter lay there, the first on a pile of others. The grain of
the paper, an address of three words dashed off in a simple, bold
handwriting, and then the perfume, that intoxicating, suggestive
perfume, the very breath of her divine lips--It was true, then, his
jealous love had not deceived him, nor the embarrassment she had shown
in his presence for some time past, nor the secretive and rejuvenated
airs of Constance, nor those bouquets magnificently blooming in the
studio as in the shadow of an intrigue. That indomitable pride had
surrendered, then, at last? But in that case, why not to him, Jenkins?
To him who had loved her for so long--always; who was ten years
younger than the other man, and who certainly was troubled with no cold
shiverings! All these thoughts passed through his head like arrows shot
from a tireless bow. And, stabbed through and through, torn to pieces,
his eyes blinded, he stood there looking at the little satiny and cold
envelope which he did not dare open for fear of dismissing a final
doubt, when the rustling of a curtain warned him that some one had just
come in. He threw the letter back quickly, and closed the wonderfully
adjusted drawer of the lacquered table.

"Ah! it is you, Jansoulet. How is it you are here?"

"His excellency told me to come and wait for him in his room," replied
the Nabob, very proud of being thus introduced into the privacy of the
apartments, at an hour, especially, when visitors were not generally
received. As a fact, the duke was beginning to show a real liking for
this savage, for several reasons: to begin with, he liked audacious
people, adventurers who followed their lucky star. Was he not one of
them himself? Then, the Nabob amused him; his accent, his frank manners,
his rather coarse and impudent flattery, were a change for him from
the eternal conventionality of his surroundings, from that scourge
of administrative and court life which he held in horror--the set
speech--in such great horror that he never finished a sentence which he
had begun. The Nabob had an unforeseen way of finishing his which was
sometimes full of surprises. A fine gambler as well, losing games of
_ecarte_ at five thousand francs the fish without flinching. And so
convenient when one wanted to get rid of a picture, always ready to
buy, no matter at what price. To these motives of condescending kindness
there had come to be joined of late a sentiment of pity and indignation
in the face of the tenacity with which the unfortunate man was being
persecuted, the cowardly and merciless war so ably managed, that public
opinion, always credulous and with neck outstretched to see which way
the wind is blowing, was beginning to be seriously influenced. One
must do to Mora the justice of admitting that he was no follower of the
crowd. When he had seen in a corner of the gallery the simple but rather
piteous and discomfited face of the Nabob, he had thought it cowardly to
receive him there, and had sent him up to his private room.

Jenkins and Jansoulet, sufficiently embarrassed by each other's
presence, exchanged a few commonplace words. Their great friendship
had recently cooled, Jansoulet having refused point-blank all further
subsidies to the Bethlehem Society, leaving the business on the
Irishman's hands, who was furious at this defection, and much more
furious still at this moment because he had not been able to open
Felicia's letter before the arrival of the intruder. The Nabob, on his
side, was asking himself whether the doctor was going to be present at
the conversation which he wished to have with the duke on the subject of
the infamous insinuations with which the _Messenger_ was pursuing him;
anxious also to know whether these calumnies might not have produced a
coolness in that sovereign good-will which was so necessary to him at
the moment of the verification of his election. The greeting which he
had received in the gallery had half reassured him on this point; he
was entirely satisfied when the duke entered and came towards him with
outstretched hand:

"Well, my poor Jansoulet, I hope Paris is making you pay dearly enough
for your welcome. What brawling and hate and spite one finds!"

"Ah, M. le Duc, if you knew--"

"I know. I have read it," said the minister, moving closer to the fire.

"I sincerely hope that your excellency does not believe these infamies.
Besides, I have here--I bring the proof."

With his strong hairy hands, trembling with emotion, he hunted among the
papers in an enormous shagreen portfolio which he had under his arm.

"Never mind that--never mind. I am acquainted with the whole affair. I
know that, wilfully or not, they have mixed you up with another person,
whom family considerations--"

The duke could not restrain a smile at the bewilderment of the Nabob,
stupefied to find him so well informed.

"A Minister of State has to know everything. But don't worry. Your
election will be declared valid all the same. And once declared valid--"

Jansoulet heaved a sigh of relief.

"Ah, M. le Duc, how it cheers me to hear you speak thus! I was beginning
to lose all confidence. My enemies are so powerful. And a piece of bad
luck into the bargain. Do you know that it is Le Merquier himself who is
charged with the report on my election?"

"Le Merquier? The devil!"

"Yes, Le Merquier, Hemerlingue's agent, the dirty hypocrite who
converted the baroness, no doubt because his religion forbade him to
have a Mohammedan for a mistress."

"Come, come, Jansoulet."

"Well, M. le Duc? One can't help being angry. Think of the situation
in which these wretches are placing me. Here I ought to have had my
election made valid a week ago, and they arrange the postponement of the
sitting expressly because they know the terrible position in which I am
placed--my whole fortune paralyzed, the Bey waiting for the decision of
the Chamber to decide whether or not he can plunder me. I have eighty
millions over there, M. le Duc, and here I begin to be short of money.
If the thing goes on only a little longer--"

He wiped away the big drops of sweat that trickled down his cheeks.

"Ah, well, I will look after this validation myself," said the minister
sharply. "I will write to what's-his-name to hurry up with his report;
and even if I have to be carried to the Chamber--"

"Your excellency is unwell?" asked Jansoulet, in a tone of interest
which, I swear to you, had no affectation about it.

"No--a little weakness. I am rather anaemic--wanting blood; but Jenkins
is going to put me right. Aren't you, Jenkins?"

The Irishman, who had not been listening, made a vague gesture.

"_Tonnerre!_ And here am I with only too much of it."

And the Nabob loosened his cravat about his neck, swollen like an
apoplexy by his emotion and the heat of the room. "If I could only
transfer a little to you, M. le Duc!"

"It would be an excellent thing for both," said the Minister of State
with pale irony. "For you, especially, who are a violent fellow, and
who at this moment need so much self-control. Take care on that point,
Jansoulet. Beware of the hot retorts, the steps taken in a fit of temper
to which they would like to drive you. Repeat to yourself now that you
are a public man, on a platform, all of whose actions are observed from
far. The newspapers are abusing you; don't read them, if you cannot
conceal the emotion which they cause you. Don't do what I did, with my
blind man of the Pont de la Concorde, that frightful clarinet-player,
who for the last ten years has been blighting my life by playing all
day 'De tes fils, Norma.' I have tried everything to get him away from
there--money, threats. Nothing has succeeded in inducing him to go. The
police? Ah, yes, indeed. With modern ideas, it becomes quite a business
to clear off a blind man from a bridge. The Opposition newspapers would
talk of it, the Parisians would make a story out of it--'_The Cobbler
and the Financier_.' 'The Duke and the Clarinet.' No, I must resign
myself. It is, besides, my own fault. I never ought to have let this
man see that he annoyed me. I am sure that my torture makes half the
pleasure of his life now. Every morning he comes forth from his wretched
lodging with his dog, his folding-stool, his frightful music, and says
to himself, 'Come, let us go and worry the Duc de Mora.' Not a day
does he miss, the wretch! Why, see, if I were but to open the window a
trifle, you would hear his deluge of little sharp notes above the noise
of the water and the traffic. Well, this journalist of the _Messenger_,
he is your clarinet; if you allow him to see that his music wearies you,
he will never finish. And with this, my dear deputy, I will remind you
that you have a meeting at three o'clock at the office, and I must send
you back to the Chamber."

Then turning to Jenkins:

"You know what I asked of you, doctor--pearls for the day after
to-morrow; and let them be extra strong!"

Jenkins started, shook himself as at the sudden awakening from a dream:

"Certainly, my dear duke. You shall be given some stamina--oh, yes;
stamina, breath enough to win the great Derby stakes."

He bowed, and left the room laughing, the veritable laugh of a wolf
showing its gleaming white teeth. The Nabob took leave in his turn, his
heart filled with gratitude, but not daring to let anything of it appear
in the presence of this sceptic in whom all demonstrativeness aroused
distrust. And the Minister of State, left alone, rolled up in his wraps
before the crackling and blazing fire, sheltered in the padded warmth of
his luxury, doubled that day by the feverish caress of the May sunshine,
began to shiver with cold again, to shiver so violently that Felicia's
letter which he had reopened and was reading rapturously shook in his
hands.

A deputy is in a very singular situation during the period which follows
his election and precedes--as they say in parliamentary jargon--the
verification of its validity. It is a little like the position of the
newly married man during the twenty-four hours separating the civil
marriage from its consecration by the Church. Rights of which he cannot
avail himself, a half-happiness, a semi-authority, the embarrassment
of keeping the balance a little on this side or on that, the lack of a
defined footing. One is married and yet not married, a deputy and yet
not perfectly sure of being it; only, for the deputy, this uncertainty
is prolonged over days and weeks, and since the longer it lasts the more
problematical does the validation become, it is like torture for the
unfortunate representative on probation to be obliged to attend the
Chamber, to occupy a place which he will perhaps not keep, to listen to
discussions of which it is possible that he will never hear the end, to
fix in his eyes and ears the delicious memory of parliamentary sittings
with their sea of bald or apoplectic foreheads, their confused noise of
rustling papers, the cries of attendants, wooden knives beating a tattoo
on the tables, private conversations from amid which the voice of
the orator issues, a thundering or timid solo with a continuous
accompaniment.

This situation, at best so trying to the nerves, was complicated in
the Nabob's case by these calumnies, at first whispered, now printed,
circulated in thousands of copies by the newspapers, with the
consequence that he found himself tacitly put in quarantine by his
colleagues.

The first days he went and came in the corridors, the library, the
dining-room, the lecture-hall, like the rest, delighted to roam through
all the corners of that majestic labyrinth; but he was unknown to most
of his associates, unacknowledged by a few members of the Rue Royale
Club, who avoided him, detested by all the clerical party of which
Le Merquier was the head. The financial set was hostile to this
multi-millionaire, powerful in both "bull" and "bear" market, like those
vessels of heavy tonnage which displace the water of a harbour, and
thus his isolation only became the more marked by the change in his
circumstances and the same enmity followed him everywhere.

His gestures, his manner, showed trace of it in a certain constraint,
a sort of hesitating distrust. He felt he was watched. If he went for a
minute into the _buffet_, that large bright room opening on the gardens
of the president's house, which he liked because there, at the broad
counter of white marble laden with bottles and provisions, the deputies
lost their big, imposing airs, the legislative haughtiness allowed
itself to become more familiar, even there he knew that the next day
there would appear in the _Messenger_ a mocking, offensive paragraph
exhibiting him to his electors as a wine-bibber of the most notorious
order.

Those terrible electors added to his embarrassments.

They arrived in crowds, invaded the Salle des Pas-Perdus, galloped all
over the place like little fiery black kids, shouting to each other from
one end to the other of the echoing room, "O Pe! O Tche!" inhaling with
delight the odour of government, of administration, pervading the air,
watching admiringly the ministers as they passed, following in their
trail with keen nose, as though from their respected pockets, from their
swollen portfolios, there might fall some appointment; but especially
surrounding "Moussiou" Jansoulet with so many exacting petitions,
reclamations, demonstrations, that, in order to free himself from the
gesticulating uproar which made everybody turn round, and turned him
as it were into the delegate of a tribe of Tuaregs in the midst of
civilized folk, he was obliged to implore with a look the help of some
attendant on duty familiar with such acts of rescue, who would come to
him with an air of urgency to say "that he was wanted immediately in
Bureau No. 8." So at last, embarrassed everywhere, driven from the
corridors, from the Pas-Perdus, from the refreshment-room, the poor
Nabob had adopted the course of never leaving his seat, where he
remained motionless and without speaking during the whole time of the
sitting.

He had, however, one friend in the Chamber, a deputy newly elected for
the Deux-Sevres, called M. Sarigue, a poor man sufficiently resembling
the inoffensive and ill-favoured animal whose name he bore, with his red
and scanty hair, his timorous eyes, his hopping walk, his white gaiters;
he was so timid that he could not utter two words without stuttering,
almost voiceless, continually sucking jujubes, which completed the
confusion of his speech. One asked what such a weakling as he had come
to do in the Assembly, what feminine ambition run mad had urged into
public life this being useless for no matter what private activity.

By an amusing irony of fate, Jansoulet, himself agitated by all the
anxieties of his own validation, was chosen in Bureau no. 8 to draw up
the report on the election in the Deux-Sevres; and M. Sarigue, humble
and supplicating, conscious of his incapacity and filled by a horrible
dread of being sent back to his home in disgrace, used to follow about
this great jovial fellow with the curly hair and big shoulder blades
that moved like the bellows of a forge beneath a light and tightly
fitting frock-coat, without any suspicion that a poor anxious being like
himself lay concealed within that solid envelope.

As he worked at the report on the Deux-Sevres election, as he examined
the numerous protests, the accusations of electioneering trickery, meals
given, money spent, casks of wine broached at the doors of the mayors'
houses, the usual accompaniments of an election in those days, Jansoulet
used to shudder on his own account. "Why, I did all that myself," he
would say to himself, terrified. Ah! M. Sarigue need not be afraid;
never could he have put his hand on an examiner with kinder intentions
or more indulgent, for the Nabob, taking pity on the sufferer, knowing
by experience how painful is the anguish of waiting, had made haste
through his labour; and the enormous portfolio which he carried under
his arm, as he left the Mora mansion, contained his report ready to be
sent in to the bureau.

Whether it were this first essay in a public function, the kind words
of the duke, or the magnificent weather out of doors, keenly enjoyed by
this southerner, with his susceptibility to wholly physical impressions
and accustomed to life under a blue sky and the warmth of the
sunshine--however that may have been, certain it is that the attendants
of the legislative body beheld that day a proud and haughty Jansoulet
whom they had not previously known. The fat Hemerlingue's carriage,
caught sight of at the gate, recognisable by the unusual width of its
doors, completed his reinstatement in the possession of his true nature
of assurance and bold audacity. "The enemy is there. Attention!" As
he crossed the Salle des Pas-Perdus, he caught sight of the financier
chatting in a corner with Le Merquier, the examiner; he passed quite
near them, and looked at them with a triumphant air which made people
wonder:

"What is the meaning of this?"

Then, highly pleased at his own coolness, he passed on towards the
committee-rooms, big and lofty apartments opening right and left on a
long corridor, and having large tables covered with green baize, and
heavy chairs all of a similar pattern and bearing the impress of a dull
solemnity. People were beginning to come in. Groups were taking up their
positions, discussing matters, gesticulating, with bows, shakings
of hands, inclinations of the head, like Chinese shadows against the
luminous background of the windows.

Men were there who walked about with bent back, solitary, as it were
crushed down beneath the weight of the thoughts which knitted their
brow. Others whispering in their neighbour's ears, confiding to each
other exceedingly mysterious and terribly important pieces of news,
finger on lip, eyes opened wide in silent recommendation to discretion.
A provincial flavour characterized it all, varieties of intonation, the
violence of southern speech, drawling accents of the central districts,
the sing-song of Brittany, fused into one and the same imbecile
self-conceit, frock-coats as they cut them at Landerneau, mountain
shoes, home-spun linen, and a self-assurance begotten in a village or in
the club of some insignificant town, local expressions, provincialisms
abruptly introduced into the speech of the political and administrative
world, that flabby and colourless phraseology which has invented such
expressions as "burning questions that come again to the surface" and
"individualities without mandate."

To see these excited or thoughtful people, you might have supposed them
the greatest apostles of ideas in the world; unfortunately, on the days
of the sittings they underwent a transformation, sat in hushed silence
in their places, laughing in servile fashion at the jests of the
clever man who presided over them, or only rising to make ridiculous
propositions, the kind of interruption which would tempt one to believe
that it is not a type only, but a whole race, that Henri Monnier has
satirized in his immortal sketch. Two or three orators in all the
Chamber, the rest well qualified to plant themselves before the
fireplace of a provincial drawing-room, after an excellent meal at the
Prefect's, and to say in nasal voice, "The administration, gentlemen,"
or "The Government of the Emperor," but incapable of anything further.

Ordinarily the good Nabob had been dazzled by these poses, that buzzing
as of an empty spinning-wheel which is made by would-be important
people; but to-day he found his own place, and fell in with the general
note. Seated at the centre of the green table, his portfolio open before
him, his elbows planted well forward upon it, he read the report
drawn up by de Gery, and the members of the committee looked at him in
amazement.

It was a concise, clear, and rapid summary of their fortnight's
proceedings, in which they found their ideas so well expressed that they
had great difficulty in recognising them. Then, as two or three among
them considered the report too favourable, that it passed too lightly
over certain protests that had reached the committee, the examiner
addressed the meeting with an astonishing assurance, with the prolixity,
the verbosity of his own people, demonstrated that a deputy ought not
to be held responsible beyond a certain point for the imprudence of
his election agents, that no election, otherwise, would bear a minute
examination, and since in reality it was his own cause that he
was pleading, he brought to the task a conviction, an irresistible
enthusiasm, taking care to let out now and then one of those long, dull
substantives with a thousand feet, such as the committee loved.

The others listened to him thoughtfully, communicating their sentiments
to each other by nods of the head, making flourishes, in order the
better to concentrate their attention, and drawing heads on their
blotting-pads--a proceeding which harmonized well with the schoolboyish
noises in the corridors, a murmur of lessons in course of repetition,
and those droves of sparrows which you could hear chirping under the
casements in a flagged court-yard, just like the court-yard of a school.
The report having been adopted, M. Sarigue was summoned in order that
he might offer some supplementary explanations. He arrived, pale,
emaciated, stuttering like a criminal before conviction, and you
would have laughed to see with what an air of authority and protection
Jansoulet encouraged and reassured him. "Calm yourself, my dear
colleague." But the members of Committee No. 8 did not laugh. They were
all, or nearly all, Sarigues in their way, two or three of them
being absolutely broken down, stricken by partial paralysis. So much
assurance, such great eloquence, had moved them to enthusiasm.

When Jansoulet issued from the legislative assembly, reconducted to
his carriage by his grateful colleague, it was about six o'clock.
The splendid weather--a beautiful sunset over the Seine, which lay
stretching away like molten gold on the Trocadero side--was a temptation
to a walk for this robust plebeian, on whom it was imposed by the
conventions that he should ride in a carriage and wear gloves, but who
escaped such encumbrances as often as he possibly could. He dismissed
his servants, and, with his portfolio under his arm, set forth across
the Pont de la Concorde.

Since the first of May he had not experienced such a sense of
well-being. With rolling gait, hat a little to the back of his head,
in the position in which he had seen it worn by overworked politicians
harassed by pressure of business, allowing all the laborious fever
of their brain to evaporate in the coolness of the air, as a factory
discharges its steam into the gutter at the end of a day's work, he
moved forward among other figures like his own, evidently coming
too from that colonnaded temple which faces the Madeleine above the
fountains of the _Place_. As they passed, people turned to look after
them, saying, "Those are deputies." And Jansoulet felt the delight of a
child, a plebeian joy, compounded of ignorance and naive vanity.

"Ask for the _Messenger_, evening edition."

The words came from a newspaper kiosk at the corner of the bridge, full
at that hour of fresh printed sheets in heaps, which two women were
quickly folding, and which smelt of the damp press--late news, the
success of the day or its scandal.

Nearly all the deputies bought a copy as they passed, and glanced over
it quickly in the hope of finding their name. Jansoulet, for his part,
feared to see his in it and did not stop. Then suddenly he reflected:
"Must not a public man be above these weaknesses? I am strong enough now
to read everything." He retraced his steps and took a newspaper like
his colleagues. He opened it, very calmly, right at the place usually
occupied by Moessard's articles. As it happened, there was one. Still
the same title: "_Chinoiseries_," and an _M._ for signature.

"Ah! ah!" said the public man, firm and cold as marble, with a fine
smile of disdain. Mora's lesson still rung in his ears, and, had he
forgotten it, the air from _Norma_ which was being slowly played in
little ironical notes not far off would have sufficed to recall it
to him. Only, after all calculations have been made amid the fleeting
happenings of our existence, there is always the unforeseen to be
reckoned with; and that is how it came that the poor Nabob suddenly felt
a wave of blood blind him, a cry of rage strangle itself in the sudden
contraction of his throat. This time his mother, his old Frances, had
been dragged into the infamous joke of the "Bateau de fleurs." How well
he aimed his blows, this Moessard, how well he knew the really sensitive
spots in that heart, so frankly exposed!

"Be quiet, Jansoulet; be quiet."

It was in vain that he repeated the words to himself again and again:
anger, a wild anger, that intoxication of the blood that demands blood,
took possession of him. His first impulse was to hail a cab, that
he might escape from the irritating street, free his body from the
preoccupation of walking and maintaining a physical composure--to hail a
cab as for a wounded man. But the carriages which thronged the square
at that hour of general home-going were victorias, landaus, private
broughams, hundreds of them, passing down from the lurid splendour
of the Arc de Triomphe towards the violet shadows of the Tuileries,
rushing, it seemed, one over another, in the sloping perspective of
the avenue, down to the great square where the motionless statues, with
their circular crowns on their brows, watched them as they separated
towards the Faubourg Saint-Germain, the Rue Royale and the Rue de
Rivoli.

Jansoulet, his newspaper in his hand, traversed this tumult without
giving it a thought, carried by force of habit towards the club where he
went every day for his game of cards from six to seven. A public man, he
was that still; but excited, speaking aloud, muttering oaths and threats
in a voice that had suddenly grown tender again at the memory of the
dear old woman. To have dragged her into that--her also! Oh, if she
should read it, if she should understand! What punishment could he
invent for such an infamy? He had reached the Rue Royale, up which were
disappearing with the speed of horses that knew they were going home
and with glancings of shining axles, visions of veiled women, heads of
fair-haired children, equipages of all kinds returning from the Bois,
depositing a little genuine earth upon the Paris pavement, and bringing
odours of spring mingled with the scent of _poudre de riz_.

Opposite the Ministry of Marine, a very high phaeton on light wheels,
rather like a great spider, its body represented by the little groom
hanging on to the box and the two persons occupying the front seat, just
missed a collision with the curb as it turned the corner.

The Nabob raised his head and stifled a cry.

Beside a painted woman, with red hair and wearing a tiny hat with wide
strings, who, perched on her leathern cushion, sat leaning stiffly
forward, hands, eyes, her whole factitious person intent on driving the
horse, there sat, pink and made-up also, grown fat with the same vices,
Moessard, the handsome Moessard--the harlot and the journalist; and of
the two, it was not the woman who had sold herself the most. High above
those women reclining in their open carriages, those men opposite them
half buried beneath the flounces of their gowns, all those poses of
fatigue and weariness which the overfed exhibit in public as in contempt
of pleasure and riches, they lorded it insolently, she very proud to be
seen driving with the lover of the Queen, and he without the least shame
in sitting beside a creature who hooked men in the drives of the Bois
with the lash of her whip, removed on her high-perched seat from all
fear of the salutary raids of the police. Perhaps, in order to whet the
appetite of his royal mistress, he chose to parade beneath her windows
in company of Suzanne Bloch, known as Suze the Red.

"Hep! hep, then!"

The horse, a high trotter with slim legs, just such a horse as a
_cocotte_ would care to own, recovered from its swerve and resumed its
proper place with dancing steps, graceful pawings executed on the same
spot without advancing. Jansoulet let fall his portfolio, and as though
he had dropped with it all his gravity, his prestige as a public man,
he made a terrible spring, and dashed to the bit of the animal, which he
held firm with his strong, hairy hands.

A carriage forcibly stopped in the Rue Royale, and in broad
daylight--only this Tartar would have dared such a stroke as that!

"Get down!" said he to Moessard, whose face had turned green and yellow
when he saw him. "Get down immediately!"

"Will you let go my horse, you bloated idiot! Whip up Suzanne; it is the
Nabob."

She tried to gather up the reins, but the animal, held firmly, reared
so sharply that a little more and like a sling the fragile vehicle would
have sent everybody in it flying far away. At this, furious with one of
those plebeian rages which in women of her kind shatter all the veneer
of their luxury, she dealt the Nabob two stinging lashes with her whip,
which left little trace on his tanned and hardened face, but which
brought there a ferocious expression, accentuated by the short nose
which had turned white and was slit at the end like that of a sporting
terrier.

"Come down, or, by God, I will upset the whole thing!"

Amid an eddy of carriages arrested by the block in the traffic, or that
passed slowly round the obstacle, with thousands of curious eyes, amid
cries of coachmen and clinking of bits, two wrists of iron shook the
entire vehicle.

"Jump--but jump, I tell you! Don't you see he will have us over? What a
grip!"

And the woman looked at the Hercules with interest.

Hardly had Moessard set foot to the ground, and before he could take
refuge on the pavement, whither the black military caps of policemen
could be seen hastening, Jansoulet threw himself upon him, lifted him by
the back of the neck like a rabbit, and, careless of his protestations
and his terrified stammerings:

"Yes, yes, I will give you satisfaction, you blackguard! But, first, I
intend to do to you what is done to dirty beasts to prevent them from
repeating the same offence."

And roughly he set to work rubbing his nose and face all over with his
newspaper, which he had rolled into a ball, stifling him, blinding him
with it, and making scratches from which the blood trickled over his
skin. The man was dragged from his hands, crimson, suffocated. A little
more and he would have killed him.

The struggle over, pulling down his sleeves, adjusting his crumpled
linen, picking up his portfolio out of which the papers of the Sarigue
election were flying scattered even to the gutter, the Nabob answered
the policemen who were asking him for his name in order to draw up a
summons:

"Bernard Jansoulet, Deputy for Corsica."

A public man!

Only then did he remember that he was one. Who would have suspected
it, seeing him breathless and bare-headed, like a porter after a street
fight, under the eager, coldly mocking glances of the crowd?




THE APPARITION

If you want simple and sincere feeling, if you would see overflowing
affection, tenderness, laughter--the laughter born of great happiness
which, at a tiny movement of the lips, is brought to the verge of
tears--and the beautiful wild joy of youth illumined by bright eyes
transparent to the very depths of the souls behind them--all these
things you may find this Sunday morning in a house that you know of, a
new house, down yonder, right at the end of the old faubourg. The glass
door on the ground floor shines more brightly than usual. More gaily
than ever dance the letters over the door, and from the open windows
comes the sound of glad cries, flowing from a stream of happiness.

"Accepted! it is accepted! Oh, what good luck! Henriette, Elise, do come
here! M. Maranne's play is accepted!"

Andre heard the news yesterday. Cardailhac, the manager of the
_Nouveautes_, sent for him to inform him that his play was to be
produced immediately--that it would be put on next month. They passed
the evening discussing scenic arrangements and the distribution of
parts; and, as it was too late to knock at his neighbour's door when he
got home from the theatre, the happy author waited for the morning in
feverish impatience, and then, as soon as he heard people stirring below
and the shutters open with a click against the house-front, he made
haste to go down to announce the good news to his friends. Just now they
are all assembled together, the young ladies in pretty _deshabille_,
their hair hastily twisted up, and M. Joyeuse, whom the announcement
had surprised in the midst of shaving, presenting under his embroidered
night-cap a strange face divided into two parts, one side shaved, the
other not. But Andre Maranne is the most excited, for you know what the
acceptance of _Revolt_ means for him; what was agreed between them and
Bonne Maman. The poor fellow looks at her as if to find an encouragement
in her eyes; and the rather mischievous, kind eyes seem to say, "Make
the experiment, in any case. What is the risk?" To give himself
courage he looks also at Mlle. Elise, pretty as a flower, with her long
eyelashes drooped. At last, making up his mind:

"M. Joyeuse," said he thickly, "I have a very serious communication to
make to you."

M. Joyeuse expresses astonishment.

"A communication? Ah, _mon Dieu_, you alarm me!"

And lowering his voice:

"Are the girls in the way?"

"No. Bonne Maman knows what I mean. Mlle. Elise also must have some
suspicion of it. It is only the children."

Mlle. Henriette and her sister are asked to retire, which they
immediately do, the one with a dignified and annoyed air, like a true
daughter of the Saint-Amands, the other, the young Chinese Yaia, hardly
hiding a wild desire to laugh.

Thereupon a great silence; after which, the lover begins his little
story.

I quite believe that Mlle. Elise has some suspicion in her mind, for
as soon as their young neighbour spoke of a communication, she drew her
_Ansart et Rendu_ from her pocket and plunged precipitately into the
adventures of somebody surnamed the Hutin, thrilling reading which makes
the book tremble in her hands. There is reason for trembling, certainly,
before the bewilderment, the indignant stupefaction into which M.
Joyeuse receives this request for his daughter's hand.

"Is it possible? How has it happened? What an extraordinary event! Who
could ever have suspected such a thing?"

And suddenly the good old man burst into a great roar of laughter. Well,
no, it is not true. He had heard of the affair; knew about it, a long
time ago.

Her father knew all about it! Bonne Maman had betrayed them then! And
before the reproachful glances cast in her direction, the culprit comes
forward smiling:

"Yes, my dears, it is I. The secret was too much for me. I found I could
not keep it to myself alone. And then, father is so kind--one cannot
hide anything from him."

As she says this she throws her arms round the little man's neck; but
there is room enough for two, and when Mlle. Elise in her turn takes
refuge there, there is still an affectionate, fatherly hand stretched
out towards him whom M. Joyeuse considers thenceforward as his son.
Silent embraces, long looks meeting each other full of emotion, blessed
moments that one would like to hold forever by the fragile tips of
their wings. There is chat, and gentle laughter when certain details
are recalled. M. Joyeuse tells how the secret was revealed to him in the
first instance by tapping spirits, one day when he was alone in
Andre's apartment. "How is business going, M. Maranne?" the spirits had
inquired, and he himself had replied in Maranne's absence: "Fairly well,
for the season, Sir Spirit." The little man repeats, "Fairly well for
the season," in a mischievous way, while Mlle. Elise, quite confused
at the thought that it was with her father that she talked that day,
disappears under her fair curls.

After the first stress of emotion they talk more seriously. It is
certain that Mme. Joyeuse, _nee_ de Saint-Amand, would never have
consented to this marriage. Andre Maranne is not rich, still less noble;
but the old accountant, luckily, has not the same ideas of grandeur that
his wife possessed. They love each other; they are young, healthy, and
good-looking--qualities that in themselves constitute fine dowries,
without involving any heavy registration fees at the notary's. The new
household will be installed on the floor above. The photography will
be continued, unless _Revolt_ should produce enormous receipts. (The
Visionary may be trusted to see to that.) In any case, the father will
still remain near them; he has a good place at his stockbroker's office,
some expert business in the courts; provided that the little ship
continue to sail in deep enough water, all will go well, with the aid of
wave, wind, and star.

Only one question preoccupies M. Joyeuse: "Will Andre's parents consent
to this marriage? How will Dr. Jenkins, so rich, so celebrated, take
it?"

"Let us not speak of that man," said Andre, turning pale; "he is a
wretch to whom I owe nothing--who is nothing to me."

He stops, embarrassed by this explosion of anger, which he was unable to
restrain and cannot explain, and goes on more gently:

"My mother, who comes to see me sometimes in spite of the prohibition
laid upon her, was the first to be told of our plans. She already loves
Mlle. Elise as her daughter. You will see, mademoiselle, how good she
is, and how beautiful and charming. What a misfortune that she belongs
to such a wicked man, who tyrannizes over her, and tortures her even to
the point of forbidding her to utter her son's name."

Poor Maranne heaves a sign that speaks volumes on the great grief which
he hides in the depths of his heart. But what sadness would not have
been vanquished in presence of that dear face lighted up with its fair
curls and the radiant perspective of the future? These serious questions
having been settled, they are able to open the door and recall the two
exiles. In order to avoid filling their little heads with thoughts above
their age, it has been agreed to say nothing about the prodigious event,
to tell them nothing except that they have all to make haste and dress,
breakfast still more quickly, so as to be able to spend the afternoon in
the Bois, where Maranne will read his play to them, before they go on to
Suresnes to have dinner at Kontzen's: a whole programme of delights in
honour of the acceptance of _Revolt_, and of another piece of good news
which they will hear later.

"Ah, really--what is it, then?" ask the two little girls, with an
innocent air.

But if you fancy they don't know what is in the air, if you think that
when Mlle. Elise used to give three raps on the ceiling they imagined
that it was for information on business, you are more ingenuous even
than _le pere_ Joyeuse.

"That's all right--that's all right, children; go and dress, in any
case."

Then there begins another refrain:

"What frock must I put on, Bonne Maman--the gray?"

"Bonne Maman, there is a string off my hat."

"Bonne Maman, my child, have I no more starched cravats left?"

For ten minutes the charming grandmother is besieged with questions and
entreaties. Every one needs her help in some way; it is she who had the
keys of everything, she who gives out the pretty, white, fine goffered
linen, the embroidered handkerchiefs, the best gloves, all the dainty
things which, taken out from drawers and wardrobes, spread over the bed,
fill a house with a bright Sunday gaiety.

The workers, the people with tasks to fulfil, alone know that delight
which returns each week consecrated by the customs of a nation. For
these prisoners of the week, the almanac with its closed prison-like
gratings opens at regular intervals into luminous spaces, with
breaths of refreshing air. It is Sunday, the day that seems so long
to fashionable folk, to the Parisians of the boulevard whose habits it
disturbs, so gloomy to people far from their homes and relatives, that
constitutes for a multitude of human beings the only recompense, the one
aim of the desperate efforts of six days of toil. Neither rain nor hail,
nothing makes any difference, nothing will prevent them from going
out, from closing behind them the door of the deserted workshop, of the
stuffy little lodging. But when the springtime is come, when the May
sunshine glitters on it as this morning, and it can deck itself out in
gay colours, then indeed Sunday is the holiday of holidays.

If one would know it well, it must be seen especially in the working
quarters of the town, in those gloomy streets which it lights up and
enlarges by closing the shops, keeping in their sheds the heavy drays
and trucks, leaving the space free for wandering bands of children
washed and in their Sunday clothes, and for games of battledore and
shuttlecock played amid the great circlings of the swallows beneath some
porch of old Paris. It must be seen in the densely populated, feverishly
toiling suburbs, where, as soon as morning is come, you may feel it
hovering, resposeful and sweet, in the silence of the factories, passing
with the ringing of church-bells and that sharp whistle of the railways,
and filling the horizon, all around the outskirts of the city, with
an immense song, as it were, of departure and of deliverance. Then one
understands it and loves it.

O Sunday of Paris, Sunday of the toilers and the humble, often have I
cursed thee without reason, I have poured whole streams of abusive ink
over thy noisy and extravagant joys, over the dust of railway stations
filled by thy uproar and the maddening omnibuses that thou takest by
assault, over thy tavern songs bawled everywhere from carts adorned with
green and pink dresses, on thy barrel-organs grinding out their tunes
beneath the balconies of deserted court-yards; but to-day, abjuring my
errors, I exalt thee, and I bless thee for all the joy and relief thou
givest to courageous and honest labour, for the laughter of the children
who greet thee with acclamation, the pride of mothers happy to dress
their little ones in their best clothes in thy honour, for the dignity
thou dost preserve in the homes of the poorest, the glorious raiment set
aside for thee at the bottom of the old shaky chest of drawers; I bless
thee especially by reason of all the happiness thou hast brought that
morning to the great new house in the old faubourg.

Toilettes having been completed, the _dejeuner_ finished, taken on
the thumb, as they say--and you can imagine what quantity these young
ladies' thumbs would carry--they came to put on their hats before the
mirror in the drawing-room. Bonne Maman threw around her supervising
glance, inserted a pin here, retied a ribbon there, straightened her
father's cravat; but while all this little world was stamping with
impatience, beckoned out of doors by the beauty of the day, there came a
ring at the bell, echoing through the apartment and disturbing their gay
proceedings.

"Suppose we don't open the door?" propose the children.

And what a relief, with a cry of delight, they see their friend Paul
come in!

"Quick! quick! Come and let us tell you the good news."

He knew well, before any of them, that the play had been accepted. He
had had a good deal of trouble to get it read by Cardailhac, who, the
moment he saw its "short lines," as he called verse, wished to send the
manuscript to the Levantine and her _masseur_, as he was wont to do in
the case of all beginners in the writing of drama. But Paul was careful
not to refer to his own intervention. As for the other event, the one of
which nothing was said, on account of the children, he guessed it easily
by the trembling greeting of Maranne, whose fair mane was standing
straight up over his forehead by reason of the poet's two hands having
been pushed through it so many times, a thing he always did in his
moments of joy, by the slightly embarrassed demeanour of Elise, by the
triumphant airs of M. Joyeuse, who was standing very erect in his new
summer clothes, with all the happiness of his children written on his
face.

Bonne Maman alone preserved her usual peaceful air; but one noticed,
in the eager alacrity with which she forestalled her sister's wants, a
certain attention still more tender than before, an anxiety to make her
look pretty. And it was delicious to watch the girl of twenty as she
busied herself about the adornment of others, without envy, without
regret, with something of the gentle renunciation of a mother welcoming
the young love of her daughter in memory of a happiness gone by. Paul
saw this; he was the only one who did see it; but while admiring Aline,
he asked himself sadly if in that maternal heart there would ever be
place for other affections, for preoccupations outside the tranquil and
bright circle wherein Bonne Maman presided so prettily over the evening
work.

Love is, as one knows, a poor blind creature, deprived of hearing
and speech, and only led by presentiments, divinations, the nervous
faculties of a sick man. It is pitiable indeed to see him wandering,
feeling his way, constantly making false steps, passing his hands over
the supports by which he guides himself with the distrustful awkwardness
of the infirm. At the very moment when Paul was doubting Aline's
sensibility, in announcing to his friends that he was about to start on
a journey which would occupy several days, perhaps several weeks, did
not remark the girl's sudden paleness, did not hear the distressed cry
that escaped her lips:

"You are going away?"

He was going away, going to Tunis, very much troubled at leaving his
poor Nabob in the midst of the pack of furious wolves that surrounded
him. Mora's protection, however, gave him some reassurance; and then,
the journey in question was absolutely necessary.

"And the Territorial?" asked the old accountant, ever returning to the
subject in his mind. "How are things standing there? I see Jansoulet's
name still at the head of the board. You cannot get him out, then, from
that Ali-Baba's cave? Take care--take care!"

"Ah, I know all about that, M. Joyeuse. But, to leave it with honour,
money is needed, much money, a fresh sacrifice of two or three millions,
and we have not got them. That is exactly the reason why I am going to
Tunis to try to wrest from the rapacity of the Bey a slice of that great
fortune which he is retaining in his possession so unjustly. At present
I have still some chance of succeeding, while later on, perhaps--"

"Go, then, and make haste, my dear lad, and if you return, as I wish you
may, with a heavy bag, see that you deal first of all with the Paganetti
gang. Remember that one shareholder less patient than the rest has the
power to smash the whole thing up, to demand an inquiry; and you know
what the inquiry would reveal. Now I come to think of it," added M.
Joyeuse, whose brow had contracted a frown, "I am even surprised that
Hemerlingue, in his hatred for you, has not secretly brought up a few
shares."

He was interrupted by the chorus of imprecations which the name of
Hemerlingue raised from all the young people, who detested the fat
banker for the injury he had done their father, and for the ill-will he
bore that good Nabob, who was adored in the house through Paul de Gery.

"Hemerlingue, the heartless monster! Wretch! That wicked man!"

But amid all these exclamations, the Visionary was following up his
idea of the fat baron becoming a shareholder in the Territorial for the
purpose of dragging his enemy into the courts. And you may imagine the
stupefaction of Andre Maranne, a complete stranger to the whole affair,
when he saw M. Joyeuse turn to him, and, with face purple and swollen
with rage, point his finger at him, with these terrible words:

"The greatest rascal, after all, in this affair, is you, sir!"

"Oh, papa, papa! what are you saying?"

"Eh, what? Ah, forgive me, my dear Andre. I was fancying myself in the
examining magistrate's private room, face to face with that rogue. It is
my confounded brain that is always running away with me."

All broke into uproarious laughter, which escaped into the outer air
through the open windows, and went to mingle with the thousand noises of
moving vehicles and people in their Sunday clothes going up the Avenue
des Ternes. The author of _Revolt_ took advantage of the diversion to
ask whether they were not soon going to start. It was late--the good
places would be taken in the Bois.

"To the Bois de Boulogne, on Sunday!" exclaimed Paul de Gery.

"Oh, our Bois is not yours," replied Aline with a smile. "Come with us,
and you will see."

Did it ever happen to you, in the course of a solitary and contemplative
walk, to lie down on your face in the undergrowth of a forest, amid that
vegetation which springs up, various and manifold, through the fallen
autumn leaves, and allow your eyes to wander along the level of the
ground before you? Little by little the sense of height is lost, the
interwoven branches of the oaks above your head form an inaccessible
sky, and you behold a new forest extending beneath the other, opening
its deep avenues filled by a green and mysterious light, and formed
of tiny shrubs or root fibres taking the appearance of the stems
of sugar-canes, of severely graceful palm-trees, of delicate cups
containing a drop of water, of many-branched candlesticks bearing little
yellow lights which the wind blows on as it passes. And the miraculous
thing is, that beneath these light shadows live minute plants and
thousand of insects whose existence, observed from so near at hand, is
a revelation to you of all the mysteries. An ant, bending like a
wood-cutter under his burden, drags after it a splinter of bark bigger
than itself; a beetle makes its way along a blade of grass thrown like a
bridge from one stem to another; while beneath a lofty bracken standing
isolated in the middle of a patch of velvety moss, a little blue or red
insect waits, with antennae at attention, for another little insect
on its way through some desert path over there to arrive at the
trysting-place beneath the giant tree. It is a small forest beneath a
great one, too near the soil to be noticed by its big neighbours, too
humble, too hidden to be reached by its great orchestra of song and
storm.

A similar revelation awaits in the Bois de Boulogne. Behind those sanded
drives, watered and clean, whereon files of carriage-wheels moving
slowly round the lake trace all day long a worn and mechanical furrow,
behind that admirably set scene of trimmed green hedges, of captive
water, of flowery rocks, the true Bois, a wild wood with perennial
undergrowth, grows and flourishes, forming impenetrable recesses
traversed by narrow paths and bubbling springs.

This is the Bois of the children, the Bois of the humble, the little
forest beneath the great one. And Paul, who knew only the long avenues
of the aristocratic Parisian promenades, the sparkling lake perceived
from the depths of a carriage or from the top of a coach in a drive back
from Longchamps, was astonished to see the deliciously sheltered nook to
which his friends had led him. It was on the banks of a pond lying like
a mirror under willow-trees, covered with water-lilies, with here and
there large white shimmering spaces where sunbeams fell and lay on the
bright surface.

On the sloping bank, sheltered by the boughs of trees where the leaves
were already thick, they sat down to listen to the reading of the play,
and the pretty, attentive faces, the skirts lying puffed out over the
grass, made one think of some Decameron, more innocent and chaste, in
a peaceful atmosphere. To complete this pleasant country scene, two
windmill-sails seen through an opening in the branches were revolving
over in the direction of Suresnes, while of the dazzling and luxurious
vision to be met at every cross-roads in the Bois there reached them
only a confused and perpetual murmur, which one ended by ceasing to
notice. The poet's voice alone rose in the silence, the verses fell on
the air tremblingly, repeated below the breath by other moved lips, and
stifled sounds of approbation greeted them, with shudders at the tragic
passages. Bonne Maman was even seen to wipe away a big tear. That comes,
you see, from having no embroidery in one's hand!

His first work! That was what the _Revolt_ was for Andre, that first
work always too exuberant and ornate, into which the author throws, to
begin with, whole arrears of ideas and opinions, pent up like the waters
of a river-lock; that first work which is often the richest if not the
best of its writer's productions. As for the fate that awaited it, no
one could predict it; and the uncertainty that hovered over the reading
of the drama added to its own emotion that of each auditor, the hopes,
all arrayed in white, of Mlle. Elise, the fantastic hallucinations of
M. Joyeuse, and the more positive desires of Aline as she installed
in advance the modest fortune of her sister in the nest of an artist's
household, beaten by the winds but envied by the crowd.

Ah, if one of those idle people, taking a turn for the hundredth time
round the lake, overwhelmed by the monotony of his habitual promenade,
had come and parted the branches, how surprised he would have been at
this picture! But would he ever have suspected how much passion, how
many dreams, what poetry and hope there could be contained in that
little green corner, hardly larger than the shadow a fern throws on the
moss?

"You were right; I did not know the Bois," said Paul in a low voice to
Aline, who was leaning on his arm.

They were following a narrow path overarched by the boughs of trees, and
as they talked were moving forward at a quick pace, well in advance
of the others. It was not, however, _pere_ Kontzen's terrace nor his
appetizing fried dishes that drew them on. No; the beautiful lines
which they had just heard had carried them away, lifting them to great
heights, and they had not yet come down to earth again. They walked
straight on towards the ever-retreating end of the road, which opened
out at its extremity into a luminous glory, a mass of sunbeams, as if
all the sunshine of that beautiful day lay waiting for them where it had
fallen on the outskirts of the wood. Never had Paul felt so happy. That
light arm that lay on his arm, that child's step by which his own was
guided, these alone would have made life sweet and pleasant to him, no
less than this walk over the mossy turf of a green path. He would have
told the girl so, simply, as he felt it, had he not feared to alarm that
confidence which Aline placed in him, no doubt because of the sentiments
which she knew he possessed for another woman, and which seemed to hold
at a distance from them every thought of love.

Suddenly, right before them, against the bright background, a group
of persons riding on horseback came in sight, at first vague and
indistinct, then appearing as a man and a woman, handsomely mounted, and
entered the mysterious path among the bars of gold, the leafy shadows,
the thousand dots of light with which the ground was strewn, and which,
displaced by their progress as they cantered along, rose and covered
them with flowery patterns from the chests of the horses to the blue
veil of the lady rider. They came along slowly, capriciously, and the
two young people, who had drawn back into the copse, could see pass
close by them, with a clinking of bits proudly shaken and white with
foam as though after a furious gallop, two splendid animals carrying a
pair of human beings brought very near together by the narrowing of the
path; he, supporting with one arm the supple figure moulded in a dark
cloth habit; she, with a hand resting on the shoulder of her cavalier
and her small head seen in retreating profile beneath the half-dropped
tulle of her veil, resting on it tenderly. This embrace, half disturbed
by the impatience of the horses, that kiss on which their reins became
confused, that passion which stalked in broad day through the Bois with
so great a contempt for public opinion, would have been enough to betray
the duke and Felicia, if the haughty and charming mein of the lady and
the aristocratic ease of her companion, his pallor slightly tinged with
colour as the result of his ride and of Jenkins's miraculous pearls, had
not already betrayed them.

It is not an extraordinary thing to meet Mora in the Bois on a Sunday.
Like his master, he loved to show himself to the Parisians, to advertise
his popularity with all sections of the public; and then the duchess
never accompanied him on that day, and he could make a halt quite at his
ease in that little villa of Saint-James, known to all Paris, whose red
towers, outlined among the trees schoolboys used to point out to each
other in whispers. But only a mad woman, a daring affronter of society
like this Felicia, could have dreamt of advertising herself like this,
with the loss of her reputation forever. A sound of hoofs dying away in
the distance, of shrubs brushed in passing; a few plants that had been
pressed down and were straightening themselves again; branches pushed
out of the way resuming their places--that was all that remained of the
apparition.

"You saw?" said Paul; speaking first.

She had seen, and she had understood, notwithstanding the candour of her
innocence, for a blush spread over her features, one of those feelings
of shame experienced for the faults of those we love.

"Poor Felicia!" she said in a low voice, pitying not only the unhappy
woman who had just passed them, but also him whom this defection must
have smitten to the very heart. The truth is that Paul de Gery had felt
no surprise at this meeting, which justified previous suspicions and the
instinctive aversion which he had felt for Felicia at their dinner some
days before. But he found it pleasant to be pitied by Aline, to feel the
compassion in that voice becoming more tender, in that arm leaning upon
his. Like children who pretend to be ill for the sake of the pleasure
of being fondled by their mother, he allowed his consoler to strive to
appease his grief, speaking to him of his brothers, of the Nabob, and
of his forthcoming trip to Tunis--a fine country, they said. "You must
write to us often, and long letters about the interesting things on the
journey, the place you stay in. For one can see those who are far away
better when one imagines the kind of place they are inhabiting."

So talking, they reached the end of the bowered path terminating in an
immense open glade through which there moved the tumult of the Bois,
carriages and riders on horseback alternating with each other, and the
crowd at that distance seeming to be tramping through a flaky dust
which blended it into a single confused herd. Paul slackened his pace,
emboldened by this last minute of solitude.

"Do you know what I am thinking of?" he said, taking Aline's hand. "I am
thinking that it would be a pleasure to be unhappy so as to be comforted
by you. But however precious your pity may be to me, I cannot allow
you to waste your compassion on an imaginary pain. No, my heart is not
broken, but more alive, on the contrary, and stronger. And if I were to
tell you what miracle it is that has preserved it, what talisman--"

He held out before her eyes a little oval frame in which was set
a simple profile, a pencil outline wherein she recognised herself,
surprised to see herself so pretty, reflected, as it were, in the magic
mirror of Love. Tears came into her eyes without her knowing the reason,
an open spring whose stream beat within her chaste breast. He continued:

"This portrait belongs to me. It was drawn for me. And yet, at the
moment of starting on this journey I have a scruple. I do not wish to
have it except from yourself. Take it, then, and if you find a worthier
friend, some one who loves you with a love deeper and more loyal than
mine, I am willing that you should give it to him."

She had regained her composure, and looking de Gery full in the face
with a serious tenderness, she said:

"If I listened only to my heart, I should feel no hesitation about my
reply: for, if you love me as you say, I am sure that I love you too.
But I am not free; I am not alone in the world. Look yonder."

She pointed to her father and her sisters, who were beckoning to them in
the distance and hastening to come up with them.

"Well, and I myself?" answered Paul quickly. "Have I not similar duties,
similar responsibilities? We are like two widowed heads of families.
Will you not love mine as much as I love yours?"

"True? is it true? You will let me stay with them? I shall be Aline for
you, and Bonne Maman for all our children? Oh! then," exclaimed the dear
creature, beaming with joy, "there is my portrait--I give it to you! And
all my soul with it, too, and forever."




THE JENKINS PEARLS

About a week after his adventure with Moessard, that new complication in
the terrible muddle of his affairs, Jansoulet, on leaving the Chamber,
one Thursday, ordered his coachman to drive him to Mora's house. He had
not paid a visit there since the scuffle in the Rue Royale, and the idea
of finding himself in the duke's presence gave him, through his thick
skin, something of the panic that agitates a boy on his way upstairs
to see the head-master after a fight in the schoolroom. However, the
embarrassment of this first interview had to be gone through. They said
in the committee-rooms that Le Merquier had completed his report, a
masterpiece of logic and ferocity, that it meant an invalidation, and
that he was bound to carry it with a high hand unless Mora, so powerful
in the Assembly, should himself intervene and give him his word of
command. A serious matter, and one that made the Nabob's cheeks flush,
while in the curved mirrors of his brougham he studied his appearance,
his courtier's smiles, trying to think out a way of effecting a
brilliant entry, one of those strokes of good-natured effrontery which
had brought him fortune with Ahmed, and which served him likewise in his
relations with the French ambassador. All this accompanied by beatings
of the heart and by those shudders between the shoulder-blades which
precede decisive actions, even when these are settled within a gilded
chariot.

When he arrived at the mansion by the river, he was much surprised to
notice that the porter on the quay, as on the days of great receptions,
was sending carriages up the Rue de Lille, in order to keep a door free
for those leaving. Rather anxious, he wondered, "What is there going
on?" Perhaps a concert given by the duchess, a charity bazaar, some
festivity from which Mora might have excluded him on account of the
scandal of his last adventure. And this anxiety was augmented still
further when Jansoulet, after having passed across the principal
court-yard amid a din of slamming doors and a dull and continuous rumble
of wheels over the sand, found himself--after ascending the steps--in
the immense entrance-hall filled by a crowd which did not extend beyond
any of the doors leading to the rooms; centring its anxious going
and coming around the porter's table, where all the famous names of
fashionable Paris were being inscribed. It seemed as though a disastrous
gust of wind had gone through the house, carrying off a little of its
calm, and allowing disquiet and danger to filter into its comfort.

"What a misfortune!"

"Ah! it is terrible."

"And so suddenly!"

Such were the remarks that people were exchanging as they met.

An idea flashed into Jansoulet's mind:

"Is the duke ill?" he inquired of a servant.

"Ah, monsieur, he is dying! He will not live through the night!"

If the roof of the palace had fallen in upon his head he would not
have been more utterly stunned. Red lights flashed before his eyes, he
tottered, and let himself drop into a seat on a velvet-covered bench
beside the great cage of monkeys. The animals, over-excited by all this
bustle, suspended by their tails, by their little long-thumbed
hands, were hanging to the bars in groups, and came, inquisitive and
frightened, to make the most ludicrous grimaces at this big, stupefied
man as he sat staring at the marble floor, repeating aloud to himself,
"I am ruined! I am ruined!"

The duke was dying. He had been seized suddenly with illness on the
Sunday after his return from the Bois. He had felt intolerable burnings
in his bowels, which passed through his whole body, searing as with a
red-hot iron, and alternating with a cold lethargy and long periods of
coma. Jenkins, summoned at once, did not say much, but ordered certain
sedatives. The next day the pains came on again with greater intensity
and followed by the same icy torpor, also more accentuated, as if life,
torn up by the roots, were departing in violent spasms. Among those
around him, none was greatly concerned. "The day after a visit to
Saint-James Villa," was muttered in the antechamber, and Jenkins's
handsome face preserved its serenity. He had spoken to two or
three people, in the course of his morning rounds, of the duke's
indisposition, and that so lightly that nobody had paid much attention
to the matter.

Mora himself, notwithstanding his extreme weakness, although he felt his
head absolutely blank, and, as he said, "not an idea anywhere," was far
from suspecting the gravity of his condition. It was only on the third
day, on waking in the morning, that the sight of a tiny stream of blood,
which had trickled from his mouth over his beard and the stained pillow,
had frightened this fastidious man, who had a horror of all human
ills, especially sickness, and now saw it arrive stealthily with its
pollutions, its weaknesses, and the loss of physical self-control,
the first concession made to death. Monpavon, entering the room behind
Jenkins, surprised the anxious expression of the great seigneur faced
by the terrible truth, and at the same time was horrified by the
ravages made in a few hours upon Mora's emaciated face, in which all the
wrinkles of age, suddenly evident, were mingled with lines of suffering,
and those muscular depressions which tell of serious internal lesions.
He took Jenkins aside, while the duke's toilet necessaries were carried
to him--a whole apparatus of crystal and silver contrasting with the
yellow pallor of the invalid.

"Look here, Jenkins, the duke is very ill."

"I am afraid so," said the Irishman, in a low voice.

"But what is the matter with him?"

"What he wanted, _parbleu_!" answered the other in a fury. "One cannot
be young at his age with impunity. This intrigue will cost him dear."

Some evil passion was getting the better of him but he subdued it
immediately, and, puffing out his cheeks as though his head were full of
water, he sighed deeply as he pressed the old nobleman's hands.

"Poor duke! poor duke! Ah, my friend, I am most unhappy!"

"Take care, Jenkins," said Monpavon coldly, disengaging his hands, "you
are assuming a terrible responsibility. What! is the duke as bad
as that?--ps--ps--ps--Will you see nobody? You have arranged no
consultation?"

The Irishman raised his hands as if to say, "What good can it do?"

The other insisted. It was absolutely necessary that Brisset,
Jousseline, Bouchereau, all the great physicians should be called in.

"But you will frighten him."

De Monpavon expanded his chest, the one pride of the old broken-down
charger.

"_Mon Cher_, if you had seen Mora and me in the trenches of
Constantine--ps--ps. Never looked away. We don't know fear. Give notice
to your colleagues. I undertake to inform him."

The consultation took place in the evening with great privacy, the duke
having insisted on this from a singular sense of shame produced by his
illness, by that suffering which discrowned him, making him the equal of
other men. Like those African kings who hide themselves in the recesses
of their palaces to die, he would have wished that men should believe
him carried off, transfigured, become a god. Then, too, he dreaded above
all things the expressions of pity, the condolences, the compassion with
which he knew that his sick-bed would be surrounded; the tears because
he suspected them to be hypocritical, and because, if sincere, they
displeased him still more by their grimacing ugliness.

He had always detested scenes, exaggerated sentiments, everything that
could move him to emotion or disturb the harmonious equilibrium of his
life. Every one knew this, and the order was to keep away from him the
distress, the misery, which from one end of France to the other flowed
towards Mora as to one of those forest refuges lighted during the
night at which all wanderers may knock. Not that he was hard to the
unfortunate; perhaps he may have been too easily moved to the pity which
he regarded as an inferior sentiment, a weakness unworthy of the strong,
and, refusing it to others, he dreaded it for himself, for the integrity
of his courage. Nobody in the palace, then, except Monpavon and Louis
the _valet de chambre_, knew of the visit of those three personages
introduced mysteriously into the Minister of State's apartments. The
duchess herself was ignorant of it. Separated from her husband by the
barriers frequently placed by the political and fashionable life of
the great world between married people, she believed him slightly
indisposed, nervous more than anything else; and had so little suspicion
of a catastrophe that at the very hour when the doctors were mounting
the great, dimly lit staircase at the other end of the palace, her
private apartments were being lit up for a girls' dance, one of those
_bals blancs_ which the ingenuity of the idle world had begun to make
fashionable in Paris.

This consultation was like all others: solemn and sinister. Doctors no
longer wear their great periwigs of the time of Moliere, but they still
assume the same gravity of the priests of Isis, of astrologers bristling
with cabalistic formulae pronounced with sage noddings of the head, to
which, for comical effect, there is only wanting the high pointed cap of
former days. In this case the scene borrowed an imposing aspect from its
setting. In the vast bed-chamber, transformed, heightened, as it were,
in dignity by the immobility of the owner, these grave figures came
forward round the bed on which the light was concentrated, illuminating
amid the whiteness of the linen and the purple of the hangings a face
worn into hollows, pale from lips to eyes, but wrapped in serenity as in
a veil, as in a shroud. The consultants spoke in low tones, cast furtive
glances as each other, or exchanged some barbarous word, remaining
impassive, without even a frown. But this mute and reticent expression
of the doctor and magistrate, this solemnity with which science and
justice hedge themselves about to hide their frailty or ignorance, had
no power to move the duke.

Sitting up in bed, he continued to talk quietly, with the upward glance
of the eye in which it seems as if thought rises before it finally takes
wing, and Monpavon coldly followed his cue, hardening himself against
his own emotion, taking from his friend a last lesson in "form"; while
Louis, in the background, stood leaning against the door leading to the
duchess's apartment, the spectre of a silent domestic in whom detached
indifference is a duty.

The most agitated, nervous man present was Jenkins. Full of obsequious
attentions for his "illustrious colleagues," as he called them, with his
lips pursed up, he hung round their consultation and attempted to
take part in it; but the colleagues kept him at a distance and hardly
answered him, as Fagon--the Fagon of Louis XIV--might have addressed
some empiric summoned to the royal bedside. Old Bouchereau especially
had black looks for the inventor of the Jenkins pearls. Finally, when
they had thoroughly examined and questioned their patient, they retired
to deliberate among themselves in a little room with lacquered ceilings
and walls, filled by an assortment of _bric-a-brac_ the triviality of
which contrasted strangely with the importance of the discussion.

Solemn moment! Anguish of the accused awaiting the decision of his
judges--life, death, reprieve, or pardon!

With his long, white hand Mora continued to stroke his mustache with a
favourite gesture, to talk with Monpavon of the club, of the foyer
of the _Varietes_, asking news of the Chamber, how matters stood with
regard to the Nabob's election--all this coldly, without the least
affectation. Then, tired, no doubt, or fearing lest his glance,
constantly drawn to that curtain opposite him, from behind which the
sentence was to come presently, should betray the emotion which he must
have felt in the depths of his soul, he laid his head on the pillow,
closed his eyes, and did not open them again until the return of the
doctors. Still the same cold and sinister faces, veritable physiognomies
of judges having on their lips the terrible decree of human fate, the
final word which the courts pronounce fearlessly, but which the doctors,
whose science it mocks, elude, and express in periphrases.

"Well, gentlemen, what says the faculty?" demanded the sick man.

There were sundry murmurs of hypocritical encouragement, vague
recommendations; then the three learned physicians hastened to depart,
eager to escape from the responsibility of this disaster. Monpavon
rushed after them. Jenkins remained at the bedside, overwhelmed by the
cruel truths which he had just heard during the consultation. In vain
had he laid his hand on his heart, quoted his famous motto; Bouchereau
had not spared him. It was not the first of the Irishman's clients whom
he had seen thus suddenly collapse; but he fervently hoped that the
death of Mora would act as a salutary warning to the world of fashion,
and that the prefect of police, after this great calamity, would send
the "dealer in cantharides" to retail his drugs on the other side of the
Channel.

The duke understood immediately that neither Jenkins nor Louis would
tell him the true issue of the consultation. He abstained, therefore,
from any insistence in his questionings of them, submitted to their
pretended confidence, affected even to share it, to believe the most
hopeful things they announced to him. But when Monpavon returned, he
summoned him to his bedside, and, confronted by the lie visible even
beneath the make-up of the decrepit old man, remarked:

"Oh, you know--no humbug! From you to me, truth. What do they say? I am
in a very bad way, eh?"

Monpavon prefaced his reply with a significant silence; then brutally,
cynically, for fear of breaking down as he spoke:

"Done for, my poor Augustus!"

The duke received the sentence full in the face without flinching.

"Ah!" he said simply.

He pulled his mustache with a mechanical gesture, but his features
remained motionless. And immediately he made up his mind.

That the poor wretch who dies in a hospital, without home or family,
without other name than the number of his bed, that he should accept
death as a deliverance or bear it as his last trial; that the old
peasant who passes away, bent double, worn out, in his dark and smoky
cellar, that he should depart without regret, savouring in advance
the taste of that fresh earth which he has so many times dug over and
over--that is intelligible. And yet how many, even among such, cling to
existence despite all their misery! how many there are who cry, holding
on to their sordid furniture and to their rags, "I don't want to die!"
and depart with nails broken and bleeding from that supreme wrench. But
here there was nothing of the kind.

To possess all, and to lose all. What a catastrophe!

In the first silence of that dreadful moment, while he heard the sound
of the music coming faintly from the duchess's ball at the other end of
the palace, whatever attached this man to life, power, honour, wealth,
all that splendour must have seemed to him already far away and in an
irrevocable past. A courage of a quite exceptional temper must have
been required to bear up under such a blow without any spur of personal
vanity. No one was present save the friend, the doctor, the servant,
three intimates acquainted with all his secrets; the lights moved back,
left the bed in shadow, and the dying man might quite well have turned
his face to the wall in lamentation of his own fate without being
noticed. But not an instant of weakness, nor of useless demonstration.
Without breaking a branch of the chestnut-trees in the garden, without
withering a flower on the great staircase of the palace, his footsteps
muffled on the thick pile of the carpets, Death had opened the door of
this man of power and signed to him "Come!" And he answered simply, "I
am ready." The true exit of a man of the world, unforeseen, rapid, and
discreet.

Man of the world! Mora was nothing if not that. Passing through life
masked, gloved, breast-plated--breast-plate of white satin, such as
the masters of fence wear on great days; preserving his fighting dress
immaculate and clean; sacrificing everything to that irreproachable
exterior which with him did duty for armour; he had determined on his
_role_ as statesman in the passage from the drawing-room to a wider
scene, and made, indeed, a statesman of the first rank on the strength
alone of his qualities as a man about town, the art of listening and of
smiling, knowledge of men, scepticism, and coolness. That coolness did
not leave him at the supreme moment.

With eyes fixed on the time, so short, which still remained to him--for
the dark visitor was in a hurry, and he could feel on his face the
draught from the door which he had not closed behind him--his one
thought now was to occupy the time well, to satisfy all the obligations
of an end like his, which must leave no devotion unrecompensed nor
compromise any friend. He gave a list of certain persons whom he wished
to see and who were sent for immediately, summoned the head of his
cabinet, and, as Jenkins ventured the opinion that it was a great
fatigue for him, said:

"Can you guarantee that I shall wake to-morrow morning? I feel strong at
this moment; let me take advantage of it."

Louis inquired whether the duchess should be informed. The duke, before
replying, listened to the sounds of music that reached his room through
the open windows from the little ball, sounds that seemed prolonged in
the night on an invisible bow, then answered:

"Let us wait a little. I have something to finish."

They brought to his bedside the little lacquered table that he might
himself sort out the letters which were to be destroyed; but feeling his
strength give way, he called Monpavon.

"Burn everything," said he to him in a faint voice; and seeing him move
towards the fireplace, where a fire was burning despite the warmth of
the season.

"No," he added, "not here. There are too many of them. Some one might
come."

Monpavon took up the writing-table, which was not heavy, and signed to
the _valet de chambre_ to go before him with a light. But Jenkins sprang
forward:

"Stay here, Louis; the duke may want you."

He took hold of the lamp; and moving carefully down the whole length of
the great corridor, exploring the waiting-rooms, the galleries, in which
the fireplaces proved to be filled with artificial plants and quite
emptied of ashes, they wandered like spectres in the silence and
darkness of the vast house, alive only over yonder on the right, were
pleasure was singing like a bird on a roof which is about to fall in
ruins.

"There is no fire anywhere. What is to be done with all this?" they
asked each other in great embarrassment. They might have been two
thieves dragging away a chest which they did not know how to open. At
last Monpavon, out of patience, walked straight to a door, the only one
which they had not yet opened.

"_Ma foi_, so much the worse! Since we cannot burn them, we will drown
them. Hold the light, Jenkins."

And they entered.

Where were they? Saint-Simon relating the downfall of one of those
sovereign existences, the disarray of ceremonies, of dignities,
of grandeurs, caused by death and especially by sudden death, only
Saint-Simon might have found words to tell you. With his delicate,
carefully kept hands, the Marquis de Monpavon did the pumping. The other
passed to him the letters after tearing them into small pieces, packets
of letters, on satin paper, tinted, perfumed, adorned with crests, coats
of arms, small flags with devices, covered with handwritings, fine,
hurried, scrawling, entwining, persuasive; and all those flimsy pages
went whirling one over the other in eddying streams of water which
crumpled them, soiled them, washed out their tender links before
allowing them to disappear with a gurgle down the drain.

They were love-letters and of every kind, from the note of the
adventuress, "_I saw you pass yesterday in the Bois, M. le Duc_," to the
aristocratic reproaches of the last mistress but one, and the complaints
of ladies deserted, and the page, still fresh, of recent confidences.
Monpavon was in the secret of all these mysteries--put a name on each of
them: "That is Mme. Moor. Hallo! Mme. d'Athis!" A confusion of coronets
and initials, of caprices and old habits, sullied by the promiscuity of
this moment, all engulfed in the horrid closet by the light of a lamp,
with the noise of an intermittent gush of water, departing into oblivion
by a shameful road. Suddenly Jenkins paused in his work of destruction.
Two satin-gray letters trembled as he held them in his fingers.

"Who is that?" asked Monpavon, noticing the unfamiliar handwriting and
the Irishman's nervous excitement. "Ah, doctor, if you want to read them
all, we shall never have finished."

Jenkins, his cheeks flushed, the two letters in his hand, was consumed
by a desire to carry them away, to pore over them at his ease, to
martyrize himself with delight by reading them, perhaps also to forge
out of this correspondence a weapon for himself against the imprudent
woman who had signed her name. But the rigorous correctness of the
marquis made him afraid. How could he distract his attention--get him
away? The opportunity occurred of its own accord. Among the letters, a
tiny page written in a senile and shaky hand, caught the attention
of the charlatan, who said with an ingenuous air: "Oh, oh! here is
something that does not look much like a _billet-doux. 'Mon Duc, to the
rescue--I am sinking! The Court of Exchequer has once more stuck its
nose into my affairs.'_"

"What are you reading there?" exclaimed Monpavon abruptly, snatching the
letter from his hands. And immediately, thanks to Mora's negligence in
thus allowing such private letters to lie about, the terrible situation
in which he would be left by the death of his protector returned to his
mind. In his grief, he had not yet given it a thought. He told himself
that in the midst of all his preparations for his departure, the duke
might quite possibly overlook him; and, leaving Jenkins to complete the
drowning of Don Juan's casket by himself, he returned precipitately
in the direction of the bed-chamber. Just as he was on the point of
entering, the sound of a discussion held him back behind the lowered
door-curtain. It was Louis's voice, tearful like that of a beggar in
a church-porch, trying to move the duke to pity for his distress, and
asking permission to take certain bundles of bank-notes that lay in a
drawer. Oh, how hoarse, utterly wearied, hardly intelligible the answer,
in which there could be detected the effort of the sick man to turn over
in his bed, to bring back his vision from a far-off distance already
half in sight:

"Yes, yes; take them. But for God's sake, let me sleep--let me sleep!"

Drawers opened, closed again, a short and panting breath. Monpavon heard
no more of what was going on, and retraced his steps without entering.
The ferocious rapacity of his servant had set his pride upon its guard.
Anything rather than degradation to such a point as that.

The sleep which Mora craved for so insistently--the lethargy, to be more
accurate--lasted a whole night, and through the next morning also, with
uncertain wakings disturbed by terrible sufferings relieved each time by
soporifics. No further attempt was made to nurse him to recovery; they
tried only to soothe his last moments, to help him to slip painlessly
over that terrible last step. His eyes had opened again during this
time, but were already dimmed, fixed in the void on floating shadows,
vague forms like those a diver sees quivering in the uncertain light
under water.

In the afternoon of the Thursday, towards three o'clock, he regained
complete consciousness, and recognising Monpavon, Cardailhac, and two
or three other intimate friends, he smiled to them, and betrayed in a
sentence his only anxiety:

"What do they say about it in Paris?"

They said many things about it, different and contradictory; but very
certainly he was the only subject of conversation, and the news spread
through the town since the morning, that Mora was at his last breath,
agitated the streets, the drawing-rooms, the cafes, the workshops,
revived the question of the political situation in newspaper offices and
clubs, even in porters' lodges and on the tops of omnibuses, in every
place where the unfolded public newspapers commented on this startling
rumour of the day.

Mora was the most brilliant incarnation of the Empire. One sees from a
distance, not the solid or insecure base of the building, but the gilded
and delicate spire, embellished, carved into hollow tracery, added
for the satisfaction of the age. Mora was what was seen in France and
throughout Europe of the Empire. If he fell, the monument would find
itself bereft of all its elegance, split as by some long and irreparable
crack. And how many lives would be dragged down by that sudden fall,
how many fortunes undermined by the weakened reverberations of
the catastrophe! None so completely as that of the big man sitting
motionless downstairs, on the bench in the monkey-house.

For the Nabob, this death was his own death, the ruin, the end of all
things. He was so deeply conscious of it that, when he entered the
house, on learning the hopeless condition of the duke, no expression of
pity, no regrets of any sort, had escaped him, only the ferocious word
of human egoism, "I am ruined!" And this word kept recurring to his
lips; he repeated it mechanically each time that he awoke suddenly
afresh to all the horror of his situation, as in those dangerous
mountain storms, when a sudden flash of lightning illumines the abyss
to its depths, showing the wounding spurs and the bushes on its sides,
ready to tear and scratch the man who should fall.

The rapid clairvoyance which accompanies cataclysms spared him no
detail. He saw the invalidation of his election almost certain, now that
Mora would no longer be there to plead his cause; then the consequences
of the defeat--bankruptcy, poverty, and still worse; for when these
incalculable riches collapse they always bury a little of a man's honour
beneath their ruins. But how many briers, how many thorns, how many
cruel scratches and wounds before arriving at the end! In a week there
would be the Schwalbach bills--that is to say, eight hundred thousand
francs--to pay; indemnity for Moessard, who wanted a hundred thousand
francs, or as the alternative he would apply for the permission of the
Chamber to prosecute him for a misdemeanour, a suit still more sinister
instituted by the families of two little martyrs of Bethlehem against
the founders of the Society; and, on top of all, the complications of
the Territorial Bank. There was one solitary hope, the mission of Paul
de Gery to the Bey, but so vague, so chimerical, so remote!

"Ah, I am ruined! I am ruined!"

In the immense entrance-hall no one noticed his distress. The crowd of
senators, of deputies, of councillors of state, all the high officials
of the administration, came and went around him without seeing him,
holding mysterious consultations with uneasy importance near the two
fireplaces of white marble which faced one another. So many ambitions
disappointed, deceived, hurled down, met in this visit _in extremis_,
that personal anxieties dominated every other preoccupation.

The faces, strangely enough, expressed neither pity nor grief, rather a
sort of anger. All these people seemed to have a grudge against the duke
for dying, as though he had deserted them. One heard remarks of this
kind: "It is not surprising, with such a life as he has lived!" And
looking out of the high windows, these gentlemen pointed out to each
other, amid the going and coming of the equipages in the court-yard, the
drawing up of some little brougham from within which a well-gloved hand,
with its lace sleeve brushing the sash of the door, would hold out a
card with a corner turned back to the footman.

From time to time one of the _habitues_ of the palace, one of those whom
the dying man had summoned to his bedside, appeared in the medley, gave
an order, then went away, leaving the scared expression of his face
reflected on twenty others. Jenkins showed himself thus for a moment,
with his cravat untied, his waistcoat unbuttoned, his cuffs crumpled, in
all the disorder of the battle in which he was engaged upstairs
against a terrible opponent. He was instantly surrounded, besieged with
questions.

Certainly the monkeys flattening their short noses against the bars of
their cage, excited by the unaccustomed tumult, and very attentive to
all that passed about them as though they were occupied in making a
methodical study of human hypocrisy, had a magnificent model in the
Irish physician. His grief was superb, a splendid grief, masculine and
strong, which compressed his lips and made him pant.

"The agony has begun," he said mournfully. "It is only a matter of
hours."

And as Jansoulet came towards him, he said to him emphatically:

"Ah, my friend, what a man! What courage! He has forgotten nobody. Only
just now he was speaking to me of you."

"Really?"

"'The poor Nabob,' said he, 'how does the affair of his election
stand?'"

And that was all. The duke had added no further word.

Jansoulet bowed his head. What had he been hoping? Was it not enough
that at such a moment a man like Mora had given him a thought? He
returned and sat down on his bench, falling back into the stupor which
had been galvanized by one moment of mad hope, and remained until,
without his noticing it, the hall had become nearly deserted. He did not
remark that he was the only and last visitor left, until he heard the
men-servants talking aloud in the waning light of the evening:

"For my part, I've had enough of it. I shall leave service."

"I shall stay on with the duchess."

And these projects, these arrangements some hours in advance of death,
condemned the noble duke still more surely than the faculty.

The Nabob understood then that it was time for him to go, but, first, he
wished to inscribe his name in the visitors' book kept by the porter. He
went up to the table, and leaned over it to see distinctly. The page was
full. A blank space was pointed out to him below a signature in a very
small, spidery hand, such as is frequently written by very fat fingers,
and when he had signed, it proved to be the name of Hemerlingue
dominating his own, crushing it, clasping it round with insidious
flourish. Superstitious, like the true Latin he was, he was struck by
this omen, and went away frightened by it.

Where should he dine? At the club? Place Vendome? To hear still more
talk of this death that obsessed him! He preferred to go somewhere by
chance, walking straight before him, like all those who are a prey to
some fixed idea which they hope to conjure away by rapid movement. The
evening was warm, the air full of sweet scents. He walked along the
quays, and reached the trees of the Cours-la-Reine, then found himself
breathing that air in which is mingled the freshness of watered roads
and the odour of fine dust so characteristic of summer evenings in
Paris. At that hour all was deserted. Here and there chandeliers were
being lighted for the concerts, blazes of gaslight flared among the
green trees. A sound of glasses and plates from a restaurant gave him
the idea of going in.

The strong man was hungry despite all his troubles. He was served under
a veranda with glazed walls backed by shrubs, and facing the great
porch of the Palais de l'Industrie, where the duke, in the presence of a
thousand people, had greeted him as a deputy. The refined, aristocratic
face rose before his memory in the darkness of the sky, while he could
see it also as it lay over yonder on the funereal whiteness of the
pillow; and suddenly, as he ran his eye over the bill of fare presented
to him by the waiter, he noticed with stupefaction that it bore the date
of the 20th of May. So a month had not elapsed since the opening of the
exhibition. It seemed to him like ten years ago. Gradually, however, the
warmth of the meal cheered him. In the corridor he could hear waiters
talking:

"Has anybody heard news of Mora? It appears he is very ill."

"Nonsense! He will get over it, you will see. Men like him get all the
luck."

And so deeply is hope implanted in the human soul, that, despite what
Jansoulet had himself seen and heard, these few words, helped by two
bottles of burgundy and a few glasses of cognac, sufficed to restore
his courage. After all, people had been known to recover from illnesses
quite as desperate. Doctors often exaggerate the ill in order to get
more credit afterward for curing it. "Suppose I called to inquire." He
made his way back towards the house, full of illusion, trusting to that
chance which had served him so many times in his life. And indeed the
aspect of the princely abode had something about it to fortify his
hope. It presented the reassuring and tranquil appearance of ordinary
evenings, from the avenue with its lights at long intervals, majestic
and deserted, to the steps where stood waiting a huge carriage of
old-fashioned shape.

In the antechamber, peaceful also, two enormous lamps were burning. A
footman slept in a corner; the porter was reading before the fireplace.
He looked at the new arrival over his spectacles, made no remark, and
Jansoulet dared ask no question. Piles of newspapers lying on the table
in their wrappers, addressed to the duke, seemed to have been thrown
there as useless. The Nabob took up one of them, opened it, and tried
to read, but quick and gliding steps, a muttered chanting, made him lift
his eyes, and he saw a white-haired and bent old man, decked out in lace
as though he had been an altar, who was praying aloud as he departed
with a long priestly stride, his ample red cassock spreading in a train
over the carpet. It was the Archbishop of Paris, accompanied by two
assistants. The vision, with its murmur as of an icy north wind,
passed quickly before Jansoulet, plunged into the great carriage and
disappeared, carrying away with it his last hope.

"Doing the right thing, _mon cher_," remarked Monpavon, appearing
suddenly at his side. "Mora is an epicurean, brought up in the ideas of
how do you say--you know--what is it you call it? Eighteenth century.
Very bad for the masses, if a man in his position--ps--ps--ps--Ah, he is
the master who sets us all an example--ps--ps--irreproachable manners!"

"Then, it is all over?" said Jansoulet, overwhelmed. "There is no longer
any hope?"

Monpavon signed to him to listen. A carriage rolled heavily along the
avenue on the quay. The visitors' bell rang sharply several times in
succession. The marquis counted aloud: "One, two, three, four." At the
fifth he rose:

"No more hope now. Here comes the other," said he, alluding to the
Parisian superstition that a visit from the sovereign was always fatal
to dying persons. From every side the lackeys hastened up, opened the
doors wide, ranged themselves in line, while the porter, his hat cocked
forward and his staff resounding on the marble floor, announced the
passage of two august shadows, of whom Jansoulet only caught a confused
glimpse behind the liveried domestics, but whom he saw beyond a long
perspective of open doors climbing the great staircase, preceded by
a footman bearing a candelabrum. The woman ascended, erect and proud,
enveloped in a black Spanish mantilla; the man supported himself by the
baluster, slower in his movements and tired, the collar of his light
overcoat turned up above a rather bent back, which was shaken by a
convulsive sob.

"Let us be off, Nabob. Nothing more to be done here," said the old beau,
taking Jansoulet by the arm and drawing him outside. He paused on the
threshold, with raised hand, making a little gesture of farewell in the
direction of the man who lay dying upstairs. "Good-bye old fellow!" The
gesture and the tone were polite, irreproachable, but the voice trembled
a little.

The club in the Rue Royale, which was famous for its gambling parties,
rarely saw one so desperate as the gaming of that night. It commenced at
eleven o'clock and was still going on at five in the morning. Enormous
sums were scattered over the green cloth, changing hands, moved now to
one side, now to the other, heaped up, distributed, regained. Fortunes
were engulfed in this monster play, at the end of which the Nabob, who
had started it to forget his terrors in the hazards of chance, after
singular alternations and runs of luck enough to turn the hair of a
beginner white, retired with winnings amounting to five hundred thousand
francs. On the boulevard the next day they said five millions, and
everybody cried out on the scandal, especially the _Messenger_,
three-quarters filled by an article against certain adventurers
tolerated in the clubs, and who cause the ruin of the most honourable
families.

Alas! what Jansoulet had won hardly represented enough to meet the first
Schwalbach bills.

During this wild play, of which Mora was, however, the involuntary
cause, and, as it were, the soul, his name was not once uttered. Neither
Cardailhac nor Jenkins put in an appearance. Monpavon had taken to his
bed, stricken more deeply than he wished it to be thought. Nobody had
any news.

"Is he dead?" Jansoulet said to himself as he left the club; and he felt
a desire to make a call to inquire before going home. It was no longer
hope that urged him, but that sort of morbid and nervous curiosity which
after a great fire leads the smitten unfortunate people, ruined and
homeless, back to the wreck of their dwellings.

Although it was still very early, and a pink mist of dawn hung in the
sky, the whole mansion stood open as if for a solemn departure. The
lamps still smoked over the fire-places, dust floated about the rooms.
The Nabob advanced amid an inexplicable solitude of desertion to the
first floor, where at last he heard a voice he knew, that of Cardailhac,
who was dictating names, and the scratching of pens over paper. The
clever stage-manager of the festivities in honour of the Bey was
organizing with the same ardour the funeral pomps of the Duc de Mora.
What activity! His excellency had died during the evening; when morning
came already ten thousand letters were being printed, and everybody
in the house who could hold a pen was busy with the writing of the
addresses. Without passing through these improvised offices, Jansoulet
reached the waiting-room, ordinarily so crowded, to-day with all its
arm-chairs empty. In the middle, on a table, lay the hat, cane, and
gloves of M. le Duc, always ready in case he should go out unexpectedly,
so as to save him even the trouble of giving an order. The objects that
we always wear keep about them something of ourselves. The curve of the
hat suggested that of the mustache; the light-coloured gloves were ready
to grasp the supple and strong Chinese cane; the total effect was one
of life and energy, as if the duke were about to appear, stretch out his
hand while talking, take up those things, and go out.

Oh, no. M. le Duc was not going out. Jansoulet had but to approach
the half-open door of the bed-chamber to see on the bed, raised three
steps--always the platform even after death--a rigid, haughty form, a
motionless and aged profile, metamorphosed by the beard's growth of a
night, quite gray; near the sloping pillow, kneeling and burying her
head in the white drapery, was a woman, whose fair hair lay in rippled
disorder, ready to fall beneath the shears of eternal widowhood; then a
priest and a nun, gathered in this atmosphere of watch by the dead, in
which are mingled the fatigue of sleepless nights and the murmurs of
prayer.

The chamber in which so many ambitions had strengthened their wings, so
many hopes and disappointments had throbbed, was wholly given over
now to the peace of passing Death. Not a sound, not a sigh. Only,
notwithstanding the early hour, away yonder, towards the Pont de la
Concorde, a little clarinet, shrill and sharp, could be heard above
the rumbling of the first vehicles; but its exasperating mockery was
henceforth lost on him who lay there asleep, showing to the terrified
Nabob an image of his own destiny, chilled, discoloured, ready for the
tomb.

Others besides Jansoulet found that death-chamber lugubrious: the
windows wide open, the night and the wind entering freely from the
garden, making a strong draught; a human form on a table; the body,
which had just been embalmed; the hollow skull filled with a sponge,
the brain in a basin. The weight of this brain of a statesman was truly
extraordinary. It weighed--it weighed--the newspapers of the period
mentioned the figure. But who remembers it to-day?




THE FUNERAL

"Don't weep, my fairy, you rob me of all my courage. Come, you will be a
great deal happier when you no longer have your terrible demon. You will
go back to Fontainebleau and look after your chickens. The ten thousand
francs from Brahim will help to get you settled down. And then, don't be
afraid, once you are over there I shall send you money. Since this Bey
wants to have sculpture done by me, he will have to pay for it, as you
may imagine. I shall return rich, rich. Who knows? Perhaps a sultana."

"Yes, you will be a sultana, but I--I shall be dead and I shall never
see you again." And the good Crenmitz in despair huddled herself into a
corner of the cab so that she would not be seen weeping.

Felicia was leaving Paris. She was trying to escape the horrible
sadness, the sinister disgust into which Mora's death had thrown her.
What a terrible blow for the proud girl! _Ennui_, pique, had thrown her
into this man's arms; she had given him pride--modesty--all; and now
he had carried all away with him, leaving her tarnished for life, a
tearless widow, without mourning and without dignity. Two or three
visits to Saint-James Villa, a few evenings in the back of some box
at some small theatre, behind the curtain that shelters forbidden and
shameful pleasure, these were the only memories left to her by this
liaison of a fortnight, this loveless intrigue wherein her pride had not
found even the satisfaction of the commotion caused by a big scandal.
The useless and indelible stain, the stupid fall of a woman who does not
know how to walk and who is embarrassed in her rising by the ironical
pity of the passers-by.

For a moment she thought of suicide, then the reflection that it would
be set down to a broken heart arrested her. She saw in a glance the
sentimental compassion of the drawing-rooms, the foolish figure that her
sham passion would cut among the innumberable love affairs of the duke,
and the Parma violets scattered by the pretty Moessards of journalism
on her grave, dug so near the other. Travelling remained to her--one of
those journeys so distant that they take even one's thoughts into a new
world. Unfortunately the money was wanting. Then she remembered that on
the morrow of her great success at the Exhibition, old Brahim Bey had
called to see her, to make her, in behalf of his master, magnificent
proposals for certain great works to be executed in Tunis. She had
said No at the time, without allowing herself to be tempted by Oriental
remuneration, a splendid hospitality, the finest court in the Bardo for
a studio, with its surrounding facades of stone in lacework carving. But
now she was quite willing. She had to make but a sign, the agreement
was immediately concluded, and after an exchange of telegrams, a hasty
packing and shutting up of the house, she set out for the railway
station as if for a week's absence, astonished herself by her prompt
decision, flattered on all the adventurous and artistic sides of her
nature by the hope of a new life in an unknown country.

The Bey's pleasure yacht was to await her at Genoa; and in anticipation,
closing her eyes in the cab which was taking her to the station, she
could see the white stone buildings of an Italian port embracing an
iridescent sea where the sunshine was already Eastern, where everything
sang, to the very swelling of the sails on the blue water. Paris, as it
happened, was muddy that day, uniformly gray, flooded by one of those
continuous rains of which it seems to have the special property, rains
that seem to have risen in clouds from its river, from its smoke, from
its monster's breath, and to fall in torrents from its roofs, from
its spouts, from the innumerable windows of its garrets. Felicia
was impatient to get away from this gloomy Paris, and her feverish
impatience found fault with the cabmen who made slow progress with the
horses, two sorry creatures of the veritable cab-horse type, with an
inexplicable block of carriages and omnibuses crowded together in the
vicinity of the Pont de la Concorde.

"But go on, driver, go on, then."

"I cannot, madame. It is the funeral procession."

She put her head out of the window and drew it back again immediately,
terrified. A line of soldiers marching with reversed arms, a confusion
of caps and hats raised from the forehead at the passage of an endless
cortege. It was Mora's funeral procession defiling past.

"Don't stop here. Go round," she cried to the cabman.

The vehicle turned about with difficulty, dragging itself regretfully
from the superb spectacle which Paris had been awaiting for four days;
it remounted the avenues, took the Rue Montaigne, and, with its slow
and surly little trot, came out at the Madeleine by the Boulevard
Malesherbes. Here the crowd was greater, more compact.

In the misty rain, the illuminated stained-glass windows of the church,
the dull echo of the funeral chants beneath the lavishly distributed
black hangings under which the very outline of the Greek temple was
lost, filled the whole square with a sense of the office in course of
celebration, while the greater part of the immense procession was still
squeezed up in the Rue Royale, and as far even as the bridges a long
black line connecting the dead man with that gate of the Legislative
Assembly through which he had so often passed. Beyond the Madeleine
the highway of the boulevard stretched away empty, and looking bigger
between two lines of soldiers with arms reversed, confining the curious
to the pavements black with people, all the shops closed, and the
balconies, in spite of the rain, overflowing with human beings all
leaning forward in the direction of the church, as if to see a mid-Lent
festival or the home-coming of victorious troops. Paris, hungry for the
spectacular, constructs it indifferently out of anything, civil war as
readily as the burial of a statesman.

It was necessary for the cab to retrace its course again and to make a
new circuit; and it is easy to imagine the bad temper of the driver and
his beasts, all three of them Parisian in soul and passions, at having
to deprive themselves of so fine a show. Then, as all the life of Paris
had been drawn into the great artery of the boulevard, there began
through the deserted and silent streets--a capricious and irregular
drive--the snail-like progress of a cab taken by the hour. First
touching the extreme points of the Faubourg Saint-Martin and the
Faubourg Saint-Denis, returning again towards the centre, and at the
conclusion of circuits and dodges finding always the same obstacle in
ambush, the same crowd, some fragment of the black defile perceived for
a moment at the branching of a street, unfolding itself in the rain to
the sound of muffled drums--a dull and heavy sound, like that of earth
falling on a coffin-lid.

What torture for Felicia! It was her weakness and her remorse crossing
Paris in this solemn pomp, this funeral train, this public mourning
reflected by the very clouds; and the proud girl revolted against this
affront done her by fate, and tried to escape from it to the back of
the carriage, where she remained exhausted with eyes closed, while old
Crenmitz, believing her nervousness to be grief, did her best to comfort
her, herself wept over their separation, and hiding also, left the
entire window of the cab to the big Algerian hound with his finely
modelled head scenting the wind, and his two paws resting in the
sash with an heraldic stiffness of pose. Finally, after a thousand
interminable windings, the cab suddenly came to a halt, jolted on again
with difficulty amid cries and abuse, then, tossed about, the luggage on
top threatening its equilibrium, it ended by coming to a full stop, held
prisoner, as it were, at anchor.

"_Bon Dieu!_ what a mass of people!" murmured the Crenmitz, terrified.

Felicia came out of her stupor.

"Where are we?"

Under a colourless, smoky sky, blotted out by a fine network of rain and
stretched like gauze over everything, there lay an immense space filled
by an ocean of humanity surging from all the streets that led to it,
and motionless around a lofty column of bronze, which dominated this sea
like the gigantic mast of a sunken vessel. Cavalry in squadrons,
with swords drawn, guns in batteries stood at intervals along an open
passage, awaiting him who was to come by, perhaps in order to try to
retake him, to carry him off by force from the formidable enemy who was
bearing him away. Alas! all the cavalry charges, all the guns could be
of no avail here. The prisoner was departing, firmly guarded, defended
by a triple wall of hardwood, metal, and velvet, impervious to
grape-shot; and it was not from those soldiers that he could hope for
his deliverance.

"Get away from this. I will not stay here," said Felicia, furious,
plucking at the wet box-coat of the driver, and seized by a wild dread
at the thought of the nightmare which was pursuing her, of _that_
which she could hear coming in a frightful rumbling, still distant,
but growing nearer from minute to minute. At the first movement of the
wheels, however, the cries and shouts broke out anew. Thinking that he
would be allowed to cross the square, the driver had penetrated with
great difficulty to the front ranks of the crowd; it now closed behind
him and refused to allow him to go forward. There they had to remain,
to endure those odours of common people and of alcohol, those curious
glances, already fired by the prospect of an exceptional spectacle. They
stared rudely at the beautiful traveller who was starting off with
so many trunks, and a dog of such size for her defender. Crenmitz was
horribly afraid; Felicia, for her part, could think of only one thing,
and that was that _he_ was about to pass before her eyes, that she would
be in the front rank to see him.

Suddenly a great shout "Here it comes!" Then silence fell on the whole
square at last at the end of three weary hours of waiting.

It came.

Felicia's first impulse was to lower the blind on her side, on the side
past which the procession was about to pass. But at the rolling of the
drums close at hand, seized by the nervous wrath at her inability to
escape the obsession of the thing, perhaps also infected by the morbid
curiosity around her, she suddenly let the blind fly up, and her pale
and passionate little face showed itself at the window, supported by her
two clinched hands.

"There! since you will have it: I am watching you."

As a funeral it was as fine a thing as can be seen, the supreme honours
rendered in all their vain splendour, as sonorous, as hollow as the
rhythmic accompaniment on the muffled drums. First the white surplices
of the clergy, amid the mourning drapery of the first five carriages;
next, drawn by six black horses, veritable horses of Erebus, there
advanced the funeral car, all beplumed, fringed and embroidered in
silver, with big tears, heraldic coronets surmounting gigantic M's,
prophetic initials which seemed those of Death himself, _La Mort_ made
a duchess decorated with the eight waving plumes. So many canopies and
massive hangings hid the vulgar body of the hearse, as it trembled and
quivered at each step from top to bottom as though crushed beneath the
majesty of its dead burden. On the coffin, the sword, the coat, the
embroidered hat, parade undress--which had never been worn--shone with
gold and mother-of-pearl in the darkened little tent formed by the
hangings and among the bright tints of fresh flowers telling of spring
in spite of the sullenness of the sky. At a distance of ten paces came
the household servants of the duke; then, behind, in majestic isolation,
the cloaked officer bearing the emblems of honour--a veritable display
of all the orders of the whole world--crosses, multicoloured ribbons,
which covered to overflowing the cushion of black velvet with silver
fringe.

The master of ceremonies came next, in front of the representatives of
the Legislative Assembly--a dozen deputies chosen by lot, among them
the tall figure of the Nabob, wearing the official costume for the first
time, as if ironical Fortune had desired to give to the representative
on probation a foretaste of all parliamentary joys. The friends of the
dead man, who followed, formed a rather small group, singularly well
chosen to exhibit in its crudity the superficiality and the void of that
existence of a great personage reduced to the intimacy of a theatrical
manager thrice bankrupt, of a picture-dealer grown wealthy through
usuary, of a nobleman of tarnished reputation, and of a few men about
town without distinction. Up to this point everybody was walking on foot
and bareheaded; among the parliamentary representatives there were only
a few black skull-caps, which had been put on timidly as they approached
the populous districts. After them the carriages began.

At the death of a great warrior it is the custom for the funeral convoy
to be followed by the favourite horse of the hero, his battle charger,
regulating to the slow step of the procession that dancing step excited
by the smell of powder and the pageantry of standards. In this case,
Mora's great brougham, that "C-spring" which used to bear him to
fashionable or political gatherings, took the place of that companion
in victory, its panels draped with black, its lamps veiled in long
streamers of light crape, floating to the ground with undulating
feminine grace. These veiled lamps constituted a new fashion for
funerals--the supreme "chic" of mourning; and it well became this dandy
to give a last lesson in elegance to the Parisians, who flocked to his
obsequies as to a "Longchamps" of death.

Three more masters of ceremony; then came the impassive official
procession, always the same for marriages, deaths, baptisms, openings
of Parliament, or receptions of sovereigns, the interminable cortege of
glittering carriages, with large windows and showy liveries bedizened
with gilt, which passed through the midst of the dazzled people, to
whom they recalled fairy-tales, Cinderella chariots, while evoking those
"Oh's!" of admiration that mount and die away with the rockets on the
evenings of firework displays. And in the crowd there was always to be
found some good-natured policeman, some learned little grocer sauntering
round on the lookout for public ceremonies, ready to name in a loud
voice all the people in the carriages, as they defiled past, with their
regulation escorts of dragoons, cuirassiers, or Paris guards.

First the representatives of the Emperor, the Empress and all the
Imperial family; after these, in the hierarchic order, cunningly
elaborated, and the least infraction of which might have been the cause
of grave conflicts between the various departments of the State--the
members of the Privy Council, the Marshals, the Admirals, the High
Chancellor of the Legion of Honour; then the Senate, the Legislative
Assembly, the Council of State, the whole organization of the law and of
the university, the costumes, the ermine, the headgear of which took
you back to the days of old Paris--an air of something stately and
antiquated, out of date in our sceptical epoch of the workman's blouse
and the dress-coat.

Felicia, to avoid her thoughts, voluntarily fixed her eyes upon this
monotonous defile, exasperating in its length; and little by little a
torpor stole over her, as if on a rainy day she had been turning over
the leaves of an album of engravings, a history of official costumes
from the most remote times down to our own day. All these people, seen
in profile, still and upright, behind the large glass panes of the
carriage windows, had indeed the appearance of personages in coloured
plates, sitting well forward on the edge of the seats in order that
the spectators should miss nothing of their golden embroideries, their
palm-leaves, their galloons, their braids--puppets given over to the
curiosity of the crowd--and exposing themselves to it with an air of
indifference and detachment.

Indifference! That was the most special characteristic of this funeral.
It was to be felt everywhere, on people's faces and in their hearts, as
well among these functionaries of whom the greater part had only known
the duke by sight, as in the ranks on foot between his hearse and his
brougham, his closest friends, or those who had been in daily attendance
upon him. The fat minister, Vice-President of the Council, seemed
indifferent, and even glad, as he held in his powerful fist the strings
of the pall and seemed to draw it forward, in more haste than the horses
and the hearse to conduct to his six feet of earth the enemy of twenty
years' standing, the eternal rival, the obstacle to all his ambitions.
The other three dignitaries did not advance with the same vigour, and
the long cords floated loosely in their weary or careless hands with
significant slackness. The priests were indifferent by profession.
Indifferent were the servants of his household, whom he never called
anything but "_chose_," and whom he treated really like "things."
Indifferent was M. Louis, for whom it was the last day of servitude, a
slave become emancipated, rich enough to enjoy his ransom. Even among
the intimate friends of the dead man this glacial cold had penetrated.
Yet some of them had been deeply attached to him. But Cardailhac was too
busy superintending the order and the progress of the procession to give
way to the least emotion, which would, besides, have been foreign to his
nature. Old Monpavon, stricken to the heart, would have considered the
least bending of his linen cuirass and of his tall figure a piece of
deplorably bad taste, totally unworthy of his illustrious friend. His
eyes remained as dry and glittering as ever, since the undertakers
provide the tears for great mournings, embroidered in silver on black
cloth. Some one was weeping, however, away yonder among the members of
the committee; but he was expending his compassion very naively upon
himself. Poor Nabob! softened by that music and splendour, it seemed to
him that he was burying all his ambitions of glory and dignity. And his
was but one more variety of indifference.

Among the public, the enjoyment of a fine spectacle, the pleasure of
turning a week-day into a Sunday, dominated every other sentiment.
Along the line of the boulevards, the spectators on the balconies almost
seemed disposed to applaud; here, in the populous districts, irreverence
was still more frankly manifest. Jests, blackguardly wit at the expense
of the dead man and his doings, known to all Paris, laughter raised by
the tall hats of the rabbis, the pass-word of the council experts, all
were heard in the air between two rolls of the drum. Poverty, forced
labour, with its feet in the wet, wearing its blouse, its apron, its
cap raised from habit, with sneering chuckle watched this inhabitant of
another sphere pass by, this brilliant duke, severed now from all his
honours, who perhaps while living had never paid a visit to that end of
the town. But there it is. To arrive up yonder, where everybody has to
go, the common route must be taken, the Faubourg Saint-Antoine, the Rue
de la Roquette as far as that great gate where the _octroi_ is collected
and the infinite begins. And well! it does one good to see that lordly
persons like Mora, dukes, ministers, follow the same road towards
the same destination. This equality in death consoles for many of the
injustices of life. To-morrow bread will seem less dear, wine better,
the workman's tool less heavy, when he will be able to say to himself
as he rises in the morning, "That old Mora, he has come to it like the
rest!"

The procession still went on, more fatiguing even than lugubrious. Now
it consisted of choral societies, deputations from the army and the
navy, officers of all descriptions, pressing on in a troop in advance
of a long file of empty vehicles--mourning-coaches, private
carriages--present for reasons of etiquette. Then the troops followed
in their turn, and into the sordid suburb, that long Rue de la Roquette,
already swarming with people as far as eye could reach, there plunged
a whole army, foot-soldiers, dragoons, lancers, carabineers, heavy guns
with their great mouths in the air, ready to bark, making pavement
and windows tremble, but not able to drown the rolling of the drums--a
sinister and savage rolling which suggested to Felicia's imagination
some funeral of an African chief, at which thousands of sacrificed
victims accompany the soul of a prince so that it shall not pass alone
into the kingdom of spirits, and made her fancy that perhaps this
pompous and interminable retinue was about to descend and disappear in
the superhuman grave large enough to receive the whole of it.

"_Now and in the hour of our death. Amen_," Crenmitz murmured, while the
cab swayed from side to side in the lighted square, and high in space
the golden statue of Liberty seemed to be taking a magic flight; and the
old dancer's prayer was perhaps the one note of sincere feeling called
forth on the immense line of the funeral procession.

All the speeches are over; three long speeches as icy as the vault
into which the dead man has just descended, three official declamations
which, above all, have provided the orators with an opportunity of
giving loud voice to their own devotion to the interests of the dynasty.
Fifteen times the guns have roused the many echoes of the cemetery,
shaken the wreaths of jet and everlasting flowers--the light _ex-voto_
offerings suspended at the corners of the monuments--and while a reddish
mist floats and rolls with a smell of gunpowder across the city of the
dead, ascends and mingles slowly with the smoke of factories in the
plebeian district, the innumerable assembly disperses also, scattered
through the steep streets, down the lofty steps all white among the
foliage, with a confused murmur, a rippling as of waves over rocks.
Purple robes, black robes, blue and green coats, shoulder-knots of gold,
slender swords, of whose safety the wearers assure themselves with
their hands as they walk, all hasten to regain their carriages. People
exchange low bows, discreet smiles, while the mourning-coaches tear down
the carriage-ways at a gallop, revealing long lines of black coachmen,
with backs bent, hats tilted forward, the box-coats flying in the wind
made by their rapid motion.

The general impression is one of thankfulness to have reached the end
of a long and fatiguing performance, a legitimate eagerness to quit the
administrative harness and ceremonial costumes, to unbuckle sashes, to
loosen stand-up collars and neckbands, to slacken the tension of facial
muscles, which had been subject to long restraint.

Heavy and short, dragging along his swollen legs with difficulty,
Hemerlingue was hastening towards the exit, declining the offers which
were made to him of a seat in this or that carriage, since he knew well
that his own alone was of size adequate to cope with his proportions.

"Baron, Baron, this way. There is room for you."

"No, thank you. I want to walk to straighten my legs."

And to avoid these invitations, which were beginning to embarrass him,
he took an almost deserted pathway, one that proved too deserted indeed,
for hardly had he taken a step along it before he regretted it. Ever
since entering the cemetery he had had but one preoccupation--the fear
of finding himself face to face with Jansoulet, whose violence of temper
he knew, and who might well forget the sacredness of the place, and even
in Pere Lachaise renew the scandal of the Rue Royale. Two or three times
during the ceremony he had seen the great head of his old chum emerge
from among the crowd of insignificant types which largely composed the
company and move in his direction, as though seeking him and desiring
a meeting. Down there, in the main road, there would, at any rate,
have been people about in case of trouble, while here--Brr--It was this
anxiety that made him quicken his short step, his panting breaths, but
in vain. As he looked round, in his fear of being followed, the strong,
erect shoulders of the Nabob appeared at the entrance to the path.
Impossible for the big man to slip away through one of the narrow
passages left between the tombs, which are placed so close together that
there is not even space to kneel. The damp, rich soil slipped and gave
way beneath his feet. He decided to walk on with an air of indifference,
hoping that perhaps the other might not recognise him. But a hoarse and
powerful voice cried behind him:

"Lazarus!"

His name--the name of this rich man--was Lazarus. He made no reply, but
tried to catch up a group of officers who were moving on, very far in
front of him.

"Lazarus! Oh, Lazarus!"

Just as in old times on the quay of Marseilles. Under the influence of
old habit he was tempted to stop; then the remembrance of his infamies,
of all the ill he had done the Nabob, that he was still occupied in
doing him, came back to him suddenly with a horrible fear so strong
that it amounted to a paroxysm, when an iron hand laid hold of him
unceremoniously. A sweat of terror broke out over all his flabby limbs,
his face became still more yellow, his eyes blinked in anticipation of
the formidable blow which he expected to come, while his fat arms were
instinctively raised to ward it off.

"Oh, don't be afraid. I wish you no harm," said Jansoulet sadly. "Only I
have come to beg you to do no more to me."

He stooped to breathe. The banker, bewildered and frightened, opened
wide his round owl's eyes in presence of this suffocating emotion.

"Listen, Lazarus; it is you who are the stronger in this war we
have been waging on each other for so long. I am down; yes, down. My
shoulders have touched the ground. Now, be generous; spare your old
chum. Give me quarter; come, give me quarter."

This southerner was trembling, defeated and softened by the emotional
display of the funeral ceremony. Hemerlingue, as he stood facing him,
was hardly more courageous. The gloomy music, the open grave, the
speeches, the cannonade of that lofty philosophy of inevitable death,
all these things had worked on the feelings of this fat baron. The voice
of his old comrade completed the awakening of whatever there remained of
human in that packet of gelatine.

His old chum! It was the first time for ten years--since their
quarrel--that he had seen him so near. How many things were recalled to
him by those sun-tanned features, those broad shoulders, so ill adapted
for the wearing of embroidered coats! The thin woollen rug full of
holes, in which they used to wrap themselves both to sleep on the bridge
of the _Sinai_, the food shared in brotherly fashion, the wanderings
through the burned-up country round Marseilles, where they used to steal
big onions and eat them raw by the side of some ditch, the dreams, the
schemings, the pence put into a common fund, and, when fortune had begun
to smile on them, the fun they had had together, those excellent quiet
little suppers over which they would tell each other everything, with
their elbows on the table.

How can one ever reach the point of seriously quarrelling when one knows
the other so well, when they have lived together like two twins at the
breast of the lean and strong nurse, Poverty, sharing her sour milk and
her rough caresses! These thoughts passed through Hemerlingue's mind
like a flash of lightning. Almost instinctively he let his heavy hand
fall into the one which the Nabob was holding out to him. Something of
the primitive animal was roused in them, something stronger than their
enmity, and these two men, each of whom for ten years had been trying
to bring the other to ruin and disgrace, fell to talking without any
reserve.

Generally, between friends newly met, after the first effusions are
over, a silence comes as if they had no more to tell each other, while
it is in reality the abundance of things, their precipitate rush, that
prevents them from finding utterance. The two chums had touched that
condition; but Jansoulet kept a tight grasp on the banker's arm, fearing
to see him escape and resist the kindly impulse he had just roused.

"You are not in a hurry, are you? We can take a little walk, if you
like. It has stopped raining, the air is pleasant; one feels twenty
years younger."

"Yes, it is pleasant," said Hemerlingue; "only I cannot walk for long;
my legs are heavy."

"True, your poor legs. See, there is a bench over there. Let us go and
sit down. Lean on me, old friend."

And the Nabob, with brotherly aid, led him to one of those benches
dotted here and there among the tombs, on which those inconsolable
mourners rest who make the cemetery their usual walk and abode. He
settled him in his seat, gazed upon him tenderly, pitied him for his
infirmity, and, following what was quite a natural channel in such a
spot, they came to talking of their health, of the old age that was
approaching. This one was dropsical, the other subject to apoplectic
fits. Both were in the habit of dosing themselves with the Jenkins
pearls, a dangerous remedy--witness Mora, so quickly carried off.

"My poor duke!" said Jansoulet.

"A great loss to the country," remarked the banker with an air of
conviction.

And the Nabob added naively:

"For me above all, for me; for, if he had lived--Ah! what luck you have,
what luck you have!"

Fearing to have wounded him, he went on quickly:

"And then, too, you are clever, so very clever."

The baron looked at him with a wink so droll, that his little black
eyelashes disappeared amid his yellow fat.

"No," said he, "it is not I who am clever. It is Marie."

"Marie?"

"Yes, the baroness. Since her baptism she has given up her name of
Yamina for that of Marie. She is a real sort of woman. She knows more
than I do myself about banking and Paris and business. It is she who
manages everything at home."

"You are very fortunate," sighed Jansoulet. His air of gloom told a long
story of qualities missing in Mlle. Afchin. Then, after a silence, the
baron resumed:

"She has a great grudge against you, Marie, you know. She will not be
pleased when she hears that we have been talking together."

A frown passed over his heavy brow, as though he were regretting their
reconciliation, at the thought of the scene which he would have with his
wife. Jansoulet stammered:

"I have done her no harm, however."

"Come, come, neither of you has been very nice to her. Think of the
affront put upon her when we called after our marriage. Your wife
sending word to us that she was not in the habit of receiving quondam
slaves. As though our friendship ought not to have been stronger than a
prejudice. Women don't forget things of that kind."

"But no responsibility lay with me for that, old friend. You know how
proud those Afchins are."

He was not proud himself, poor man. His mien was so woebegone, so
supplicating under his friend's frown, that he moved him to pity.
Decidedly, the cemetery had softened the baron.

"Listen, Bernard; there is only one thing that counts. If you want us to
be friends, as formerly, and this reconciliation not to be wasted, you
will have to get my wife to consent. Without her nothing can be done.
When Mlle. Afchin shut her door in our faces you let her have her way,
did you not? In the same way, on my side, if Marie said to me when I go
home, 'I will not let you be friends,' all my protestations now would
not prevent me from throwing you overboard. For there is no such thing
as friendship in face of such difficulties. Peace at one's fireside is
better than everything else."

"But in that case, what is to be done?" asked the Nabob, frightened.

"I am going to tell you. The baroness is at home every Saturday. Come
with your wife and pay her a visit the day after to-morrow. You will
find the best society in Paris at the house. The past shall not be
mentioned. The ladies will gossip together of chiffons and frocks, talk
of the things women do talk about. And then the whole matter will be
settled. We shall become friends as we used to be; and since you are in
difficulties, well, we will find some way of getting you out of them."

"Do you think so? The fact is I am in terrible straits," said the other,
shaking his head.

Hemerlingue's cunning eyes disappeared again beneath the folds of his
cheeks like two flies in butter.

"Well, yes; I have played a strong game. But you don't lack shrewdness,
all the same. The loan of the fifteen millions to the Bey--it was a good
stroke, that. Ah! you are bold enough; only you hold your cards badly.
One can see your game."

Till now they had been talking in low tones, impressed by the silence
of the great necropolis; but little by little human interests asserted
themselves in a louder key even there where their nothingness lay
exposed on all those flat stones covered with dates and figures, as if
death was only an affair of time and calculation--the desired solution
of a problem.

Hemerlingue enjoyed the sight of his friend reduced to such humility,
and gave him advice on his affairs, with which he seemed to be fully
acquainted. According to him the Nabob could still get out of his
difficulties very well. Everything depended on the validation, on the
turning up of a card. The question was to make sure that it should be a
good one. But Jansoulet had no more confidence. In losing Mora, he had
lost everything.

"You lose Mora, but you regain me; so things are equalized," said the
banker tranquilly.

"No, do you see it is impossible. It is too late. Le Merquier has
completed the report. It is a dreadful one, I believe."

"Well, if he has completed his report, he will have to prepare another."

"How is that to be done?"

The baron looked at him with surprise.

"Ah, you are losing your senses. Why, by paying him a hundred, two
hundred, three hundred thousand francs, if necessary.

"How can you think of such a thing? Le Merquier, that man of integrity!
'My conscience,' as they call him."

This time Hemerlingue's laugh burst forth with an extraordinary
heartiness, and must have reached the inmost recesses of the
neighbouring mausoleums, little accustomed to such disrespect.

"'My conscience' a man of integrity! Ah! you amuse me. You don't know,
then, that he is in my pay, conscience and all, and that--" He paused,
and looked behind him, somewhat startled by a sound which he had heard.
"Listen."

It was the echo of his laughter sent back to them from the depths of a
vault, as if the idea of Le Merquier having a conscience moved even the
dead to mirth.

"Suppose we walk a little," said he, "it begins to be chilly on this
bench."

Then, as they walked among the tombs, he went on to explain to him with
a certain pedantic fatuity, that in France bribes played as important a
part as in the East. Only one had to be a little more delicate about
it here. You veiled your bribes. "Thus, take this Le Merquier, for
instance. Instead of offering him your money openly, in a big purse, as
you would to a local pasha, you go about it indirectly. The man is
fond of pictures. He is constantly having dealings with Schwalbach, who
employs him as a decoy for his Catholic clients. Well, you offer him
some picture--a souvenir to hang on a panel in his study. The whole
point is to make the price quite clear. But you will see. I will take
you round to call on him myself. I will show you how the thing is
worked."

And delighted at the amazement of the Nabob, who, to flatter him,
exaggerated his surprise still further, and opened his eyes wide with an
air of admiration, the banker enlarged the scope of his lesson--made of
it a veritable course of Parisian and worldly philosophy.

"See, old comrade, what one has to look after in Paris, above everything
else, is the keeping up of appearances. They are the only things that
count--appearances! Now you have not sufficient care for them. You go
about town, your waistcoat unbuttoned, a good-humoured fellow, talking
of your affairs, just what you are by nature. You stroll around just
as you would in the bazaars of Tunis. That is how you have come to get
bowled over, my good Bernard."

He paused to take breath, feeling quite exhausted. In an hour he had
walked farther and spoken more than he was accustomed to do in the
course of a whole year. They noticed, as they stopped, that their walk
and conversation had led them back in the direction of Mora's grave,
which was situated just above a little exposed plateau, whence looking
over a thousand closely packed roofs, they could see Montmartre, the
Buttes Chaumont, their rounded outline in the distance looking like high
waves. In the hollows lights were already beginning to twinkle, like
ships' lanterns, through the violet mists that were rising; chimneys
seemed to leap upward like masts, or steamer funnels discharging their
smoke. Those three undulations, with the tide of Pere Lachaise, were
clearly suggestive of waves of the sea, following each other at equal
intervals. The sky was bright, as often happens in the evening of a
rainy day, an immense sky, shaded with tints of dawn, against which
the family tomb of Mora exhibited in relief four allegorical figures,
imploring, meditative, thoughtful, whose attitudes were made more
imposing by the dying light. Of the speeches, of the official
condolences, nothing remained. The soil trodden down all around, masons
at work washing the dirt from the plaster threshold, were all that was
left to recall the recent burial.

Suddenly the door of the ducal tomb shut with a clash of all its
metallic weight. Thenceforth the late Minister of State was to remain
alone, utterly alone, in the shadow of its night, deeper than that which
then was creeping up from the bottom of the garden, invading the winding
paths, the stone stairways, the bases of the columns, pyramids and tombs
of every kind, whose summits were reached more slowly by the shroud.
Navvies, all white with that chalky whiteness of dried bones, were
passing by, carrying their tools and wallets. Furtive mourners, dragging
themselves away regretfully from tears and prayer, glided along the
margins of the clumps of trees, seeming to skirt them as with the silent
flight of night-birds, while from the extremities of Pere Lachaise
voices rose--melancholy calls announcing the closing time. The day of
the cemetery was at its end. The city of the dead, handed over once
more to Nature, was becoming an immense wood with open spaces marked by
crosses. Down in a valley, the window-panes of a custodian's house were
lighted up. A shudder seemed to run through the air, losing itself in
murmurings along the dim paths.

"Let us go," the two old comrades said to each other, gradually coming
to feel the impression of that twilight, which seemed colder than
elsewhere; but before moving off, Hemerlingue, pursuing his train of
thought, pointed to the monument winged at the four corners by the
draperies and the outstretched hands of its sculptured figures.

"Look here," said he. "That was the man who understood the art of
keeping up appearances."

Jansoulet took his arm to aid him in the descent.

"Ah, yes, he was clever. But you are the most clever of all," he
answered with his terrible Gascon intonation.

Hemerlingue made no protest.

"It is to my wife that I owe it. So I strongly recommend you to make
your peace with her, because unless you do----"

"Oh, don't be afraid. We shall come on Saturday. But you will take me to
see Le Merquier."

And while the two silhouettes, the one tall and square, the other
massive and short, were passing out of sight among the twinings of the
great labyrinth, while the voice of Jansoulet guiding his friend, "This
way, old fellow--lean hard on my arm," died away by insensible degrees,
a stray beam of the setting sun fell upon and illuminated behind them
in the little plateau, an expressive and colossal bust, with great brow
beneath long swept-back hair, and powerful and ironic lip--the bust of
Balzac watching them.




LA BARONNE HEMERLINGUE

Just at the end of the long vault, under which were the offices of
Hemerlingue and Sons, the black tunnel which Joyeuse had for ten years
adorned and illuminated with his dreams, a monumental staircase with a
wrought-iron balustrade, a staircase of mediaeval time, led towards the
left to the reception rooms of the baroness, which looked out on the
court-yard just above the cashier's office, so that in summer, when the
windows were open, the ring of the gold, the crash of the piles of
money scattered on the counters, softened a little by the rich and lofty
hangings at the windows, made a mercantile accompaniment to the buzzing
conversation of fashionable Catholicism.

The entrance struck at once the note of this house, as of her who did
the honours of it. A mixture of a vague scent of the sacristy, with
the excitement of the Bourse, and the most refined fashion, these
heterogeneous elements, met and crossed each other's path there, but
remained as much apart as the noble faubourg, under whose patronage
the striking conversion of the Moslem had taken place, was from the
financial quarters where Hemerlingue had his life and his friends.
The Levantine colony--pretty numerous in Paris--was composed in great
measure of German Jews, bankers or brokers who had made colossal
fortunes in the East, and still did business here, not to lose the
habit. The colony showed itself regularly on the baroness's visiting
day. Tunisians on a visit to Paris never failed to call on the wife of
the great banker; and old Colonel Brahim, _charge d'affaires_ of
the Bey, with his flabby mouth and bloodshot eyes, had his nap every
Saturday in the corner of the same divan.

"One seems to smell scorching in your drawing-room, my child," said the
old Princess de Dions smilingly to the newly named Marie, whom M. Le
Merquier and she had led to the font. But the presence of all these
heretics--Jews, Moslems, and even renegades--of these great over-dressed
blotched women, loaded with gold and ornaments, veritable bundles
of clothes, did not hinder the Faubourg Saint-Germain from visiting,
surrounding, and looking after the young convert, the plaything of these
noble ladies, a very obedient puppet, whom they showed, whom they took
out, and whose evangelical simplicities, so piquant by contrast with
her past, they quoted everywhere. Perhaps deep down in the heart of her
amiable patronesses a hope lay of meeting in this circle of returned
Orientals some new subject for conversion, an occasion for filling the
aristocratic Chapel of Missions again with the touching spectacle of one
of those adult baptisms which carry one back to the first days of the
Faith, far away on the banks of the Jordan; baptisms soon to be followed
by a first communion, a confirmation, when baptismal vows are renewed;
occasions when a godmother may accompany her godchild, guide the young
soul, share in the naive transports of a newly awakened belief, and
may also display a choice of toilettes, delicately graduated to the
importance of the sentiment of the ceremony. But not every day does it
happen that one of the leaders of finance brings to Paris an Armenian
slave as his wife.

A slave! That was the blot in the past of this woman from the East,
bought in the bazaar of Adrianople for the Emperor of Morocco, then
sold, when he died and his harem was dispersed, to the young Bey Ahmed.
Hemerlingue had married her when she passed from this new seraglio,
but she could not be received at Tunis, where no woman--Moor, Turk or
European--would consent to treat a former slave as an equal, on account
of a prejudice like that which separates the creoles from the best
disguised quadroons. Even in Paris the Hemerlingues found this
invincible prejudice among the small foreign colonies, constituted,
as they were, of little circles full of susceptibilities and local
traditions. Yamina thus passed two or three years in a complete solitude
whose leisure and spiteful feelings she well knew how to utilize,
for she was an ambitious woman endowed with extraordinary will and
persistence. She learned French thoroughly, said farewell to her
embroidered vests and pantaloons of red silk, accustomed her figure and
her walk to European toilettes, to the inconvenience of long dresses,
and then, one night at the opera, showed the astonished Parisians
the spectacle, a little uncivilized still, but delicate, elegant, and
original, of a Mohammedan in a costume of _Leonard's_.

The sacrifice of her religion soon followed that of her costume. Mme.
Hemerlingue had long abandoned the practices of Mohammedan religion,
when M. le Merquier, their friend and mentor in Paris, showed them that
the baroness's public conversion would open to her the doors of
that section of the Parisian world whose access became more and
more difficult as society became more democratic. Once the Faubourg
Saint-Germain was conquered, all the others would follow. And, in fact,
when, after the announcement of the baptism, they learned that the
greatest ladies in France could be seen at the Baroness Hemerlingue's
Saturdays, Mmes. Gugenheim, Furenberg, Caraiscaki, Maurice Trott--all
wives of millionaires celebrated on the markets of Tunis--gave up their
prejudices and begged to be invited to the former slave's receptions.
Mme. Jansoulet alone--newly arrived with a stock of cumbersome Oriental
ideas in her mind, like her ostrich eggs, her narghile pipe, and the
Tunisian _bric-a-brac_ in her rooms--protested against what she called
an impropriety, a cowardice, and declared that she would never set her
foot at _her_ house. Soon a little retrograde movement was felt round
the Gugenheims, the Caraiscaki, and the other people, as happens at
Paris every time when some irregular position, endeavouring to establish
itself, brings on regrets and defections. They had gone too far to draw
back, but they resolved to make the value of their good-will, of their
sacrificed prejudices, felt, and the Baroness Marie well understood the
shade of meaning in the protecting tone of the Levantines, treating her
as "My dear child," "My dear good girl," with an almost contemptuous
pride. Thenceforward her hatred of the Jansoulets knew no bounds--the
complicated ferocious hatred of the seraglio, with strangling and the
sack at the end, perhaps more difficult to arrive at in Paris than
on the banks of the lake of El Bahaira, but for which she had already
prepared the stout sack and the cord.

One can imagine, knowing all this, what was the surprise and agitation
of this corner of exotic society, when the news spread, not only that
the great Afchin--as these ladies called her--had consented to see the
baroness, but that she would pay her first visit on her next Saturday.
Neither the Fuernbergs nor the Trotts would wish to miss such an
occasion. On her side, the baroness did everything in her power to give
the utmost brilliancy to this solemn reparation. She wrote, she visited,
and succeeded so well, that in spite of the lateness of the season, Mme.
Jansoulet, on arriving at four o'clock at the Faubourg Saint-Honore,
would have seen drawn up before the great arched doorway, side by side
with the discreet russet livery of the Princess de Dion, and of
many authentic _blasons_, the pretentious and fictitious arms, the
multicoloured wheels of a crowd of plutocrat equipages, and the tall
powdered lackeys of the Caraiscaki.

Above, in the reception rooms, was another strange and resplendent
crowd. In the first two rooms there was a going and coming, a continual
passage of rustling silks up to the boudoir where the baroness sat,
sharing her attentions and cajoleries between two very distinct camps.
On one side were dark toilettes, modest in appearance, whose refinement
was appreciable only to observant eyes; on the other, a wild burst of
vivid colour, opulent figures, rich diamonds, floating scarfs, exotic
fashions, in which one felt a regret for a warmer climate, and more
luxurious life. Here were sharp taps with the fan, discreet whispers
from the few men present, some of the _bien pensant_ youth, silent,
immovable, sucking the handles of their canes, two or three figures,
upright behind the broad backs of their wives, speaking with their heads
bent forward, as if they were offering contraband goods for sale; and
in a corner the fine patriarchal beard and violet cassock of an orthodox
Armenian bishop.

The baroness, in attempting to harmonize these fashionable diversities,
to keep her rooms full until the famous interview, moved about
continually, took part in ten different conversations, raising
her harmonious and velvety voice to the twittering diapason which
distinguishes Oriental women, caressing and coaxing, the mind supple
as the body, touching on all subjects, and mixing in the requisite
proportions fashion and charity sermons, theatres and bazaars, the
dressmaker and the confessor. The mistress of the house united a great
personal charm with this acquired science--a science visible even in her
black and very simple dress, which brought out her nun-like pallor, her
houri-like eyes, her shining and plaited hair drawn back from a narrow,
child-like forehead, a forehead of which the small mouth accentuated
the mystery, hiding from the inquisitive the former _favourite's_ whole
varied past, she who had no age, who knew not herself the date of her
birth, and never remembered to have been a child.

Evidently if the absolute power of evil--rare indeed among women,
influenced as they are by their impressionable physical nature by so
many different currents--could take possession of a soul, it would be
in that of this slave, moulded by basenesses, revolted but patient, and
complete mistress of herself, like all those whom the habit of veiling
the eyes has accustomed to lie safely and unscrupulously.

At this moment no one could have suspected the anguish she suffered;
to see her kneeling before the princess, an old, good, straightforward
soul, of whom the Fuernberg was always saying, "Call that a
princess--that!"

"I beg of you, godmamma, don't go away yet."

She surrounded her with all sorts of cajoleries, of graces, of little
airs, without telling her, to be sure, that she wanted to keep her till
the arrival of the Jansoulets, to add to her triumph.

"But," said the princess, pointing out to her the majestic Armenian,
silent and grave, his tasselled hat on his knees, "I must take this poor
bishop to the _Grand Saint-Christophe_, to buy some medals. He would
never get on without me."

"No, no, I wish--you must--a few minutes more." And the baroness threw a
furtive look on the ancient and sumptuous clock in a corner of the room.

Five o'clock already, and the great Afchin not arrived. The Levantines
began to laugh behind their fans. Happily tea was just being served,
also Spanish wines, and a crowd of delicious Turkish cakes which were
only to be had in that house, whose receipts, brought away with her by
the favourite, had been preserved in the harem, like some secrets of
confectionery on our convents. That made a diversion. Hemerlingue, who
on Saturdays came out of his office from time to time to make his bow to
the ladies, was drinking a glass of Madeira near the little table while
talking to Maurice Trott, once the dresser of Said-Pasha, when his wife
approached him, gently and quietly. He knew what anger this impenetrable
calm must cover, and asked her, in a low tone, timidly:

"No one?"

"No one. You see to what an insult you expose me."

She smiled, her eyes half closed, taking with the end of her nail a
crumb of cake from his long black whiskers, but her little transparent
nostrils trembled with a terrible eloquence.

"Oh, she will come," said the banker, his mouth full. "I am sure she
will come."

The noise of dresses, of a train rustling in the next room made the
baroness turn quickly. But, to the great joy of the "bundles," looking
on from their corners, it was not the lady they were expecting.

This tall, elegant blonde, with worn features and irreproachable
toilette, was not like Mlle. Afchin. She was worthy in every way to bear
a name as celebrated as that of Dr. Jenkins. In the last two or three
months the beautiful Mme. Jenkins had greatly changed, become much
older. In the life of a woman who has long remained young there comes a
time when the years, which have passed over her head without leaving a
wrinkle, trace their passage all at once brutally in indelible marks.
People no longer say, on seeing her, "How beautiful she is!" but "How
beautiful she must have been!" And this cruel way of speaking in the
past, of throwing back to a distant period that which was but yesterday
a visible fact, marks a beginning of old age and of retirement, a change
of all her triumphs into memories. Was it the disappointment of
seeing the doctor's wife arrive, instead of Mme. Jansoulet, or did the
discredit which the Duke de Mora's death had thrown on the fashionable
physician fall on her who bore his name? There was a little of each
of these reasons, and perhaps of another, in the cool greeting of the
baroness. A slight greeting on the ends of her lips, some hurried words,
and she returned to the noble battalion nibbling vigorously away. The
room had become animated under the effects of wine. People no longer
whispered; they talked. The lamps brought in added a new brilliance to
the gathering, but announced that it was near its close; some indeed,
not interested in the great event, having already taken their leave. And
still the Jansoulets did not come.

All at once a heavy, hurried step. The Nabob appeared, alone, buttoned
up in his black coat, correctly dressed, but with his face upset, his
eyes haggard, still trembling from the terrible scene which he had left.

She would not come.

In the morning he had told the maids to dress madame for three o'clock,
as he did each time he took out the Levantine with him, when it was
necessary to move this indolent person, who, not being able to accept
even any responsibility whatever, left others to think, decide, act for
her, going willingly where she was desired to go, once she was
started. And it was on this amiability that he counted to take her to
Hemerlingue's. But when, after _dejeuner_, Jansoulet dressed, superb,
perspiring with the effort to put on gloves, asked if madame would soon
be ready, he was told that she was not going out. The matter was grave,
so grave, that putting on one side all the intermediaries of valets and
maids, which they made use of in their conjugal dialogues, he ran up the
stairs four steps at once like a gust of wind, and entered the draperied
rooms of the Levantine.

She was still in bed, dressed in that great open tunic of silk of
two colours, which the Moors call a _djebba_, and in a little cap
embroidered with gold, from which escaped her heavy long black hair, all
entangled round her moon-shaped face, flushed from her recent meal. The
sleeves of her _djebba_ pushed back showed two enormous shapeless arms,
loaded with bracelets, with long chains wandering through a heap of
little mirrors, of red beads, of scent-boxes, of microscopic pipes, of
cigarette cases--the childish toyshop collection of a Moorish woman at
her rising.

The room, filled with the heavy opium-scented smoke of Turkish tobacco,
was in similar disorder. Negresses went and came, slowly removing their
mistress's coffee, the favourite gazelle was licking the dregs of a cup
which its delicate muzzle had overturned on the carpet, while seated at
the foot of the bed with a touching familiarity, the melancholy Cabassu
was reading aloud to madame a drama in verse which Cardailhac was
shortly going to produce. The Levantine was stupefied with this reading,
absolutely astounded.

"My dear," said she to Jansoulet, in her thick Flemish accent, "I don't
know what our manager is thinking of. I am just reading this _Revolt_,
which he is so mad about. But it is impossible. There is nothing
dramatic about it."

"Don't talk to me of the theatre," said Jansoulet, furious, in spite of
his respect for the daughter of the Afchins. "What, you are not dressed
yet? Weren't you told that we were going out?"

They had told her, but she had begun to read this stupid piece. And with
her sleepy air:

"We will go out to-morrow."

"To-morrow! Impossible. We are expected to-day. A most important visit."

"But where?"

He hesitated a second.

"To Hemerlingue's."

She raised her great eyes, thinking he was making game of her. Then he
told her of his meeting with the baron at the funeral of de Mora and the
understanding they had come to.

"Go there, if you like," said she coldly. "But you little know me if you
believe that I, an Afchin, will ever set foot in that slave's house."

Cabassu, prudently seeing what was likely to happen, had fled into a
neighbouring room, carrying with him the five acts of _The Revolt_ under
his arm.

"Come," said the Nabob to his wife, "I see that you do not know the
terrible position I am in. Listen."

Without thinking of the maids or the negresses, with the sovereign
indifference of an Oriental for his household, he proceeded to picture
his great distress, his fortune sequestered over seas, his credit
destroyed over here, his whole career in suspense before the judgment
of the Chamber, the influence of the Hemerlingues on the judge-advocate,
and the necessity of the sacrifice at the moment of all personal feeling
to such important interests. He spoke hotly, tried to convince her, to
carry her away. But she merely answered him, "I shall not go," as if it
were only a matter of some unimportant walk, a little too long for her.

He said trembling:

"See, now, it is not possible that you should say that. Think that my
fortune is at stake, the future of our children, the name you bear.
Everything is at stake in what you cannot refuse to do."

He could have spoken thus for hours and been always met by the same
firm, unshakable obstinacy--an Afchin could not visit a slave.

"Well, madame," said he violently, "this slave is worth more than you.
She has increased tenfold her husband's wealth by her intelligence,
while you, on the contrary----"

For the first time in the twelve years of their married life Jansoulet
dared to hold up his head before his wife. Was he ashamed of this crime
of _lese-majeste_, or did he understand that such a remark would place
an impassable gulf between them? He changed his tone, knelt down before
the bed, with that cheerful tenderness when one persuades children to be
reasonable.

"My little Martha, I beg of you--get up, dress yourself. It is for your
own sake I ask it, for your comfort, for your own welfare. What would
become of you if, for a caprice, a stupid whim, we should become poor?"

But the word--poor--represented absolutely nothing to the Levantine. One
could speak of it before her, as of death before little children.
She was not moved by it, not knowing what it was. She was perfectly
determined to keep in bed in her _djebba_; and to show her decision, she
lighted a new cigarette at her old one just finished; and while the poor
Nabob surrounded his "dear little wife" with excuses, with prayers, with
supplications, promising her a diadem of pearls a hundred times more
beautiful than her own, if she would come, she watched the heavy smoke
rising to the painted ceiling, wrapping herself up in it as in an
imperturbable calm. At last, in face of this refusal, this silence, this
barrier of headstrong obstinacy, Jansoulet unbridled his wrath and rose
up to his full height:

"Come," said he, "I wish it."

He turned to the negresses:

"Dress your mistress at once."

And boor as he was at the bottom, the son of a southern nail-maker
asserting itself in this crisis which moved him so deeply, he threw back
the coverlids with a brutal and contemptuous gesture, knocking down the
innumerable toys they bore, and forcing the half-clad Levantine to
bound to her feet with a promptitude amazing in so massive a person. She
roared at the outrage, drew the folds of her dalmatic against her bust,
pushed her cap sideways on her dishevelled hair, and began to abuse her
husband.

"Never, understand me, never! You may drag me sooner to this----"

The filth flowed from her heavy lips as from a spout. Jansoulet could
have imagined himself in some frightful den of the port of Marseilles,
at some quarrel of prostitutes and bullies, or again at some open-air
dispute between Genoese, Maltese, and Provencal hags, gleaning on the
quays round the sacks of wheat, and abusing each other, crouched in the
whirlwinds of golden dust. She was indeed a Levantine of a seaport,
a spoiled child, who, in the evening, left alone, had heard from her
terrace or from her gondola the sailors revile each other in every
tongue of the Latin seas, and had remembered it all. The wretched man
looked at her, frightened, terrified at what she forced him to hear, at
her grotesque figure, foaming and gasping:

"No, I will not go--no, I will not go!"

And this was the mother of his children, a daughter of the Afchins!
Suddenly, at the thought that his fate was in the hands of this woman,
that it would only cost her a dress to put on to save him--and that time
was flying--that soon it would be too late, a criminal feeling rose to
his brain and distorted his features. He came straight to her, his hands
contracted, with such a terrible expression that the daughter of the
Afchins, frightened, rushed, calling towards the door by which the
_masseur_ had just gone out:

"Aristide!"

This cry, the words, this intimacy of his wife with a servant! Jansoulet
stopped, his rage suddenly calmed; then, with a gesture of disgust, he
flung himself out, slamming the doors, more eager to fly the misfortune
and the horror whose presence he divined in his own home, than to seek
elsewhere the help he had been promised.

A quarter of an hour later he made his appearance at the Hemerlingues',
making a despairing gesture as he entered to the banker, and approached
the baroness stammering the ready-made phrase he had heard repeated so
often the night of his ball, "His wife, very unwell--most grieved not
to have been able to come--" She did not give him time to finish, rose
slowly, unwound herself like a long and slender snake from the pleated
folds of her tight dress, and said, without looking at him, "Oh, I
knew--I knew!" then changed her place and took no more notice of him. He
attempted to approach Hemerlingue, but the good man seemed absorbed in
his conversation with Maurice Trott. Then he went to sit down near Mme.
Jenkins, whose isolation seemed like his own. But, even while talking
to the poor woman, as languid as he was preoccupied, he was watching
the baroness doing the honours of this drawing-room, so comfortable when
compared with his own gilded halls.

It was time to leave. Mme. Hemerlingue went to the door with some of
the ladies, presented her forehead to the old princess, bent under the
benediction of the Armenian bishop, nodded with a smile to the young men
with the canes, found for each the fitting adieu with perfect ease; and
the wretched man could not prevent himself from comparing this Eastern
slave, so Parisian, so distinguished in the best society of the world,
with the other, the European brutalized by the East, stupefied with
Turkish tobacco, and swollen with idleness. His ambitions, his pride as
a husband, were extinguished and humiliated in this marriage of which
he saw the danger and the emptiness--a final cruelty of fate taking from
him even the refuge of personal happiness from all his public disasters.

Little by little the room was emptied. The Levantines disappeared one
after another, leaving each time an immense void in their place. Mme.
Jenkins was gone, and only two or three ladies remained whom Jansoulet
did not know, and behind whom the mistress of the house seemed to
shelter herself from him. But Hemerlingue was free, and the Nabob
rejoined him at the moment when he was furtively escaping to his offices
on the same floor opposite his rooms. Jansoulet went out with him,
forgetting in his trouble to salute the baroness, and once on the
antechamber staircase, Hemerlingue, cold and reserved while he was under
his wife's eye, expanded a little.

"It is very annoying," said he in a low voice, as if he feared to be
overheard, "that Mme. Jansoulet has not been willing to come."

Jansoulet answered him by a movement of despair and savage helplessness.

"Annoying, annoying," repeated the other in a whisper, and feeling for
his key in his pocket.

"Come, old fellow," said the Nabob, taking his hand, "there's no reason,
because our wives don't agree--That doesn't hinder us from remaining
friends. What a good chat the other day, eh?"

"No doubt" said the baron, disengaging himself, as he opened the door
noiselessly, showing the deep workroom, whose lamp burned solitarily
before the enormous empty chair. "Come, good-bye, I must go; I have my
mail to despatch."

"_Ya didon, monci_" (But look here, sir) said the poor Nabob, trying to
joke, and using the _patois_ of the south to recall to his old chum all
the pleasant memories stirred up the other evening. "Our visit to Le
Merquier still holds good. The picture we were going to present to him,
you know. What day?"

"Ah, yes, Le Merquier--true--eh--well, soon. I will write to you."

"Really? You know it is very important."

"Yes, yes. I will write to you. Good-bye."

And the big man shut his door in a hurry, as if he were afraid of his
wife coming.

Two days after, the Nabob received a note from Hemerlingue, almost
unreadable on account of the complicated scrawls, of abbreviations more
or less commercial, under which the ex-sutler hid his entire want of
spelling:

MY DEAR OLD COM_--I cannot accom_ you to Le Mer. _Too bus_ just now.
Besid_ y_ will be _bet_ alone to _tal_. Go _th bold_. You are _exp. A_
Cassette, _ev morn_ 8 to 10.

Yours _faith_

HEM.


Below as a postscript, a very small hand had written very legibly:

"A religious picture, as good as possible."

What was he to think of this letter? Was there real good-will in it,
or polite evasion? In any case hesitation was no longer possible. Time
pressed. Jansoulet made a bold effort, then--for he was very frightened
of Le Merquier--and called on him one morning.

Our strange Paris, alike in its population and its aspects, seems a
specimen map of the whole world. In the Marais there are narrow streets,
with old sculptured worm-eaten doors, with overhanging gables
and balconies, which remind you of old Heidelberg. The Faubourg
Saint-Honore, lying round the Russian church with its white minarets and
golden domes, seems a part of Moscow. On Montmartre I know a picturesque
and crowded corner which is simply Algiers. Little, low, clean houses,
each with its brass plate and little front garden, are English streets
between Neuilly and the Champs-Elysees while all behind the apse of
Saint-Sulpice, the Rue Feron, the Rue Cassette, lying peaceably in the
shadow of its great towers, roughly paved, their doors each with its
knocker, seem lifted out of some provincial and religious town--Tours
or Orleans, for example--in the district of the cathedral or the palace,
where the great over-hanging trees in the gardens rock themselves to the
sound of the bells and the choir.

It was there, in the neighbourhood of the Catholic Club--of which he
had just been made honorary president--that M. Le Merquier lived. He was
_avocat_, deputy for Lyons, business man of all the great communities of
France; and Hemerlingue, moved by a deep-seated instinct, had intrusted
him with the affairs of his firm.

He arrived before nine o'clock at an old mansion of which the ground
floor was occupied by a religious bookshop, asleep in the odour of the
sacristy, and of the thick gray paper on which the stories of miracles
are printed for hawkers, and mounted the great whitewashed convent
stairway. Jansoulet was touched by this provincial and Catholic
atmosphere, in which revived the souvenirs of his past in the south,
impressions of infancy still intact, thanks to his long absence from
home; and since his arrival at Paris he had had neither the time nor the
occasion to call them in question. Fashionable hypocrisy had presented
itself to him in all its forms save that of religious integrity, and
he refused now to believe in the venality of a man who lived in such
surroundings. Introduced into the _avocat's_ waiting-room--a vast
parlour with fine white muslin curtains, having for its sole ornament
a large and beautiful copy of Tintoretto's Dead Christ--his doubt and
trouble changed into indignant conviction. It was not possible! He had
been deceived as to Le Merquier. There was surely some bold slander in
it, such as so easily spreads in Paris--or perhaps it was one of those
ferocious snares among which he had stumbled for six months. No, this
stern conscience, so well known in Parliament and the courts, this cold
and austere personage, could not be treated like those great swollen
pashas with loosened waist-belts and floating sleeves open to conceal
the bags of gold. He would only expose himself to a scandalous refusal,
to the legitimate revolt of outraged honour, if he attempted such means
of corruption.

The Nabob told himself all this, as he sat on the oak bench which ran
round the room, a bench polished with serge dresses and the rough cloth
of cassocks. In spite of the early hour several persons were waiting
there with him. A Dominican, ascetic and serene, walking up and down
with great strides; two sisters of charity, buried under their caps,
counting long rosaries which measured their time of waiting; priests
from Lyons, recognisable by the shape of their hats; others reserved and
severe in air, sitting at the great ebony table which filled the middle
of the room, and turning over some of those pious journals printed at
Fouvieres, just above Lyons, the _Echo of Purgatory_, the _Rose-bush
of Mary_, which give as a present to all yearly subscribers pontifical
indulgences and remissions of future sins. Some muttered words, a
stifled cough, the light whispered prayers of the sisters, recalled to
Jansoulet the distant and confused sensation of the hours of waiting in
the corner of his village church round the confessional on the eves of
the great festivals of the Church.

At last his turn came, and if a doubt as to M. Le Merquier had remained,
he doubted no longer when he saw this great office, simple and severe,
yet a little more ornate than the waiting-room, a fitting frame for
the austerity of the lawyer's principles, and for his thin form, tall,
stooping, narrow-shouldered, squeezed into a black coat too short in
the sleeves, from which protruded two black fists, broad and flat,
two sticks of Indian ink with hieroglyphs of great veins. The clerical
deputy had, with the leaden hue of a Lyonnese grown mouldy between his
two rivers, a certain life of expression which he owed to his double
look--sometimes sparkling, but impenetrable behind the glass of his
spectacles; more often, vivid, mistrustful, and dark, above these same
glasses, surrounded by the shadow which a lifted eye and a stooping head
gives the eyebrow.

After a greeting almost cordial in comparison with the cold bow which
the two colleagues exchanged at the Chamber, an "I was expecting you" in
which perhaps an intention showed itself, the lawyer pointed the Nabob
into a seat near his desk, told the smug domestic in black not to come
till he was summoned, arranged a few papers, after which, sinking into
his arm-chair with the attitude of a man ready to listen, who becomes
all ears, his legs crossed, he rested his chin on his hand, with his
eyes fixed on a great rep curtain falling to the ground in front of him.

The moment was decisive, the situation embarrassing. Jansoulet did not
hesitate. It was one of the poor Nabob's pretensions to know men as
well as Mora. And this instinct, which, said he, had never deceived
him, warned him that he was at that moment dealing with a rigid and
unshakable honesty, a conscience in hard stone, untouchable by pick-axe
or powder. "My conscience!" Suddenly he changed his programme, threw to
the winds the tricks and equivocations which embarrassed his open and
courageous disposition, and, head high and heart open, held to this
honest man a language he was born to understand.

"Do not be astonished, my dear colleague,"--his voice trembled, but soon
became firm in the conviction of his defence--"do not be astonished if
I am come to find you here instead of asking simply to be heard by
the third committee. The explanation which I have to make to you is so
delicate and confidential that it would have been impossible to make it
publicly before my colleagues."

Maitre Le Merquier, above his spectacles, looked at the curtain with a
disturbed air. Evidently the conversation was taking an unexpected turn.

"I do not enter on the main question," said the Nabob. "Your report, I
am assured, is impartial and loyal, such as your conscience has dictated
to you. Only there are some heart-breaking calumnies spread about me to
which I have not answered, and which have perhaps influenced the opinion
of the committee. It is on this subject that I wish to speak to you. I
know the confidence with which you are honoured by your colleagues, M.
Le Merquier, and that, when I shall have convinced you, your word will
be enough without forcing me to lay bare my distress to them all. You
know the accusation--the most terrible, the most ignoble. There are so
many people who might be deceived by it. My enemies have given names,
dates, addresses. Well, I bring you the proofs of my innocence. I lay
them bare before you--you only--for I have grave reasons for keeping the
whole affair secret."

Then he showed the lawyer a certificate from the Consulate of Tunis,
that during twenty years he had only left the principality twice--the
first time to see his dying father at Bourg-Saint Andeol; the second,
to make, with the Bey, a visit of three days to his chateau of
Saint-Romans.

"How comes it, then, that with a document so conclusive in my hands
I have not brought my accusers before the courts to contradict and
confound them? Alas, monsieur, there are cruel responsibilities in
families. I have a brother, a poor fellow, weak and spoiled, who has for
long wallowed in the mud of Paris, who has left there his intelligence
and his honour. Has he descended to that degree of baseness which I, in
his name, am accused of? I have not dared to find out. All I can say
is, that my poor father, who knew more than any one in the family of
it, whispered to me in dying, 'Bernard, it is your elder brother who has
killed me. I die of shame, my child.'"

He paused, compelled by his suppressed emotion; then:

"My father is dead, Maitre Le Merquier, but my mother still lives, and
it is for her sake, for her peace, that I have held back, that I hold
back still, before the scandal of my justification. Up to now, in fact,
the mud thrown at me has not touched her; it only comes from a certain
class, in a special press, a thousand leagues away from the poor woman.
But law courts, a trial--it would be proclaiming our misfortune from
one end of France to the other, the articles of the official paper
reproduced by all the journals, even those of the little district where
my mother lives. The calumny, my defence, her two children covered
with shame by the one stroke, the name--the only pride of the old
peasant--forever disgraced. It would be too much for her. It would be
enough to kill her. And truly, I find it enough, too. That is why I
have had the courage to be silent, to weary, if I could, my enemies by
silence. But I need some one to answer for me in the Chamber. It must
not have the right to expel me for reasons which would dishonour me, and
since it has chosen you as the chairman of the committee, I am come to
tell you everything, as to a confessor, to a priest, begging you not to
divulge anything of this conversation, even in the interests of my case.
I only ask you, my dear colleague, absolute silence; for the rest, I
rely on your justice and your loyalty."

He rose, ready to go, and Le Merquier did not move, still asking the
green curtain in front of him, as if seeking inspiration for his answer
there. At last he said:

"It shall be as you desire, my dear colleague. This confidence shall
remain between us. You have told me nothing, I have heard nothing."

The Nabob, still heated with his burst of confidence, which demanded,
it seemed to him, a cordial response, a pressure of the hand, was seized
with a strange uneasiness. This coolness, this absent look, so unnerved
him that he was at the door with the awkward bow of one who feels
himself importunate, when the other stopped him.

"Wait, then, my dear colleague. What a hurry you are in to leave me! A
few moments, I beg of you. I am too happy to have a chat with a man like
you. Besides, we have more than one common bond. Our friend Hemerlingue
has told me that you, too, are much interested in pictures."

Jansoulet trembled. The two words--"Hemerlingue," "pictures"--meeting
in the same phrase so unexpectedly, restored all his doubts, all his
perplexities. He did not give himself away yet, however, and let Le
Merquier advance, word by word, testing the ground for his stumbling
advances. People had told him often of the collection of his honourable
colleague. "Would it be indiscreet to ask the favour of being admitted,
to--"

"On the contrary, I should feel much honoured," said the Nabob, tickled
in the most sensible--since the most costly--point of his vanity; and
looking round him at the walls of the room, he added with the tone of a
connoisseur, "You have some fine things, too."

"Oh," said the other modestly, "just a few canvases. Painting is so dear
now, it is a taste so difficult to satisfy, a true passion _de luxe_--a
passion for a Nabob," said he, smiling, with a furtive look over his
glasses.

They were two prudent players, face to face; but Jansoulet was a little
astray in this new situation, where he who only knew how to be bold, had
to be on his guard.

"When I think," murmured the lawyer, "that I have been ten years
covering these walls, and that I have still this panel to fill."

In fact, at the most conspicuous place on the wall there was an empty
place, emptied rather, for a great gold-headed nail near the ceiling
showed the visible, almost clumsy, trace of a snare laid for the poor
simpleton, who let himself be taken in it so foolishly.

"My dear M. Le Merquier," said he with his engaging, good-natured voice,
"I have a Virgin of Tintoretto's just the size of your panel."

Impossible to read anything in the eyes of the lawyer, this time hidden
under their overhanging brows.

"Permit me to hang it there, opposite your table. That will help you to
think sometimes of me."

"And to soften the severities of my report, too, sir?" cried Le
Merquier, formidable and upright, his hand on the bell. "I have seen
many shameless things in my life, but never anything like this. Such
offers to me, in my own house!"

"But, my dear colleague, I swear to you----"

"Show him out," said the lawyer to the hang-dog servant who had just
entered; and from the middle of his office, whose door remained open,
before all the waiting-room, where the paternosters were silent, he
pursued Jansoulet--who slunk off murmuring excuses to the door--with
these terrible words:

"You have outraged the honour of the Chamber in my person, sir. Our
colleagues shall be informed of it this very day; and, this crime coming
after your others, you will learn to your cost that Paris is not the
East, and that here we do not make shameless traffic of the human
conscience."

Then, after having chased the seller from the temple, the just man
closed his door, and approaching the mysterious green curtain, said in a
tone that sounded soft amidst his pretended anger:

"Is that what you wanted, Baroness Marie?"




THE SITTING

That morning there were no guests to lunch at 32 Place Vendome, so
that towards one o'clock might have been seen the majestic form of M.
Barreau, gleaming white at the gate, among four or five of his scullions
in their cook's caps, and as many stable-boys in Scotch caps--an
imposing group, which gave to the house the aspect of an hotel where the
staff was taking the air between the arrivals of the trains. To complete
the resemblance, a cab drew up before the door and the driver took down
an old leather trunk, while a tall old woman, her upright figure wrapped
in a little green shawl, jumped lightly to the footpath, a basket on
her arm, looked at the number with great attention, then approached the
servants to ask if it was there that M. Bernard Jansoulet lived.

"It is here," was the answer; "but he is not in."

"That does not matter," said the old lady simply.

She returned to the driver, who put her trunk in the porch, and paid
him, returning her purse to her pocket at once with a gesture that said
much for the caution of the provincial.

Since Jansoulet had been deputy for Corsica, the domestics had seen
so many strange and exotic figures at his house, that they were not
surprised at this sunburnt woman, with eyes glowing like coals, a
true Corsican under her severe coif, but different from the ordinary
provincial in the ease and tranquility of her manners.

"What, the master is not here?" said she, with an intonation which
seemed better fitted for farm people in her part of the country, than
for the insolent servants of a great Parisian mansion.

"No, the master is not here."

"And the children?"

"They are at lessons. You cannot see them."

"And madame?"

"She is asleep. No one sees her before three o'clock."

It seemed to astonish the good woman a little that any one could stay
in bed so late; but the tact which guides a refined nature, even without
education, prevented her from saying anything before the servants, and
she asked for Paul de Gery.

"He is abroad."

"Bompain Jean-Baptiste, then."

"He is with monsieur at the sitting."

Her great gray eyebrows wrinkled.

"It does not matter; take up my trunk just the same."

And with a little malicious twinkle of her eye, a proud revenge for
their insolent looks, she added: "I am his mother."

The scullions and stable-boys drew back respectfully. M. Barreau raised
his cap:

"I thought I had seen madame somewhere."

"And I too, my lad," answered Mme. Jansoulet, who shivered still at the
remembrance of the Bey's _fete_.

"My lad," to M. Barreau, to a man of his importance! It raised her at
once to a very high place in the esteem of the others.

Well! grandeur and splendour hardly dazzled this courageous old lady.
She did not go into ecstasies over gilding and petty baubles, and as she
walked up the grand staircase behind her trunk, the baskets of flowers
on the landings, the lamps held by bronze statues, did not prevent her
from noticing that there was an inch of dust on the balustrade, and
holes in the carpet. She was taken to the rooms on the second floor
belonging to the Levantine and her children; and there, in an apartment
used as a linen-room, which seemed to be near the school-room (to judge
by the murmur of children's voices), she waited alone, her basket on
her knees, for the return of her Bernard, perhaps the waking of her
daughter-in-law, or the great joy of embracing her grandchildren. What
she saw around her gave her an idea of the disorder of this house
left to the care of the servants, without the oversight and foreseeing
activity of a mistress. The linen was heaped in disorder, piles on
piles in great wide-open cupboards, fine linen sheets and table-cloths
crumpled up, the locks prevented from shutting by pieces of torn lace,
which no one took the trouble to mend. And yet there were many servants
about--negresses in yellow Madras muslin, who came to snatch here
a towel, there a table-cloth, walking among the scattered domestic
treasures, dragging with their great flat feet frills of fine lace
from a petticoat which some lady's-maid had thrown down--thimble here,
scissors there--ready to pick up again in a few minutes.

Jansoulet's mother was doubly wounded. The half-rustic artisan in her
was outraged in the tenderness, the respect, the sweet unreasonableness
the woman of the provinces feels towards a full linen cupboard--a
cupboard filled piece by piece, full of relics of past struggles, whose
contents grow finer little by little, the first token of comfort, of
wealth, in the house. Besides, she had held the distaff from morning
till night, and if the housewife in her was angry, the spinner could
have wept at the profanation. At last, unable to contain herself longer,
she rose, and actively, her little shawl displaced at each movement, she
set herself to pick up, straighten, and carefully fold this magnificent
linen, as she used to do in the fields of Saint-Romans, when she gave
herself the treat of a grand washing-day, with twenty washerwomen, the
clothes-baskets flowing over with floating whiteness, and the sheets
flapping in the morning wind on the clothes-lines. She was in the midst
of this occupation, forgetting her journey, forgetting Paris, even
the place where she was, when a stout, thick-set, bearded man, with
varnished boots and a velvet jacket, over the torso of a bull, came into
the linen-room.

"What! Cabassu!"

"You here, Mme. Francoise! What a surprise!" said the _masseur_, staring
like a bronze figure.

"Yes, my brave Cabassu, it is I. I have just arrived; and as you see, I
am at work already. It made my heart bleed to see all this muddle."

"You came up for the sitting, then?"

"What sitting?"

"Why, the grand sitting of the legislative body. It's do-day."

"Dear me, no. What has that got to do with me? I should understand
nothing at all about it. No, I came because I wanted to know my little
Jansoulets, and then, I was beginning to feel uneasy. I have written
several times without getting an answer. I was afraid that there was a
child sick, that Bernard's business was going wrong--all sorts of ideas.
At last I got seriously worried, and came away at once. They are well
here, they tell me."

"Yes, Mme. Francoise. Thank God, every one is quite well."

"And Bernard. His business--is that going on as he wants it to?"

"Well, you know one has always one's little worries in life--still,
I don't think he should complain. But, now I think of it, you must be
hungry. I will go and make them bring you something."

He was going to ring, more at home and at ease than the old mother
herself. She stopped him.

"No, no, I don't want anything. I have still something left in my
basket." And she put two figs and a crust of bread on the edge of the
table. Then, while she was eating: "And you, lad, your business? You
look very much sprucer than you did the last time you were at Bourg. How
smart you are! What do you do in the house?"

"Professor of massage," said Aristide gravely.

"Professor--you?" said she with respectful astonishment; but she did
not dare ask him what he taught, and Cabassu, who felt such questions a
little embarrassing, hastened to change the subject.

"Shall I go and find the children? Haven't they told them that their
grandmother is here?"

"I didn't want to disturb them at their work. But I believe it must be
over now--listen!"

Behind the door they could hear the shuffling impatience of the children
anxious to be out in the open air, and the old woman enjoyed this state
of things, doubling her maternal desire, and hindering her from doing
anything to hasten its pleasure. At last the door opened. The tutor came
out first--a priest with a pointed nose and great cheek-bones, whom we
have met before at the great _dejeuners_. On bad terms with his bishop,
he had left the diocese where he had been engaged, and in the precarious
position of an unattached priest--for the clergy have their Bohemians
too--he was glad to teach the little Jansoulets, recently turned out of
the Bourdaloue College. With his arrogant, solemn air, overweighted with
responsibilities, which would have become the prelates charged with the
education of the dauphins of France, he preceded three curled and gloved
little gentlemen in short jackets, with leather knapsacks, and great red
stockings reaching half-way up their little thin legs, in complete suits
of cyclist dress, ready to mount.

"My children," said Cabassu, "that is Mme. Jansoulet, your grandmother,
who has come to Paris expressly to see you."

They stopped in a row, astonished, examining this old wrinkled visage
between the folds of her cap, this strange dress of a simplicity
unknown to them; and their grandmother's astonishment answered theirs,
complicated with a heart-breaking discomfiture and constraint in dealing
with these little gentlemen, as stiff and disdainful as any of the
nobles or ministers whom her son had brought to Saint-Romans. On the
bidding of their tutor "to salute their venerable grandmother," they
came in turn to give her one of those little half-hearted shakes of
the hand of which they had distributed so many in the garrets they
had visited. The fact is that this good woman, with her agricultural
appearance and clean but very simple clothes, reminded them of the
charity visits of the College Bourdaloue. They felt between them the
same unknown quality, the same distance, which no remembrance, no
word of their parents had ever helped to bridge. The abbe felt this
constraint, and tried to dispel it--speaking with the tone of voice and
gestures customary to those who always think they are in the pulpit.

"Well, madame, the day has come, the great day when Jansoulet will
confound his enemies--_confundantur hostes mei, quia injuste iniquitatem
fecerunt in me_--because they have unjustly persecuted me."

The old lady bent religiously before the Latin of the Church, but her
face expressed a vague expression of uneasiness at this idea of enemies
and of persecutions.

"These enemies are powerful and numerous, my noble lady, but let us
not be alarmed beyond measure. Let us have confidence in the decrees of
Heaven and in the justice of our cause. God is in the midst of it, it
shall not be overthrown--_in medio ejus non commovebitur_."

A gigantic negro, resplendent with gold braid, interrupted him by
announcing that the bicycles were ready for the daily lesson on the
terrace of the Tuileries. Before setting out, the children again
shook solemnly their grandmother's wrinkled and hardened hand. She
was watching them go, stupefied and oppressed, when all at once, by an
adorable spontaneous movement, the youngest turned back when he had got
to the door and, pushing the great negro aside, came to throw himself
head foremost, like a little buffalo, into Mme. Jansoulet's skirts,
squeezing her to him, while holding out his smooth forehead, covered
with brown curls, with the grace of a child offering its kiss like a
flower. Perhaps this one, nearer the warmth of the nest, the cradling
knees of the nurses with their peasant songs, had felt the maternal
influence, of which the Levantine had deprived him, reach his heart.
The old woman trembled all over with the surprise of this instinctive
embrace.

"Oh! little one, little one," said she, seizing the little silky, curly
head which reminded her so much of another and she kissed it wildly.
Then the child unloosed himself, and ran off without saying anything,
his head moist with hot tears.

Left alone with Cabassu, the mother, comforted by this embrace, asked
some explanation of the priest's words. Had her son many enemies?

"Oh!" said Cabassu, "it is not astonishing, in his position."

"But what is this great day--this sitting of which you all speak?"

"Well, then, it is to-day that we shall know whether Bernard will be
deputy or no."

"What? He is not one now, then? And I have told them everywhere in the
country. I illuminated Saint-Romans a month ago. Then they have made me
tell a lie."

The _masseur_ had a great deal of trouble in explaining to her the
parliamentary formalities of the verification of elections. She only
listened with one ear, walking up and down the linen-room feverishly.

"That's where my Bernard is now, then?"

"Yes, madame."

"And can women go to the Chamber? Then why is his wife not there? For
one does not need telling that it is an important matter for him. On a
day like this he needs to feel all those whom he loves at his side. See,
my lad, you must take me there, to this sitting. Is it far?"

"No, quite near. Only, it must have begun already. And then," added he,
a little disconcerted, "it is the hour when madame wants me."

"Ah! Do you teach her this thing you are professor of? What do you call
it?"

"Massage. We have learned it from the ancients. Yes, there she is
ringing for me, and some one will come to fetch me. Shall I tell her you
are here?"

"No, no; I prefer to go there at once."

"But you have no admission ticket."

"Bah! I will tell them I am Jansoulet's mother, come to hear him
judged." Poor mother, she spoke truer than she knew.

"Wait, Mme. Francoise. I will give you some one to show you the way, at
least."

"Oh, you know, I have never been able to put up with servants. I have a
tongue. There are people in the streets. I shall find my way."

He made a last attempt, without letting her see all his thought. "Take
care; his enemies are going to speak against him in the Chamber. You
will hear things to hurt you."

Oh, the beautiful smile of belief and maternal pride with which she
answered: "Don't I know better than them all what my child is worth?
Could anything make me mistaken in him? I should have to be very
ungrateful then. Get along with you!"

And shaking her head with its flapping cap wings, she set off fiercely
indignant.

With head erect and upright bearing the old woman strode along under the
great arcades which they had told her to follow, a little troubled by
the incessant noise of the carriages, and by the idleness of this walk,
unaccompanied by the faithful distaff which had never quitted her
for fifty years. All these ideas of enmities and persecutions, the
mysterious words of the priest, the guarded talk of Cabassu, frightened
and agitated her. She found in them the meaning of the presentiments
which had so overpowered her as to snatch her from her habits, her
duties, the care of the house and of her invalid. Besides, since Fortune
had thrown on her and her son this golden mantle with its heavy folds,
Mme. Jansoulet had never become accustomed to it, and was always waiting
for the sudden disappearance of these splendours. Who knows if the
break-up was not going to begin this time? And suddenly, through these
sombre thoughts, the remembrance of the scene that had just passed,
of the little one rubbing himself on her woollen gown, brought on her
wrinkled lips a tender smile, and she murmured in her peasant tongue:

"Oh, for the little one, at any rate."


She crossed a magnificent square, immense, dazzling, two fountains
throwing up their water in a silvery spray, then a great stone bridge,
and at the end was a square building with statues on its front, a
railing with carriages drawn up before it, people going on, numbers of
policemen. It was there. She pushed through the crowd bravely and came
up to the high glass doors.

"Your card, my good woman?"

The "good woman" had no card, but she said quite simply to one of the
porters in red who were keeping the door:

"I am Bernard Jansoulet's mother. I have come for the sitting of my
boy."

It was indeed the sitting of her boy; for everywhere in this crowd
besieging the doors, filling the passages, the hall, the tribune, the
whole palace, the same name was repeated, accompanied with smiles and
anecdotes. A great scandal was expected, terrible revelations from the
chairman, which would no doubt lead to some violence from the barbarian
brought to bay, and they hurried to the spot as to a first night or a
celebrated trial. The old mother would hardly have been heard in the
middle of this crowd, if the stream of gold left by the Nabob wherever
he had passed, marking his royal progress, had not opened all the roads
to her. She went behind the attendant in this tangle of passages,
of folding-doors, of empty resounding halls, filled with a hum which
circulated with the air of the building, as if the walls, themselves
soaked with babble, were joining to the sound of all these voices the
echoes of the past. While crossing a corridor she saw a little dark man
gesticulating and crying to the servants:

"You will tell Moussiou Jansoulet that it is I, that I am the Mayor of
Sarlazaccio, that I have been condemned to five months' imprisonment for
him. In God's name, surely that is worth a card for the sitting."

Five months' imprisonment for her son! Why? Very much disturbed, she
arrived at last, her ears singing, at the top of the staircase, where
different inscriptions--"Tribune of the Senate, of the Diplomatic Body,
of the Deputies"--stood above little doors like boxes in a theatre. She
entered, and without seeing anything at first except four or five rows
of seats filled with people, and opposite, very far off, separated from
her by a vast clear space, other galleries similarly filled. She leaned
up against the wall, astonished to be there, exhausted, almost ashamed.
A current of hot air which came to her face, a chatter of rising voices,
drew her towards the slope of the gallery, towards the kind of gulf open
in the middle where her son must be. Oh! how she would like to see him.
So squeezing herself in, and using her elbows, pointed and hard as her
spindle, she glided and slipped between the wall and the seats, taking
no notice of the anger she aroused or the contempt of the well-dressed
women whose lace and fresh toilettes she crushed; for the assembly
was elegant and fashionable. Mme. Jansoulet recognised, by his stiff
shirt-front and aristocratic nose, the marquis who had visited them at
Saint-Romans, who so well suited his name, but he did not look at her.
She was stopped farther progress by the back of a man sitting down,
an enormous back which barred everything and forbade her go farther.
Happily, she could see nearly all the hall from here by leaning forward
a little; and these semi-circular benches filled with deputies, the
green hanging of the walls, the chair at the end, occupied by a bald man
with a severe air, gave her the idea, under the studious and gray light
from the roof, of a class about to begin, with all the chatter and
movement of thoughtless schoolboys.

One thing struck her--the way in which all looks turned to one side,
to the same point of attraction; and as she followed this current
of curiosity which carried away the entire assembly, hall as well as
galleries, she saw that what they were all looking at--was her son.

In the Jansoulet's country there is still, in some old churches, at the
end of the choir, half-way up the crypt, a stone cell where lepers were
admitted to hear mass, showing their dark profiles to the curious and
fearful crowd, like wild beasts crouched against the loopholes in the
wall. Francoise well remembered having seen in the village where she had
been brought up the leper, the bugbear of her infancy, hearing mass from
his stone cage, lost in the shade and in isolation. Now, seeing her son
seated, his head in his hands, alone, up there away from the others,
this memory came to her mind. "One might think it was a leper," murmured
the peasant. And, in fact, this poor Nabob was a leper, his millions
from the East weighing on him like some terrible and mysterious disease.
It happened that the bench on which he had chosen to sit had several
recent vacancies on account of holidays or deaths; so that while the
other deputies were talking to each other, laughing, making signs,
he sat silent, alone, the object of attention to all the Chamber; an
attention which his mother felt to be malevolent, ironic, which burned
into her heart. How was she to let him know that she was there, near
him, that one faithful heart beat not far from his? He would not turn to
the gallery. One would have said that he felt it hostile, that he feared
to look there. Suddenly, at the sound of the bell from the presidential
platform, a rustle ran through the assembly, every head leaned forward
with that fixed attention which makes the features unmovable, and a thin
man in spectacles, whose sudden rise among so many seated figures gave
him the authority of attitude at once, said, opening the paper he held
in his hand:

"Gentlemen, in the name of your third committee, I beg to move that
the election of the second division of the department of Corsica be
annulled."

In the deep silence following this phrase, which Mme. Jansoulet did not
understand, the giant seated before her began to puff vigorously, and
all at once, in the front row of the gallery, a lovely face turned round
to address him a rapid sign of intelligence and approval. Forehead pale,
lips thin, eyebrows too black for the white framing of her hat, it all
produced in the eyes of the good old lady, without her knowing why, the
effect of the first flash of lightning in a storm and the apprehension
of the thunderbolt following the lightning.

Le Merquier was reading his report. The slow, dull monotonous voice,
the drawling, weak Lyonnese accent, while the long form of the lawyer
balanced itself in an almost animal movement of the head and shoulders,
made a singular contrast to the ferocious clearness of the brief. First,
a rapid account of the electoral irregularities. Never had universal
suffrage been treated with such primitive and barbarous contempt. At
Sarlazaccio, where Jansoulet's rival seemed to have a majority, the
ballot-box was destroyed the night before it was counted. The same thing
almost happened at Levia, at Saint-Andre, at Avabessa. And it was the
mayors themselves who committed these crimes, who carried the urns home
with them, broke the seals, tore up the voting papers, under cover
of their municipal authority. There had been no respect for the law.
Everywhere fraud, intrigue, even violence. At Calcatoggio an armed
man sat during the election at the window of a tavern in front of
the _mairie_, holding a blunderbuss, and whenever one of Sebastiani's
electors (Sebastiani was Jansoulet's opponent) showed himself, the man
took aim: "If you come in, I will blow out your brains." And when
one saw the inspectors of police, justices, inspectors of weights and
measures, not afraid to turn into canvassing agents, to frighten or
cajole a population too submissive before all these little tyrannical
local influences, was that not proof of a terrible state of things? Even
priests, saintly pastors, led astray by their zeal for the poor-box and
the restoration of an impoverished building, had preached a mission in
favour of Jansoulet's election. But an influence still more powerful,
though less respectable, had been called into play for the good
cause--the influence of the banditti. "Yes, banditti, gentlemen; I am
not joking." And then came a sketch in outline of Corsican banditti in
general, and of the Piedigriggio family in particular.

The Chamber listened attentively, with a certain uneasiness. For, after
all, it was an official candidate whose doings were thus described, and
these strange doings belonged to that privileged land, cradle of the
imperial family, so closely attached to the fortunes of the dynasty,
that an attack on Corsica seemed to strike at the sovereign. But when
people saw the new minister, successor and enemy of Mora, glad of the
blow to a _protege_ of his predecessor, smile complacently from
the Government bench at Le Merquier's cruel banter, all constraint
disappeared at once, and the ministerial smile repeated on three hundred
mouths, grew into a scarcely restrained laugh--the laugh of crowds under
the rod which bursts out at the least approbation of the master. In the
galleries, not usually treated to the picturesque, but amused by these
stories of brigands, there was general joy, a radiant animation on all
these faces, pleased to look pretty without insulting the solemnity of
the spot. Little bright bonnets shook with all their flowers and plumes,
round gold-encircled arms leaned forward the better to hear. The grave
Le Merquier had imported into the sitting the distraction of a show,
the little spice of humour allowed in a charity concert to bribe the
uninitiated.

Impassable and cold in the midst of his success, he continued to read in
his gloomy voice, penetrating like the rain of Lyons:

"Now, gentlemen, one asks how a stranger, a Provencial returned from the
East, ignorant of the interests and needs of this island where he had
never been seen before the election, a true type of what the Corsican
disdainfully calls a 'continental'--how has this man been able to excite
such an enthusiasm, such devotion carried to crime, to profanity.
His wealth will answer us, his fatal gold thrown in the face of the
electors, thrust by force into their pockets with a barefaced cynicism
of which we have a thousand proofs." Then the interminable series of
denunciations: "I, the undersigned, Croce (Antoine), declare in the
interests of truth, that the Commissary of Police Nardi, calling on us
one evening, said: 'Listen, Croce (Antoine), I swear by the fire of this
lamp that if you vote for Jansoulet you will have fifty francs
to-morrow morning.'" And this other: "I, the undersigned, Lavezzi
(Jacques-Alphonse), declare that I refused with contempt seventeen
francs offered me by the Mayor of Pozzonegro to vote against my
cousin Sebastiani." It is probably that for three francs more Lavezzi
(Jacques-Alphonse) would have swallowed his contempt in silence. But the
Chamber did not look into things so closely.

Indignation seized on this incorruptible Chamber. It murmured, it
fidgeted on its padded seats of red velvet, it raised a positive
clamour. There were "Oh's" of amazement, eyes lifted in astonishment,
brusque movements on the benches, as if in disgust at this spectacle of
human degradation. And remark that the greater part of these deputies
had used the same electoral methods, that these were the heroes of those
famous orgies when whole oxen were carried in triumph, ribanded and
decorated as at Gargantuan feasts. Just these men cried louder than
others, turned furiously towards the solitary seat where the poor leper
listened, still and downcast. Yet in the midst of the general uproar,
one voice was raised in his favour, but low, unpractised, less a voice
than a sympathetic murmur, through which was distinguished
vaguely: "Great services to the Corsican population--Considerable
works--Territorial Bank."

He who mumbled thus was a little man in white gaiters, an albino
head, and thin hair in scattered locks. But the interruption of this
unfortunate friend only furnished Le Merquier with a rapid and natural
transition. A hideous smile parted his flabby lips. "The honourable M.
Sarigue mentions the Territorial Bank. We shall be able to answer him."
He seemed in fact to be very familiar with the Paganetti den. In a
few neat and lively phrases he threw the light on to the depths of the
gloomy cave, showed all the traps, the gulfs, the windings, the snares,
like a guide waving his torch above the _oubliettes_ of some sinister
dungeon. He spoke of the fictitious quarries, of the railways on paper,
of the chimeric liners disappearing in their own steam. The frightful
desert of the Taverna was not forgotten, nor the old Genoese castle, the
office of the steamship agency. But what amused the Chamber most was the
story of a swindling ceremony organized by the governor for the piercing
of a tunnel through Monte Rotondo, a gigantic undertaking always in
project, put off from year to year, demanding millions of money and
thousands of workmen, and which was begun in great pomp a week before
the election. His report gave the thing a comic air--the first blow of
the pickaxe given by the candidate in the enormous mountain covered by
ancient forests, the speech of the Prefect, the benediction of the flags
with the cries of "Long live Bernard Jansoulet!" and the two hundred
workmen beginning the task at once, working day and night for a week;
then, when the election was over, leaving the fragments of rock heaped
round the abandoned excavation for a laughing-stock--another asylum
for the terrible banditti. The game was over. After having extorted the
shareholders' money for so long, the Territorial Bank this time was
used as a means to swindle the electors of their votes. "Furthermore,
gentlemen, another detail, with which perhaps I should have begun and
spared you the recital of this electoral pasquinade. I learn that a
judicial inquiry has been opened to-day into the affairs of the Corsican
Bank, and that a serious examination of its books will very probably
reveal one of those financial scandals--too frequent, alas! in our
days--and in which, for the honour of the Chamber, we would wish that
none of our members were concerned."

With this sudden revelation, the speaker stopped a moment, like an actor
making his point; and in the heavy silence weighing on the assembly, the
noise of a closing door was heard. It was the Governor Paganetti leaving
the tribune, his face white, the eyes wide open, his mouth half opened,
like some Pierrot scenting in the air a formidable blow. Monpavon,
motionless, expanded his shirtfront. The big man puffed violently into
the flowers of his wife's little white hat.

Jansoulet's mother looked at her son.

"I have spoken of the honour of the Chamber, gentlemen. On that point
I have more to say." Now Le Merquier was reading no longer. After the
chairman of the committees, the orator came on the scene, or rather
the judge. His face was expressionless, his eyes hidden; nothing lived,
nothing moved in all his body save the right arm--the long angular arm
with short sleeves--which rose and fell automatically, like a sword of
justice, making at the end of each sentence the cruel and inexorable
gesture of beheading. And truly it was an execution at which they were
present. The orator would leave on one side scandalous legends, the
mystery which brooded over this colossal fortune acquired in distant
lands, far from all control. But there were in the life of the candidate
certain points difficult to clear up, certain details. He hesitated,
seemed to select his words; then, before the impossibility of
formulating a direct accusation: "Do not let us lower the debate,
gentlemen. You have understood me. You know to what infamous stories I
allude--to what calumnies, I wish I could say; but truth forces me to
state that when M. Jansoulet called before your committee, was asked to
deny the accusations made against him, his explanations were so vague
that, though convinced of his innocence, a scrupulous regard for your
honour forced us to reject a candidature so besmirched. No, this man
must not sit among you. Besides, what would he do there? Living so long
in the East, he has unlearned the laws, the manners, and the usages of
his country. He believes in rough and ready justice, in fights in the
open street; he relies on the abuses of power, and worse still, on
the venality and crouching baseness of all men. He is the merchant who
thinks that everything can be bought at a price--even the votes of the
electors, even the conscience of his colleagues."

One should have seen with what naive admiration these fat deputies,
enervated with good fortune, listened to this ascetic, this man
of another age, like some Saint-Jerome who had left his Thebaid to
overwhelm with his vigorous eloquence, in a full assembly of the
Roman Empire, the shameless luxury of the prevaricators and of the
_concussionaires_. How well they understood now this grand surname of
"My conscience" which the courts had given him. In the galleries the
enthusiasm rose higher still. Lovely heads leaned to see him, to drink
in his words. Applause went round, bending the bouquets here and there,
like the wind in a wheat-field. A woman's voice cried with a little
foreign accent, "Bravo! Bravo!"

And the mother?

Standing upright, immovable, concentrated in her desire to understand
something of this legal phraseology, of these mysterious allusions, she
was there like deaf-mutes who only understand what is said before them
by the movement of the lips and the expression of the faces. But it was
enough for her to watch her son and Le Merquier to understand what harm
one was doing to the other, what perfidious and poisoned meaning fell
from this long discourse on the unfortunate man whom one might have
believed asleep, except for the trembling of his strong shoulders and
the clinching of his hands in his hair, while hiding his face. Oh,
if she could have said to him: "Don't be afraid, my son. If they all
misconstrue you, your mother loves you. Let us come away together. What
need have we of them?" And for one moment she could believe that what
she was saying to him thus in her heart he had understood by some
mysterious intuition. He had just raised and shaken his grizzled head,
where the childish curve of his lips quivered under a possibility of
tears. But instead of leaving his seat, he spoke from it, his great
hands pounded the wood of the desk. The other had finished, now it was
his time to answer:

"Gentlemen," said he.

He stopped at once, frightened by the sound of his voice, hoarse,
frightfully low and vulgar, which he heard for the first time in public.
He must find the words for his defence, tormented as he was by the
twitchings of his face, the intonations which he could not express. And
if the anguish of the poor man was touching, the old mother up there,
leaning, gasping, moving her lips nervously as if to help him find
words, reflected the picture of his torture. Though he could not see
her, intentionally turned away from her gallery, as he evidently was,
this maternal inspiration, the ardent magnetism of those black eyes,
ended by giving him life, and suddenly his words and gestures flowed
freely:

"First of all, gentlemen, I must say that I do not defend the methods of
my election. If you believe that electoral morals have not been always
the same in Corsica, that all the irregularities committed are due to
the corrupting influence of my gold and not to the uncultivated and
passionate temperament of its people, reject me--it will be justice
and I will not murmur. But in this debate other matters have been dealt
with, accusations have been made which involve my personal honour, and
those, and those alone, I wish to answer." His voice was growing firmer,
always broken, veiled, but with some soft cadences. He spoke rapidly of
his life, his first steps, his departure for the East. It sounded like
an eighteenth century tale of the Barbary corsairs sailing the Latin
seas, of Beys and of bold Provencals, as sunburned as crickets, who
used to end by marrying some sultana and "taking the turban," in the
old expression of the Marseillais. "As for me," said the Nabob, with his
good-humoured smile. "I had no need of taking the turban to grow rich. I
had only to take into this land of idleness the activity and flexibility
of a southern Frenchman; and in a few years I made one of those fortunes
which can only be made in those hot countries, where everything is
gigantic, prodigious, disproportionate, where flowers grow in a night,
and one tree produces a forest. The excuse of such fortunes is the
manner in which they are used; and I make bold to say that never has any
favourite of fortune tried harder to justify his wealth. I have not
been successful." No! he had not succeeded. From all the gold he had
scattered he had only gathered contempt and hatred. Hatred! Who could
boast more of it than he? like a great ship in the dock when its keel
touches the bottom. He was too rich, and that stood for every vice,
and every crime pointed him out for anonymous vengeances, cruel and
incessant enmities.

"Ah, gentlemen," cried the poor Nabob, lifting his clinched hands, "I
have known poverty, I have struggled face to face with it, and it is a
dreadful struggle, I swear. But to struggle against wealth, to defend
one's happiness, honour--rest--to have no shelter but piles of gold
which fall and crush you, is something more hideous, more heart-breaking
still. Never, in the darkest days of my distress, have I had the pains,
the anguish, the sleepless nights with which fortune has loaded me--this
horrible fortune which I hate and which stifles me. They call me the
Nabob, in Paris. It is not the Nabob they should say, but the Pariah--a
social pariah holding out wide arms to a society which will have none of
him."

Written down, the words may appear cold; but there, before the assembly,
the defence of this man was stamped with an eloquent and grandiose
sincerity, which at first, coming from this rustic, this upstart,
without culture or education, with the voice of a boatman, first
astonished and then singularly moved his hearers just on account of
its wild, uncultivated style, foreign to every notion of parliamentary
etiquette. Already marks of favour had agitated members, used to the
flood of gray and monotonous administrative speech. But at this cry
of rage and despair against wealth, uttered by the wretch whom it
was enfolding, rolling, drowning in its floods of gold, while he was
struggling and calling for help from the depths of his Pactolus, the
whole Chamber rose with loud applause, and outstretched hands, as if to
give the unfortunate Nabob more testimonies of esteem, of which he was
so desirous, and at the same time to save him from shipwreck. Jansoulet
felt it; and warmed by this sympathy, he went on, with head erect and
confident look:

"You have just been told, gentlemen, that I was unworthy of sitting
among you. And he who said it was the last from whom I should have
expected it, for he alone knew the sad secret of my life, he alone could
speak for me, justify me, and convince you. He has not done it. Well,
I will try, whatever it may cost me. Outrageously calumniated before my
country, I owe it to myself and my children this public justification,
and I will make it."

With a brusque movement he turned towards the tribune where he knew his
enemy was watching him, and suddenly stopped, full of fear. There,
in front of him, behind the pale, malignant head of the baroness, his
mother, his mother whom he believed to be two hundred leagues away
from the terrible storm, was looking at him, leaning against the wall,
bending down her saintly face, flooded with tears, but proud and beaming
nevertheless with her Bernard's great success. For it was really a
success of sincere human emotion, which a few more words would change
into a triumph. Cries of "Go on, go on!" came from all sides of the
Chamber to reassure and encourage him. But Jansoulet did not speak. He
had only to say: "Calumny has wilfully confused two names. I am called
Bernard Jansoulet, the other Jansoulet Louis." Not a word more was
needed.

But in the presence of his mother, still ignorant of his brother's
dishonour, he could not say it. Respect--family ties forbade it. He
could hear his father's voice: "I die of shame, my child." Would not she
die of shame too, if he spoke? He turned from the maternal smile with a
sublime look of renunciation, then in a low voice, utterly discouraged,
he said:

"Excuse me, gentlemen; this explanation is beyond my power. Order an
investigation of my whole life, open as it is to all, alas! since any
one can interpret all my actions. I swear to you that you will find
nothing there which unfits me to sit among the representatives of my
country."

In the face of this defeat, which seemed to everybody the sudden
crumbling of an edifice of effrontery, the astonishment and
disillusionment were immense. There was a moment of excitement on the
benches, the tumult of a vote taken on the spot, which the Nabob saw
vaguely through the glass doors, as the condemned man looks down from
the scaffold on the howling crowd. Then, after that terrible pause which
precedes a supreme moment, the president made, amid deep silence, the
simple pronouncement:

"The election of M. Bernard Jansoulet is annulled."

Never had a man's life been cut off with less solemnity or disturbance.

Up there in her gallery, Jansoulet's mother understood nothing, except
that the seats were emptying near her, that people were rising and going
away. Soon there was no one else there save the fat man and the lady
in the white hat, who leaned over the barrier, watching Bernard with
curiosity, who seemed also to be going away, for he was putting up
great bundles of papers in his portfolio quite calmly. When they were
in order, he rose and left his place. Ah! the life of public men had
sometimes cruel situations. Gravely, slowly, under the gaze of the whole
assembly, he must descend those steps which he had mounted at the cost
of so much trouble and money, to whose feet an inexorable fatality was
precipitating him.

The Hemerlingues were waiting for this, following to its last stage this
humiliating exit, which crushes the unseated member with some of the
shame and fear of a dismissal. Then, when the Nabob had disappeared,
they looked at each other with a silent laugh, and left the gallery
before the old woman had dared to ask them anything, warned by her
instinct of their secret hostility. Left alone, she gave all her
attention to a new speech, persuaded that her son's affairs were still
in question. They spoke of an election, of a scrutiny, and the poor
mother leaning forward in her red hood, wrinkling her great eyebrows,
would have religiously listened to the whole of the report of the
Sarigue election, if the attendant who had introduced her had not come
to say that it was finished and she had better go away. She seemed very
much surprised.

"Indeed! Is it over?" said she, rising almost regretfully.

And quietly, timidly:

"Has he--has he won?"

It was innocent, so touching that the attendant did not even dream of
smiling.

"Unfortunately, no, madame. M. Jansoulet has not won. But why did he
stop in that way? If it is true that he never came to Paris, and that
another Jansoulet did everything they accuse him of, why did he not say
so?"

The old mother, turning pale, leaned on the balustrade of the staircase.
She had understood.

Bernard's brusque interruption on seeing her, the sacrifice he had made
to her so simply--that noble glance as of a dying animal, came to her
mind, and the shame of the elder, the favourite child, mingled itself
with Bernard's disaster--a double-edged maternal sorrow, which tore her
whichever way she turned. Yes, yes, it was on her account he would not
speak. But she would not accept such a sacrifice. He must come back at
once and explain himself before the deputies.

"My son, where is my son?"

"Below, madame, in his carriage. It was he who sent me to look for you."

She ran before the attendant, walking quickly, talking aloud, pushing
aside out of her way the little black and bearded men who were
gesticulating in the passages. After the waiting-hall she crossed a
great round antechamber where servants in respectful rows made a living
wainscotting to the high, blank wall. From there she could see through
the glass doors, the outside railing, the crowd in waiting, and among
the other vehicles, the Nabob's carriage waiting. As she passed, the
peasant recognised in one of the groups her enormous neighbour of the
gallery, with the pale man in spectacles who had attacked her son, who
was receiving all sorts of felicitation for his discourse. At the
name of Jansoulet, pronounced among mocking and satisfied sneers, she
stopped.

"At any rate," said a handsome man with a bad feminine face, "he has not
proved where our accusations were false."

The old woman, hearing that, wrenched herself through the crowd, and
facing Moessard said:

"What he did not say I will. I am his mother, and it is my duty to
speak."

She stopped to seize Le Merquier by the sleeve, who was escaping:

"Wicked man, you must listen, first of all. What have you got against my
child? Don't you know who he is? Wait a little till I tell you."

And turning to the journalist:

"I had two sons, sir."

Moessard was no longer there. She returned to Le Merquier: "Two sons,
sir." Le Merquier had disappeared.

"Oh, listen to me, some one, I beg," said the poor mother, throwing her
hands and her voice round her to assemble and retain her hearers; but
all fled, melted away, disappeared--deputies, reporters, unknown and
mocking faces to whom she wished at any cost to tell her story, careless
of the indifference where her sorrows and her joys fell, her pride and
maternal tenderness expressed in a tornado of feeling. And while she was
thus exciting herself and struggling--distracted, her bonnet awry--at
once grotesque and sublime, as are all the children of nature when
brought into civilization, taking to witness the honesty of her son
and the injustice of men, even the liveried servants, whose disdainful
impassibility was more cruel than all, Jansoulet appeared suddenly
beside her.

"Take my arm, mother. You must not stop there."

He said it in a tone so firm and calm that all the laughter ceased, and
the old woman, suddenly quieted, sustained by this solid hold, still
trembling a little with anger, left the palace between two respectful
rows. A dignified and rustic couple, the millions of the son gilding the
countrified air of the mother, like the rags of a saint enshrined in a
golden _chasse_--they disappeared in the bright sunlight outside, in the
splendour of their glittering carriage--a ferocious irony in their deep
distress, a striking symbol of the terrible misery of the rich.

They sat well back, for both feared to be seen, and hardly spoke at
first. But when the vehicle was well on its way, and he had behind
him the sad Calvary where his honour hung gibbeted, Jansoulet, utterly
overcome, laid his head on his mother's shoulder, hid it in the old
green shawl, and there, with the burning tears flowing, all his great
body shaken by sobs, he returned to the cry of his childhood: "Mother."




DRAMAS OF PARIS

     Que l'heure est donc breve,
     Qu'on passe en aimant!
     C'est moins qu'un moment,
     Un peu plus qu'un reve.

In the semi-obscurity of a great drawing-room filled with flowers, the
seats of the furniture covered with holland, the chandeliers draped with
muslin, the windows open, and the venetians lowered, Mme. Jenkins is
seated at the piano reading the new song of the fashionable musician;
some melodic phrases accompanying exquisite verse, a melancholy _Lied_,
unequally divided, which seems written for the tender gravities of her
voice and the disturbed state of her soul.

     Le temps nous enleve
     Notre enchantement

sighs the poor woman, moved by the sound of her own voice, and while
the notes float away in the court-yard of the house, where the fountain
falls drop by drop among a bed of rhododendrons, the singer breaks off,
her hands holding the chord, her eyes fixed on the music, but her look
far away. The doctor is absent. The care of his health and business has
exiled him from Paris for some days, and the thoughts of the beautiful
Mme. Jenkins have taken that grave turn, as often happens in solitude,
that analytical tendency which sometimes makes even momentary
separations fatal in the most united households. United they had not
been for sometime. They only saw each other at meal-times, before
the servants, hardly speaking unless he, the man of unctuous manners,
allowed himself to make some disobliging or brutal remark on her son,
or on her age, which she began to show, or on some dress which did not
become her. Always gentle and serene, she stifled her tears, accepted
everything, feigned not to understand; not that she loved him still
after so much cruelty and contempt, but it was the story, as their
coachman Joe told it, "of an old clinger who was determined to make him
marry her." Up to then a terrible obstacle--the life of the legitimate
wife--had prolonged a dishonourable situation. Now that the obstacle
no longer existed she wished to put an end to the situation, because
of Andre, who from one day to another might be forced to despise his
mother, because of the world which they had deceived for ten years--a
world she never entered but with a beating heart, for fear of the
treatment she would receive after a discovery. To her allusions, to
her prayers, Jenkins had answered at first by phrases, grand gestures:
"Could you distrust me? Is not our engagement sacred?"

He pointed out the difficulty of keeping an act of this importance
secret. Then he shut himself up in a malignant silence, full of cold
anger and violent determinations. The death of the duke, the fall of an
absurd vanity, had struck a final blow at the household; for disaster,
which often brings hearts ready to understand one another nearer,
finishes and completes disunions. And it was indeed a disaster. The
popularity of the Jenkins pearls suddenly stopped, the situation of the
foreign doctor and charlatan, ably defined by Bouchereau in the Journal
of the Academy, and people of fashion looked at each other in fright,
paler from terror than from the arsenic they had imbibed. Already the
Irishman had felt the effect of those counter blasts which make Parisian
infatuations so dangerous.

It was for that reason, no doubt, that Jenkins had judged it wise to
disappear for some time, leaving madame to continue to frequent the
houses still open to them, to gauge and hold public opinion in respect.
It was a hard task for the poor woman, who found everywhere the cool and
distant welcome which she had received at the Hemerlingues. But she did
not complain; thus earning her marriage, she was putting between them as
a last resource the sad tie of pity and common trials. And as she knew
that she was welcomed in the world on account of her talent, of the
artistic distraction she lent to their private parties, she was always
ready to lay on the piano her fan and long gloves, to play some fragment
of her vast repertory. She worked constantly, passing her afternoons
in turning over new music, choosing by preference sad and complicated
harmonies, the modern music which no longer contents itself with being
an art, but becomes a science, and answers better to our nerves, to our
restlessness, than to sentiment.

Daylight flooded the room as a maid brought a card to her mistress;
"Heurteux, business agent."

The gentleman was there, he insisted on seeing madame.

"You have told him the doctor is travelling?"

He had been told, but it was to madame he wished to speak.

"To me?"

Disturbed, she examined this rough, crumpled card, this unknown name:
"Heurteux." What could it be?

"Well, show him in."

Heurteux, business agent, coming from broad daylight into the
semi-obscurity of the room, was blinking with an uncertain air, trying
to see. She, on the other hand, saw very distinctly a stiff figure, with
iron-gray whiskers and protruding jaw, one of those hangers-on of the
law whom one meets round the law courts, born fifty years old, with a
bitter mouth, an envious air, and a morocco portfolio under the arm. He
sat down on the edge of the chair which she pointed out to him, turned
his head to make sure that the servant had gone out, then opened his
portfolio methodically to search for a paper. Seeing that he did not
speak, she began in a tone of impatience:

"I ought to warn you, sir, that my husband is absent, and that I am not
acquainted with his business."

Without any astonishment, his hand in his papers, the man answered:
"I know that _M. Jenkins_ is absent, madame"--he emphasized more
particularly the two words "M. Jenkins"--"especially as I come on his
behalf."

She looked at him frightened. "On his behalf?"

"Alas! yes, madame. The doctor's situation, as you are no doubt aware,
is one, for the moment, of very great embarrassment. Unfortunate
dealings on the Stock Exchange, the failure of a great financial
enterprise in which his money is invested, the _OEuvre de Bethleem_
which weighs heavily on him, all these reverses coming at once have
forced him to a grave resolution. He is selling his mansion, his horses,
everything that he possesses, and has given me a power of attorney for
that purpose."

He had at last found what he was looking for--one of those stamped
folded papers, interlined and riddled with references, where the
impassible law makes itself responsible for so many lies. Mme. Jenkins
was going to say: "But I was here. I would have carried out all his
wishes, all his orders--" when she suddenly understood by the coolness
of her visitor, his easy, almost insolent attitude, that she was
included in this clearing up, in the getting rid of the costly mansion
and useless riches, and that her departure would be the signal for the
sale.

She rose suddenly. The man, still seated, went on: "What I have still to
say, madame"--oh, she knew it, she could have dictated to him, what he
had still to say--"is so painful, so delicate. M. Jenkins is leaving
Paris for a long time, and in the fear of exposing you to the hazards
and adventures of the new life he is undertaking, of taking you
away from a son you cherish, and in whose interest perhaps you had
better----"

She heard no more, saw no more, and while he was spinning out his
gossamer phrases, given over to despair, she heard the song over and
over in her mind, as the last image seen pursues a drowning man:

     Le temps nous enleve
     Notre enchantement.

All at once her pride returned. "Let us put a stop to this, sir. All
your turns and phrases are only an additional insult. The fact is that I
am driven out--turned into the street like a servant."

"Oh, madame, madame! The situation is cruel enough, don't let us make it
worse by hard words. In the evolution of his _modus vivendi_ M. Jenkins
has to separate from you, but he does so with the greatest pain to
himself; and the proposals which I am charged to make are a proof of his
sentiments for you. First, as to furniture and clothes, I am authorized
to let you take--"

"That will do," said she. She flew to the bell. "I am going out.
Quick--my hat, my mantle, anything, never mind what. I am in a hurry."

And while they went to fetch her what she wanted she said:

"Everything here belongs to M. Jenkins. Let him dispose of it as he
likes. I want nothing from him. Don't insist; it is useless."

The man did not insist. His mission fulfilled, the rest mattered little
to him.

Steadily, coldly, she arranged her hat carefully before the glass, the
maid fastening her veil, and arranging on her shoulders the folds of her
mantle, then she looked round her and considered for a moment whether
she was forgetting anything precious to her. No, nothing--her son's
letters were in her pocket, she never allowed them to be away from her.

"Madame does not wish for the carriage?"

"No." And she left the house.

It was about five o'clock. At that moment Bernard Jansoulet was crossing
the doorway of the legislative chamber, his mother on his arm; but
poignant as was the drama enacted there, this one surpassed it--more
sudden, unforeseen, and without any stage effects. A drama between four
walls, improvised in Paris day by day. Perhaps it is this which gives
that vibration to the air of the city, that tremor which forces the
nerves into activity. The weather was magnificent. The streets of the
wealthy quarter, large and straight as avenues, shone in the declining
light, embellished with open windows, flowery balconies, and patches
of green seen on the boulevards, light and soft among the narrow, hard
prospects of stone. Mme. Jenkins hurried in this direction, walking
aimlessly, in a dull stupor. What a horrible crash! Five minutes ago
rich, surrounded by all the respect and comfort of easy circumstances.
Now--nothing. Not even a roof to sleep under, not even a name. The
street!

Where was she to go? What would become of her?

At first she had thought of her son. But, to acknowledge her fault, to
blush before her own child, to weep while taking from him the right to
console her, was more than she could do. No, there was nothing for her
but death. To die as soon as possible, to escape shame by a complete
disappearance, to unravel in this way an inextricable situation. But
where to die! How? There are so many ways of departure! And she called
them all up mentally while she walked. Life flowed around her, its
luxury at this time of the year in full flower, round the Madeleine
and its market, in a space marked off by the perfume of carnations and
roses. On the wide footpath were well-dressed women whose skirts mingled
their rustle with the trembling of the young leaves; there was some of
the pleasure here of a meeting in a drawing-room, an air of acquaintance
among the passers-by, of smiles and discreet greetings in passing. And
all at once Mme. Jenkins, anxious lest her features might betray her,
fearing what might be thought if any one saw her rushing on so blindly,
slackened her pace to the aimless gait of an afternoon walk, stopping
here and there. The light materials of the dresses spoke of summer,
of the country; a thin skirt for the sandy paths of the parks,
gauze-trimmed hats for the seaside, fans, sunshades. Her fixed eyes
fastened on these trifles without seeing them; but in a vague and pale
reflection in the clear windows she saw her image, lying motionless on
the bed of some hotel, the leaden sleep of a poison in her head; or,
down there, beyond the walls, among the slime of some sunken boat. Which
of the two was better?

She hesitated, considered, compared; then, her decision made, started
off with the resolved air of a woman tearing herself regretfully
from the temptations of the window. As she moved away, the Marquis de
Monpavon, proud and well-dressed, a flower in his coat, saluted her at
a distance with that sweep of the hat so dear to women's vanity, the
well-bred brow, with the hat lifted high above the erect head. She
answered him with her pretty Parisian's greeting, expressed in an
imperceptible inclination of the body and a smile; and seeing this
exchange of politeness in the midst of the spring gaiety, one would
never think that the same sinister idea was guiding the two, meeting by
chance on the road they were traversing in opposite directions, but to
the same end.

The prediction of Mora's valet had come true for the marquis: "We
may die or lose power; then there will be a reckoning, and it will be
terrible." It was terrible. The former receiver-general had obtained
with difficulty a delay of a fortnight to make up his deficiencies,
taking the last chance that Jansoulet, with his election confirmed, and
with full control over his millions again, would come to the rescue once
more. The decision of the Assembly had just taken from him this last
hope. As soon as he knew it, he returned to the club calmly, and went
up to his room, where Francis was waiting impatiently for him with
an important paper just arrived. It was a notification to the Sieur
Louis-Marie-Agenor de Monpavon to appear the next day in the office
of the Juge d'Instruction. Was it addressed to the censor of the
Territorial Bank or to the former receiver-general? In any case, the
bold formula of a judicial assignation in the first instance, instead of
a private invitation, spoke sufficiently of the gravity of the situation
and the firm resolution of Justice.

In view of such an extremity, foreseen and expected for long, he
had made his plans. A Monpavon in the criminal courts!--a Monpavon,
librarian in a convict prison! Never! He put all his affairs in order,
tore up his papers, emptied his pockets carefully, and took something
from his toilet-table, so calmly and naturally, that when he said
to Francis, as he was going out, "Am going to the baths--That dirty
Chamber--Filthy dust"--the servant took him at his word. And the marquis
was not lying. His exciting post up there in the dust of the tribune had
tired him as much as two nights in the train; and his decision to die
associated itself with his desire to take a bath, the old Sybarite
thought of going to sleep in the bath, like what's his name, and other
famous personages of antiquity. And in justice, it must be said that not
one of these Stoics went to his death more quietly than he.

With a white camellia in his buttonhole, above his rosette of the Legion
of Honour, he was going up the Boulevard des Capucines with a light
step, when the sight of Mme. Jenkins troubled his serenity for a moment.
She had a youthful air, a light in her eyes, something so piquant that
he stopped to look at her. Tall and beautiful, with her long dress of
black gauze, her shoulders wrapped in a lace mantle, her hat trimmed
with a garland of autumn leaves, she disappeared in the midst of other
elegant women in the balmy atmosphere; and the thought that his eyes
were going to close forever on this delightful sight, whose pleasures he
knew so well, saddened Monpavon a little, and took the spring from his
step. But a few paces farther on, a meeting of another kind gave him
back all his courage.

Some one, threadbare, shamefaced, dazzled by the light, was coming down
the Boulevard. It was old Marestang, former senator, former minister,
so deeply compromised in the affairs of the "Malta Biscuits," that,
in spite of his age, his services, and the great scandal of such a
proceeding, he had been condemned to two years of prison, struck off
the roll of the Legion of Honour, of which he had been one of the
dignitaries. The affair was long ago; the poor wretch had just been let
out of prison before his sentence had expired, lost, ruined, not having
even the means to gild his trouble, for he had had to pay what he owed.
Standing on the curb, he was waiting with bent head till the crowds of
carriages should allow him to pass, embarrassed by this stoppage at the
fullest spot of the boulevards between the passers-by and the sea of
open carriages filled with familiar figures. Monpavon walking near him,
caught his timid, uneasy look, imploring a recognition and hiding from
it at the same time. The idea that one day he could humiliate himself
thus, gave him a shudder of revolt. "Oh! that is not possible!" And
straightening himself up and throwing out his chest, he kept on his way,
firmer and more resolute than before.

M. de Monpavon walks to his death! He goes there by the long line of
the boulevards, all on fire in the direction of the Madeleine, where
he treads the elastic asphalt once more as a lounger, nose in the air,
hands crossed behind. He has time; there is no hurry; he is master of
the rendezvous. At each instant he smiles before him, waves a greeting
from the ends of his fingers or makes the more formal bow we have
just seen. Everything revives him, charms him, the noise of the
watering-carts, the awnings of the _cafes_, pulled down to the middle
of the foot-paths. The approach of death gives him the feelings of a
convalescent accessible to all the delicacy, the hidden poesy of an
exquisite hour of summer in the midst of Parisian life--of an exquisite
hour--his last, and which he will prolong till night. No doubt it is
for that reason that he passes the sumptuous establishment where he
ordinarily takes his bath. He does not stop either at the Chinese Baths.
He is too well known here. All Paris would know of it the same evening.
There would be a scandal of bad taste, much coarse rumour about his
death in the clubs and drawing-rooms. And the old sensualist, the
well-bred man, wishes to spare himself this shame, to plunge and be
swallowed up in the vague anonymity of suicide, like those soldiers who,
after great battles, neither wounded, dead, or living, are simply
put down as "missing." That is why he has nothing on him which can be
recognised, or furnish a hint to the inquiries of the police, why he
seeks in this immense Paris the distant quarter where will open for him
the terrible but oblivious confusion of the pauper's grave. Already,
since Monpavon has been walking, the aspect of the boulevard
has changed. The crowd has become more compact, more active, and
preoccupied, the houses smaller, marked with signs of commerce. When the
gates of Saint-Denis and Saint-Martin are passed, with their overflow
from the faubourgs, the provincial physiognomy of the town accentuates
itself. The old beau no longer knows any one, and can congratulate
himself on being unknown.

The shopkeepers looking curiously after him, with his fine linen, his
well-cut coat, and good figure, take him for some famous actor strolling
on the boulevard--witness of his first triumphs--before the play begins.
The wind freshens, the twilight softens the distances, and while the
long road behind him still glitters, it grows darker now at every
step--like the past, with its retrospections to him who looks back and
regrets. It seems to Monpavon that he is walking into blackness. He
shivers a little, but does not falter, and continues to walk with erect
head and chest thrown out.

M. de Monpavon walks to his death! Now he is entering the complicated
labyrinth of noisy streets, where the clatter of the omnibus mingles
with the thousand humming trades of the working city, where the heat
of the factory chimneys loses itself in the fever of a whole people
struggling against hunger. The air trembles, the gutters steam, the
houses shake at the passing of the wagons, of the heavy drays rumbling
round the narrow streets. On a sudden the marquis stops; he has found
what he wanted. Between the black shop of a charcoal-seller and the
establishment of a packing-case maker, whose pine boards leaning on the
walls give him a little shiver, there is a wide door, surmounted by its
sign, the word BATHS on a dirty lantern. He enters, crosses a little
damp garden where a jet of water weeps in a rockery. Here is the gloomy
corner he was looking for. Who would ever believe that the Marquis de
Monpavon had come there to cut his throat? The house is at the end, low,
with green blinds and a glass door, with a sham air of a villa. He asks
for a bath, and while it is being prepared he smokes his cigar at the
window, with the noise of the water behind him, looks at the flower-bed
of sparse lilac, and the high walls which inclose it.

At the side there is a great yard, the court-yard of a fire station,
with a gymnasium, whose masts and swings, vaguely seen from below, look
like gibbets. A bugle-call sounds in the yard, and its call takes the
marquis thirty years back, reminds him of his campaigns in Algeria, the
high ramparts of Constantine, the arrival of Mora at the regiment, and
the duels, and the little parties. Ah! how well life began then! What a
pity that those cursed cards--ps--ps--ps--Well, it's something to have
saved appearances.

"Your bath is ready, sir," said the attendant.


At that moment, breathless and pale, Mme. Jenkins was entering Andre's
studio, where an instinct stronger than her will had brought her--the
wish to embrace her child before she died. When she opened the door (he
had given her a key) she was relieved to find that he was not there, and
that she would have time to calm her excitement, increased as it was by
the long walk to which she was so little accustomed. No one was there.
But on the table was the little note which he always left when he went
out, so that his mother, whose visits were becoming shorter and less
frequent on account of the tyranny of Jenkins, could tell where he was,
and wait for him or rejoin him easily. The two had not ceased to love
each other deeply, tenderly, in spite of the cruelty of life which
forced into the relations of mother and son the clandestine precautions
of an intrigue.

"I am at my rehearsal," said the note to-day, "I shall be back at
seven."

This attention of the son, whom she had not seen for three weeks, yet
who persisted in expecting her all the same, brought to the mother's
eyes the flood of tears which was suffocating her. She felt as if she
had just entered a new world. This little room was so pure, so quiet, so
elevated. It kept the last rays of the setting sun on its windows,
and seemed, with its bare walls, hewn from a corner of the sky. It was
adorned only with one great portrait, hers, nothing but hers, smiling
in the place of honour, and again, down there, on the table in a gilt
frame. This humble little lodging, so light when all Paris was becoming
dark, made an extraordinary impression on her, in spite of the poverty
of its sparse furniture, scattered in two rooms, its common chintz, and
its chimney garnished with two great bunches of hyacinths--those flowers
which are hawked round the streets in barrowsful. What a good and worthy
life she could have led by the side of her Andre! And in her mind's eye
she had arranged her bed in one corner, her piano in another, she saw
herself giving lessons, and caring for the home to which she was adding
her share of ease and courageous gaiety. How was it that she had not
seen that her duty, the pride of her widowhood, was there? By what
blindness, what unworthy weakness?

It was a great fault, no doubt, but one for which many excuses might be
found in her easy and tender disposition, and the clever knavery of her
accomplice, always talking of marriage, hiding from her that he himself
was no longer free, and when at last obliged to confess it, painting
such a picture of his dull life, of his despair, of his love, that the
poor creature, so deeply compromised already, and incapable of one
of those heroic efforts which raise the sufferer above the false
situations, had given way at last, had accepted this double existence,
so brilliant and so miserable, built on a lie which had lasted
ten years. Ten years of intoxicating success and unspeakable
unhappiness--ten years of singing, with the fear of exposure between
each verse--where the least remark on irregular unions wounded her like
an allusion--where the expression of her face had softened to the air of
mild humility, of a guilty woman begging for pardon. Then the certainty
that she would be deserted had come to spoil even these borrowed joys,
had tarnished her luxury; and what misery, what sufferings borne in
silence, what incessant humiliations, even to this last, the most
terrible of all!

While she is thus sadly reviewing her life in the cool of the evening
and the calm of the deserted house, a gust of happy laughter rose from
the rooms beneath; and recalling the confidences of Andre, his last
letter telling the great news, she tried to distinguish among all these
fresh and limpid voices that of her daughter Elise, her son's betrothed,
whom she did not know, whom she would never know. This reflection added
to the misery of her last moments, and loaded them with so much remorse
and regret that, in spite of her will to be brave, she wept.

Night comes on little by little. Large shadows cover the sloping
windows, where the immense depth of the sky seems to lose its colour,
and to deepen into obscurity. The roofs seem to draw close together for
the night, like soldiers preparing for the attack. The bells count the
hours gravely, while the martins fly round their hidden nests, and the
wind makes its accustomed invasion of the rubbish of the old wood-yard.
To-night it sighs with the sound of the river, a shiver of the fog; it
sighs of the river, to remind the unfortunate woman that it is there
she must go. She shivers beforehand in her lace mantle. Why did she come
here to reawaken her desire for a life impossible after the avowal she
was forced to make? Hasty steps shake the staircase; the door opens
precipitately; it is Andre. He is singing, happy, in a great hurry, for
they are waiting dinner for him below. But, as he is striking the match,
he feels that someone is in the room--a moving shadow among the shadows
at rest.

"Who is there?"

Something answers him like a stifled laugh or a sob. He believes that
it is one of his little neighbours, a plot of the children to amuse
themselves. He draws near. Two hands, two arms, seize and surround him.

"It is I."

And with a feverish voice, hurrying as if to assure herself, she tells
him that she is setting out on a long journey, and that before going--

"A journey! And where are you going?"

"Oh, I do not know. We are going over there, a long way, on business in
his own part of the world."

"What! You will not be here for my play? It is in three days. And then,
immediately after, my marriage. Come now, he cannot hinder you from
coming to my marriage?"

She makes excuses, imagines reasons, but her hands burning between her
son's, and her altered voice, tell Andre that she is not speaking the
truth. He is going to strike a light; she prevents him.

"No, no; it is useless. We are better without it. Besides, I have so
much to get ready still. I must go away."

They are both standing up, ready for the separation, but Andre will not
let her go without telling him what is the matter, what tragic care
is hollowing that fair face where the eyes--was it an effect of the
dusk?--shone with a strange light.

"Nothing; no, nothing, I assure you. Only the idea of not being able to
take part in your happiness, your triumph. At any rate, you know I love
you; you don't mistrust your mother, do you? I have never been a day
without thinking of you: do the same--keep me in your heart. And now
kiss me and let me go quickly. I have waited too long."

Another minute and she would have the strength for what she had to do.
She darts forward.

"No, you shall not go. I feel that something extraordinary is happening
in your life which you do not want to tell. You are in some great
trouble, I am sure. This man has done some infamous thing."

"No, no. Let me go! Let me go!"

But he held her fast.

"Tell me, what is it? Tell me."

Then, whispering in her ear, with a voice tender and low as a kiss:

"He has left you, hasn't he?"

The wretched woman shivers, hesitates.

"Ask me nothing. I will say nothing. Adieu!"

He pressed her to his heart:

"What could you tell me that I do not know already, poor mother? You did
not guess, then, why I left six months ago?"

"You know?"

"I know everything. And what has happened to you to-day I have foreseen
for long, and hoped for."

"Oh, wretch, wretch that I am, why did I come?"

"Because it is your home, because you owe me ten years of my mother. You
see now that I must keep you."

He said all this on his knees, before the sofa on which she had let
herself fall, in a flood of tears, and the last painful sobs of her
wounded pride. She wept thus for long, her child at her feet. And now
the Joyeuse family, anxious because Andre did not come down, hurried
up in a troop to look for him. It was an invasion of innocent faces,
transparent gaiety, floating curls, modest dress, and over all the
group shone the big lamp, the good old lamp with the vast shade which
M. Joyeuse solemnly carried, as high, as straight as he could, with the
gesture of a caryatid. Suddenly they stopped before this pale and sad
lady, who looked, touched to the depths, at all this smiling grace,
above all at Elise, a little behind the others, whose conscious air in
this indiscreet visit points her out as the _fiancee_.

"Elise, embrace our mother and thank her. She has come to live with her
children."

There she is, caught in all these caressing arms, pressed against four
little feminine hearts which have missed the shelter of a mother's love
for so long; there she is introduced, and so gently, into the luminous
circle of the family lamp, widened to allow her to take her place there,
to dry her eyes, to warm and brighten her spirit at this steady flame,
even in this little studio near the roof, where just now the terrible
storm blew so wildly.


He who breathes his last over there, lying in his blood-stained bath,
has never known this sacred flame. Egoistical and hard, he has lived up
to the last for show, throwing out his chest in a bubble of vanity. And
this vanity was what was best in him. It alone had held him firm and
upright so long; it alone clinched his teeth on the groans of his
last agony. In the damp garden the water drips sadly. The bugle of the
firemen sounds the curfew. "Go and look at No. 7," says the mistress,
"he will never have done with his bath." The attendant goes, and utters
a cry of fright, of horror: "Oh, madame, he is dead! But it is not the
same man." They go, but nobody can recognise the fine gentleman who
entered a short time ago, in this death's-head puppet, the head leaning
on the edge of the bath, a face where the blood mingles with paint and
powder, all the limbs lying in the supreme lassitude of a part played
to the end--to the death of the actor. Two cuts of the razor across the
magnificent chest, and all the factitious majesty has burst and resolved
itself into this nameless horror, this heap of mud, of blood, of spoiled
and dead flesh, where, unrecognisable, lies the man of appearances, the
Marquis Louis-Marie-Agenor de Monpavon.




MEMOIRS OF AN OFFICE PORTER THE LAST LEAVES

I put down in haste and with an agitated pen the terrible events of
which I have been the plaything for the last few days. This time it
is all up with the Territorial and with my ambitious dreams. Disputed
bills, men in possession, visits of the police, all our books in the
hands of the courts, the governor fled, Bois l'Hery, the director, in
prison, another--Monpavon--disappeared. My brain reels in the midst of
these catastrophes. And if I had obeyed the warnings of reason, I should
have been quietly six months ago at Montbars cultivating my vineyard,
with no other care than that of seeing the clusters grow round and
golden in the good Burgundian sun, and to gather from the leaves, after
the dew, the little gray snails, so excellent when they are fried.
I should have built for myself with my savings, at the end of the
vineyard, on the height--I can see the place at this moment--a tower in
rough stone, like M. Chalmette's, so convenient for an afternoon nap,
while the quails are chirping round the place. But always misled by
deceiving illusions, I wished to enrich myself, speculate, meddle in
finance, chain my fortune to the car of the conquerors of the day; and
now here I am back again in the saddest pages of my history, clerk in
a bankrupt establishment, my duty to answer a horde of creditors, of
shareholders drunk with fury, who load my white hairs with the worst
outrages, and would like to make me responsible for the ruin of the
Nabob and the flight of the governor; as if I myself was not as cruelly
struck by the loss of my four years of arrears, and my seven thousand
francs which I had confided to that scoundrel of Paganetti de
Porto-Vecchio.

But it is my fate to empty the cup of humiliation and degradation to the
dregs. Have I not been made to appear before a Juge d'Instruction--I,
Passajon, former apparitor of the faculty, with thirty years of faithful
service, and the ribbon of Officer of the Academy? Oh! when I saw
myself going up that staircase of the Palace of Justice, so big, so
conspicuous, without a rail to hold by, I felt my head turning and my
legs sinking under me. I was forced to reflect there, crossing these
halls, black with lawyers and judges, studded with great green doors
behind which one heard the imposing noise of the hearings; and up
higher, in the corridor of the Juges d'Instruction, during my hour's
waiting on a bench, where the prison vermin crawled on my legs, while I
listened to a lot of thieves, pickpockets, and loose women talking and
laughing with the gendarmes, and the butts of the rifles echo in the
passages, and the dull roll of prison vans. I understood then the danger
of "combinations," and that it was not always good to ridicule M. Gogo.

What reassured me, however, was that never having taken any part in the
deliberations of the Territorial, I had no share in their dealings and
intrigues. But explain this to me: Once in the judge's office, before
that man in a velvet cap looking at me across his table with his little
eyes like hooks, I felt so pierced through, searched, turned over to
the very depth of my being, that, in spite of my innocence, I wanted to
confess. Confess what? I don't know. But that is the effect which the
law had. This devil of a man spent five minutes looking at me without
speaking, all the while turning over a book filled with writing not
unknown to me, and suddenly he said, in a mocking and severe tone:

"Well, M. Passajon, how long is it since the affair of the drayman?"

The memory of a certain little misdeed, in which I had taken part in my
days of distress, was already so distant that I did not understand at
once; but some words of the judge showed me how completely he knew the
history of our bank. This terrible man knew everything, down to the
least details, the most secret things. Who could have informed him so
thoroughly?

It was all very short, very dry, and, when I wished to enlighten justice
with some wise observations, a certain insolent fashion of saying,
"Don't make phrases," so much the more wounding at my age and with my
reputation of a good talker; also we were not alone in his office. A
clerk seated near me was writing down my deposition, and behind I heard
the noise of great leaves turning. The judge asked me all sorts of
questions about the Nabob--the time when he had made his payments, the
place where we kept our books; and all at once, addressing himself to
the person whom I could not see: "Show us the cash-book, _M. l'Expert_."

A little man in a white tie brought the great register to the table. It
was M. Joyeuse, the former cashier of Hemerlingue & Sons. But I had not
time to offer him my respects.

"Who has done that?" asked the judge, opening the book where a page was
torn out. "Don't lie, now."

I did not lie; I knew nothing of it, never having had to do with the
books. However, I thought it my duty to mention M. de Gery, the Nabob's
secretary, who often came at night into the office and shut himself up
for hours casting balances. Then little Father Joyeuse turned red with
anger.

"That is an absurdity, M. le Juge d'Instruction. M. de Gery is the
young man of whom I have spoken to you. He came to the Territorial as a
superintendent, and thought too much of this poor M. Jansoulet to
remove the receipts for his payments; that is the proof of his blind but
thorough honesty. Besides, M. de Gery, who has been detained in Tunis,
is on his way back, and will furnish before long all the explanation
necessary."

I felt that my zeal was about to compromise me.

"Take care, Passajon," said the judge. "You are only here as a witness;
but if you attempt to mislead justice, you may return a prisoner"
(he, the monster, had, indeed, the manner of desiring it). "Come now,
consider; who tore out this page?"

Then I very fortunately remembered that some days before he left Paris
the governor had me made bring the books to his house, where they were
all night. The clerk took a note of my declaration, after which the
judge dismissed me with a sign, warning me to be ready when I was
wanted. Then, on the threshold, he called me back: "Stay, M. Passajon,
take this away. I don't want it any more."

He held out the papers he had been consulting while he was questioning
me; and judge of my confusion when I saw on the cover the word
"Memoirs," written in my best round-hand. I, myself, had provided
material to Justice--important details which the suddenness of our
catastrophe had prevented me from saving from the police search of our
office.

My first idea on returning home was to tear up these indiscreet papers;
but on reflection, and after having assured myself that the Memoirs
contained nothing that would compromise me, I have decided to go on with
them, with the certainty of getting some profit out of them one day or
another. There are plenty of novelists at Paris who have no imagination
and can only put true stories in their books, who would be glad to buy
a little book of incidents. That is how I shall avenge myself on this
society of well-to-do swindlers, with which I have been mixed up to my
shame and misfortune.

Besides, I must occupy my leisure time. There is nothing to do at the
bank, which is completely deserted since the judicial inquiry began,
except to arrange the bills of all colours. I have again undertaken the
writing for the cook on the second floor, Mlle. Seraphine, from whom
I accept in return some little refreshment, which I keep in the
strong-box, once more become a provision safe. The wife of the governor
is also very good to me, and stuffs my pockets each time I go to see her
in her great rooms on the Chaussee d'Antin. There nothing has changed;
the same luxury, the same comfort, also a three-months'-old baby--the
seventh--and a superb nurse, whose Norman cap is the admiration of the
Bois de Boulogne. It seems that once started on the rails of fortune,
people need a certain time to slacken their speed or stop. Besides, this
thief of a Paganetti had, in case of accident, settled everything on his
wife. Perhaps that is why this rag-bag of an Italian woman has such an
unshakable admiration for him. He has fled, he is in hiding; but she
remains convinced that her husband is a little Saint-John of innocence,
the victim of his goodness and credulity. One ought to hear her. "You
know him, you Moussiou Passajon. You know if he is scrupulous. But as
true as there is a God, if my husband had committed such crimes as he is
accused of, I myself--you hear me--I myself would put a blunderbuss in
his hands, and would say to him, 'Here, Tchecco, blow out your brains!'"
and by the way in which she opens the nostrils of her little turned-up
nose, her round eyes, black as jet, one feels that this little Corsican
would have acted as she spoke. He must be very clever, this infernal
governor, to deceive even his wife, to act a part even at home, where
the cleverest let themselves be seen as they really are.

In the meantime all these rogues have good dinners; even Bois l'Hery
has his meals sent in to the prison from the Cafe Anglais, and poor old
Passajon is reduced to live on scraps picked up in the kitchen. Still
we must not grumble too much. There are others more wretched than we
are--witness M. Francis, who came in this morning to the Territorial,
thin, pale, with dirty linen and frayed cuffs, which he still pulled
down by force of habit.

I was at the moment grilling some bacon before the fire in the
board-room, my plate laid on the corner of a marqueterie table, with a
newspaper underneath to preserve it. I invited Monpavon's valet to share
my frugal meal; but since he has waited on a marquis he had come to
think that he formed part of the nobility, and he declined with a
dignified air, perfectly ridiculous with his hollow cheeks. He began by
telling me that he still had no news of his master; that they had
sent him away from the club, all the papers under seal, and a horde of
creditors like locusts on the marquis's small wardrobe. "So that I am
a little short," added M. Francis. That is to say, that he had not the
worth of a radish in his pockets, that he had been sleeping for two days
on the benches in the streets, awakened at each instant by the police,
obliged to rise, to pretend to be drunk so as to seek another shelter.
As to eating, I believe he had not done so for a long time, for he
looked at the food with such hungry eyes as to wring one's heart, and
when I insisted on putting before him a slice of bacon and a glass of
wine, he fell on it like a wolf. All at once the blood came back to his
cheeks and, still eating, he began to chatter.

"You know, _pere_ Passajon," said he to me between two mouthfuls, "I
know where he is. I have seen him."

He winked his eye knowingly. I looked at him in wonder. "Who is it you
have seen, M. Francis?"

"The marquis, my master--over there in the little white house behind
Notre-Dame." (He did not use the word morgue, it is too low.) "I was
sure I should find him there. I went there first thing next morning.
There he was. Oh, well disguised, I tell you. Only his valet could
recognise him. The hair gray, the teeth gone, the wrinkles showing his
sixty-five years, which he used to hide so well. On the marble slab,
with the tap running above, I seemed to see him at his dressing-table."

"And you said nothing?"

"No. I knew his intentions on the subject for long. I let him go away
discreetly, without awakening attention, as he wished. But, all the
same, he might have given me a crust of bread before he went, after a
service of twenty years."

And on a sudden, striking the table with his fist with rage:

"When I think that if I had liked I might have been with Mora, instead
of going to Monpavon, that I might have had Louis's place. What luck he
has had! How many bags of gold he laid his hands on when his duke died!
And the wardrobe--hundreds of shirts, a dressing-gown of blue fox fur
worth more than twenty thousand francs. Like Noel, too, he must have
made his pile! He had to hurry, too, for he knew that it would stop
soon. Now there is nothing to be got in the Place Vendome. An old
policeman of a mother who manages everything. Saint-Romans is to be
sold, the pictures are to be sold, half the house to be let. It is a
real break-up."

I must confess that I could not help showing my satisfaction, for
this wretched Jansoulet is the cause of all our misfortunes. A man who
boasted of being so rich, who said so everywhere. The public bit at
it like a fish who sees the scales shine through the net. He has lost
millions, I admit, but why did he make us believe he had more? They have
arrested Bois l'Hery; they should have arrested _him_. Ah! if we had had
another expert, I am sure it would have been done. Besides, as I said to
Francis, you had only to look at this upstart of a Jansoulet to see what
he was worth. What a head--like a bandit!

"And so common," said the ex-valet.

"No principles."

"An absolute want of form. Well, there he is on his beam-ends, and then
Jenkins, too, and plenty of others with them."

"What! the doctor too? Ah! so much the worse. Such a polite and amiable
man."

"Yes, still another breaking-up of his establishment. Horses, carriages,
furniture. The yard of the house is full of bills, and it sounds as
empty as if some one were dead. The place at Nanterre is on sale. There
were half a dozen of the 'little Bethlehems' left whom they packed up in
a cab. It is a break-up, I tell you, _pere_ Passajon, a ruin which
we, old as we are, may not see the end of, but it will be complete.
Everything is rotten, it must all come down!"

He was a sinister figure, this old steward of the Empire, thin, stubbly,
covered with mud, and shouting like a Jeremiah, "It is the downfall!"
with a toothless mouth, black and wide open. I felt afraid and ashamed
of him, with a great desire to see him outside, and I thought: "Oh, M.
Chalmette! Oh, my little vineyard of Montbars!"


_Same date_.--Great news. Mme. Gaganetti came this afternoon to bring me
mysteriously a letter from the governor. He is in London, going to begin
a magnificent thing. Fine offices in the best part of the town, a superb
list of shareholders. He offers me the chance of joining him, "happy to
repair thus the damage he has caused me," says he. I shall have twice my
wages at the Territorial, be lodged comfortably, five shares in the new
bank, and all my arrears paid. All I need is a little money to go
there and to pay a few small debts round here. Good luck! My fortune
is assured. I shall write to the notary of Montbars to mortgage my
vineyard.




AT BORDIGHERA

As M. Joyeuse had told the Juge d'Instruction, Paul de Gery returned
from Tunis after three weeks' absence. Three interminable weeks spent
in struggling among intrigues, and traps secretly laid by the powerful
hatred of the Hemerlingues--in wandering from hall to hall, from
ministry to ministry through the immense palace of the Bardo, which
gathered within one enclosure, bristling with culverins, all the
departments of the State, as much under the master's eye as his stables
and harem. On his arrival, Paul had learned that the Chamber of Justice
was preparing secretly Jansoulet's trial--a derisive trial, lost
beforehand; and the closed offices of the Nabob on the Marine Quay, the
seals on his strong boxes, his ships moored to the Goulette, a guard
round his palace, seemed to speak of a sort of civil death, of a
disputed succession of which the spoils would not long remain to be
shared.

There was not a defender, nor a friend, in this voracious crowd; the
French colony itself appeared satisfied with the fall of a courtier who
had so long monopolized the roads to favour. To attempt to snatch this
prey from the Bey, excepting by a striking triumph at the Assembly, was
not to be thought of. All that de Gery could hope for was to save some
shreds of his fortune, and this only if he hurried, for he was expecting
day by day to learn of his friend's complete ruin.

He set himself to work, therefore, hurried on his business with
an activity which nothing could discourage, neither Oriental
discursiveness--that refined fair-spoken politeness, under which is
hidden ferocity--nor coolly indifferent smiles, nor averted looks,
invoking divine fatalism when human lies fail. The self-possession of
this southerner, in whom was condensed, as it were, all the exuberance
of his compatriots, served him as well as his perfect knowledge of
French law, of which the Code of Tunis is only a disfigured copy.

By his diplomacy and discretion, in spite of the intrigues of
Hemerlingue's son--who was very influential at the Bardo--he succeeded
in withdrawing from confiscation the money lent by the Nabob some
months before, and to snatch ten millions out of fifteen from Mohammed's
rapacity. The very morning of the day on which the money was to be paid
over, he received from Paris the news of the unseating of Jansoulet. He
hurried at once to the Palace to arrive there before the news, and on
his return with the ten millions in bills on Marseilles secure in his
pocket-book, he passed young Hemerlingue's carriage, with his three
mules at full gallop. The thin owl's face was radiant. De Gery
understood that if he remained many hours at Tunis his bills ran the
risk of being confiscated, so took his place at once on an Italian
packet which was sailing next morning for Genoa, passed the night on
board, and was only easy in his mind when he saw far behind him white
Tunis with her gulf and the rocks of Cape Carthage spread out before
her. On entering Genoa, the steamer while making for the quay passed
near a great yacht with the Tunisian flag flying. De Gery felt greatly
excited, and for a moment believed that she had come in pursuit of him,
and that on landing he might be seized by the Italian police like a
common thief. But the yacht was swinging peacefully at anchor, her
sailors cleaning the deck or repainting the red siren of her figurehead,
as if they were expecting someone of importance. Paul had not the
curiosity to ask who this personage was. He crossed the marble city, and
returned by the coast railway from Genoa to Marseilles--that marvellous
route where one passes suddenly from the blackness of the tunnels to the
dazzling light of the blue sea.

At Savona the train stopped, and the passengers were told that they
could go no farther, as one of the little bridges over the torrents
which rush from the mountains to the sea had been broken during the
night. They must wait for the engineer and the break-down gang, already
summoned by telegraph; wait perhaps a half day. It was early morning.
The Italian town was waking in one of those veiled dawns which forecast
great heat for the day. While the dispersed travellers took refuge in
the hotels, installed themselves in the _cafes_, and others visited the
town, de Gery, chafing at the delay, tried to think of some means of
saving these few hours. He thought of poor Jansoulet, to whom the money
he was bringing might save honour and life, of his dear Aline, her whose
remembrance had not quitted him a single day of his journey, no more
than the portrait which she had given him. Then he was inspired to hire
one of those four-horse _calesinos_ which run from Genoa to Nice, along
the Italian Corniche--an adorable trip which foreigners, lovers, and
winners at Monaco often enjoy. The driver guaranteed that he would be
at Nice early; and even if he arrived no earlier than the train, his
impatient spirit felt the comfort of movement, of feeling at each turn
of the wheel the distance from his desire decrease.

On a fine morning in June, when one is young and in love, it is a
delicious intoxication to tear behind four horses over the white
Corniche road. To the left, a hundred feet below, the sea sparkling with
foam, from the rounded rocks of the shore to those vapoury distances
where the blue of the waves and of the heavens mingle; red or white
sails are scattered over it like wings, steamers leaving behind them
their trail of smoke; and on the sands, fishermen no larger than birds,
in their anchored boats like nests. Then the road descends, follows a
rapid declivity along the rocks and sharp promontories. The fresh wind
from the waves shakes the little harness bells; while on the right, on
the side of the mountain, the rows of pine-trees, the green oaks with
roots capriciously leaving the arid soil, and olive-trees growing on
their terraces, up to a wide and white pebbly ravine, bordered with
grass, marking the passage of the waters. This is really a dried-up
water-course, which the loaded mules ascend with firm foot among the
shingle, and a washer-woman stoops near a microscopic pond--the few
drops that remained of the great inundation of winter. From time to time
one crosses the street of some village, or little town rather, grown
rusty through too much sun, of historic age, the houses closely packed
and joined by dark arcades--a network of vaulted courts which clamber
the hillside with glimpses of the upper daylight, here and there letting
one see crowds of children with aureoles of hair, baskets of brilliant
fruit, a woman coming down the road, her water-pot on her head and her
distaff on her arm. Then at a corner of the street, the blue sparkle of
the waves and the immensity of nature.

But as the day advanced, the sun rising in the heavens spread over
the sea--now escaped from its mists, still with the transparence
of quartz--thousands of rays striking the water like arrow-heads, a
dazzling sight made doubly so by the whiteness of the rocks and of
the soil, by a veritable African sirocco which raised the dust in
a whirlwind on the road. They were coming to the hottest and most
sheltered places of the Corniche--a true exotic temperature, scattering
dates, cactus, and aloes. Seeing these thin trunks, this fantastic
vegetation in the white hot air, feeling the blinding dust crackle under
the wheels like snow, de Gery, his eyes half closed, dreaming in this
leaden noon, thought he was once more on that fatiguing road from Tunis
to the Bardo, in a singular medley of Levantine carriages with brilliant
liveries, of long-necked camels, of caparisoned mules, of young donkeys,
of Arabs in rags, of half-naked negroes, of officials in full-dress with
their guard of honour. Should he find there, where the road ran through
the gardens of palm-trees, the strange and colossal architecture of the
Bey's palace, its barred windows with closed lattices, its marble gates,
its balconies in carved wood painted in bright colours?--It was not the
Bardo, but the lovely country of Bordighera, divided, like all those
on the coast, into two parts--the sea town lying on the shore; and the
upper town, joined to it by a forest of motionless palm-trees, with
upright stem and falling crown--like green rockets, springing into the
blue with their thousand feathers.

The insupportable heat, the overtired horses, forced the traveller to
stop for a couple of hours at one of those great hotels which line the
road, and bring every November into this little town, so marvellously
sheltered, the luxurious life and cosmopolitan animation of an
aristocratic wintering place. But at this time of year there was no one
in the sea town of Bordighera but fishermen, invisible at this hour. The
villas and hotels seemed dead, their blinds and shutters closed.
They took Paul through long, cool, and silent passages to a great
drawing-room facing north, which seemed to be part of the suites let
for the season, whose doors communicated with the other rooms. White
curtains, a carpet, the comfort demanded by the English even when
travelling, and outside the windows, which the hotel-keeper opened
wide to tempt the traveller to a longer stay, a splendid view of the
mountain. An astonishing quiet reigned in this great deserted inn, with
neither manager, nor cook, nor waiters--the whole staff coming only
in the winter--and given up for domestic needs to a local spoil-sauce,
expert at a _stoffato_, a _risotto_; also to two stablemen, who clothed
themselves at meal-time with the dress-coat and white tie of office.
Happily, de Gery was only going to remain there for an hour or two, to
rest his eyes from the overpowering light, his head from the dolorous
grip of the sun.

From the divan where he lay, the admirable landscape, diversified with
light and trembling leaves, seemed to descend to his window by stages
of different greens, where scattered villas shone white, and among
them that of Maurice Trott, the banker, recognisable by its capricious
architecture and the height of its palms.

The Levantine house, whose gardens came up to the windows of the hotel,
had sheltered for some months an artistic celebrity, the sculptor
Brehat, who was dying of consumption, and owed the prolonging of his
existence to this princely hospitality. The neighbourhood of this dying
celebrity--of which the hotel-keeper was proud, and which he would have
liked to charge in the bill--the name of Brehat, which de Gery had so
often heard pronounced with admiration in Felicia Ruys's studio, brought
back his thoughts to the beautiful face, with its pure lines, which he
had last seen in the Bois de Boulogue, leaning on Mora's shoulder. What
had become of this unfortunate girl when this prop had failed her?
Would this lesson be of use to her in the future? And, by a strange
coincidence, while he was thinking thus of Felicia, a great white
greyhound was bounding up an alley of green trees on the slopes of the
neighbouring garden. It was like Kadour--the same short hair, the same
mouth, red, fierce, and delicate. Paul, before his open window, was
assailed in a moment by all sorts of visions, sad or charming. Perhaps
the beauty of the scene before his eyes made his thoughts wander. Under
the orange-trees and lemon-trees in rows, laden with their golden
fruit, stretched immense fields of violets in regular and packed beds,
separated by little irrigation canals, whose white stone cut up the
exuberant verdure.

An exquisite ordour of violets dried in the sun was rising--a hot
boudoir scent, enervating, enfeebling, which called up for de Gery
feminine visions--Aline, Felicia--permeating the fairy-like landscape,
in this blue-charged atmosphere, this heavenly day, which one might have
called the perfume become visible of so many open flowers. The creaking
of a door made him open his eyes. Some one had just gone into the next
room. He heard the rustle of a dress against the thin partition, a leaf
turned in a book which could not be very interesting, for a long sigh
turning into a yawn made him start. Was he still sleeping, dreaming? Had
he not heard the cry of the "jackal in the desert," so much in keeping
with the burning temperature out of doors? No--nothing more. He fell
asleep again, and this time all the confused images which pursued him
fixed themselves in a dream--a very pleasant dream.

He was on his honeymoon with Aline. She was a delicious wife, her clear
eyes full of love and faith, which only knew, only looked at him. In
this very room, on the other side of the partition, she was sitting in
white morning dress, which smelt of violets and of the fine lace of her
trousseau. They were having breakfast--one of those solitary breakfasts
of a honeymoon, served in their bedroom, opposite the blue sea, and the
clear sky, which tinge with azure the glass in which one drinks, the
eyes where one sees one's self, the future--life--the distant horizon.
Oh! how good it was; what a divine youth-giving light; how happy they
were!

And all at once, in the delight of their kisses, Aline became sad. Her
eyes filled with tears. She said to him: "Felicia is there. You will
love me no longer." And he laughed, "Felicia here? What an idea!" "Yes,
yes; she is there." Trembling she pointed to the next room, from
which came angry barks, and the voice of Felicia: "Here, Kadour! Here,
Kadour!" the low, concentrated, furious voice of some one who is hiding
and suddenly discovered.

Wide awake, the lover, disenchanted, found himself in his empty room,
before an empty table, his dream, fled through the window to the great
hillside. But he heard very distinctly in the next room the bark of a
dog, and hurried knocks on the door.

"Open the door! It is I--it is Jenkins."

Paul sat up on his divan, stupefied. Jenkins here? How was that? To whom
was he speaking? What voice was going to answer him? No one answered. A
light step went to the door, and the lock creaked nervously.

"Here you are at last," said the Irishman, entering.

And truly if he had not taken care to announce himself, Paul would
never have taken this brutal, violent, hoarse voice heard through the
partition for the doctor's with his sugary manners.

"At last I have found you after a week of searching, of mad rushing from
Genoa to Nice, from Nice to Genoa. I knew that you had not gone, because
the yacht was in the harbour, and I was going to inspect all the inns on
the coast, when I remembered Brehat. I have just come from him. It was
he who told me you were here."

But to whom was he speaking? Who was so singularly obstinate? At last a
beautiful, sad voice, which Paul well knew, made the hot afternoon air
vibrate.

"Well, yes, Jenkins, here I am. What is the matter?"

Through the wall Paul could see the disdainful mouth, turned down with
disgust.

"I have come to prevent you from going--from doing this foolish thing."

"What foolish thing? I have some work at Tunis. I must go there."

"But you don't think, my dear child, that--"

"Oh, enough of your fatherly airs, Jenkins. We know what lies underneath
it. Speak to me as you did just now. I prefer the bull-dog to the
spaniel. I fear it less."

"Well, I tell you that you must be mad to go over there alone, young and
beautiful as you are."

"And am I not always alone? Would you like me to take Constance, at her
age?"

"Or me?"

"You!" She pronounced the word with an ironical laugh. "And what about
Paris? And your patients--deprive society of its Cagliostro? Never, on
any account."

"I have, however, made up my mind to follow you wherever you go," said
Jenkins resolutely.

There was an instant of silence. Paul asked himself if it was worthy
of him to listen to this conversation which was full of terrible
revelations. But in spite of his fatigue an invincible curiosity nailed
him to the spot. It seemed to him that the enigma which had so long been
perplexing and troubling him was going to be solved at last, to show the
woman sad or perverse, concealed by the fashionable artist. He remained
there, still holding his breath, needlessly, however; for the two,
believing themselves to be alone in the hotel, let their passions and
their voices rise without constraint.

"Well, what do you want of me?"

"I want you."

"Jenkins!"

"Yes, yes, I know; you have forbidden me to say such words before you,
but other men than I have said them, and nearer still."

"And if it were so, wretch! If I have not been able to protect myself
from disgust and boredom, if I have lost my pride, is it for you to say
a word? As if you were not the cause of it; as if you had not forever
saddened and darkened my life for me!"

And these burning and rapid words revealed to the terrified Paul de
Gery the horrible meaning of this apparently affectionate guardianship,
against which the mind, the thought, the dreams of the young girl had
had to struggle so long, and which had left her the incurable sadness of
precocious regret, the heart-break of a life hardly begun.

"I loved you! I love you still! Passion excuses everything," answered
Jenkins in a hollow voice.

"Love me, then, if that amuses you. As for me, I hate you not only for
the wrong you have done me, all the beliefs and energy you have killed
in me, but because you represent what is most execrable, most hideous
under the sun--hypocrisy and lies. This society masquerade, this heap of
falsity, of grimaces, of cowardly and unclean conventions have sickened
me to such an extent, that I am running away exiling myself so as to see
them no longer; rather than them I would have the prison, the sewer, the
streets. And yet it is your deceit, O sublime Jenkins, which horrifies
me most. You have mingled our French hypocrisy, all smiles and
politeness, with your large English shakes of the hand, with your
cordial and demonstrative loyalty. They have all been caught by it. They
said, 'The good Jenkins; the worthy, honest Jenkins.' But I--I knew you,
and in spite of your fine motto on the envelopes of your letters,
on your seal, your sleeve-links, your hat-bands, the doors of your
carriage, I always saw the rascal you are."

Her voice hissed through her teeth, clinched by an incredible ferocity
of expression, and Paul expected some furious revolt of Jenkins under so
many insults. But this hate and contempt of the woman he loved must have
given him more sorrow than anger, for he answered softly, in a tone of
wounded gentleness:

"Oh! you are cruel. If you knew the pain you are giving me! Hypocrite!
yes, it is true; but I was not born like that. One is forced into it by
the difficulties of life. When one has the wind against one, and wishes
to advance, one tacks. I have tacked. Lay the blame on my miserable
beginnings, my false entry into existence, and agree at least that one
thing in me has never lied--my passion! Nothing has been able to kill
it--neither your disdain, nor your abuse, nor all that I have read in
your eyes, which for so many years have not once smiled at me. It is
still my passion which gives me the strength, even after what I have
just heard, to tell you why I am here. Listen! You told me once that you
wanted a husband--some one who would watch over you during your work,
who would take over some of the duties of the poor Crenmitz. Those were
your own words, which wounded me then because I was not free. Now all
that is changed. Will you marry me, Felicia?"

"And your wife?" cried the young girl, while Paul was asking himself the
same question.

"My wife is dead."

"Dead? Mme. Jenkins? Is it true?"

"You never knew her of whom I speak. The other was not my wife. When
I met her I was already married in Ireland--years before. A horrible
forced marriage. My dear, when I was twenty-five I was confronted with
this alternative: a debtor's prison or Miss Strang, an ugly and gouty
old maid, sister of the usurer who had lent me five hundred pounds to
pay for my medical studies. I preferred the prison; but after weeks and
months I came to the end of my courage, and I married Miss Strang, who
brought me for dowry--my note of hand. You can guess what my life was
between these two monsters who adored each other. A jealous, impotent
wife. The brother spied on me, following me everywhere. I should have
gone away, but one thing kept me there. The usurer was said to be very
rich. I wished to have some return for my cowardice. You see, I tell you
all. Come now, I have been punished. Old Strang died insolvent; he used
to gamble, had ruined himself without saying a word. Then I put my wife
and her rheumatism in a hospital, and came to France. I had to begin
existence again, more struggles and misery. But I had experience on my
side, hatred and contempt for men, and my newly conquered liberty, for I
did not dream that the horrible weight of this cursed union was going to
hinder my getting on, at that distance. Happily, it is over--I am free."

"Yes, Jenkins, free. But why do you not make your wife the poor creature
who has shared your life so long, so humble and devoted as she is?"

"Oh!" said he, with an outburst of sincerity, "between my two prisons
I would prefer the other, where I could be frankly indifferent. But the
atrocious comedy of conjugal love, of unwearying happiness, when for
so long I had loved you and thought of you alone! There is not such a
torture on earth. If I can guess, the poor woman must have uttered a cry
of relief and happiness at the separation. It is the only adieu I hoped
for from her."

"But who forced you to such a thing?"

"Paris, society, the world. Married by its opinion, we were held by it."

"And now you are held no longer?"

"Now something comes before all--it is the idea of losing you, of seeing
you no longer. Oh! when I learned of your flight, when I saw the bill
over your door TO LET, I felt sure that it was all up with poses and
grimaces, that I had nothing else to do but to set out, to run quickly
after my happiness, which you were taking away. You were leaving
Paris--I have left it. Everything of yours was being sold; everything of
mine will be sold."

"And she?" said Felicia trembling. "She, the irreproachable companion,
the honest woman whom no one has ever suspected, where will she go?
What will she do? And it is her place you have just offered me. A stolen
place, think what a hell! Well, and your motto, good Jenkins, virtuous
Jenkins, what shall we do with it? '_Le bien sans esperance_,' eh!"

At this sneer, cutting his face like a whip, the wretch answered
panting:

"That will do! Do not sneer at me so. It is too horrible now. Does it
not touch you, then, to be loved as I love you in sacrificing everything
to you--fortune, honour, respect? See, look at me. I have snatched my
mask off for you, I have snatched if off before all. And now, see, here
is the hypocrite."

He heard the muffled noise of two knees falling on the floor. And
stammering, distracted with love, weak before her, he begged her
to consent to this marriage, to give him the right to follow her
everywhere, to defend her. Then the words failed him, stifled in a
passionate sob, so deep, so lacerating that it should have touched any
heart, above all among this splendid impassible scenery in this perfumed
heat. But Felicia was not touched. "Let us have done, Jenkins," said
she brusquely. "What you ask is impossible. We have nothing to hide from
each other, and after your confidences just now, I wish to make one to
you, which humbles my pride, but your degradation makes you worthy. I
was Mora's mistress."

Paul knew this. And yet it was so sad to hear this beautiful, pure voice
laden with such a confession, in the midst of the intoxicating air, that
he felt his heart contract.

"I knew it," answered Jenkins in a low voice, "I have the letters you
wrote to him."

"My letters?"

"Oh, I will give them to you--here. I know them by heart. I have read
and reread them. It is that which hurts one, when one loves. But I
have suffered other tortures. When I think that it was I--" He stopped
himself. He choked. "I who had to furnish fuel for your flames, warm
this frozen lover, send him to you ardent and young--Ah! he has devoured
my pearls--I might refuse over and over again, he was always taking
them. At last I was mad. You wish to burn, wretched woman. Well, burn,
then!"


Paul rose to his feet in terror. Was he going to hear the confession
of a crime? But the shame of hearing more was not inflicted on him.
A violent knocking, this time on his own door, warned him that his
_calesino_ was ready.

"Is the French gentleman ready?"

In the next room there was silence, then a whisper.--There had been some
one near who had heard them.--Paul de Gery hurried downstairs. He must
get out of this room to escape the weight of so much infamy.

As the post-chaise swayed, he saw among the common white curtains, which
float at all the windows in the south, a pale figure with the hair of
a goddess, and great burning eyes fixed on him. But a glance at Aline's
portrait quickly dispelled this disturbing vision, and forever cured
of his old love, he travelled until evening through the magic landscape
with the lovely bride of the _dejeuner_, who carried in the folds of her
modest robe and mantle all the violets of Bordighera.




THE FIRST NIGHT OF "REVOLT"

"Take your places for the first act!"

The cry of the stage-manager, standing with his hand raised to his
mouth to form a trumpet, at the foot of the staircase behind the scenes,
echoes under the roof, rises and rolls along, to be lost in the depths
of corridors full of the noise of doors banging, of hasty steps, of
desperate calls to the _coiffeur_ and the dressers; while there appear
one by one on the landings of the various floors, slow and majestic,
without moving their heads for fear of disturbing the least detail
of their make-up, all the personages of the first act of _Revolt_, in
elegant modern ball costumes, with the creaking of new shoes, the silken
rustle of the trains, the jingling of rich bracelets pushed up the arm
while gloves are being buttoned. All these people seem excited, nervous,
pale beneath their paint, and under the skilfully prepared satin-like
surface of the shoulders, tremors flutter like shadows. Dry-mouthed,
they speak little. The least nervous, while affecting to smile, have
in their eyes and voice the hesitation that marks an absent mind--that
apprehension of the battle behind the foot-lights which is ever one of
the most powerful attractions of the comedian's art, its piquancy, its
freshness.

The stage is encumbered by the passage to and fro of machinists and
scene-builders hastening about, running into one another in the dim,
pallid light falling from above, which will give place directly, as soon
as the curtain rises, to the dazzling of the foot-lights. Cardailhac is
there in his dress-coat and white tie, his opera hat on one side, giving
a final glance to the arrangement of the scenery, hurrying the workmen,
complimenting the _ingenue_ who is waiting dressed and ready, beaming,
humming an air, looking superb. To see him no one would ever guess the
terrible worries which distract him. He is compromised by the fall of
the Nabob--which entails the loss of his directorate--and is risking his
all on the piece of this evening, obliged, if it be not a success, to
leave the cost of this marvellous scenery, these stuffs at a hundred
francs the yard, unpaid. It is a fourth bankruptcy that stares him in
the face. But, bah! our manager is confident. Success, like all the
monsters that feed on men, loves youth; and this unknown author, whose
name is appearing for the first time on a theatre bill, flatters the
gambler's superstitions.

Andre Maranne feels less confident. As the hour for the production of
the piece approaches he loses faith in his work, terrified by the sight
of the house, at which he looks through the hole in the curtain as
through the narrow lens of a stereoscope.

A splendid house, crammed to the roof, notwithstanding the late period
of the spring and the fashionable taste for early departure to the
country; a house that Cardailhac, a declared enemy of nature and the
country, endeavouring always to keep Parisians in Paris till the latest
possible date, has succeeded in crowding and making as brilliant as in
midwinter. Fifteen hundred heads are swarming beneath the great central
chandelier, erect--bent forward--turning round--questioning amid a great
play of shadows and reflections; some massed in the obscure corners of
the floor, others in a bright light reflected through the open doors of
the boxes from the white walls of the corridor; the first-night public
which is always the same, that brigand-like _tout Paris_ which goes
everywhere, carrying those envied places by storm when a favour or a
claim by right of some official position fails to secure them.

In the stalls are low-cut waistcoats, clubmen, shining bald heads, wide
partings in scanty hair, light-coloured gloves, big opera-glasses raised
and directed towards various points. In the galleries a mixture of
different social sets and all kinds of dress, all the people well known
as figuring at this kind of solemnity, and the embarrassing promiscuity
which places the modest smile of the virtuous woman along-side of the
black-ringed eyes, the vermilion-painted lips of her who belongs to
another category. White hats, pink hats, diamonds and paint. Above, the
boxes present the same confusion; actresses and women of the demi-monde,
ministers, ambassadors, famous authors, critics--these last wearing a
grave air and frowning brow, sitting crosswise in their _fauteuils_ with
the impassive haughtiness of judges whom nothing can corrupt. The boxes
near the stage especially stand out in the general picture brilliantly
lighted, occupied by celebrities of the financial world, the women
_decollete_ and with bare arms, glittering with jewels like the Queen of
Sheba on her visit to the King of Judea. But on the left, one of these
large boxes, entirely empty, attracts attention by reason of its curious
decoration, lighted from the back by a Moorish lantern. Over the whole
assembly is an impalpable and floating dust, the flickering of the gas,
that odour that mingles with all the pleasures of Paris, its little
sputterings, sharp and quick like the breaths drawn by a consumptive,
accompanying the movement of opened fans. And then, too, _ennui_, a
gloomy _ennui_, the _ennui_ of seeing the same faces always in the
same places, with their defects or their poses, that uniformity of
fashionable gatherings which ends by establishing in Paris each winter
a spiteful and gossiping provincialism more petty than that of the
provinces themselves.

Maranne observed this ill-humour, this lassitude of the public, and
thinking of all the changes which the success of his play might bring
about in his simple life, he asked himself, full of a great anxiety,
what he could do to bring his ideas home to those thousands of people,
to pluck them away from their preoccupation, and to send through
this crowd a single current which should draw to himself those absent
glances, those minds of every different calibre, so difficult to move to
unison. Instinctively his eyes sought friendly faces, a box facing the
stage occupied by the Joyeuse family; Elise and the younger girls seated
in the front, Aline and the father in the row behind--a charming family
group, like a bouquet wet with dew amid a display of artificial flowers.
And while all Paris was disdainfully asking, "Who are those people
there?" the poet instrusted his fate to those little fairy hands, new
gloved for the occasion, which very soon would boldly give the signal
for applause.

The curtain is going up! Maranne has barely time to spring into the
wings; and suddenly he hears as from far, very far away, the first words
of his play, which rise, like a flight of timid birds, into the silence
and immensity of the theatre. A terrible moment. Where should he go?
What should he do? Remain there leaning against a wing, with straining
ear and beating heart? Encourage the actors when he himself stood in so
much need of encouragement? He prefers rather to look the peril in the
face; and by the little door communicating with the corridor behind the
boxes he slips out to a corner box, which he orders to be opened for him
softly. "Sh! It is I." Some one is seated in the shadow--a woman, she
whom all Paris knows and who is hiding herself from the public gaze.
Andre sits down by her side, and so, close to one another, mother and
son tremblingly watch the progress of the play.

It astonished the audience at first. This Theatre des Nouveautes,
situated in the very heart of the boulevard, where its portico glitters
all illuminated among the great restaurants of the smart clubs; this
theatre, to which people were accustomed to come in parties after a
luxurious dinner to listen until supper-time to an act or two of some
suggestive piece, had become in the hands of its clever manager the most
fashionable of all Parisian entertainments, without any very precise
character of its own, and partaking something of all, from the
fairy-operetta which exhibits undressed women, to the serious modern
drama. Cardailhac was especially anxious to justify his title of
"Manager of the Nouveautes," and, since the Nabob's millions had been
at the back of the undertaking, had made a point of preparing for
the boulevardiers the most dazzling surprises. That of this evening
surpassed them all; the piece was in verse--and moral.

A moral play!

The old rogue had realized that the moment had arrived to try that
effect, and he was trying it. After the astonishment of the first
minutes, a few disappointed exclamations here and there in the boxes,
"Why, it is in verse!" the house began to feel the charm of this
invigorating and healthy piece, as if there had been sprinkled on it,
in its rarefied atmosphere, some fresh and pungent essence, an elixir of
life perfumed with thyme from the hillside.

"Ah! this is nice--it is restful."

Such was the general sense, a thrill of ease, a spasm of pleasure
accompanying each line. That fat old Hemerlingue found it restful,
puffing in his stage-box on the ground floor as in a trough of cerise
satin. It was restful also to that tall Suzanne Bloch, her hair dressed
in the antique way, ringlets flowing over a diadem of gold; and
near her, Amy Ferat, all in white like a bride and with sprigs of
orange-blossom in her fluffy hair, it was restful to her also, you may
be sure.

A crowd of demi-mondaines were present, some very fat, with a dirty
greasiness acquired in a hundred seraglios, three chins, and an air of
stupidity; others absolutely green in spite of their paint, as if they
had been dipped in a bath of that arsenate of copper which is called
in the shops "Paris green." These were wrinkled, faded to such a degree
that they hid in the back of their boxes, only allowing a portion of
a white arm to be seen, a rounded shoulder protruding. Then there were
young men about town, flabby and without backbone, those who at
that time used to be called _petits creves_, creatures worn out by
dissipation, with stooping necks and drooping lids, incapable of
standing erect or of articulating a single word perfectly. And all these
people exclaimed with one accord: "This is nice--it is restful." The
handsome Moessard murmured it like a refrain beneath his little fair
mustache, while his queen in the stage-box translated it into the
barbarism of her foreign tongue. Positively they found it restful. They
did not say after what--after what heart-breaking labour, after what
forced, idle and useless task.

All these friendly murmurs, united and mingled, began to give to the
house an eventful appearance. Success was felt in the air, faces
became serene again, the women seemed the more beautiful for reflecting
enthusiasm, for being moved to glances that were as exciting as
applause. Andre, at his mother's side, thrilled with such an unknown
pleasure, with that proud delight which a man feels when he stirs the
multitude, be he only a singer in a suburban back-yard, with a patriotic
refrain and two pathetic notes in his voice. Suddenly the whisperings
redoubled, were transformed into a tumult. People were chuckling and
fidgeting with excitement. What had happened? Some accident on the
stage? Andre, leaning terrified towards the actors as astonished as
himself, saw every opera-glass turned towards the big stage-box which
had remained empty until then, and which some one had just entered, who
sat down immediately with both his elbows on the velvet ledge, and
with his opera-glass drawn from its case, taking his place in gloomy
solitude.

In ten days the Nabob had aged twenty years. Violent southern natures
like his, if they are rich in enthusiasms, become also more utterly
prostrate than others. Since his unseating the unfortunate man had shut
himself up in his bedroom, with drawn curtains, no longer wishing even
to see the light of day nor to cross over the threshold beyond which
life was waiting for him, with the engagements he had undertaken,
the promises he had made, a mass of protested bills and writs. The
Levantine, gone off to some spa accompanied by her _masseur_ and her
negress, was totally indifferent to the ruin of the establishment;
Bompain--the man in the fez--in frightened bewilderment amid the demands
for money, not knowing how to approach his ill-starred master, who
persistently kept his bed and turned his face to the wall as soon as
business matters were mentioned. His old mother alone remained behind to
face the disaster, with the knowledge born of her narrow and straitened
experience as a village woman, who knows what a stamped document--a
signature--is, and thinks honour is the greatest and best thing in
the world. Her peasant's cap made its appearance on every floor of
the mansion, examining bills, reforming the domestic arrangements, and
fearing neither outcries or humiliation. At all hours the good woman
might be seen striding about the Place Vendome, gesticulating, talking
to herself, and saying aloud: "_Te_, I will go and see the bailiff."
And never did she consult her son about anything save when it was
indispensable, and then only in a few discreet words, while avoiding
even a glance at him. To rouse Jansoulet from his torpor it had required
de Gery's telegram, dated from Marseilles, announcing that he was on his
way back, bringing ten million francs. Ten millions!--that is to say,
bankruptcy averted, the possibility of recovering his position--of
starting life afresh. And behold our southerner rebounding from the
depth of his fall, intoxicated with joy, and full of hope. He ordered
the windows to be opened and newspapers to be brought to him. What a
magnificent opportunity was this first night of _Revolt_ to show himself
to the Parisians, who were believing him to have gone under, to enter
the great whirlpool once more through the swing door of his box at the
Nouveautes! His mother, warned by some instinct, did indeed try to hold
him back. Paris now terrified her. She would have liked to carry off her
child to some unknown corner of the Midi, to nurse him along with his
elder brother--stricken down both of them by the great city. But he was
the master. Resistance was impossible to that will of a man spoiled by
wealth. She helped him to dress for the occasion, "made him look nice,"
as she said laughing, and watched him not without a certain pride as
he departed, dignified, full of new life, having almost got over the
prostration of the preceding days.

After his arrival at the theatre, Jansoulet quickly perceived the
commotion which his presence caused in the house. Accustomed to similar
curious ovations, he acknowledged them ordinarily without the least
embarrassment, with a frank display of his wide and good-natured smile;
but this time the manifestation was hostile, almost indignant.

"What! It is he?"

"There he is."

"What impudence!"

Such exclamations from the stalls confusedly rose among many others. The
retirement in which he had taken refuge for some days past had left him
in ignorance of the public exasperation, of the homilies, the statements
broadcast in the newspapers, with the corrupting influence of his wealth
as their text--articles written for effect, hypocritical phraseology
by the aid of which opinion avenges itself from time to time on the
innocent for all its own concessions to the guilty. It was a terribly
embarrassing exhibition, which gave him at first more sorrow than anger.
Deeply moved, he hid his emotion behind his opera-glass, fixing his
attention on the least details of the stage arrangements, giving a
three-quarters view of his back to the house, but unable to escape the
scandalous observation of which he was the victim and which made his
ears buzz, his temples beat, the dulled lenses of his opera-glass
become full of those whirling multi-coloured circles which are the first
symptom of brain disorder.

When the curtain fell at the end of the first act he remained
motionless, in the same attitude of embarrassment; the whisperings, now
more distinct when they were no longer held in check by the dialogue on
the stage, the pertinacity of certain inquisitive people changing their
places in order to get a better view of him, obliged him to leave his
box and to beat a hurried retreat into the corridors, like a wild beast
escaping across a circus from the arena. Beneath the low ceiling in
the narrow circular passage of the theatre corridors, he found
himself suddenly in the midst of a dense crowd of emasculate youths,
journalists, tightly laced women wearing their hats, laughing as part
of their trade, their backs against the wall. From box-doors opened for
air, mixed and disjointed fragments of conversation were escaping:

"A delightful piece. It is fresh; it is good."

"That Nabob! What impudence!"

"Yes, indeed, it is restful. One feels better for it."

"How is it that he has not yet been arrested?"

"Quite a young man, it seems. It is his first play."

"Bois l'Hery at Mazas! It is impossible. Why, there is the marquise
opposite, in the balcony, with a new hat."

"What does that prove? She is at her business as a stager of new
fashions. It is very pretty, that hat. In Desgrange's racing colours."

"And Jenkins? What is Jenkins doing?"

"At Tunis, with Felicia. Old Brahim has seen them both. It seems that
the Bey has begun to take the pearls."

"The deuce he has!"

Farther along, soft voices were murmuring:

"Yes, father, do, do go speak to him. See how lonely he looks, poor
man!"

"But, children, I do not know him."

"Never mind. Just a bow. Something to show him that he is not utterly
deserted."

Thereupon the little old gentleman, very red in the face and wearing
a white tie, stepped quickly in front of the Nabob, and ceremoniously
raised his hat to him with great respect. With what gratitude, what
a smile of eager good-will was that solitary greeting returned, that
greeting from a man whom Jansoulet did not know, whom he had never seen,
and who had yet exerted a weighty influence upon his destiny; for, but
for the _pere_ Joyeuse, the chairman of the board of the Territorial
would probably have shared the fate of the Marquis de Bois l'Hery. Thus
it is that in the tangle of modern society, that great web of interests,
ambitions, services accepted and rendered, all the various worlds are
connected, united beneath the surface, from the highest existences
to the most humble; this it is that explains the variegation, the
complexity of this study of manners, the collection of the scattered
threads of which the writer who is careful of truth is bound to make the
background of his story.

In ten minutes the Nabob had been subjected to every manifestation
of the terrible ostracism of that Paris world to which he had neither
relationship nor serious ties, and whose contempt isolated him more
surely than a visiting monarch is isolated by respect--the averted look,
the apparently aimless step aside, the hat suddenly put on and pulled
down over the eyes. Overcome by embarrassment and shame, he stumbled.
Some one said quite loudly, "He is drunk," and all that the poor man
could manage to do was to return and shut himself up in the salon at the
back of his box. Ordinarily, this little retreat was crowded during
the intervals between the acts by stock-brokers and journalists. They
laughed and smoked and made a great noise; the manager would come to
greet his sleeping partner. But on this evening there was nobody. And
the absence of Cardailhac, with his keen nose for success, signified
fully to Jansoulet the measure of his disgrace.

"What have I done? Why will Paris have no more of me?"

Thus he questioned himself amid a solitude that was accentuated by the
noises around, the abrupt turning of keys in the doors of the boxes, the
thousand exclamations of an amused crowd. Then suddenly, the freshness
of his luxurious surroundings, the Moorish lantern casting strange
shadows on the brilliant silks of the divan and walls, reminded him of
the date of his arrival. Six months! Only six months since he came to
Paris! Completely done for and ruined in six months! He sank into a
kind of torpor, from which he was roused by the sound of applause
and enthusiastic bravos. It was decidedly a great success--this play
_Revolt_. There were some passages of strength and satire, and the
violent tirades, a trifle over-emphatic but written with youth and
sincerity, excited the audience after the idyllic calm of the opening.
Jansoulet in his turn wished to hear and see. This theatre belonged to
him after all. His place in that stage-box had cost him over a million
francs; the very least he could do was to occupy it.

So he seated himself in the front of his box. In the theatre the heat
was suffocating in spite of the fans which were vigorously at work,
throwing reflections from their bright spangles through the impalpable
atmosphere of silence. The house was listening religiously to an
indignant and lofty denunciation of the scamps who occupied exalted
positions, after having robbed their fellows in those depths from which
they were sprung. Certainly, Maranne when he wrote these fine lines
had been far from having the Nabob in his mind. But the public saw
an allusion in them; and while a triple salvo of applause greeted the
conclusion of the speech, all heads were turned towards the stage-box on
the left with an indignant, openly offensive movement. The poor wretch,
pilloried in his own theatre! A pillory which had cost him so dear!
This time he made no attempt to escape the insult, but settled himself
resolutely in his seat, with arms folded, and braved the crowd that was
staring at him--those hundreds of faces raised in mockery, that virtuous
_tout Paris_ which had seized upon him as a scapegoat and was driving
him into the wilderness, after having laden him with the burden of all
its own crimes.

A pretty gang, truly, for a manifestation of that kind! Opposite, the
box of a bankrupt banker, the wife and her lover sitting next each
other in the front row, the husband behind in the shadow, voluntarily
inconspicuous and solemn. Near them the frequent trio of a mother who
has married her daughter in accordance with the personal inclination
of her own heart, in order to make a son-in-law of her lover. Then
irregular households, courtesans exhibiting the price of shame, diamonds
like circlets of fire riveted around arms and neck. And those groups of
emasculate youths, with their open collars and painted eyebrows, whose
shirts of embroidered cambric and white satin corsets people used to
admire in the guest-chambers at Compiegne; those _mignons_, of the time
of Agrippa, calling each other among themselves: "My heart--My
dear girl." An assemblage of all the scandals, all the turpitudes,
consciences sold or for sale, the vice of an epoch devoid of greatness
and without originality, intent on making trial of the caprices of every
other age.

And these were the people who were insulting him and crying: "Away with
thee, thou art unworthy!"

"Unworthy--I! But my worth is a hundred times greater than that of any
among you, wretches that you are! You make my millions a reproach to
me, but who has helped me to spend them? Thou, cowardly and treacherous
comrade, who hidest thy sick pasha-like obesity in the corner of thy
stage-box! I made thy fortune along with my own in the days when we
shared all things in brotherly community. Thou, pale marquis--I paid a
hundred thousand francs at the club in order to save thee from shameful
expulsion!

"Thee I covered with jewels, hussy, letting thee pass for my mistress,
because that kind of thing makes a good impression in our world--but
without ever asking thee anything in return. And thou, brazen-faced
journalist, who for brain hast all the dirty sediment of thy inkstand,
and on thy conscience as many spots as thy queen has on her skin, thou
thinkest that I have not paid thee thy price and that is why thy insults
are heaped on me. Yes, yes; stare at me, you vermin! I am proud. My
worth is above yours."

All that he was thus saying to himself mentally, in an ungovernable
rage, visible in the quivering of his pale, thick lips. The unfortunate
man, who was nearly mad, was about perhaps to shout it aloud in the
silence, to denounce that insulting crowd--who knows?--to spring into
the midst of it, kill one of them--ah! kill _one_ of them--when he
felt a light tap on his shoulder, and a fair head came before his eyes,
serious and frank, two hands held out, which he grasped convulsively,
like a drowning man.

"Ah! dear friend, dear--" the poor man stammered. But he had not the
strength to say more. This emotion of joy coming suddenly in the midst
of his fury melted him into a sobbing torrent of tears, and stifled
words. His face became purple. He motioned "Take me away." And,
stumbling in his walk, leaning on de Gery's arm, he only managed to
cross the threshold of his box before he fell prostrate in the corridor.

"Bravo! Bravo!" cried the house in reply to the speech which the actor
had just finished; and there was a noise like a hailstorm, and stamping
of enthusiastic feet while the great lifeless body, raised with
difficulty by the scene-shifters, was carried through the brightly
lighted wings, crowded with people pressing in their curiosity round the
stage, excited by the atmosphere of success and who hardly noticed the
passage of the inert and vanquished man, borne on men's arms like
some victim of a riot. They laid him on a couch in the room where the
properties were stored, Paul de Gery at his side, with a doctor and two
porters who eagerly lent all the assistance in their power. Cardailhac,
extremely busy over his play, had sent word that he should come to hear
the news "directly, after the fifth act."

Bleeding after bleeding, cuppings, mustard leaves--nothing brought even
a quiver to the skin of the patient, insensible apparently to all the
remedies usually employed in cases of apoplexy. The whole being seemed
to be surrendering to death, to be preparing the way for the rigidity
of the corpse; and this in the most sinister place in the world, this
chaos, lighted by a lantern merely, amid which there lie about pell-mell
in the dust all the remains of former plays--gilt furniture, curtains
with gay fringes, coaches, boxes, card-tables, dismantled staircases
and balusters, among ropes and pulleys, a confusion of out-of-date
theatrical properties, thrown down, broken, and damaged. Bernard
Jansoulet, as he lay among this wreckage, his shirt opened over his
chest, pale and covered with blood, was indeed a man come to the
shipwreck of his life, bruised and tossed aside along with the pitiful
ruins of his artificial luxury dispersed and broken up, in the whirlpool
of Paris. Paul, with aching heart, contemplated the scene sadly, that
face with its short nose, preserving in its inertia the savage yet
kindly expression of an inoffensive creature that tried to defend itself
before it died and had not time to bite. He reproached himself bitterly
with his inability to be of any service to him. Where was that fine
project of leading Jansoulet across the bogs, of guarding him against
ambushes? All that he had been able to do had been to save a few
millions for him, and even these had come too late.


The windows had just been thrown open upon the curved balcony over
the boulevard, now at the height of its noisy and brilliant stir. The
theatre was surrounded by, as it were, a plinth of gas-jets, a zone of
fire which brought the gloomiest recesses into light, pricked out with
revolving lanterns, like stars journeying through a dark sky. The play
was over. People were coming out. The black and dense crowd on the steps
was dispersing over the white pavements, on its way to spread through
the town the news of a great success and the name of an unknown author
who to-morrow would be triumphant and famous. A splendid evening, so
that the windows of the restaurants were lighted up in gaiety and files
of carriages passed through the streets at a late hour. This tumult of
festivity which the poor Nabob had loved so keenly, which seemed to go
so well with the dizzy whirl of his existence, roused him to life for
a moment. His lips moved, and into his dilated eyes, turned towards
de Gery, there came before he died a pained expression, beseeching and
protesting, as though to call upon him as witness of one of the greatest
and most cruel acts of injustice that Paris has ever committed.





End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Nabob, by Alphonse Daudet

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE NABOB ***

***** This file should be named 2077.txt or 2077.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/2/0/7/2077/

Produced by Dagny, John Bickers, and David Widger

Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.book2/          1351528356  47990 11180 100660  26150     `
THE NABOB.

XIII.

A DAY OF SPLEEN.


Five o'clock in the afternoon. Rain ever since the morning, a gray sky,
so low that one can touch it with one's umbrella, dirty weather,
puddles, mud, nothing but mud, in thick pools, in gleaming streaks along
the edge of the sidewalks, driven back in vain by automatic sweepers,
sweepers with handkerchiefs tied over their heads, and carted away on
enormous tumbrils which carry it slowly and in triumph through the
streets toward Montreuil; removed and ever reappearing, oozing between
the pavements, splashing carriage panels, horses' breasts, the clothing
of the passers-by, soiling windows, thresholds, shop-fronts, until one
would think that all Paris was about to plunge in and disappear beneath
that depressing expanse of miry earth in which all things are jumbled
together and lose their identity. And it is a pitiable thing to see how
that filth invades the spotless precincts of new houses, the copings of
the quays, the colonnades of stone balconies. There is some one,
however, whom this spectacle rejoices, a poor, ill, disheartened
creature, who, stretched out at full length on the embroidered silk
covering of a divan, her head resting on her clenched fists, gazes
gleefully out through the streaming window-panes and gloats over all
these ugly details:

"You see, my Fairy, this is just the kind of weather I wanted to-day.
See them splash along. Aren't they hideous, aren't they filthy? What
mud! It's everywhere, in the streets, on the quays, even in the Seine,
even in the sky. Ah! mud is a fine thing when you're downhearted. I
would like to dabble in it, to mould a statue with it, a statue one
hundred feet high, and call it, 'My Ennui.'"

"But why do you suffer from ennui, my darling?" mildly inquires the
ex-ballet-dancer, good-natured and rosy, from her armchair, in which she
sits very erect for fear of damage to her hair, which is even more
carefully arranged than usual. "Haven't you all that any one can need to
be happy?"

And she proceeds, in her placid voice, to enumerate for the hundredth
time her reasons for happiness, her renown, her genius, her beauty, all
men at her feet, the handsomest, the most powerful; oh! yes, the most
powerful, for that very day--But an ominous screech, a heart-rending
wail from the jackal, maddened by the monotony of her desert, suddenly
makes the studio windows rattle and sends the terrified old chrysalis
back into her cocoon.

The completion of her group and its departure for the Salon has left
Felicia for a week past in this state of prostration, of disgust, of
heart-rending, distressing irritation. It requires all of the old
fairy's unwearying patience, the magic of the memories she evokes every
moment in the day, to make life endurable to her beside that
restlessness, that wicked wrath which she can hear grumbling beneath the
girl's silences, and which suddenly bursts forth in a bitter word, in a
_pah_! of disgust _apropos_ of everything. Her group is hideous. No one
will speak of it. All the critics are donkeys. The public? an immense
_goitre_ with three stories of chin. And yet, a few Sundays ago, when
the Duc de Mora came with the superintendent of Fine Arts to see her
work at the studio, she was so happy, so proud of the praise bestowed on
her, so thoroughly delighted with her work, which she admired at a
distance as if it were by another hand, now that the modelling-tool had
ceased to form between her and her work the bond which tends to impair
the impartiality of the artist's judgment.

But it is so every year. When the studio is robbed of the latest work,
when her famous name is once more at the mercy of the public's
unforeseen caprice, Felicia's preoccupations--for she has then no
visible object in life--stray through the empty void of her heart, of
her existence as one who has turned aside from the peaceful furrow,
until she is once more intent upon another task. She shuts herself up,
she refuses to see anybody. One would say that she is distrustful of
herself. The good Jenkins is the only one who can endure her during
those crises. He even seems to take pleasure in them, as if he expected
something from them. And yet God knows she is not amiable to him. Only
yesterday he remained two hours with the beautiful ennui-ridden
creature, who did not so much as speak a single word to him. If that is
the sort of welcome she has in store for the great personage who does
them the honor to dine with them--At that point the gentle Crenmitz, who
has been placidly ruminating all these things and gazing at the slender
toe of her tufted shoes, suddenly remembers that she has promised to
make a dish of Viennese cakes for the dinner of the personage in
question, and quietly leaves the studio on the tips of her little toes.

Still the rain, still the mud, still the beautiful sphinx, crouching in
her seat, her eyes wandering aimlessly over the miry landscape. Of what
is she thinking? What is she watching on those muddy roads, growing dim
in the fading light, with that frown on her brow and that lip curled in
disgust? Is she awaiting her destiny? A melancholy destiny, to have gone
abroad in such weather, without fear of the darkness, of the mud.

Some one has entered the studio, a heavier step than Constance's
mouse-like trot. The little servant, doubtless. And Felicia says
roughly, without turning:

"Go to bed. I am not at home to any one."

"I should be very glad to speak with you if you were," a voice replied
good-naturedly.

She starts, rises, and says in a softer tone, almost laughing at sight
of that unexpected visitor:

"Ah! it's you, young Minerva! How did you get in?"

"Very easily. All the doors are open."

"I am not surprised. Constance has been like a madwoman ever since
morning, with her dinner."

"Yes, I saw. The reception room is full of flowers. You have--?"

"Oh! a stupid dinner, an official dinner. I don't know how I ever made
up my mind to it. Sit down here, beside me. I am glad to see you."

Paul sat down, a little perturbed in mind. She had never seemed so
lovely to him. In the half-light of the studio, amid the confusion of
objects of art, bronzes, tapestries, her pallor cast a soft light, her
eyes shone like jewels, and her long, close-fitting riding habit
outlined the negligent attitude of her goddess-like figure. Then her
tone was so affectionate, she seemed so pleased at his call. Why had he
stayed away so long? It was almost a month since she had seen him. Had
they ceased to be friends, pray? He excused himself as best he could.
Business, a journey. Moreover, although he had not been there, he had
often talked about her, oh! very often, almost every day.

"Really? With whom?"

"With--"

He was on the point of saying: "With Aline Joyeuse," but something
checked him, an indefinable sentiment, a sort of shame at uttering that
name in the studio which had heard so many other names. There are some
things which do not go together, although one cannot tell why. Paul
preferred to answer with a falsehood which led him straight to the
object of his call.

"With an excellent man upon whom you have unnecessarily inflicted great
pain. Tell me, why haven't you finished the poor Nabob's bust? It was a
source of great joy and great pride to him, the thought of that bust at
the Salon. He relied upon it."

At the name of the Nabob she was slightly embarrassed.

"It is true," she said, "I broke my word. What do you expect? I am the
slave of my whims. But it is my purpose to take it up again one of these
days. See, the cloth thrown over it is all damp, so that the clay won't
dry."

"And the accident? Ah! do you know, we hardly believed in that?"

"You were wrong. I never lie. A fall, a terrible crash. But the clay was
fresh, I easily repaired it. Look!"

She removed the cloth with a movement of her arm; the Nabob stood forth,
with his honest face beaming with joy at being reproduced, and so true,
so natural, that Paul uttered a cry of admiration.

"Isn't it good?" she asked ingenuously. "A few touches there and
there--" She had taken the tool and the little sponge and pushed the
stand into what little light there was. "It would be a matter of a few
hours; but it couldn't go to the Exhibition. This is the 22d; everything
had to be sent in long ago."

"Pshaw! With influence--"

She frowned, and the wicked, drooping expression played about her mouth.

"True. The Duc de Mora's _protegee_. Oh! you need not excuse yourself. I
know what people say of him, and I care as little for it as that!" She
threw a pellet of clay which flattened out against the wall. "Perhaps,
indeed, by dint of imagining what is not--But let us drop those vile
things," she said, with a toss of her little aristocratic head. "I am
anxious to give you pleasure, Minerva. Your friend shall go to the Salon
this year."

At that moment the odor of caramel, of hot pastry invaded the studio,
where the twilight was falling in fine, decolorized dust; and the Fairy
appeared, with a plate of fritters in her hand, a true fairy,
rejuvenated in gay attire, arrayed in a white tunic which afforded
glimpses, beneath the yellowed lace, of her lovely old woman's arms, the
charm that is the last to die.

"Look at my _kuchlen_, darling; see if they're not a success this time.
Oh! I beg your pardon; I didn't see that you had company. Ah! It's
Monsieur Paul? Are you pretty well, Monsieur Paul? Pray taste one of my
cakes."

And the amiable old lady, to whom her costume seemed to impart
extraordinary animation, came prancing forward, balancing her plate on
the ends of her doll-like fingers.

"Let him alone," said Felicia calmly. "You can offer him some at
dinner."

"At dinner!"

The dancer was so thunderstruck that she nearly overturned her pretty
cakes, which were as light and dainty and excellent as herself.

"Why, yes, I am keeping him to dinner with us. Oh! I beg you," she added
with peculiar earnestness, seeing that the young man made a gesture of
refusal, "I beg you, do not say no. You can do me a real service by
staying to-night. Come, I did not hesitate a moment ago, you know."

She had taken his hand; really there seemed to be a strange
disproportion between her request and the anxious, imploring tone in
which it was made. Paul still held back. He was not properly dressed.
How could she expect him to stay? A dinner-party at which she was to
have other guests.

"My dinner-party? Why, I will countermand the orders for it. That is the
way I feel. We three will dine alone, you and I and Constance."

"But, Felicia, my child, you can't think of doing such a thing. Upon my
word! What about the--the other who will soon be here?"

"_Parbleu!_ I will write to him to stay at home."

"Wretched girl, it is too late."

"Not at all, It's just striking six. The dinner was to be at half-past
seven. You must send him this at once."

She wrote a note, in haste, on a corner of the table.

"_Mon Dieu, mon Dieu!_ what a strange girl!" murmured the dancer, lost
in bewilderment, while Felicia, enchanted, transfigured, joyously sealed
her letter.

"There, my excuses are all made. The sick-headache wasn't invented for
Kadour. Oh! how glad I am!" she added, when the letter had gone; "what a
delightful evening we will have! Kiss me, Constance. This won't prevent
our doing honor to your _kuchlen_, and we shall enjoy seeing you in a
pretty gown that makes you look younger than I."

Less than that would have induced the dancer to forgive this latest whim
of her dear demon and the crime of _lese-majeste_ in which she had made
her an accomplice. The idea of treating such a personage so cavalierly!
No one else in the world would have done it, no one but her. As for Paul
de Gery, he made no further attempt at resistance, being caught once
more in the network from which he believed that he had set himself free
by absence, but which, as soon as he crossed the threshold of the
studio, suppressed his will and delivered him over, fast bound and
conquered, to the sentiment that he was firmly resolved to combat.

       *       *       *       *       *

It was evident that the dinner, a veritable gourmand's dinner,
superintended by the Austrian even in its least important details, had
been prepared for a guest of first-rate consequence. From the high
Berber chandeliers of carved wood, with seven branches, which shed a
flood of light upon the richly embroidered cloth, to the long-necked
wine-jugs of curious and exquisite shape, the sumptuous table
appointments and the delicacy of the dishes, which were highly seasoned
to an unusual degree, everything disclosed the importance of the
expected guest and the pains that had been taken to please him. There
was no mistaking the fact that it was an artist's establishment. Little
silverware, but superb china, perfect harmony without the slightest
attempt at arrangement. Old Rouen, pink Sevres, Dutch glass mounted in
old finely-wrought pewter met on that table as on a stand of rare
objects collected by a connoisseur simply to gratify his taste. The
result was some slight confusion in the household, dependent as it was
upon the chance of a lucky find. The exquisite oil-cruet had no stopper.
The broken salt-cellar overflowed on the cloth, and every moment it was:
"What has become of the mustard-pot? What has happened to that fork?"
All of which troubled de Gery a little on account of the young mistress
of the house, who, for her part, was not in the least disturbed.

But something that made him even more ill at ease was his anxiety to
know who the privileged guest was whose place he had taken at that
table, whom they could entertain with such magnificence and at the same
time such utter lack of ceremony. In spite of everything he felt as if
that countermanded guest were present, a constant affront to his own
dignity. In vain did he try to forget him; everything reminded him of
him, even to the holiday attire of the kindly Fairy, who sat opposite
him and who still retained some of the grand manners which she had
assumed in anticipation of the solemn occasion. The thought disturbed
him, poisoned his joy in being there.

On the other hand, as is always the case in parties of two, where
harmony of mood is very rare, he had never seen Felicia so affectionate,
in such merry humor. She was in a state of effervescent, almost
childlike gayety, one of those fervent outbursts of emotion which one
experiences when some danger has passed, the reaction of a clear,
blazing fire after the excitement of a shipwreck. She laughed heartily,
teased Paul about his accent and what she called his bourgeois ideas.
"For you are shockingly bourgeois, you know. But that is just what I
like in you. It's on account of the contrast, I have no doubt, because I
was born under a bridge, in a gust of wind, that I have always been fond
of sedate, logical natures."

"Oh! my dear, what do you suppose Monsieur Paul will think, when you say
you were born under a bridge?" exclaimed the excellent Crenmitz, who
could not accustom herself to the exaggeration of metaphors, and always
took everything literally.

"Let him think what he pleases, my Fairy. We haven't our eye on him for
a husband. I am sure he would have none of that monster known as an
artist wife. He would think he had married the devil. You are quite
right, Minerva. Art is a despot. One must give oneself to it
unreservedly. You put into your work all the imagination, energy,
honesty, conscience that you possess, so that you have no more of any of
them as long as you live, and the completion of the work tosses you
adrift, helpless and without a compass, like a dismasted hulk, at the
mercy of every wave. Such a wife would be a melancholy acquisition."

"And yet," the young man ventured timidly to observe, "it seems to me
that art, however exacting it may be, cannot take entire possession of
the woman. What would she do with her affections, with the craving for
love, for self-sacrifice, which is in her, far more than in man, the
motive for every act?"

She mused a moment before replying.

"You may be right, O wise Minerva! It is the truth that there are days
when my life rings terribly hollow. I am conscious of holes in it,
unfathomable depths. Everything disappears that I throw in to fill them
up. My noblest artistic enthusiasms are swallowed up in them and die
every time in a sigh. At such times I think of marriage. A husband,
children, a lot of children, tumbling about the studio, all their nests
to look after, the satisfaction of the physical activity which is
lacking in our artistic lives, regular occupations, constant movement,
innocent fun, which would compel one to play instead of always thinking
in the dark and the great void, to laugh at a blow to one's self-esteem,
to be simply a happy mother on the day when the public casts one aside
as a used-up, played-out artist."

And in presence of that vision of domestic happiness the girl's lovely
features assumed an expression which Paul had never before seen upon
them, and which took entire possession of him, gave him a mad longing to
carry away in his arms that beautiful wild bird dreaming of the dovecot,
to protect her, to shelter her with the sure love of an honest man.

She continued, without looking at him:

"I am not so flighty as I seem to be, you know. Ask my dear godmother if
I didn't keep straight up to the mark when she put me at
boarding-school. But what a hurly-burly my life was after that! If you
knew what a youth I had, if you knew how premature experience withered
my mind, and what confusion there was, in my small girl's brain, between
what was and was not forbidden, between reason and folly. Only art,
which was constantly discussed and eulogized, stood erect in all that
ruin, and I took refuge in that. That, perhaps, is why I shall never be
anything but an artist, a woman apart from other women, a poor Amazon
with her heart held captive under her iron breastplate, rushing into
battle like a man, and condemned to live and die like a man."

Why did he not say to her then:

"Beautiful warrior, lay aside your weapons, don the floating robe and
the charms of the sex to which you belong. I love you, I entreat you to
marry me that you may be happy and may make me happy too."

Ah! this is why. He was afraid that the other, he who was to come to
dinner that night, you know, and who remained between them despite his
absence, would hear him speak in that strain and would have the right to
laugh at him or to pity him for such a fervent outburst.

"At all events, I promise you one thing," she continued, "and that is
that if I ever have a daughter, I will try to make a true woman of her
and not such a poor abandoned creature as I am. Oh! you know, my good
Fairy, I do not mean that for you. You have always been kind to your
demon, full of affection and care. Why just look at her, see how pretty
she is, how young she looks to-night."

Enlivened by the repast, the lights, and one of those white dresses
whose reflection causes wrinkles to disappear, La Crenmitz was leaning
back in her chair, holding on a level with her half-closed eyes a glass
of Chateau-Yquem from the cellar of their neighbor the Moulin-Rouge; and
her little pink face, her airy pastel-like costume reflected in the
golden wine, which loaned to it its sparkling warmth, recalled the
former heroine of the dainty suppers after the play, the Crenmitz of the
good old days, not an audacious hussy after the style of our modern
operatic stars, but entirely unaffected and nestling contentedly in her
splendor like a fine pearl in its mother-of-pearl shell. Felicia, who
was certainly determined to be agreeable to everybody that evening, led
her thoughts to the chapter of reminiscences, made her describe once
more her triumphs in _Giselle_ and in the _Peri_, and the ovations from
the audience, the visit of the princes to her dressing-room, and Queen
Amelie's gift, accompanied by such charming words. The evocation of
those glorious scenes intoxicated the poor Fairy, her eyes shone, they
could hear her little feet moving restlessly under the table as if
seized by a dancing frenzy. And, indeed, when the dinner was at an end
and they had returned to the studio, Constance began to pace back and
forth, to describe a dance-step or a pirouette, talking all the time,
interrupting herself to hum an air from some ballet to which she kept
time with her head, then suddenly gathered herself together and with one
leap was at the other end of the studio.

"Now she's off," whispered Felicia to de Gery. "Watch. It will be worth
your while, for you are about to see La Crenmitz dance."

It was a fascinating, fairy-like spectacle. Against the background of
the enormous room, drowned in shadow and hardly lighted save through the
round window from without, where the moon was climbing upward in a deep
blue sky, a typical operatic sky, the famous dancer's figure stood out
all white, a light, airy unsubstantial ghost, flying, rather than
springing, through the air; then, standing upon her slender toes, upheld
in the air by naught but her outstretched arms, her face raised in a
fleeting attitude in which nothing was visible but the smile, she came
quickly forward toward the light, or receded with little jerky steps, so
rapid that one constantly expected to hear the crash of glass and see
her glide backward up the slope of the broad moonbeam that shone aslant
into the studio. There was one fact that imparted a strange, poetic
charm to that fantastic ballet, and that was the absence of music, of
every other sound than that of the measured footfalls, whose effect was
heightened by the semi-darkness, of that quick, light patter no louder
than the fall of the petals from a dahlia, one by one. This lasted for
some minutes, then they could tell from the quickening of her breath
that she was becoming exhausted.

"Enough, enough! Sit down," said Felicia.

Thereupon the little white ghost lighted on the edge of an armchair and
sat there poised and ready to start anew, smiling and panting, until
sleep seized upon her, and began to sway and rock her softly to and fro
without disturbing her pretty attitude, like a dragon-fly on a willow
branch that drags in the water and moves with the current.

As they watched her nodding in the chair, Felicia said:

"Poor little Fairy! that is the best and most serious thing in the way
of friendship, protection and guardianship that I have had during my
life. That butterfly acted as my godmother. Do you wonder now at the
zigzags, the erratic flights of my mind? Lucky for me that I have clung
to her."

She added abruptly, with joyful warmth:

"Ah! Minerva, Minerva, I am very glad that you came to-night. You
mustn't leave me alone so long again, you see. I need to have an upright
mind like yours by my side, to see one true face amid all the masks
that surround me. But you're fearfully bourgeois all the same," she
added laughingly, "and a provincial to boot. But never mind! you are the
man that I most enjoy looking at all the same. And I believe that my
liking for you is due mainly to one thing. You remind me of some one who
was the dearest friend of my youth, a serious, sensible little creature
like yourself, bound fast to the commonplace side of existence, but
mingling with it the element of idealism which we artists put aside for
the benefit of our work alone. Some things that you say seem to me to
come from her lips. You have a mouth built on the same antique model. Is
that what makes your words alike? I don't know about that, but you
certainly do resemble each other. I'll show you."

As she sat opposite him at the table laden with sketches and albums, she
began to draw as she talked, her face bending over the paper, her
unmanageable curls shading her shapely little head. She was no longer
the beautiful crouching monster, with the frowning anxious face,
lamenting her own destiny; but a woman, a true woman, who loves and
seeks to charm. Paul forgot all his suspicions then, in presence of such
sincerity and grace. He was on the point of speaking, of pleading with
her. It was the decisive moment. But the door opened and the little
servant appeared. Monsieur le Duc had sent to ask if Mademoiselle were
still suffering from her sick headache.

"Just as much as ever," she said testily.

When the servant had gone, there was a moment's silence between them, a
freezing pause. Paul had risen. She went on with her sketch, her head
still bent.

He walked away a few steps, then returned to the table and asked gently,
astonished to find that he was so calm:

"Was it the Duc de Mora who was to dine here?"

"Yes--I was bored--a day of spleen. Such days are very bad for me."

"Was the duchess to come?"

"The duchess? No. I don't know her."

"Well, if I were in your place, I would never receive in my house, at my
table, a married man whose wife I did not meet in society. You complain
of being abandoned; why do you abandon yourself? When one is without
reproach, one must keep oneself above suspicion. Do I offend you?"

"No, no, scold me, Minerva. I like your morality. It is frank and
straightforward; it doesn't squint like Jenkins'. As I told you, I need
some one to guide me."

She held before him the sketch she had just finished.

"See! there's the friend of whom I spoke to you. A deep, sure affection
which I was foolish enough to throw away, like the wasteful idiot I am.
I always used to invoke her memory in moments of perplexity, when there
was some question to be decided or some sacrifice to be made. I would
say to myself: 'What will she think about it?' as we pause in our work
to think of some great man, of one of our masters. You must fill that
place for me. Will you?"

Paul did not answer. He was looking at Aline's portrait. It was she, it
was she to the life, her regular profile, her kindly, laughing mouth,
and the long curl caressing the slender neck. Ah! all the Ducs de Mora
on earth might come now. Felicia no longer existed for him.

Poor Felicia, a creature endowed with superior powers, was much like
those sorceresses who weave and ravel the destinies of others without
the power to accomplish anything for their own book3/          1351528422  47990 11180 100660  810592    `
CHAPTER I.

HUSBAND AND WIFE.


It was a brilliant day in June. The sky was cloudless and dazzlingly
blue, but the heat of the sun's rays was tempered by a deliciously cool
breeze, and the foliage of the trees that clothe the pleasant slopes
round the vivacious little town of Aix-les-Bains afforded plenty of
shade to the pedestrian. Aix was, as usual, very crowded and very gay.
German potentates abounded: French notabilities were not wanting: it was
rumored that English royalty was coming. A very motley crowd of divers
nationalities drank the waters every morning and discussed the latest
society scandal. Festivity seemed to haunt the very air of the place,
beaming from the trim white villas with their smart green jalousies, the
tall hotels with crudely tinted flags flying from their roofs, the
cheery little shops with their cheerier _dames de comptoir_ smiling
complacently on the tourists who unwarily bought their goods. Ladies in
gay toilets, with scarlet parasols or floating feathers, made vivid
patches of color against the green background of the gardens, and the
streets were now and then touched into picturesqueness by the passing of
some half-dozen peasants who had come from the neighboring villages to
sell their butter or their eggs. The men in their blue blouses were
mostly lean, dark, and taciturn; the women, small, black-eyed, and
vivacious, with bright-colored petticoats, long earrings, and the
quaintest of round white caps. The silvery whiteness of the lake,
flashing back an answer to the sunlight, gave a peculiarly joyous
radiance to the scene. For water is to a landscape what the eye is to
the human countenance: it gives life and expression; without it, the
most beautiful features may be blank and uninteresting.

But the brightness of the scene did not find an echo in every heart.

"Dame!" said a French waiter, who stood, napkin in hand, at a window of
the Hotel Venat, watching the passers-by, "there they go, that cold,
sullen English pair, looking as if nothing on earth would make them
smile again!"

A bullet-headed little man in a white apron stepped up to the window and
stared in the direction that Auguste's eyes had taken.

"Tiens, donc! Quelle tournure! But she is superb!" he exclaimed, as if
in remonstrance.

"She is handsome--oui, sans doute; but see how she frowns! I like a
woman who smiles, who coquettes, who knows how to divert herself--like
Mademoiselle Lisette here, queen of my heart and life."

And Auguste bowed sentimentally to a pretty little chambermaid who came
tripping up the stairs at that moment, and laid his hand upon his heart.

"You are too polite, Monsieur Auguste," Lisette responded amicably. "And
at whom are you gazing so earnestly?"

"At the belle Anglaise--you can still see her, if you look--she is
charmingly dressed, but----"

"She is magnificent! simply magnificent," murmured the bullet-headed
Jean, who was not, like his friend, enamored of the pert Lisette. "I
have never seen so splendid an Englishwoman, never! nor one who had so
much the true Parisian air!"

Lisette uttered a shrill little scream of laughter. "Do you know the
reason, mon ami? She is not English at all: she is a compatriot. He--the
husband--_he_ is English; but she is French, I tell you, French to the
finger-tips."

"Voyons; what rooms have they?"

"They are au quatrieme--they are poor--poor," said Lisette, with
infinite scorn. "I wait on them a little--not much; they have been here
three days, and one can see----But the gentleman, he is generous. When
madame scolds, he gives me money to buy my forbearance; she has the
temper of a demon, the tongue of a veritable fiend!"

"Ah! He loves her, then!" said Auguste, putting his head on one side.

Lisette snapped her fingers. "Ah, oui! He loves her so well that he will
strangle her one of these days when she says a word too much and he is
in his sombre mood! Quiet as he is, I would not go too far with him, ce
beau monsieur! He will not be patient always--you will see!"

She went on her way, and the waiters remained at the window in the
corridor. The lady and gentlemen of whom they spoke had turned into the
hotel garden, and were walking up and down its gravelled paths,
apparently in silence. Auguste and Jean watched them, as if fascinated
by the sight of the taciturn pair, who now and then were lost to sight
behind a clump of trees or in some shady walk, presently reappearing in
the full sunshine, with the air of those who wish for some reason or
other to show themselves as much as possible.

This, at least, was the impression produced by the air and gait of the
woman; not by those of the man. He walked beside her gravely, somewhat
dejectedly, indeed. There was a look of resignation in his face, which
contrasted forcibly with the flaunting audacity visible in every gesture
of the woman who was his wife.

He was the less noticeable of the two, but still a handsome man in his
way, of a refined and almost scholarly type. He was tall, and although
rather of slender than powerful build, his movements were characterized
by the mingled grace and alertness which may be seen when
well-proportioned limbs are trained to every kind of athletic exercise.
His face, however, was that of the dreamer, not of the athlete. He had a
fine brow, thoughtful brown eyes, a somewhat long nose with sensitive
nostrils, a stern-set mouth, and resolute chin. The spare outlines of
his face, well defined yet delicate withal, sometimes reminded strangers
of Giotto's frescoed head of Dante in his youth. But the mouth was
partly hidden beneath a dark brown moustache; a pity from the artistic
point of view. Refinement was the first and predominating characteristic
of his face; thoughtful melancholy, the second. It was evident, even to
the most casual observer, that this man was eminently unfitted to be the
husband of the woman at his side.

For a woman she was unusually tall. She was also unusually handsome. She
had a magnificent figure, a commanding presence, good features, hair,
and eyes; yet the impression that she produced was anything but
pleasant. The flashing dark eyes were too bold and too defiant; the
carmine on her cheeks was artificially laid on, and her face had been
dabbed with a powder puff in very reckless fashion. Her black hair was
frizzed and tortured in the latest mode, and her dress made in so novel
a style that it looked _outre_, even at a fashionable watering-place.
Dress, bonnet and parasol were scarlet of hue; and the vivid tint was
softened but slightly by the black lace which fell in cascades from her
closely-swathed neck to the hem of her dress, fastened here and there by
diamond pins. If it were possible that, as Lisette had said, Mr. and
Mrs. Alan Walcott were poor, their poverty was not apparent in Mrs.
Walcott's dress. Black and scarlet were certainly becoming to her, but
the effect in broad daylight was too startling for good taste. To a
critical observer, moreover, there was something unpleasantly suggestive
in her movements: the way in which she walked and held her parasol, and
turned her head from side to side, spoke of a desire to attract
attention, and a delight in admiration even of the coarsest and least
complimentary kind.

There was certainly something in the bearing of husband and wife that
attracted notice. Her vivacity and her boldness, a certain weariness and
reluctance in his air, as if he were paraded up and down these garden
walks against his will, led others beside inquisitive French waiters to
watch the movements of the pair. And they were in full view of several
gazers when an unexpected and dramatic incident occurred.

A man who had sauntered out of the hotel into the gardens directed his
steps towards them, and met them face to face as they issued from one of
the side-paths. He was not tall, but he was dapper and agile: his
moustache curled fiercely, and his eyeglass was worn with something of
an aggressive air. He was perfectly dressed, except that--for English
taste--he wore too much jewellery; and from the crown of his shining hat
to the tip of his polished pointed boot he was essentially Parisian--a
dandy of the Boulevards, or rather, perhaps, of the Palais Royal--an
exquisite who prided himself upon the fit of his trousers and the swing
of his Malacca cane.

He paused as he met the Walcotts, and raised his hat with a true French
flourish. The lady laughed, showing a row of very white, even teeth, and
held out her hand. Her husband sprang forward, uttering an angry word of
remonstrance or command. The Frenchman grinned insolently, and answered
with a sneer.

The Englishman seemed to gain in dignity as he replied. His wife laughed
loudly and unpleasantly, however, and then, with a quick movement which
proved him agile as a cat, the Frenchman struck him with his cane across
the face. In another moment, Alan Walcott had taken him by the collar
and wrested the cane from his hand. Whether or no he would have
administered the thrashing that the man deserved must remain an
unsettled question, for hotel servants and functionaries came rushing to
the rescue, guests flocked to the scene in hopes of further excitement,
and all was bustle and confusion. Mrs. Walcott began to scream
violently, as soon as she saw signs of an impending conflict, and was
finally carried into the house in a fit of hysterics.

A very pretty little altercation between the two combatants--who were
separated with difficulty--and the landlord and his myrmidons then
followed. The police arrived rather late on the scene, but were speedily
quieted by assurances that peace was restored, and by the transfer of a
few coins from Alan Walcott's pockets to their own. The aggressor, who
gave his name as Henri de Hauteville, was politely requested to leave
the Hotel Venat; and Mr. Walcott declared his own intention of
proceeding to Paris next morning. Accordingly the Frenchman speedily
disappeared, but it was noticed that he dropped a word to his enemy,
which Walcott answered by a bend of his head, and that he was seen
shortly afterwards arm-in-arm with a young officer who was known to be
an enthusiast in the matter of duelling.

An hour later Alan Walcott was crossing the hall with a hurried step and
a face expressive of deep anxiety and vexation, when he encountered a
stout, fair Englishman, who greeted him with effusion.

"You here, Walcott? Never thought of meeting you."

"I'm glad to see you, Dalton. I was longing at that very moment for some
one to act as my friend."

"Not in the conventional meaning, I hope," laughed Dalton. "Your way of
putting it suggests a duel--which no Englishman of any sense would
embark in, I should hope!"

Dalton was a fresh-colored, blue-eyed man, of nearly thirty years of
age. His frankness of manner and shrewdness of expression contrasted
forcibly with the subtle dreaminess characteristic of Alan Walcott's
face. Alan eyed him curiously, as if doubtful whether he should proceed.

"I am not altogether an Englishman," he said presently, "which may
account in your eyes for some lack of sense. I want you, as a friend, in
the most conventional manner possible. Come out with me and let us talk
it over."

The two men went out and talked together for upwards of an hour. When
they separated the expression of their faces afforded a curious
contrast. Alan looked defiant, resolved, almost triumphant; but Brooke
Dalton went on his way wagging his head in a depressed and melancholy
manner, as if his soul were afflicted by misgivings of many kinds.

       *       *       *       *       *

Mr. Alan Walcott had said that he should leave Aix-les-Bains next day,
but the state of his wife's health rendered it impossible for her to
quit the hotel, and he could not very well separate himself from her.
She continued for some time in shrieking hysterics, varied by fainting
fits; and when she became quieter, under the influence of a soporific
administered by the doctor, she declared herself quite too ill and
exhausted to rise from her bed. Her husband remained with her night and
day, until the second morning, when he escaped from her sight and ken
for a couple of hours, and absolutely refused to tell her where he had
been. His refusal seemed to produce a quieting effect upon her. She
became very still, and lay watching him, with a sullen, puzzled look in
her great dark eyes. He took up a paper and began to read, with an
assumption of complete calmness and unconcern; but she saw that he was
paler than usual, and that his hand shook a little as he turned the
pages of his _Galignani_. Presently she asked, in a subdued voice, for
something to drink. He brought her a glass of claret and water, and she
raised herself a little on one arm to take it from him. Suddenly she
uttered a loud cry, and fell back gasping upon her pillows.

"Mon Dieu!" she cried, "there is blood upon your cuff."

Alan looked down hastily. It was true enough: his white cuff was stained
with red.

"You have killed him!" she said. "You have murdered him, you wretch, you
murderer----"

"Not at all," said Walcott with the greatest composure. "Upon my word, I
rather wish I had. I think he deserved it. He has got off very easily."

"You had a meeting?" his wife shrieked, her eyes beginning to flash with
rage.

"We had a meeting. It was for that purpose that I left for two hours
this morning. You don't suppose that I should let myself be struck in
the face without demanding satisfaction? I have enough French blood in
my veins to think it a very natural way of settling such a quarrel----"

"Was he hurt?" she asked, without waiting for him to finish.

"Very slightly. A sword-cut on the shoulder. The seconds interposed, or
we should have gone on----"

"I have no doubt you wanted to kill him! I shall denounce you to the
police!"

"As you please" said her husband indifferently, taking up his paper.
"But M. de Hauteville has retired from the scene: he had a carriage
waiting, and has crossed the frontier by this time. I assure you he is
perfectly safe Switzerland."

There was a taunt in his voice which exasperated his wife's temper
almost to madness.

"Scelerat!" she said, in a hissing, unnatural voice. "You would have
killed him if you could? Beware of my vengeance then, for I swear that
you shall suffer as he has suffered--and worse things too!"

Alan shrugged his shoulders. He had heard threats of this kind too often
to be greatly moved by them. And Mrs. Walcott, after a few ineffectual
remarks of the same sort, began to sob violently, and finally to work
herself into another hysterical fit, during which her husband coolly
rang the bell, and left her to Lisette's not very tender care.

When he returned she was once more quiet and subdued. He noticed that
she was reading a letter, which, at his entrance, she thrust--somewhat
ostentatiously--beneath her pillow. He took no notice. He was tired of
taking notice. As a rule, he let her go her own way. He had been married
for three years, and he had learned that, save in exceptional
circumstances, it was better not to interfere. He was relieved, and
somewhat surprised, when she suddenly declared herself better, and
wishful to leave her bed. Before long she was sitting at an open window,
with a cup of black coffee and a flask of cognac on a table before her,
while Alan fanned her with a great red fan and occasionally bathed her
temples with eau-de-cologne. He paid her these attentions with an air of
gentle gravity which became him well, but the slight fold between his
brows betokened irritation and weariness.

Cora Walcott seemed to delight in keeping him at her beck and call. She
did not let him stir from her side for the whole of that sultry summer
day. She put on a soft and languid manner: she shed tears and tried to
say coaxing things, which were very coldly received; for there was a
hard and evil look in her fine dark eyes that went far to neutralize the
effect of her _calineries_. Once, indeed, when Alan had gone into an
adjoining room to fetch a vinaigrette, her true feeling found its vent
in a few expressive words.

"Sacre," she muttered, drawing back the red lips from her white teeth,
with the snarl of a vicious dog, "how I hate you, cochon! How I wish
that you were dead!"

And then she smoothed her brows, and smiled at him as he re-entered the
room.

In the course of the evening she made the suggestion that they should
leave Aix-les-Bains next day.

"Certainly," Alan answered, more warmly than usual. "And where shall we
go?"

"Oh, to Paris, I suppose. To Dijon first, of course--if I am strong
enough to travel so far."

Alan was eager to make his preparations for departure, and pleased to
find that his wife was as ready as he to hasten them. Only in one point
did her behavior strike him as peculiar. She announced that she meant to
leave Aix-les-Bains at an early hour, lunch and rest at Culoz, and go on
to Dijon by the afternoon train.

"But why Culoz? Nobody stops at Culoz," he remonstrated.

"Why not Culoz? There is an inn. I suppose we can get some lunch," she
answered. "Besides, I have always meant to go there, to look at the
chateau on the hill! You English like 'views,' do you not? The 'view'
must be magnificent."

She had never formerly shown any interest in scenery, and Alan stared at
her for a moment with a puzzled look. If Henry de Hauteville had been
likely to join her at Culoz he could have understood this whim of hers;
but de Hauteville was safely lodged by this time in the nearest Swiss
canton, and not at all likely to intercept their journey. He did her
bidding, however, without comprehension of her reasons, as he had done
many a time before. Again, he was discomfited by her behavior in the
train, shortly after their departure from the station at Aix-les-Bains.
She suddenly flung herself back in the corner of the _coupe_ and burst
into a prolonged fit of noisy laughter, which seemed as if it would
choke her by its violence. Alan questioned and remonstrated in vain.
Fortunately, they had the _coupe_ to themselves; but the laughter
continued so long that he began to doubt his wife's sanity, as well as
her self-control. At last she sat up and wiped her eyes.

"You will know why I laugh some day, mon ami," she remarked. "Till then,
ask no questions."

Alan was not disposed to ask them. He remained silent, and his silence
continued until the little station of Culoz was reached.

"We change here, of course," he said. "But why should we leave the
station?"

"Do you want to starve me?" his wife inquired angrily. "We will go to
the inn. There is an inn on the road to the village; I asked about it
yesterday."

Very few English tourists think it worth their while to spend any time
at Culoz, pretty little place although it be; and the landlady of the
quaint auberge, with its wooden, vine-grown piazza, was somewhat amazed
and distracted by the appearance of foreign visitors. The dining-room
seemed to be full of peasants in blue blouses, who had been attending a
fair; but lunch was served to Mr. and Mrs. Walcott in the open air, on
the verandah. Cora grumbled openly at the simple fare provided; and Alan
thought how charming would be the scene and the rustic meal if only his
companion were more congenial. For himself, he was quite satisfied with
the long French loaf, the skinny chicken, the well-salted cream cheese,
and the rough red _vin du pays_. The blue sky, the lovely view of
mountain and valley, lake and grove, the soft wind stirring the vine
leaves on the trellis-work of the verandah, would have given him unmixed
delight if he had been alone. But all was spoiled by the presence of an
unloved and unloving wife.

       *       *       *       *       *

The road to the chateau leads upwards from Culoz, and is a trifle hot
and dusty. Alan wondered dumbly whether Cora had an object in dragging
him so far away from the inn, and what that object was. But he took
small annoyances patiently. It was something gained, at least, that his
wife should seem content. Anything was better than tearing rage or
violent hysterical weeping, which were the phases of temper most
frequently presented to his view. On this occasion she appeared pleased
and happy. He surprised a touch of malignity in her tones, a glance of
evil meaning now and then; but he did not greatly care. Cora could not
keep a secret. If she had any ill-will or ill intention towards him he
was sure to know it before long.

"I am tired," she said at last, abruptly. "Let us sit down and rest.
Look, here is an entrance into the park of the chateau. Shall we go in?"

"Is it open to the public?" said Alan, with an Englishman's instinctive
fear of trespassing. For, although he had had a French grandmother, and
sometimes boasted himself of French descent, he was essentially English
in his ideas. Cora laughed him to scorn.

"I go where I will," she said, "and nobody finds it in his heart to turn
me out. Courage, mon ami, I will protect you, if necessary. Follow me!"

Piqued by her tone, he opened the gate for her, and they passed from the
hot, white road into the green demesnes of the Count who owned the
chateau above Culoz. It struck Alan that his wife knew the way
wonderfully well. She turned without hesitation into a path which led
them to a wooden seat shaded by two great trees, and so situated that it
could not be seen by anyone passing on the high road. Here she seated
herself and looked up at her husband with a defiant smile.

"You have been here before?" he said suddenly.

She nodded. "Precisely, mon ami, I have been here before. And with whom?
With M. de Hauteville, when you imagined me suffering from a migraine a
few days ago. Surely you did not think that it was his first appearance
when he arrived at the hotel, the day before yesterday?"

"I do not wish to discuss M. de Hauteville," said Alan turning away.

"But perhaps I wish to discuss him. We discussed _you_ at full
length--that day last week. We chronicled your vices, your weaknesses,
your meannesses in detail. One thing I might have told him, which I left
out--the fact that you are no gentleman, not even bourgeois--a mere
peasant clown. He would not have let you measure swords with him if he
had known the baseness of your origin, my friend!"

Alan's lips moved as if he would have spoken, but he restrained himself.
He saw that she wanted him to respond, to lose his temper, to give her
some cause of complaint, some opening for recrimination; and he resolved
that he would not yield to her desire. She might abuse him as she would
and he would not reply. She would cease when she was tired--and not till
then.

"You are a mean-spirited creature!" she said, her eyes flashing hatred
at him as she spoke. "You have chained me to you all these years,
although you know that I loathe the very sight of you, that I have
worshiped Henri, my lover, all the while. Who but a base, vile wretch
would not have given me my freedom? You have known all the time that he
loved me, and you have pretended ignorance because you did not want to
let me go. From the moment I found this out, I have hated and despised
you. You have no courage, no spirit; there is nothing even to be afraid
of in you. You would be brutal if you dared, but you do not dare. You
can be spiteful and treacherous and villainous, that is all. And I hate
you for all that you are and all that you do not dare to be!"

Alan ground his teeth, in a moment's raging desire to bring the woman to
her senses by some actual exertion of his physical strength. But the
impulse of anger lasted only for a moment. He knew that half her rage
was simulated--that she was lashing herself up in preparation for some
tremendous crisis, and all that he could do was to wait for it in
silence. She had risen to her feet as she spoke. He rose too and leaned
against the trunk of a tree, while she stormed and raved like a madwoman
for some minutes in front of him.

"Now," she said at last, "you know what I think of you, how I hate you,
how I despise you. But it is not enough. My father shot down twenty of
his enemies in the siege of Paris. Do you think that his daughter is a
coward, to be trampled on by a brutal, cold-blooded Englishman? No!
Because I hate you, and because you have tried to kill the man I love,
and because you are too mean and vile to live--I will kill _you_!"

Her hand darted to the bosom of her dress. Before Alan could stop
her--almost before he realized what she was doing--she had drawn out a
little pistol, cocked it, and pulled the trigger. But her hurry at the
last moment spoiled her aim. Alan felt a sting in the left arm, and knew
that she had so far succeeded in her intentions; but with his right hand
he was able to snatch the pistol from her, and to fling it far into the
brushwood.

Then came the reaction. She burst into loud, screaming sobs and tears,
and flung herself on the ground, where she writhed for a time like one
in convulsions. Alan seated himself, feeling somewhat sick and faint,
and waited for the storm to spend itself. Some time elapsed before she
became calm; but at last she raised herself panting from the ground and
looked half timorously at her husband. His coolness and quietness often
enraged, but now and then it frightened her.

"If you have not another pistol with you," said Alan, "you cannot kill
me just now. Perhaps you have done enough to satisfy yourself for the
moment. What do you propose to do next?"

"What do _you_ mean to do?" she asked sullenly. "Of course, you can
follow me and give me up to the police."

"I shall not do that."

"I will not return with you," she said in a furious tone.

"That is natural," Alan agreed politely. "What then?"

"I told you I knew this place," she answered. "I am to meet a friend
upon the road, half a mile further on. I am going there now. He will
take me to the next station on the line."

"Admirably planned!" said Alan. "Every detail fits in to perfection."

"And I shall never come back," she said, looking at him spitefully.

For answer, he raised his hat. She turned on her heel, went down the
slope towards the road, and disappeared. It was a strange parting
between husband and wife. Not a single feeling of reluctance existed in
the mind of either; only a fixed resolve to have done with each other
henceforth and for ever.

Alan bound up his wounds as well as he could, and retraced his steps to
Culoz. He would have done better, possibly, to avoid the place. People
stared at him curiously as he passed them by. Why had he come back
alone? What had he done with the beautiful lady who had accompanied him
when he set forth?

"He, monsieur," tried the black-eyed dame of the auberge, leaning over
the rail of the verandah, as he passed: "ou donc est madame? Est-ce
qu'elle ne revient pas?"

"Madame est partie," said Alan continuing his walk without turning
round. The aubergiste looked after him in amaze. Where could madame have
gone? There was no other road to the station, and she had been watching
for the English milord and his lady for the last hour and a half! What
had he done with madame?

It was a matter of speculation which lasted her for many a day, and was
often recounted to new comers. It became the general opinion at Culoz
that the Englishman had in some unaccountable manner killed his wife and
disposed mysteriously of her body. But although search was made for it
high and low, the murdered body was never found. Nevertheless, the
stranger's guilt remained a tradition of the neighborhood, and the story
of that marvelous disappearance is related by the villagers unto this
day.

Alan went on his way rejoicing, although in somewhat grim and
shame-faced wise. For three years he had been a miserable slave. Now he
was free! And he determined that he would never submit to bonds again.




CHAPTER II.

AT THE RECTORY.


About the very time when Alan Walcott, at the age of three-and-twenty,
was making a hasty match with the daughter of a French refugee--a match
bitterly deplored before the first few weeks of married life were
over--events, which afterwards very greatly affected his career, were
quickly shaping themselves in a sleepy little English village not far
from the place where he was born.

Angleford, a mere handful of red-brick cottages, five miles from a
railway station, was little known to the outer world. Its nearest
market-town was Dorminster, and the village of Thorley lay between
Angleford and the county town. Birchmead, a hamlet which had some repute
of its own as a particularly healthy place, stood further down the river
on which Angleford was built, and its merits generally threw those of
neighboring villages into the shade.

But Angleford was in itself a pretty little nook, and its inhabitants
somewhat prided themselves on its seclusion from the world. These
inhabitants, it must be confessed, were few. It had once been a larger
and more important place, but had gradually dwindled away until the
village contained less than three hundred persons, chiefly laborers and
small shop-keepers. Beside these, there were the doctor, and his wife,
the rector and his family, and the squire--a childless widower, who was
of rather less account than anybody else in the parish.

The Rectory was a rambling, long, low, red-brick house standing in
prettily-wooded grounds, bordered by the river, on the other side of
which lay the park belonging to the squire. The park ran for some
distance on both sides of the stream, and the Rectory grounds were, so
to speak, taken out of the very midst of the squire's, demesne. The
continuation of wooded ground on either side the narrow winding river
made the place particularly picturesque; and it was a favorite amusement
for the rector's son and daughter to push a rather crazy boat out of the
little boat-house at the foot of the garden, and row up and down those
reaches of the stream "between the bridges," which were navigable. One
of the bridges warned them of the weir, which it was not very safe to
approach; and beyond the other, three miles further down and close to
Birchmead, the stream was shallow and clogged with reeds. But within
these limits there was a peaceful tranquil beauty which made the boat a
favorite resting place for the Rectory people during the long summer
evenings and afternoons.

It was two o'clock on a late autumn afternoon, when a girl of sixteen
came out of the Rectory door, which always stood hospitably open in fine
weather, and walked to the boat-house, as if intending to launch out
upon the water. The day was sunny on the whole, but not cloudless: the
sun shone out brightly every now and then, and was again obscured by a
filmy haze, such as rises so easily from the low-lying land in Essex.
But the golden haze softened the distant outlines of wood and meadow,
and the sun's beams rested tenderly upon the rapidly stripping branches,
where a few rustling leaves still told of their departed glories. The
long undefined shadows of the trees stretched far across the wide lawn,
scarcely moving in the profound stillness of the air; and a whole
assembly of birds kept up a low-toned conversation in the bushes, as if
the day were hardly bright enough to warrant a full chorus of concerted
song. It was a tender, wistful kind of day, such as comes sometimes in
the fall of the year, before the advent of frost. And a certain affinity
with the day was visible in the face of the girl who had walked down to
the riverside. There was no melancholy in her expression: indeed, a very
sweet and happy smile played about the corners of her sensitive mouth;
but a slightly wistful look in the long-lashed grey eyes lent an
unconscious pathos to the delicate face. But, although delicate, the
face was anything but weak. The features were clearly cut; the mouth and
chin expressed decision as well as sensibility; and beneath the thick,
fine waves of shining brown hair, the forehead was broad and
well-developed. Without pretension to actual beauty or any kind of
perfection, the face was one likely to attract and then to charm;
gentleness, thoughtfulness, intellectual power, might be read in those
fair features, as well as an almost infantine candor and innocence, and
the subtle and all too-transient bloom of extreme youth. Her hair, which
constituted one of her best "points," was simply parted in the middle,
fastened with a clasp at the nape of her neck, and then allowed to fall
in a smooth, shining shower down to her waist. Mrs. Campion, who had
been something of a beauty in her young days, was given to lamenting
that Lettice's hair was not golden, as hers had been; but the clear soft
brown of the girl's abundant tresses had a beauty of it's own; and, as
it waved over her light woollen frock of grey-green hue, it gave her an
air of peculiar appropriateness to the scene--as of a wood-nymph, who
bore the colors of the forest-trees from which she sprang.

Such, at any rate, was the fancy of a man whose canoe came shooting down
the river at this moment, like an arrow from a bow. He slackened pace as
he came near the Rectory garden, and peered through the tangled branches
which surrounded the old black boat-house, to catch another glimpse of
Lettice. He wondered that she did not notice him: his red and white
blazer and jaunty cap made him a somewhat conspicuous object in this
quiet country place; and she must have heard the long strokes of his
oars. But she remained silent, apparently examining the fastenings of
the boat; absorbed and tranquil, with a happy smile upon her lips.

"Good afternoon, Miss Campion: can I help you there in any way?" he
shouted at last, letting his boat slide past the boat-house entrance,
and then bringing it round to the little flight of grassy steps cut in
the bank from the lawn to the river.

"Oh, good afternoon, Mr. Dalton. Thank you, no; I don't want any help,"
said Lettice; but the young man had already set foot upon the lawn and
was advancing towards her. He was the nephew and heir of the childless
Squire at Angleford Manor, and he occasionally spent a few weeks with
his uncle in the country. Old Mr. Dalton was not fond of Angleford,
however, and the Campions did not see much of him and his nephew.

Brooke Dalton was six-and-twenty, a manly, well-looking young fellow,
with fair hair and bright blue eyes. He was not very tall, and had
already begun to develop a tendency towards stoutness, which gave him
considerable trouble in after years. At present he kept it down by heavy
doses of physical exercise, so that it amounted only to a little unusual
fullness of body and the suspicion of a double chin. His enemies called
him fat. His friends declared that his sunshiny look of prosperity and
good-humor was worth any amount of beauty, and that it would be a
positive loss to the world if he were even a trifle thinner. And Brooke
Dalton was a man of many friends.

Lettice greeted him with a smile. "So you are here again," she said.

"Yes, I've been here a day or two. Have you heard from Sydney yet?"

"No, and we are dreadfully anxious. But papa says we shall hear very
soon now."

"I don't suppose you need have the slightest anxiety. Sydney is sure to
do well: he was always a clever fellow."

"Yes, but he has had no teaching except from papa: and papa torments
himself with the idea that there may be better teachers than himself at
Cambridge--which I am sure there couldn't be. And I am sure he will be
disappointed if Sydney does not get at least an exhibition, although he
tries to pretend that he will not mind."

"If he does not get it this year, he will be the surer of it next time."

"Yes," said Lettice rather doubtfully. "But I wish papa were not quite
so anxious."

"Did he go to Cambridge with Sydney?"

"Yes, and stayed for a day or two; but he said he was rather glad to get
home again--there had been so many changes since he was there."

"Here he comes," said Brooke, turning round.

The rector was a dignified-looking man, with a tall figure, handsome
features, and hair and beard which had of late been growing very grey.
He greeted Dalton cordially, and at once began to speak of his hopes and
expectations for his son. To all of these Dalton responded
good-humoredly. "Sydney has plenty of brains: he is is sure to do well,"
he said.

"Oh, I don't know--I don't know. I've been his only tutor, and I may not
have laid the foundations with sufficient care. I shall not be at all
surprised if he fails. Indeed"--with a transparent affectation of
indifference--"I shall not be sorry to have him back for another year.
He is not quite eighteen, you know. And Lettice will be glad to have him
again."

"But I want him to succeed!" said Lettice eagerly.

"Of course you do. And he _will_ succeed," said Brooke; an assurance
which caused her to flash a glad look of gratitude to him in reply.

"Lettice has been Sydney's companion in his studies," said Mr. Campion,
patting her hand gently with his long white fingers. "She has been very
industrious and has got on very well, but I daresay she will be pleased
to have a holiday when he is gone."

"Yes, I daresay," said Brooke; and then, looking at Lettice, he saw the
manifestation of some strong feeling which he did not understand. The
girl flushed hotly and withdrew her hand from her father's arm. The
tears suddenly came into her eyes.

"I never wanted a holiday," she said, in a hurt tone.

"No, no, you were always a good girl," returned her father absently--his
eyes had wandered away from her to the high-road beyond the glebe. "But
of course there is a limit to a girl's powers; she can't compete with a
boy beyond a certain point. Is not that a cab, Lettice? Surely it must
be Sydney, and he has came at last. Well, now we shall know the result!"

"I'll go to the fence and look," said Lettice, running away. The tears
of mortification and distress were still smarting in her eyes. Why
should her father depreciate her to their neighbor because she was a
girl? She did not mind Mr. Dalton's opinion of her, but it was hard that
her father should give her no credit for the work that she had done in
the study at his side. Step by step she had kept pace with her brother:
sometimes he had excelled her, sometimes she thought that she was
outstripping him. Now in the hour of his possible success (of which she
would be proud and glad), why should her father seem to undervalue her
powers and her industry? They would never bring her the guerdon that
might fall to Sydney's lot; but she felt that she, too, had a right to
her father's praise.

She had been vaguely hurt during Sydney's absence to find that Mr.
Campion did not seem disposed to allow her to go on working alone with
him. "Wait, my dear, wait," he had said to her, when she came to him as
usual, "let us see how Sydney's examination turns out. If he comes back
to us for another year you can go on with him. If not--well, you are a
girl, it does not matter so much for _you_; and your mother complains
that you do not sit with her sufficiently. Take a holiday just now, we
will go on when Sydney comes back."

But in this, Lettice's first separation from her beloved brother, she
had no heart for a holiday. She would have been glad of hard work to
take her out of herself. She was anxious, sad, _des[oe]uvree_, and if
she had not been taught all her life to look on failure in an
examination as something disgraceful, she would have earnestly hoped
that Sydney might lose the scholarship for which he was competing.

Brooke Dalton saw that his presence was scarcely desired just then, and
took his leave, meditating as he pulled up the river on Lettice's
reddened cheeks and pretty tear-filled eyes. "I suppose she thinks
she'll miss her brother when he goes away," he decided at length, "and
no doubt she will, for a time; but it is just as well--what does a girl
want with all that Latin and Greek? It will only serve to make her
forget to brush her hair and wear a frock becomingly. Of course she's
clever, but I should not care for that sort of cleverness in a
sister--or a wife." He thought again of the girl's soft grey eyes. But
he had a hundred other preoccupations, and her image very soon faded
from his brain.

Lettice ran to the fence to look at the cab, but Mr. Campion turned at
once to the gateway and walked out into the road. He had not been
mistaken, it was Sydney, indeed; and as soon as the young fellow saw his
father he stopped the vehicle, told the driver to go on to the Rectory
with his portmanteau, and turned to his father with a triumphant smile.
Lettice did not meet the pair for a minute or two, so the son's
communication was made first to Mr. Campion alone.

"Here I am, sir!" was the young man's greeting, "turned up again like a
bad half-penny."

"Welcome anyhow, my boy," said the rector, "and sterling coin, I'll
warrant, however much you may malign yourself." He was too nervous to
ask a direct question about his son's success. "We have been very dull
without you. Lettice is counting on your help to break in her pony to
the saddle."

"You mustn't be dull after a week's absence. What would you do if I had
to be more than half the year at Cambridge?"

"Ah, that would be a different thing. Have they given you an exhibition
then?"

"Well, not exactly that." The rector's face fell, but it brightened as
Sydney proceeded with a touch of youthful pomposity. "Your old pupil is
a Scholar of Trinity."

The rector was carrying his cane as he walked along, and when Sydney had
told his good news he stopped short, his face aglow, and for lack of any
more eloquent mode of expressing his satisfaction, raised it in the air
and brought it down with sounding emphasis on his companion's back.

Sydney laughed.

"Laudatur et alget," he said. "How many stripes would it have been if I
had come home disgraced?"

"The stripes would have been my portion in that case," the rector
answered, with a hearty laugh. He had not been so jovial for many
months.

Then Lettice came running up, and had to be told the news, and clung to
Sydney's neck with kisses, which he graciously permitted rather than
returned. But he was gratified by her affection, as well as by the pride
and pleasure which his father took in his success, and the less
discriminating, but equally warm congratulations and caresses showered
upon him by his mother.

Indeed for the rest of the day, Sydney was caressed and complimented to
his heart's content. He preferred the compliments to the caresses, and
he was not unloving to his parents, although he repulsed Lettice when
she attempted to kiss him more than once. He had come back from
Cambridge with an added sense of manliness and importance, which did not
sit ill upon his handsome face and the frank confidence of his manner.
It was Sydney who had inherited the golden hair and regular features
which, as his mother said, ought to have belonged to Lettice and not to
him; but she loved him all the more dearly for his resemblance to her
family and to herself. It escaped her observation that Sydney's
blue-grey eyes were keener, his mouth more firmly closed and his jaw
squarer than those of most boys or men, and betokened, if physiognomy
goes for anything, a new departure in character and intellect from the
ways in which Mrs. Campion and her family had always walked. A fair,
roseate complexion, and a winning manner, served to disguise these
points of difference; and Mrs. Campion had not quick sight for anything
which did not lie upon the surface, in the character of those with whom
she had to do.

She was usually to be found in the drawing-room--a faded, pretty woman,
little over fifty years of age, but with the delicate and enfeebled air
of the semi-invalid--a white shawl round her shoulders, a bit of
knitting or embroidery between her incapable, uncertain fingers. Her
hair was very grey, but the curliness had never gone out of it, and it
sprang so crisply and picturesquely from her white, unwrinkled forehead
that it seemed a pity to hide any of the pretty waves even by the crown
of fine old lace which Mrs. Campion loved. She was a woman at whom no
one could look without a sense of artistic satisfaction, for her face
was still charming, and her dress delicately neat and becoming. As for
her mental and moral qualities, she was perfectly well satisfied with
them, and her husband was as satisfied as she--although from a somewhat
different point of view. And as she very properly remarked, if her
husband were satisfied with her, she did not know why she should be
called upon to regard any adverse opinion of the outer world. At the
same time she was an ardent disciple of Mrs. Grundy.

How this woman came to be the mother of a child like Lettice, it were,
indeed, hard to say. Sydney was fashioned more or less after Mrs.
Campion's own heart: he was brisk, practical, unimaginative--of a type
that she to some extent understood; but Lettice with her large heart,
her warm and passionate nature, her keen sensibilities and tender
conscience, was a continual puzzle to her mother. Especially at this
period of the girl's life, when new powers were developing and new
instincts coming into existence--the very time when a girl most needs
the help and comfort of a mother's tender comprehension--Mrs. Campion
and Lettice fell hopelessly apart. Lettice's absorption in her studies
did not seem right in Mrs. Campion's eyes: she longed with all her soul
to set her daughter down to crewel-work and fancy knitting, and her one
comfort in view of Sydney's approaching separation from his home was her
hope that, when he was gone, Lettice would give up Latin and Greek and
become like other girls. She was ignorantly proud of Sydney's successes:
she was quite as ignorantly ashamed of Lettice's achievements in the
same lines of study.

"I can never forget," she said to Lettice that evening, when the
rector and his son were discussing Cambridge and examination papers
in the study, while the mother and her daughter occupied the
drawing-room--Lettice, indeed, wild to join her father and brother in
the study and glean every possible fragment of information concerning
the place which she had been taught to reverence, but far too dutiful to
her mother to leave her alone when Mrs. Campion seemed inclined to
talk--"I can never forget that Sydney learned his alphabet at my knee. I
taught him to spell, at any rate; and if your father had not insisted on
taking the teaching out of my hands when he was seven years old, I am
convinced that I should have done great things with him."

"Surely he has done great things already, mamma!" Lettice said with
enthusiasm.

"Oh, yes!" said Mrs. Campion with a sigh. "But I don't think your father
has given quite the bias to his mind that I should have liked best. I
have always hoped that he would spend his strength in the service of the
Church; but----You have not heard him say much about his future career,
have you, Lettice?"

"I don't think he has considered it particularly," Lettice answered.
"But he never speaks of taking Orders; he talked of the Bar the other
day. There's no reason why he should make up his mind so soon, is there,
mamma?"

"No, dear, no. But I am quite sure that if he went into the Church he
would be a Bishop," said Mrs. Campion, with conviction. "And I should
like him to be a Bishop."

"Well, perhaps he will be Lord Chancellor instead," said Lettice,
merrily.

"There can be no doubt, my dear," said her mother, "that a Bishop of the
Anglican Church is able to carry himself with more dignity and
distinction in everyday life than a Lord Chancellor, who is only
dignified when he is on the Bench. I think that Sydney would make an
excellent Bishop--quite the most distinguished Bishop of the day."

It was not until next morning that Lettice had time to ply her brother
with questions as to his examination and his Cambridge experiences
generally. She did not ask about the visit to London which he had also
paid. She had been to London herself, and could go there any day. But
Cambridge!--the goal of Sydney's aspirations--the place where (the girl
believed) intellectual success or failure was of such paramount
importance--what was that like?

Sydney was ready to hold forth. He liked the position of instructor and
was not insensible to the flattery of Lettice's intentness on his
answers. But he was a little dismayed by one of her questions, which
showed the direction of her thoughts.

"Did you hear anything about the women's college, Sydney?" For Girton
and Newnham were less well known then than they are now.

"Women's colleges! No, indeed. At least, I heard them laughed at several
times. They're no good."

"Why not?" said Lettice, wistfully.

"Now, Lettice," said the youthful mentor, severe in boyish wisdom, "I
hope you are not going to take fancies into your head about going to
Cambridge yourself. I should not like it at all. I'm not going to have
_my_ sister laughed at and sneered at every time she walks out. I don't
want to be made a laughing-stock. Nice girls stay at home with their
mothers; they don't go to colleges and make themselves peculiar."

"I am not going to be peculiar; but I don't want to forget all I have
learned with you," said Lettice, quickly.

"You have learned too much already," said the autocrat, whose views
concerning women's education had developed since his short stay in
Cambridge. "Girls don't want Latin and Greek; they want music and
needlework, and all that sort of thing. I don't want my sister to be a
blue-stocking."

Lettice felt that her lot in life ought not to be settled for her simply
as Sydney's sister--that she had an individuality of her own. But the
feeling was too vague to put into words; and after Syndey had left her,
in obedience to a call from his father, she sat on in the long, low room
with its cushioned window-seats and book-covered walls--the dear old
room in which she had spent so many happy hours with her teacher and her
fellow-pupil--and wondered what would become of her when Sydney was
really gone; whether all those happy days were over, and she must
henceforth content herself with a life at Mrs. Campion's side, where it
was high treason to glance at any book that was neither a devotional
work nor a novel. Lettice loved her mother, but the prospect did not
strike her as either brilliant or cheering.

It was the beginning, although at first she knew it not, of a new
era in her life. Her happy childhood was over; she was bound henceforth
to take up the heavy burden which custom lays on the shoulders of so
many women: the burden of trivial care, unchanging routine, petty
conventionalities--

    "Heavy as frost and deep almost as life."

Sydney went out into the world to fight; Lettice sat in idleness at
home; and society, as well as the rector and his wife, judged this
division of labor to be fair and right. But to Lettice, whose courage
was high and whose will and intellect were strong, it seemed a terrible
injustice that she might not fight and labor too. She longed for
expansion: for a wider field and sharper weapons wherewith to contest
the battle; and she longed in vain. During her father's lifetime it
became more and more impossible for her to leave home. She was
five-and-twenty before she breathed a larger air than that of Angleford.




CHAPTER III.

PROGRESS.


In due time, Sydney proceeded to Cambridge, and Lettice was left alone.
The further development of brother and sister can scarcely be understood
without a retrospective glance at their own and their parents' history.

The Reverend Lawrence Campion, Rector of Angleford, was at this time a
prosperous and contented man. Before he reached his fortieth year, he
had been presented by an old college friend to a comfortable living.
Married to the woman of his early choice, he had become the father of
two straight-limbed, healthy, and intelligent children; and then, for
another twenty years, he felt that he would not care to change his lot
with that of the most enviable of his fellow-creatures.

Being himself a scholar and a student, he determined that his boy and
girl, so far as he could shape their lives, should be scholars also. To
teach them all he knew was henceforth his chief occupation; for he would
not hand over to another a task which for him was a simple labor of
love. Day by day he sat between them in his comfortable study, where
roses tapped at the lozenge-shaped window panes all through the summer,
and in winter the glow of the great logs upon the hearth was reflected
from the polished binding and gilt lettering of his books in a thousand
autumnal hues, as pleasing to his eyes as the tints of the summer
flowers. Day by day he sat between his children, patiently laying the
foundation of all they could thereafter learn or know. He made no
distinction for age or sex; and in their case, at any rate, nature had
set no stigma of inferiority on the intelligence of the girl. Sydney was
the older of the two by eighteen months, and at first it seemed as
though his mind was readier to grasp a new idea; but there awoke in
Lettice a spirit of generous rivalry and resolution, which saved her
from being far out-stripped by her brother. Together they studied Greek
and Latin; they talked French and read German; they picked up as much of
mathematics as their father could explain to them--which was little
enough; and, best of all, they developed a literary faculty such as does
not always accompany a knowledge of half-a-dozen dead and living
languages.

The day came when Mr. Campion, not without misgiving, resolved to test
the value of the education which he had given to his children. He had
held a fellowship at Peterhouse up to the time of his marriage, and had
intended that Sydney should try for a scholarship at the same college.
But the boy aimed at a higher mark; he was bent on being a Scholar of
Trinity. Perhaps it might have done him good to fail once or twice on
the threshold of his life, had his father assured himself beforehand
that he would not be disappointed if his pupil was sent back to him for
another year of preparation. But, as we have already seen, Sidney
succeeded, and, if the truth must be told, Mr. Campion was in no way
surprised at his success.

From that time forward none of the Campions ever dreamed of failure in
connection with Sydney's efforts. He certainly did not dream of failure
for himself. He had that sublime confidence which swells the heart of
every young man in the flush of his first victory. We laugh in the
middle age at the ambitions which we nursed at twenty; but we did not
laugh when the divine breath was in us, and when our faith removed
mountains of difficulty from our path.

Sydney's career at Cambridge was one long triumph. He gained the Craven
and Porson scholarships; his epigrams were quoted by college tutors as
models of vigor and elegance; he was President of the Union; he took an
excellent degree, and was elected to a fellowship in due course. He had,
in fact, done brilliant things; and at the age of twenty-four he was--to
those who knew him best, and especially to those who liked him
least--that shining, glorified, inspired, and yet sophisticated product
of modern university culture, an academic prig. The word is not of
necessity a term of reproach. Perhaps we are all prigs at some season in
our lives, if we happen to have any inherent power of doing great
things. There are lovable prigs, who grow into admirable men and women;
but, alas! for the prig whose self-love coils round him like a snake,
until it crushes out the ingenuous fervor of youth, and perverts the
noblest aspirations of manhood!

From Cambridge Sydney went to London, and was called to the bar. Here,
of course, his progress was not so rapid. Briefs do not come for
wishing, nor even for merit alone. Nevertheless he was advancing year by
year in the estimation of good judges; and it was known to his father,
and to his intimate friends, that he only waited a favorable opportunity
to stand for a seat in parliament.

At Angleford, in the meantime, they watched his career with proud hearts
and loving sympathy. Mrs. Campion, in particular, doted on her son. She
even scanned the paper every morning, never by any chance missing an
item of law intelligence, where occasionally she would be rewarded by
coming across Sydney's name. She would not have considered any
distinction, however great, to be more than his due.

Lettice never thought of disagreeing with her mother when she sang the
praises of Sydney; but it must be confessed that both the rector and his
wife displayed less than their ordinary balance of judgment in
discussing the merits of their son. They unconsciously did much
injustice to the girl, by their excessive adulation of her brother, and
her interests were constantly sacrificed to his. She would have been the
last to admit that it was so; but the fact was clear enough to the few
persons who used to visit them at Angleford. Her friend, Clara Graham,
for instance, the wife of a London journalist, who came down now and
then to spend a holiday in her native village, would attempt to
commiserate Lettice on the hardness of her lot; but Lettice would not
listen to anything of the kind. She was too loyal to permit a word to be
spoken in her presence which might seem to reflect upon her parents or
her brother.

Yet it would have been impossible that she should not be in some way
affected by the change which had come over her life since Sydney went to
Cambridge. From that day her regular reading with her father had ceased,
and she was left to direct her studies as she thought best. Mr. Campion
was almost entirely absorbed in the prospects of his son, and if Lettice
needed his assistance she had to ask for it, often more than once. The
consequence was that she soon gave up asking, and her mind, left to its
own devices, gradually found its true bent. She did not read much more
Latin or Greek, but devoured all the Modern literature that came in her
way. After that she began to write--not fiction in the first instance,
but more or less solid essays on criticism and social philosophy,
following the pattern of certain writers in the half-crown monthly
magazines, which her father was wont to take in. If she had known that
the time would come when she would have to earn her living by her pen,
she could scarcely have adopted a better plan to prepare herself for the
task.

In the first instance, whatever she did in this way had been for her own
pleasure and distraction, without any clear idea of turning her
abilities to practical account. She had no inclination for an idle life,
but there was a limited period during which it rested with her father to
say what her occupation as a woman should be. When Sidney went to
Cambridge, Lettice had entreated that she might be sent to Girton or
Newnham; but the young Scholar of Trinity had fought shy of the notion,
and it was dropped at once. That, indeed, was the beginning of Lettice's
isolation--the beginning of a kind of mental estrangement from her
brother, which the lapse of time was to widen and perpetuate.

Mr. Campion and his wife were by no means unkind to their daughter; they
simply put Sydney first in all their plans and anticipations of the
future. Her education was supposed to be complete; her lot was to be
cast at home, and not in the rough outer world, where men compete and
struggle for the mastery. If she had complained, they might not have
been shocked, but they would have been immeasurably astonished. The
rector had given her an excellent training, and though his strongest
motive was the desire to stimulate and encourage his son, no doubt he
had her interests in view at the same time. But when he finished with
Sydney he finished with Lettice, and it never occurred to him that there
was any injustice in suddenly withdrawing from her the arm on which he
had taught her to lean.

She did not complain. Yet as time went on she could not shut her eyes to
Sydney's habit of referring every question to the test of personal
expediency. It was her first great disillusion, but the pain which it
caused her was on her parents' behalf rather than on her own. They were
the chief sufferers; they gave him so much and received so little in
return. To be sure, Sydney was only what they had made him. They bade
him "take," in language which he could easily understand, but their
craving for love, for tenderness, for a share in his hopes, ambitions,
resolutions, and triumphs, found no entrance to his understanding.

Sydney had spent a large sum of money at Cambridge, and had left heavy
debts behind him, although his father had paid without remonstrance all
the accounts which he suffered to reach the old man's hands. He had what
are called expensive tastes; in other words, he bought what he coveted,
and did not count the cost. The same thing went on in London, and Mr.
Campion soon found that his income, good as it was, fell short of the
demands which were made upon it.

The rector himself had always been a free spender. His books, his
pictures, his garden, his mania for curiosities, had run away with
thousands of pounds, and now, when he surreptitiously tried to convert
these things into cash again there was a woeful falling off in their
value. He knew nothing of the art of driving a bargain; and, where
others would have made a profit with the same opportunities, he
invariably lost money. He had bought badly to begin with, and he sold
disastrously. Being hard pressed on one occasion for a hundred pounds to
send to Sydney, he borrowed it of a perfect stranger, who took for his
security what would have sufficed to cover ten times the amount.

This was in the third year after Sydney was called to the bar. Lettice
was in London that autumn, on a visit to the Grahams; and perhaps
something which she contrived to say to her brother induced him to write
and tell his father that briefs were coming in at last, and that he
hoped to be able to dispense with further remittances from home. Mr.
Campion rejoiced in this assurance as though it implied that Sydney had
made his fortune. But things had gone too far with him to admit of
recovery, even if the young man had kept to his good resolutions--which
he did not.

The fact is that Sydney's college debts hung like a weight round his
neck, and he had made no effort to be rid of them. The income of his
fellowship and his professional earnings ought to have been ample for
all his needs, and no excuse can be urged for the selfishness which made
him a burden to his father after he had left Cambridge. But chambers in
Piccadilly, as well as at the Inner Temple, a couple of West End clubs,
a nightly rubber at whist, and certain regular drains upon his pocket
which never found their way into any book of accounts, made up a
formidable total of expenditure by the year's end. He was too clever a
man of the world to let his reputation--or even his conscience--suffer
by his self-indulgence, and, if he lived hard in the pursuit of
pleasure, he also worked hard in his profession. In short, he was a
well-reputed lawyer, against whom no one had a word to say; and he was
supposed to have a very good chance of the prizes which are wont to fall
to the lot of successful lawyers.

At the beginning of 1880, when Sydney Campion was in his twenty-seventh
year, there came to him the opportunity for which he had waited. Mr.
Disraeli had dissolved Parliament somewhat suddenly, and appealed to the
country for a renewal of the support accorded to him six years before.
He had carried out in Eastern Europe a policy worthy of an Imperial
race. He had brought peace with honor from Berlin, filled the bazaars of
three continents with rumors of his fame, and annexed the Suez Canal. He
had made his Queen an Empress, and had lavished garters and dukedoms on
the greatest of Her Majesty's subjects. But the integrity of the empire,
safe from foes without, was threatened on either shore of St. George's
Channel--by malignant treason on one side, and on the other by exuberant
verbosity. It was a moment big with the fate of humanity--and he
strongly advised the constituencies to make him Prime Minister again.

Then the country was plunged into the turmoil of a General Election.
Every borough and shire which had not already secured candidates
hastened to do so. Zealous Liberals and enthusiastic Tories ran up to
town from the places where local spirit failed, or local funds were not
forthcoming, convinced that they would find no lack of either in the
clubs and associations of the metropolis. Young and ambitious
politicians had their chance at last, and amongst others the chance came
for Sydney Campion.

There is no difficulty about getting into Parliament for a young man who
has friends. He can borrow the money, the spirit, the eloquence, the
political knowledge, and he will never be asked to repay any of them out
of his own resources. Now Sydney had a friend who would have seen him
through the whole business on these terms, who would at any rate have
found him money, the only qualification in which he was deficient. But
he fell into a trap prepared for him by his own vanity, and, as it
happened, the mistake cost him very dear.

"You see, Campion," his friend had said to him, after suggesting that he
should go down as Conservative candidate for Dormer, "our people know
very well what they would get for their money if you were elected. You
would make your mark in the first session, and be immensely useful to us
in ever so many ways."

"Would it cost much?" asked Sydney, rather nettled by the mention of
money. He had known Sir John Pynsent at Cambridge, and had never allowed
himself to be outdressed or outshone by him in any way. But Pynsent had
beaten him in the race for political honors; and Sydney, like a showy
player at billiards who prefers to put side on when he might make a
straightforward stroke, resolved to take a high tone with his would-be
patronizing friend.

"Much?" said Sir John. "Well, no, not much, as things go. But these
worthies at Dormer have their own traditional ways of working the
oracle. The Rads have got hold of a stockjobber who is good for a
thousand, and Maltman says they cannot fight him with less than that.
The long and short of it is that they want a strong candidate with five
hundred pounds, and we are prepared to send you down, my boy, and to be
good for that amount."

Sydney took out his cigar case, and offered the beaming baronet a choice
Villar.

"It's uncommonly good of you, Pynsent, to give me a look in at Dormer,
and to suggest the other thing in such a friendly way. Now, look
here--can you let me have two days to say yes or no to Maltman?"

"I am afraid I can't. He must have his answer in twenty-four hours."

"Well, say twenty-four hours. He shall have it by this time to-morrow.
And as for the five hundred, you may be wanting that by and by. Keep it
for some fellow who is not in a position to fight for his own hand."

Sir John Pynsent left his friend with a greatly increased opinion of his
spirit and professional standing--a result of the interview with which
Sydney was perfectly satisfied.

Then came the serious question, how he was to deal with the emergency
which had arisen--perhaps the most critical emergency of his life.
Within twenty-four hours he must know when and how he could put his hand
upon five hundred pounds.

He might easily have saved twice the sum before now; but he had never
learned the art of saving. He thought of his father, whom he had not
seen or written to for more than a month, and determined that he would
at all events go down and consult the rector. He had not realized the
fact that his father's resources were already exhausted, and that mere
humanity, to say nothing of filial duty, required him to come to the old
man's assistance, instead of asking him for fresh sacrifices.

"If he has not the money," Sydney said, "no doubt he can help me to
raise it. It will be an excellent investment of our joint credit, and a
very good thing for us both."

So he telegraphed to Angleford--

"I am going to contest a borough. Must make provision. Shall be with you
by next train."




CHAPTER IV.

FATHER AND SON.


Sydney's telegram reached Angleford at an awkward time. Things had been
going from bad to worse with Mr. Campion, who had never had as much
money as he needed since he paid the last accounts of the Cambridge
tradesmen. In the vain hope that matters would mend by and by--though he
did not form any precise idea as to how the improvement would take
place--he had been meeting each engagement as it came to maturity by
entering on another still more onerous. After stripping himself of all
his household treasures that could be converted into money, he had
pledged his insurance policy, his professional and private income, and
at last even his furniture; and he was now in very deep waters.

A great change had come over him. At sixty, when Sydney took his degree,
he was still handsome and upright, buoyant with hope and energy. At
sixty-six he was broken, weak, and disheartened. To his wife and
daughter, indeed, he was always the same cheerful, gentle, sanguine man,
full of courtesy and consideration. In the village he was more beloved
than ever, because there was scarcely a man or woman who was not
familiar with the nature and extent of his troubles. In a country parish
the affairs of the parson, especially when they do not prosper, are apt
to become the affairs of the congregation as well. Who should know
better than a man's butcher and baker when the supply of ready money
runs short, when one month would be more convenient than another for the
settlement of a bill, or when the half-year's stipend has been
forestalled and appropriated long before it fell due?

However great his trouble, the rector had generally contrived to put a
good face on things. He considered his difficulties as entirely the
result of his own improvidence, and rejoiced to think that Sydney's
position was assured, no matter what might happen to himself. Yet often
in the silence of the night he would toss upon his restless bed, or vex
his soul with complicated accounts in the privacy of his study, and none
but the two faithful women who lived with him suspected what he suffered
in his weakest moments.

He had come to lean more and more constantly on the companionship of
Lettice. Mrs. Campion had never been the kind of woman to whom a man
looks for strength or consolation, and when she condoled with her
husband he usually felt himself twice as miserable as before. Some wives
have a way of making their condolences sound like reproaches; and they
may be none the less loving wives for that. Mrs. Campion sincerely loved
her husband, but she never thoroughly understood him.

When the boy arrived with Sydney's telegram, Lettice intercepted him at
the door. She was accustomed to keep watch over everything that entered
the house, and saved her father a great deal of trouble by reading his
letters, and, if need be, by answering them. What he would have done
without her, he was wont to aver, nobody could tell.

Time had dealt gently with Lettice, in spite of her anxieties, in spite
of that passionate revolt against fate which from time to time had
shaken her very soul. She was nearly five-and-twenty, and she certainly
looked no more then twenty-one. The sweet country air had preserved the
delicate freshness of her complexion: her dark grey eyes were clear, her
white brow unlined by trouble, her rippling brown hair shining and
abundant. Her slender hands were a little tanned--the only sign that
country life had laid upon her--because she was never very careful about
wearing gloves when she worked in the garden; but neither tan nor
freckle ever appeared upon her face, the bloom of which was tender and
refined as that of a briar-rose. The old wistful look of her sweet eyes
remained unchanged, but the mouth was sadder in repose than it had been
when she was a child. When she smiled, however, there could not have
been a brighter face.

Notwithstanding this touch of sadness on her lips, and a faint shadow of
thought on the clear fine brows, the face of Lettice was noticeable for
its tranquillity. No storm of passion had ever troubled those
translucent eyes: patience sat there, patience and reflection; emotion
waited its turn. One could not doubt her capabilities of feeling; but,
in spite of her four-and-twenty years, the depths of her heart had never
yet been stirred. She had lived a somewhat restricted life, and there
was yet very much for her to experience and to learn. Who would be her
teacher? For Lettice was not the woman to go ignorant of life's fullest
bliss and deepest sorrow to the grave.

She looked particularly slender and youthful as she stood that day at
the hall window when Sydney's telegram arrived. She had a double reason
for keeping guard in the hall and glancing nervously down the
carriage-drive that led from the main road to the rectory front.
Half-an-hour before, a hard-featured man had swaggered up the avenue,
fired off a volley of defiance on the knocker, and demanded to see Mr.
Campion.

"What do you want?" said Lettice, who had opened the door and stood
boldly facing him.

"I want to see the parson. At once, miss, if you please."

"Perhaps I can do what is necessary, if you will tell me what your
business is. You cannot see my father."

"Oh," said the man, with a little more respect. "You are his daughter,
are you? Well, if you can do the needful I am sure I have no objection.
Three hundred and twenty pound seventeen-and-six"--here he took out a
stamped paper and showed it to Lettice. "That's the figure, miss, and if
you'll oblige with coin--cheques and promises being equally
inconvenient--I don't mind waiting five minutes to accommodate a lady."

"We have not the money in the house," answered Lettice, who had been
reading the formidable document, without quite understanding what it
meant.

"Ah, that's a pity," said the man. "But I didn't expect it, so I ain't
disappointed."

"It shall be sent to you. I will see that you have it--within a week
from this date--only go away now, for my father is unwell."

"Very sorry, miss, but I can't go without the money. This business won't
wait any longer. The coin or the sticks--those are my orders, and that's
my notion of what is fair and right."

"The sticks?" said Lettice faintly.

"The goods--the furniture. This paper is a bill of sale, and as the
reverend gentleman doesn't find it convenient to pay, why, of course, my
principal is bound to realize the security. Now, miss, am I to see the
gentleman, or am I not?"

"Oh no," said Lettice, "it is useless."

"Then what I am going to do," said the man, "is this. I am going to get
the vans, and fetch the goods right away. I may be back this afternoon,
or I may be back to-morrow morning; but you take my advice, miss. Talk
it over with the old gentleman, and raise the money somehow, for it
really would go against me to have to sell you up. I'm to be heard of at
the 'Chequers,' miss--William Joskins, at your service."

Then he had gone away, and left her alone, and she stood looking through
the window at the dreary prospect--thinking, and thinking, and unable to
see any light in the darkness.

One thing, at all events, she must do; a message must be sent to Sydney.
It would not be just, either to him or to his father, that the extent of
the disaster should be any longer concealed. She had just arrived at
this determination, and was turning away to write the telegram, when the
messenger from the post-office made his appearance.

In five minutes all the house was astir. A visit from Sydney was a rare
occurrence, and he must be treated royally, as though he were a king
condescending to quarter himself on his loyal subjects--which indeed, he
was. When Lettice went to tell her father the news she found him seated
by the fire, pondering gloomily on what the immediate future might have
in store for him; but as soon as she showed him Sydney's telegram he
sprang to his feet, with straightened body and brightly shining eyes. In
one moment he had passed from despondency to the height of exultation.

"Two o'clock," he said, looking at his watch, "and he will be here at
five! Dinner must be ready for him by six; and you will take care,
Lettice, that everything is prepared as you know he would like to have
it. Going into Parliament, is he? Yes, I have always told you that he
would. He is a born orator, child; he will serve his country
brilliantly--not for place, nor for corrupt motives of any kind, but as
a patriot and a Christian, to whom duty is the law of his nature."

"Yes, papa. And you will be satisfied when he is a member of
Parliament?"

"So long as Sydney lives, my dear, I know that he will grow in favor
with God and man; and so long as I live, I shall watch his course with
undiminished joy and satisfaction. What else have we left to live for?
Wife!" said the rector, as Mrs. Campion entered the room, "do you know
that our boy is to dine with us to-night?"

"Yes, Lawrence, I have seen his telegram; and Mollie is doing all she
can at short notice. It will not be the kind of dinner I should like to
put before him; but times are changed with us--sadly changed! I hope he
will not miss the plate, Lawrence; and as for wine and dessert----"

"Oh, mother dear," said Lettice, interrupting, "I quite forgot to tell
you about my letter this morning. Look here! It contained a cheque for
ten pounds, for that article of mine in the _Decade_. I mean to go into
Dorminster, and get one or two things we shall be wanting, and I shall
probably drive back in Sydney's cab. So you can leave the wine and
dessert to me. And, mother dear, be sure you put on your silver-grey
poplin, with the Mechlin cap. Nothing suits you half as well!"

Lettice's earnings had sufficed for some years past for her dress and
personal expenses; but latterly she had contrived to have a fair margin
left for such emergencies as that which had now arisen. She was more
than thanked by the gleam of love which lightened the eyes of her
parents as she spoke. Even though Sydney was coming, she thought, that
smile at any rate was all for her.

So she went into the town and made her purchases, and waited at the
station, shivering in the cold March wind, for Sydney's train.

How much should she tell him to begin with? Or should she say nothing
till after dinner? How would he take it? How would it affect him? And
suppose for a moment that he had to choose between getting into
Parliament and rescuing his father from ruin?

Clearly as she saw the worst sides of Sydney's character, yet she loved
him well, and was proud of him. How often she had yearned for tenderness
in the days gone by! What excuses she had framed for him in her own
heart, when he seemed to forget their existence at Angleford for months
together! And now, when she had this terrible news to tell him, was it
not possible that his heart would be softened by the blow, and that good
would come for all of them out of this menaced evil? What a happy place
the old Rectory might be if her father's mind were set at rest again,
and Sydney would come down and stay with them from time to time!

The train was at the platform before Lettice had decided what to do.
Sydney looked rather surprised to see her, but gave her his cheek to
kiss, and hurried her off to the cab stand.

"What brought you here?" he said. "How cold you are! All well at home?"

"Yes, they are well. But, oh, Sydney, they are growing old?"

"Growing old, child? Why, of course they are. We must expect it. Do you
mean they look older than they are?"

"Yes--older, and--and more----"

"Well?"

He looked at her sharply, for she could not quite command her voice, and
left the sentence unfinished. Then Sydney had an uncomfortable feeling.
He saw that there was something amiss, but did not care at the moment to
insist on further confidences. No doubt he would hear all that there was
to be said by and by. Meanwhile he turned the conversation, and soon
contrived to interest her, so that they reached the Rectory in excellent
spirits. All that day poor Lettice alternated between despair and giddy
lightness of heart.

So the hero came home and was feasted, and his father and mother did
obeisance to him, and even he for an hour or two thought it good that he
should now and then renew his contract with the earth from which he
sprang, and remember the chains of duty and affection which bound him to
the past, instead of dwelling constantly in the present and the future.

Throughout dinner, and at dessert, and as they drank the wine which
Lettice had provided, Sydney spoke of his position and prospects,
dazzling those who listened to him with his pictures of victory at
Dormer, of Conservative triumphs all along the line, of Ministerial
favor for himself, of "Office--why not?--within a twelvemonth." It would
have been treason for any of his audience to doubt that all these good
things would come to pass. If Lettice felt that there was a skeleton at
the feast, her father at any rate had forgotten its existence. Or,
rather, he saw deliverance at hand. The crisis of his boy's fortune had
arrived; and, if Sydney triumphed, nothing that could happen to Sydney's
father could rob Mr. Campion of his joy.

At last the women left the room, and Sydney proceeded to tell his father
what he wanted. He must return to town by the first train in the
morning, having made an appointment with Mr. Maltman for two o'clock. Of
course he meant to contest Dormer; but it was desirable that he should
know for certain that he could raise five hundred pounds within a week,
to supplement his own narrow means.

His face fell a little when his father confessed--as though it were
clearly a matter for shame and remorse--that he could not so much as
draw a cheque for twenty pounds. But, in fact, he was not surprised.
Recklessly as he had abstained from inquiring into the old man's affairs
since Lettice spoke to him in London two years ago, he had taken it for
granted that there were difficulties of some kind; and men in
difficulties do not keep large balances at their bankers'.

"Well, father," he said, "I am sorry for that. Yes--it certainly makes
the thing rather hard for me. I hoped you might have seen me fairly
launched on my career; and then, you know, if the worst came to the
worst, I could soon have repaid you what you advanced. Well, what I
suggest is this. I can probably borrow the money with your assistance,
and I want to know what security we could offer between us for the
loan."

Mr. Campion looked mournfully at his son, but he was not ready with a
reply.

"You see," said Sydney, "it would never do for me to miss this chance.
Everything depends upon it, and I was bound to refuse Pynsent's offer of
the money. But if you have something that we can lodge as security----"

Mr. Campion shook his head. The look of distress that came upon his face
might have softened Sydney's heart, if he had been less intent on his
object.

"There will be an insurance policy I suppose?"

"No, my boy! The fact is, I was obliged to assign it a few years ago, to
cover a former engagement."

"Dear me!" said Sydney, in a tone of vexation, "what a nuisance! I am
afraid our signatures alone would hardly suffice. A bill of sale is out
of the question, for that would have to be registered."

Something in the old man's appearance, as he sank back in his chair and
wrung his hands, struck Sydney with a sudden conviction. He sprang to
his feet, and came close to his father's side, standing over him in what
looked almost like an attitude of menace.

"Good heaven!" he cried. "Don't tell me that it has gone so far as
that!"

The door opened, and Lettice stood before them, with pale cheeks and
glistening eyes. She had guessed what would come of their conversation,
and had held herself in readiness to intervene.

Sydney turned upon her at once.

"You," he said, as deliberate now as he had been excited a minute
before, "you, with your fine head for business, will doubtless know as
much about this as anybody. Has my father given a bill of sale on his
furniture?"

"He has," said Lettice.

"When?"

"Months ago. I must have known it, for I read all his correspondence;
but I hardly knew what a bill of sale meant. And Sydney," she continued,
laying her hand on his arm, and whispering so that her father should not
hear, "it may be only a threat, but a man was here this morning, who
said he should come to-morrow and take the things away."

When he heard this, Sydney lost his self-command, and spoke certain
words for which he never quite forgave himself. No doubt the blow was a
heavy one, and he realized immediately all that it implied. But he did
not foresee the effect of the harsh and bitter words which he flung at
his father and sister, charging them with reckless extravagance, and
declaring that their selfishness had ruined his whole career.

Lettice was stung to the quick, not so much by her brother's unjust
accusations as by the suffering which they inflicted on her father. His
childishness had increased upon him so much of late that he was in
truth, at this moment, more like a boy under correction than a father in
presence of his children. He buried his face in his hands, and Lettice
heard a piteous groan.

Then she stood beside him, laid her arm upon his neck, and faced Sydney
with indignant eyes.

"Look!" she said. "This is your work. Can you not see and understand?
You accuse him of selfishness--him, whose life has been one long
sacrifice for you! I tell you, Sydney, that your cruel neglect, your
ingrained love of self, have dragged our father down to this. He gave
you all that you have, and made you all that you are, and when you
should have come to his succor, and secured for him a happy old age, you
have left him all these years to struggle with the poverty to which you
reduced him. He never murmured--he will never blame you as long as he
lives--he is as proud of you to-day as he was ten years ago--and you
dare, you _dare_ to reproach him!"

Lettice ended in magnificent wrath; and, then, being a woman after all,
she knelt by her father's side and burst into tears.

If Sydney's pride had not got the better of him he would have owned the
justice of her words, and all might have been well. Instead of that, he
went to his room, brooding upon his misfortune, and soothing his wounded
feelings in an intense self-pity.

And next morning, when he came remorsefully to his father's bedside,
intending to assure him that he would make it the first business of his
life to rescue him from his difficulties, he found him rescued indeed,
with placid face and silent heart, over which the cares of earth had no
further dominion.




CHAPTER V.

SEVERANCE.


The rector's death was a terrible shock to Sydney. For a time his
remorse for his own conduct was very great, and it bore good fruit in a
perceptible softening of his over-confident manner and a more distinct
show of consideration for his mother and sister. Little by little he
drew from Lettice the story of her past anxieties, of his father's
efforts and privations, of his mother's suffering at the loss of
luxuries to which she had always been accustomed--suffering silently
borne because it was borne for Sydney. Lettice spared him as far as she
could; but there was much that she was obliged to tell, as she had been
for so long the depositary of her father's secrets and his cares.
Man-like, Sydney showed his sorrow by exceeding sharpness of tone.

"Why did you not write to me? Why was I never told?"

"I told you as much as I dared, when I was in London."

"As much as you _dared_?"

"Dear father would not let me tell very much. He laid his commands on me
to say nothing."

"You should have disobeyed him," said Sydney marching up and down the
darkened study, in which this conference took place. "It was your duty
to have disobeyed him, for his own good----"

"Oh, Sydney, how can you talk to me of duty?" said Lettice, with a sob.
"Why did you not come and see for yourself? Why did you stay away so
long?"

The reproach cut deeper than she knew. "I thought I was acting for the
best," said the young man, half defiantly, half apologetically. "I did
what it was the desire of his heart that I should do--But you, you were
at home; you saw it all, and you should have told me, Lettice."

"I did try," she answered meekly, "but it was not very easy to make you
listen."

In other circumstances he would, perhaps, have retorted angrily; and
Lettice felt that it said much for the depth of his sorrow for the past
that he did not carry his self-defence any further. By and by he paused
in his agitated walk up and down the room, with head bent and hands
plunged deep into his pockets. After two or three moments' silence,
Lettice crept up to him and put her hand within his arm.

"Forgive me, Sydney, I spoke too bitterly; but it has been very hard
sometimes."

"I would have helped if I had known," said Sydney gloomily.

"I know you would, dear. And he always knew it, too. That was the reason
why he told me to keep silence--for fear of hampering you in your
career. He has often said to me that he wished to keep the knowledge of
his difficulties from you, because he knew you would be generous and
kind----"

Tears choked her voice. Her brother, who had hitherto been quite
unresponsive to her caresses, put out his right hand and stroked the
trembling fingers that rested on his left arm. He was leaning against
the old oak table, where his father's books and papers had stood for so
many years; and some remembrances of bygone days when he and Lettice, as
boy and girl, sat together with their grammars and lexicons at that very
place, occurred a little dimly to his mind. But what was a dim memory to
him was very clear and distinct to Lettice.

"Oh, Sydney, do you remember how we used to work here with father?" she
broke out. "How many hours we spent here together--reading the same
books, thinking the same thoughts--and now we seem so divided, so very
far apart! You have not quite forgotten those old days, have you?"

"No, I have not forgotten them," said Sydney, in a rather unsteady
voice. Poor Lettice! She had counted for very little in his life for the
last few years, and yet, as she reminded him, what companions they had
been before he went to Cambridge! A suddenly roused instinct of
compassion and protection caused him to put his arm round her and to
speak with unusual tenderness.

"I won't forget those old times, Lettice. Perhaps we shall be able to
see more of each other by and bye than we have done lately. You have
been a good girl, never wanting any change or amusement all these years;
but I'll do my best to look after you now."

"I began to think you did not care for any of us, Sydney."

"Nonsense," said Sydney, and he kissed her forehead affectionately
before he left the study, where, indeed, he felt that he had stayed a
little too long, and given Lettice an unusual advantage over him. He was
not destitute of natural affections, but they had so long been obscured
by the mists of selfishness that he found it difficult to let them
appear--and more difficult with his sister than with his mother. Lettice
seemed to him to exact too much, to be too intense in feeling, too
critical in observation. He was fond of her, but she was not at all his
ideal woman--if he had one. Sydney's preference was for what he called
"a womanly woman": not one who knew Greek.

He made a brave and manly effort to wind up his father's affairs and pay
his outstanding debts. He was so far stirred out of himself that it
hardly occurred to his mind that a slur would be left on him if these
debts were left unpaid: his strongest motive just now was the sense of
right and wrong, and he knew, too late, that it was right for him to
take up the load which his own acts had made so heavy.

The rector had died absolutely penniless. His insurance policy, his
furniture, the whole of his personal effects, barely sufficed to cover
the money he had borrowed. What Sydney did was to procure the means of
discharging at once all the household bills, and the expenses connected
with the funeral.

"And now," he said to Lettice, when the last of these dues had been paid
off and they took their last stroll together through the already half
dismantled rooms of the desolate old Rectory, "I feel more of a man than
I have felt since that terrible night, and I want to get back to my
work."

"I am afraid you will have to work very hard, dear!" said Lettice,
laying her hand on his arm, rather timidly. How she still yearned for
the full measure of mutual confidence and sympathy!

"Hard work will be good for me," he said, his keen blue eyes lighting up
as if with ardor for the fray. "I shall soon wipe off old scores, and
there's nothing like knowing you have only yourself to look to. My
practice, you know, is pretty good already, and it will be very good by
and bye."

"I am so glad!"

"Yes. And, of course, you must never have any anxiety about mother and
yourself. I shall see to all that. You are going to stay with the
Grahams for a while, so I can come over one day and discuss it. I don't
suppose I shall ever marry, but whether I do or not, I shall always set
apart a certain sum for mother and you."

"I have been thinking about the future," said Lettice, quietly. She
always spoke in a low, musical voice, without gesture, but not without
animation, producing on those who heard her the impression that she had
formed her opinions beforehand, and was deliberate in stating them. "Do
you know, Sydney, that I can earn a very respectable income?"

"Earn an income! You!" he said, with a wrinkle in his forehead, and a
curl in his nostrils. "I will not hear of such a thing. I cannot have my
sister a dependent in other people's houses--a humble governess or
companion. How could you dream of it!"

"I have not dreamed of that," said Lettice. "I do not think I should
like it myself. I simply stay at home and write. I earned seventy pounds
last year, and Mr. Graham says I could almost certainly earn twice as
much if I were living in London."

"Why was I not told of this?" said Sydney, with an air of vexation.
"What do you write?"

"Essays, and now and then a review, and little stories."

"Little stories--ouf!" he muttered, in evident disgust. "You don't put
your name to these things!"

"I did to one article, last March, in _The Decade_."

"That is Graham's magazine, and I daresay Graham asked you to sign your
name. When I see him I shall tell him it was done without sufficient
consideration."

"All articles are signed in _The Decade_," said Lettice. She did not
think it worth while to mention that Graham had written her a very
flattering letter about her article, telling her that it had attracted
notice--that the critics said she had a style of her own, and was likely
to make her mark. The letter had reached her on the morning before her
father's death, and she had found but a brief satisfaction in it at the
time.

"I think you had better not say anything to Mr. Graham," she continued.
"They have both been very kind, and we shall not have too many friends
in London."

"Why do you want to live in London?"

"I think I should like it, and mother would like it too. You know she
has fifty pounds a year of her own, and if what Mr. Graham says is right
we shall be able to live very comfortably."

"I can't say I like this writing for a living," he said.

"I suppose we cannot have everything as we like it. And, besides, I do
like it. It is congenial work, and it makes me feel independent."

"It is not always good for women to be independent. It is dangerous."

She laughed--a pleasant little rallying laugh.

"I hope you will not be shocked," she said. "I have set my heart on
being perfectly independent of you and everybody else."

He saw that she would have her way, and let the subject drop.

A few weeks afterwards, Lettice and her mother had packed up their
belongings and went to London. The Grahams were delighted to have them,
for Lettice was a great favorite with both. James Graham was a literary
man of good standing, who, in addition to editing _The Decade_, wrote
for one of the weekly papers, and reviewed books in his special lines
for one of the dailies. By dint of hard work, and carefully nursing his
connection, he contrived to make a living; and that was all. Literary
work is not well paid as a rule. There is fair pay to be had on the
staff of the best daily papers, but that kind of work requires a special
aptitude. It requires, in particular, a supple and indifferent mind,
ready to take its cue from other people, with the art of representing
things from day to day not exactly as they are, but as an editor or
paymaster wants them to appear. If we suffered our journalists to sign
their articles, they would probably write better, with more self-respect
and a higher sense of responsibility; they would become stronger in
themselves, and would be more influential with their readers. As it is,
few men with vigorous and original minds can endure beyond a year or two
of political leader-writing.

Graham had tried it, and the ordeal was too difficult for him. Now he
had a greater scope for his abilities, and less money for his pains.

Clara Graham was the daughter of a solicitor in Angleford, and had known
Lettice Campion from childhood. She was a pretty woman, thoroughly
good-hearted, with tastes and powers somewhat in advance of her
education. Perhaps she stood a little in awe of Lettice, and wondered
occasionally whether her husband considered a woman who knew Latin and
Greek, and wrote clever articles in _The Decade_, superior to one who
had no such accomplishments, though she might be prettier, and the
mother of his children, and even the darner of his stockings. But Clara
was not without wits, so she did not propound questions of that sort to
her husband; she reserved them for her own torment, and then expiated
her jealousy by being kinder to Lettice than ever.

Lettice's plans were far more fixed and decided than Sydney knew. She
had corresponded very fully and frankly with the Grahams on the subject,
and Mr. Graham was already looking about for a place where she could set
up her household gods. It was no use to consult Mrs. Campion on the
subject. Her husband's death had thrown her into a state of mental
torpor which seemed at first to border upon imbecility; and although she
recovered to some extent from the shock, her health had been too much
shaken to admit of complete recovery. Thenceforward she was an invalid
and an old woman, who had abnegated her will in favor of her daughter's,
and asked for nothing better than to be governed as well as cared for.
The change was a painful one to Lettice, but practically it left her
freer than ever, for her mother wanted little companionship, and was
quite as happy with the maid that Lettice had brought from Angleford as
with Lettice herself. The visit to the Grahams was an excellent thing
both for Mrs. Campion and for her daughter. Clara managed to win the old
lady's heart, and so relieved her friend of much of her anxiety. The
relief came not a moment too soon, for the long strain to which Lettice
had been subjected began to tell upon her and she was sorely in need of
rest. The last three or four years had been a time of almost incessant
worry to her. She had literally had the care of the household on her
shoulders, and it had needed both courage and endurance of no ordinary
kind to enable her to discharge her task without abandoning that inner
and intellectual life which had become so indispensable to her
well-being. The sudden death of her father was a paralyzing blow, but
the care exacted from her by her mother had saved her from the physical
collapse which it might have brought about. Now, when the necessity for
immediate exertion had passed away, the reaction was very great, and it
was fortunate that she had at this crisis the bracing companionship of
James Graham, and Clara's friendly and stimulating acerbities.

Lettice had reached the age of five and twenty without experiencing
either love, or intimate friendship, or intellectual sympathy. She had
had neither of those two things which a woman, and especially an
intellectual woman, constantly craves, and in the absence of which she
cannot be happy. Either of the two may suffice for happiness, both
together would satisfy her completely, but the woman who has not one or
the other is a stranger to content. The nature of a woman requires
either equality of friendship, a free exchange of confidence, trust and
respect--having which, she can put up with a good deal of apparent
coldness and dryness of heart in her friend; or else she wants the
contrasted savor of life, caressing words, demonstrations of tenderness,
amenities and attentions, which keep her heart at rest even if they do
not satisfy her whole nature. If she gets neither of these things the
love or friendship never wakes, or, having been aroused, it dies of
inanition.

So it was with Lettice. The one oasis in the wilderness of her existence
had been the aftermath of love which sprang up between her and her
father in the last few years, when she felt him depending upon her,
confiding and trusting in her, and when she had a voice in the shaping
of his life. But even this love, unsurpassable in its tenderness, was
only as a faint shadow in a thirsty land. Such as it was, she had lost
it, and the place which it had occupied was an aching void.

The one desire left to her at present was to become an absolutely
independent woman. This meant that she should work hard for her living
in her own way, and that she should do what seemed good and pleasant to
her, because it seemed good and pleasant, not because it was the way of
the world, or the way of a house, or the routine of a relative or an
employer. It meant that she should keep her mother under her own eye, in
comfort and decency, not lodged with strangers to mope out her life in
dreary solitude. It meant also that she should not be a burden on
Sydney--or, in plain terms, that she should not take Sydney's money,
either for herself or her mother.

Indeed, the consciousness that she had to work for another, and to be
her protection and support, was not only bracing but cheering in its
effects, and Lettice now turned towards her writing-table with an energy
which had been wanting when her efforts were for herself alone.

The Rectory household had been reduced as much as possible during the
last few months, and only two servants remained at the time of the
rector's death: one, an elderly cook, who was content for the love of
"Miss Lettice" to do the work of a general servant; and a young girl of
eighteen, who had lived at the Rectory and been trained for domestic
service under Mrs. Campion's eye ever since her parents' death, which
had occurred when she was fifteen years of age. Emily, or Milly
Harrington, as she was generally called, was a quick, clever girl, very
neat-handed and fairly industrious; and it seemed to Lettice, when she
decided upon going to London, that she could not do better than ask
Milly to go too. The girl's great blue eyes opened with a flash of
positive rapture. "Go with you to London? Oh, Miss Lettice!"

"You would like it, Milly?" said Lettice, wondering at her excitement,
and thinking that she had never before noticed how pretty Millie
Harrington had grown of late.

"Oh, of all things in the world, miss, I've wanted to go to London!"
said Milly, flushing all over her face through the clear white skin
which was one of her especial beauties. There was very little trace of
commonness in Milly's good looks. Three years of life at the Rectory had
refined her appearance, as also her manners and ways of speech; and
Lettice thought that it would be far pleasanter to keep Milly about her
than to go through the agonies of a succession of pert London girls. Yet
something in Milly's eagerness to go, as well as the girl's fresh,
innocent, country air, troubled her with a vague sense of anxiety. Was
not London said to be a place of temptation for inexperienced country
girls? Could she keep Milly safe and innocent if she took her away from
Angleford?

"You would have all the work of the house to do, and to look after Mrs.
Campion a little as well," she said seeking to put her vague anxiety
into the form of a warning or an objection. But Milly only smiled.

"I'm very strong, Miss Lettice. I am sure I can do all that you want.
And I should like to go to London with you. One hears such fine tales of
London--and I don't want to leave mistress and you." Though this was
evidently an afterthought.

"You will see very little of London, Milly; I shall live in a very quiet
part," said Lettice. "And I shall want you to be very good and steady,
and take care of my mother when I am busy. I shall have to work hard
now, you know; quite as hard as you."

Milly looked up quickly; there was inquiry in her eyes. But she answered
only by protestations of good behavior and repeated desires to go with
her young mistress; and Lettice gave her a promise, subject to the
consent of Milly's grandmother, who lived at Birchmead, that she would
take the girl with her when she went away.

Old Mrs. Harrington had no objection at all to Milly's going to London.
"Indeed, Miss Lettice," she said, "I'm only too glad to think of your
looking after her, for Milly's not got much sense, I'm afraid, although
she's a woman grown."

"I always thought her unusually clever and sensible," said Lettice, in
some surprise.

"Clever, miss, she always was, but sensible's a different affair. Her
head's filled with foolishness, all along of her reading story books, I
tell her; and she's got an idea that her pretty face will bring her a
rich husband, and I don't know what beside. I shall be obliged to you,
miss, if you'll kindly keep a sharp eye and a tight hand over Milly. Not
but what she's a good kind-hearted girl," said the old woman, relenting
a little, as she saw a rather startled expression on Miss Campion's
face, "and I don't think there's any harm in her, but girls are always
better for being looked after, that is all."

"I'll try to take care of Milly," said Lettice, as she rose to go. "But
my care will be of very little use if she does not take care of
herself."

She was fated on the same day to hear a remonstrance from the doctor's
wife, Mrs. Budworth, on the subject of her choice of a servant. Mrs.
Budworth was a noted busybody, who knew everybody's business better than
the rest of the world.

"Oh, Lettice, dear," she said, "I do hope it's not true that you are
going to take that silly girl, Milly Harrington, up to London with you."

"Why not? You cannot know anything against her," said Lettice, who was
becoming a little angry.

"Well, perhaps not--only she is so very pretty, and London is so full of
temptations for a pretty girl of that class!"

"We shall live so quietly that she will have no more temptations there
than here, Mrs. Budworth."

"You can't tell that, my dear--once you get a girl away from her friends
and relations. However, she has only her old grandmother to fall back
on, and she seems a well-meaning girl enough, and perhaps she won't be
considered so pretty in London as she has the name of being here. I hope
she will keep straight, I'm sure; it would be such a worry to you,
Lettice, if anything went wrong."

"Poor Milly!" said Lettice to herself, as she walked home in a state of
blazing indignation; "how easily that woman would undermine your
reputation--or that of anybody else! Milly is a dear, good little girl;
and as for her being so pretty--well, it is not her fault, and I don't
see why it should be her misfortune! I will look well after her when we
are in London, and it will be for her good, I believe, to stay with us.
What an absurd fuss to make about such a trifle!"

So she dismissed the matter from her mind, remembering it only from time
to time when she was making her new household arrangements, and
carefully planning to keep Milly out of every possible danger.

But dangers are oftener from within than from without. While Lettice
walked homeward after her talk with Mrs. Budworth, Milly Harrington had
locked herself into her own room, and was experimenting with her pretty
curling hair before the looking-glass. She wanted to see herself with a
"fringe"--a thing that was strictly forbidden at the Rectory, and she
had brushed the soft little curls that were generally hidden beneath her
cap well over her forehead. Then she stood and gazed at the reflection
of the fair locks, the large blue eyes, the graceful neck and shoulders.
"I suppose I look pretty," she was saying to herself. "I've been told so
often enough. Mr. Sydney thought so when he was here at Christmas, I'm
sure of that. This time, of course, he was so taken up with his father's
death, and other things, that he never noticed me. But I shall see him
again."

A faint color mantled in her cheeks, and her eyes began to sparkle.

"Beauty's a great power, I've heard," she said to herself, still looking
at that fair image in the glass. "There's no knowing what I mayn't do if
I meet the right person. And one meets nobody in Angleford. In
London--things may be different."

Different, indeed, but not as poor Milly fancied the difference.

And then she brushed back her curls, and fastened up her black dress,
and tied a clean muslin apron round her trim little figure before going
downstairs; and when she brought in the tea-tray that afternoon, Lettice
looked at her with pleasure and admiration, and thought how sweet and
good a girl she was, and how she had won the Prayer-Book prize at the
Diocesan Inspector's examination, and of the praise that the rector had
given her for her well-written papers at the Confirmation Class, and of
her own kindly and earnest teaching of all things that were good in
Lettice's eyes; and she decided that Mrs. Harrington and Mrs. Budworth
were mere croakers, and that poor Milly would never come to harm.




BOOK II.

CHANGE.

    "Yet the twin habit of that early time
      Lingered for long about the heart and tongue;
    We had been natives of one happy clime,
      And its dear accent to our utterance clung.

    "Till the dire years whose awful name is Change
      Had grasped our souls, still yearning in divorce,
    And pitiless shaped them in two forms that range--
      Two elements which sever their life's course."

    George Eliot.




CHAPTER VI.

NEW BEGINNINGS.


"Poor dear Lettice! how she must have suffered!" said Clara Graham.

"Less than you suppose," rejoined her husband.

"Jim, what do you mean? You are very hard-hearted."

"No, I'm not! I'm only practical. Your friend, Miss Campion, has been a
source of lamentation and woe to you ever since I made your
acquaintance. According to you, she was always being sacrificed to that
intolerable prig of a brother of hers. _Then_ she was immolated on the
altar of her father's money difficulties and her mother's ill-health.
Now she has got a fair field, and can live where she likes and exercise
her talents as she pleases; and as I can be as unfeeling as I like in
the bosom of my family, I will at once acknowledge that I am very glad
the old man's gone."

"I do hope and trust, Jim----"

"That I am not a born fool, my dear?"

"--That you won't say these things to Lettice herself."

"Exactly. That is what I knew you were going to say."

"If it weren't that I am certain you do not mean half you say----"

"I mean all that I say: every word of it. But I'll tell you what, Clara:
I believe that Lettice Campion is a woman of great talent--possibly even
of genius--and that she has never yet been able to give her talents full
play. She has the chance now, and I hope she'll use it."

"Oh, Jim, dear, do you think she is so sure to succeed?"

"If she doesn't, it will be pure cussedness on her part, and nothing
else," said Jim.

Clara reflected that she would tell Lettice what her husband said. She
moved to the window and looked out. She was waiting for her guests,
Lettice and Mrs. Campion, in the soft dusk of a sweet May evening, and
she was a little impatient for their arrival. She had had a comfortable,
nondescript meal, which she called dinner-tea, set ready for them in the
dining-room, and as this room was near the hall-door, she had installed
herself therein, so that she could the more easily watch for her
visitors. Mr. Graham, a tall, thin man, with coal-black beard, deep-set
dark eyes, and marked features, had thrown himself into a great
arm-chair, where he sat buried in the current number of a monthly
magazine. His wife was universally declared to be a very pretty woman,
and she was even more "stylish," as women say, than pretty; for she had
one of those light, graceful figures that give an air of beauty to
everything they wear. For the rest, she had well-cut features, bright
dark eyes, and a very winning smile. A brightly impulsive and
affectionate nature had especially endeared her to Lettice, and this had
never been soured or darkened by her experiences of the outer world,
although, like most people, she had known reverses of fortune and was
not altogether free from care. But her husband loved her, and her three
babies were the most charming children ever seen, and everybody admired
the decorations of her bright little house in Edwardes Square; and what
more could the heart of womankind desire?

"I wonder," she said presently, "whether Sydney will come with them. He
was to meet them at Liverpool Street; and of course I asked him to come
on."

"I would have gone out if you had told me that before," said Mr. Graham,
tersely.

"Why do you dislike Sydney Campion so much, Jim?"

"Dislike? I admire him. I think he is the coming man. He's one of the
most successful persons of my acquaintance. It is just because I feel so
small beside him that I can't stand his company."

"I must repeat, Jim, that if you talk like that to Lettice----"

"Oh, Lettice doesn't adore her precious brother," said Graham,
irreverently. "She knows as well as you and I do that he's a selfish
sort of brute, in spite of his good looks and his gift of the gab. I
say, Clara, when are these folks coming? I'm confoundedly hungry."

"Who's the selfish brute now?" asked Clara, with triumph. "But you won't
be kept waiting long: the cab's stopping at the door, and Sydney hasn't
come."

She flew to the door, to be the first to meet and greet her visitors.
There was not much to be got from Mrs. Campion that evening except
tears--this was evident as soon as she entered the house, leaning on
Lettice's arm; and the best thing was to put her at once to bed, and
delay the evening meal until Lettice was able to leave her. Graham was
quite too good-natured to grumble at a delay for which there was so
valid a reason; for, as he informed his wife, he preferred Miss
Campion's conversation without an accompaniment of groans. He talked
lightly, but his grasp of the hand was so warm, his manner so
sympathetic, when Lettice at last came down, that Clara felt herself
rebuked at having for one moment doubted the real kindliness of his
feeling.

Lettice in her deep mourning looked painfully white and slender in
Clara's eyes; but she spoke cheerfully of her prospects for the future,
as they sat at their evening meal. Sad topics were not broached, and Mr.
Graham set himself to give her all the encouragement in his power.

"And as to where you are to set up your tent," he said, "Clara and I
have seen a cottage on Brook Green that we think would suit you
admirably."

"Where is Brook Green?" asked Lettice, who was almost ignorant of any
save the main thoroughfares of London.

"In the wilds of Hammersmith----"

"West Kensington," put in Clara, rather indignantly.

"Well, West Kensington is only Hammersmith writ fine. It is about ten
minutes' walk from us----"

"Oh, I am glad of that," said Lettice.

"--And it is not, I think, too large or too dear. You must go and look
at it to-morrow, if you can."

"Is there any garden?"

"There is a garden, with trees under which your mother can sit when it
is warm. Clara told me you would like that; and there is a grass-plot--I
won't call it a lawn--where you can let your dog and cat disport
themselves in safety. I am sure you must have brought a dog or a cat
with you, Miss Campion. I never yet knew a young woman from the country
who did not bring a pet animal to town with her."

"Jim, you are very rude," said his wife.

"I shall have to plead guilty," Lettice answered, smiling a little. "I
have left my fair Persian, Fluff, in the care of my maid, Milly, who is
to bring her to London as soon as I can get into my new home."

"Fluff," said Clara, meditatively, "is the creature with a tail as big
as your arm, and a ruff round her neck, and Milly is the pretty little
housemaid; I remember and approve of them both."

The subject of the new house served them until they went upstairs into
Clara's bright little drawing-room, which Graham used to speak of
disrespectfully as his wife's doll's house. It was crowded with pretty
but inexpensive knick-knacks, the profusion of which was rather
bewildering to Lettice, with her more simple tastes. Of one thing she
was quite sure, that she would not, when she furnished her own rooms,
expend much money in droves of delicately-colored china pigs and
elephants, which happened to be in fashion at the time. She also doubted
the expediency of tying up two peacocks' feathers with a yellow ribbon,
and hanging them in solitary glory on the wall flanked by plates of Kaga
ware, at tenpence-halfpenny a-piece. Lettice's taste had been formed by
her father, and was somewhat masculine in its simplicity, and she cared
only for the finer kinds of art, whether in porcelain or painting. But
she was fain to confess that the effect of Clara's decorations was very
pretty, and she wondered at the care and pains which had evidently been
spent on the arrangement of Mrs. Graham's "Liberty rags" and Oriental
ware. When the soft yellow silk curtains were drawn, and a subdued light
fell through the jewelled facets of an Eastern lamp upon the peacock
fans and richly-toned Syrian rugs, and all the other hackneyed
ornamentation by which "artistic" taste is supposed to be shown, Lettice
could not but acknowledge that the room was charming. But her thoughts
flew back instantly to the old study at home, with its solid oak
furniture, its cushioned window-seats, its unfashionable curtains of red
moreen; and in the faint sickness of that memory, it seemed to her that
she could be more comfortable at a deal table, with a kitchen chair set
upon unpolished boards, than in the midst of Clara's pretty novelties.

"You are tired," Mr. Graham said to her, watching her keenly as she sat
down in the chair that he offered her, and let her hands sink languidly
upon her lap. "We won't let you talk too much. Clara is going to see
after her bairns, and I'm going to read the _Pall Mall_. Here's the May
number of _The Decade_: have you seen it?"

She took it with a grateful smile; but she did not intend to read, and
Mr. Graham knew it. He perused his paper diligently, but he was
sufficiently interested in her to know exactly at what point she ceased
to brood and began to glance at the magazine. After a little while, she
became absorbed in its pages; and only when she laid it down at last,
with a half suppressed sigh, did he openly look up to find that her eyes
were full of tears.

"I hope that you discovered something to interest you," he said.

"I was reading a poem," Lettice answered, rather guiltily.

"Oh--Alan Walcott's 'Sorrow'? Very well done, isn't it? but a trifle
morbid, all the same."

"It is very sad. Is he--has he had much trouble?"

"I'm sure I couldn't tell you. Probably not, as he writes about it,"
said Graham, grimly. "He's a pessimist and a bit of a dilletante. If he
would work and believe in himself a little more, I think he might do
great things."

"He is young?"

"Over thirty. He comes to the house sometimes. I daresay you will meet
him before long."

Lettice said nothing. She was not in a mood to enjoy the prospect of
making new acquaintances; but the poem had touched her, and she felt a
slight thrill of interest in its writer.

"Yes," she said, "I shall be pleased to make his acquaintance--some
day." And then the conversation dropped, and Graham understood from her
tone that she was not disposed as yet to meet new faces.

The house on Brook Green proved eminently satisfactory. She agreed to
take it as soon as possible, and for the next few weeks her mind was
occupied with the purchase and arrangement of furniture, and the many
details which belong to the first start in a new career. Although her
tastes differed widely from those of Clara Graham, she found her
friend's advice and assistance infinitely valuable to her; and many were
the expeditions taken together to the Kensington shops to supply
Lettice's requirements. She had not Clara's love for shopping, or
Clara's eagerness for a bargain; but she took pleasure in her visits to
the great London store-houses of beautiful things, and made her
purchases with care and deliberation.

So at the end of June she settled down with her mother in the pleasant
cottage which was thenceforth to be their home. In addition to the new
plenishing, there were in the house a few favorite pieces of furniture
which had been saved from the wreck at Angleford; and Sydney--perhaps as
a sign that he recognized some redeeming features in her desire to be
independent--had made one room look quite imposing with an old-fashioned
bookcase, and a library table and chair. There was a well-established
garden behind the house, with tall box and bay-trees of more than a
generation's growth, and plenty of those old English border plants
without which a garden is scarcely worthy of its name. On the whole,
Lettice felt that she had not made a bad selection out of the million or
so of human habitations which overflow the province of London; and even
Mrs. Campion would occasionally end her lamentations over the past by
admitting that Maple Cottage was "not a workhouse, my dear, where I
might have expected to finish my life."

The widow had a fixed idea about the troubles which had fallen upon her.
She would talk now and then of the "shameful robberies" which had broken
her husband's heart, and declare that sooner or later the miscreants
would be discovered, and restitution would be made, and they would "all
end their days in peace." As for Sydney, he was still her hero of
heroes, who had come to their rescue when their natural protector was
done to death, and whose elevation to the woolsack might be expected at
any moment.

Lettice's friends, the Grahams, had naturally left her almost
undisturbed during her visit to them, so far as invited guests were
concerned. Nevertheless, she casually met several of Mr. Graham's
literary acquaintances, and he took care to introduce her to one or two
editors and publishers whom he thought likely to be useful to her. James
Graham had plenty of tact; he knew just what to say about Miss Campion,
without saying too much, and he contrived to leave an impression in the
minds of those to whom he spoke that it might be rather difficult to
make this young woman sit down and write, but decidedly worth their
while to do it if they could.

"Now I have thrown in the seeds," Graham said to her before she left
Edwardes Square, "and by the time you want to see them the blades will
be springing up. From what you have told me I should say that you have
quite enough to do in the next three months. There is that article for
me, and the translation of Feuerbach, and the Ouf stories."

This reminiscence of Sydney's criticism made Lettice laugh--she was
beginning to laugh again--and Graham's forecast of her future as a woman
of letters put her into a cheerful and hopeful mood.

The summer passed away, and the autumn, and when Lettice lighted her
first study fire, one cold day at the end of October, she could look
forward to the coming winter without misgiving. In four months she had
done fifty pounds' worth of work, and she had commissions which would
keep her busy for six months more, and would yield at least twice as
much money. Mr. Graham's seeds were beginning to send up their blades;
and, in short, Lettice was in a very fair way of earning not only a
living, but also a good literary repute.

One call, indeed, was made upon her resources in a very unexpected
manner. She had put by four five-pound notes of clear saving--it is at
such moments that our unexpected liabilities are wont to find us
out--and she was just congratulating herself on that first achievement
in the art of domestic thrift when her maid Milly knocked at her door,
and announced a visitor.

"Please, miss, here is Mrs. Bundlecombe of Thorley!"

Mrs. Bundlecombe was a bookseller in her own right, in a village some
three miles from Angleford. Her husband had died four years before Mr.
Campion, and his widow made an effort to carry on the business. The
rector in his palmy days had had many dealings with Mr. Bundlecombe, who
was of some note in the world as a collector of second-hand books; but,
as Lettice had no reason to think that he had bought anything of Mrs.
Bundlecombe personally, she could not imagine what the object of this
visit might be.

"Did she say what her business was, Milly?"

"No, miss. Only she said she had heard you were living here, and she
would like to see you, please."

Milly's relations had lived in Thorley. Thus she knew Mrs. Bundlecombe
by sight, and, being somewhat inquisitive by nature, she had already
tried to draw the visitor into conversation, but without success.

"Show her in," said Lettice, after a moment's pause. It was pleasant,
after all, to meet a "kent face" in London solitudes, and she felt quite
kindly towards Mrs. Bundlecombe, whom she had sometimes seen over the
counter in her shop at Thorley. So she received her with gentle
cordiality.

Mrs. Bundlecombe showed symptoms of embarrassment at the quiet
friendliness of Lettice's manners. She was not a person of aristocratic
appearance, for she was short and very stout, and florid into the
bargain; but her broad face was both shrewd and kindly, and her grey
eyes were observant and good-humored. Her grey hair was arranged in
three flat curls, fastened with small black combs on each side of her
face, which was rosy and wrinkled like a russet apple, and her full
purple skirt, her big bonnet, adorned with bows of scarlet ribbon, and
her much be-furbelowed and be-spangled dolman, attested the fact that
she had donned her best clothes for the occasion of her visit, and that
Thorley fashions differed from those of the metropolis. She wore gloves
with one button, moreover, and boots with elastic sides.

Mrs. Bundlecombe seemed to have some difficulty in coming to the point.
She told Lettice much Angleford news, including a piece of information
that interested her a good deal: namely, that the old squire, after many
years of suffering, was dead, and that his nephew, Mr. Brooke Dalton,
had at last succeeded to the property. "He's not there very much,
however: he leaves the house pretty much to his sister, Miss Edith
Dalton; but it's to be hoped that he'll marry soon and bring a lady to
the place."

Lettice wondered again why Mrs. Bundlecombe had called upon her. There
seemed very little point in her remarks. But the good woman had a very
sufficient reason for her call. She was a practical-minded person, and
she was moreover a literary woman in her way, as behoved the widow of a
bookseller who had herself taken to selling books. It is true that her
acquaintance with the works of British authors did not extend far beyond
their titles, but it was to her credit that she contrived to make so
much as she did out of her materials. She might have known as many
insides of books as she knew outsides, and have put them to less
practical service.

"Well," she said, after a quarter of an hour's incessant talk, "you will
be wondering what brought me here, and to be sure, miss, I hardly like
to say it now I've come; but, as I argued with myself, the rights of man
are the rights of man, and to do your best by them who depend on you is
the whole duty of man, which applies, I take it, to woman also. And when
my poor dear husband died, I thought the path of duty was marked out for
me, and I went through my daily exercises, so to speak, just as he had
done for forty years. But times were bad, and I could make nothing of
it. He had ways of selling books that I could never understand, and I
soon saw that the decline and fall was setting in. So I have sold the
business for what it would fetch, and paid all that was owing, and I can
assure you that there is very little left. I have a nephew in London who
is something in the writing way himself. He used to live with us at
Thorley, and he is a dear dutiful boy, but he has had great troubles; so
I am going to keep his rooms for him, and take care of his linen, and
look after things a bit. I came up to-day to talk to him about it.

"Well, Miss Campion, the long and short of it is that as I was looking
over my husband's state documents, so to speak, which he had kept in a
private drawer, and which I had never found until I was packing up to
go, I found a paper signed by your respected father, less than three
months before my good man went to his saint's everlasting rest. You see,
miss, it is an undertaking to pay Samuel Bundlecombe the sum of twenty
pounds in six months from date, for value received, but owing to my
husband dying that sudden, and not telling me of his private drawer,
this paper was never presented."

Lettice took the paper and read it, feeling rather sick at heart, for
two or three reasons. If her father had made this promise she felt sure
that he would either have kept it or have put down the twenty pounds in
his list of debts. The list, indeed, which had been handed to Sydney was
in her own writing, and certainly the name of Bundlecombe was not
included in it. Was the omission her fault? If the money had never been
paid, that was what she would prefer to believe.

"I thought, miss," her visitor continued, "that there might be some
mention of this in Mr. Campion's papers, and, having heard that all the
accounts were properly settled, I made bold to bring it to your notice.
It is a kind of social contract, you see, and a solemn league and
covenant, as between man and man, which I am sure you would like to
settle if the means exist. Not but what it seems a shame to come to a
lady on such an errand; and I may tell you miss, fair and candid, that I
have been to Mr. Sydney Campion in the Temple, who does not admit that
he is liable. That may be law, or it may not, but I do consider that
this signature ought to be worth the money."

Lettice took the paper again. There could be no doubt as to its
genuineness, and the fact that Sydney had denied his liability
influenced her in some subtle manner to do what she had already half
resolved to do without that additional argument.

She looked at the box in which she had put her twenty pounds, and she
looked at her father's signature. Then she opened the box and took out
the notes.

"You did quite right in coming, Mrs. Bundlecombe. This is certainly my
father's handwriting, and I suppose that if the debt had been settled
the paper would not have remained in your husband's possession. Here is
the money."

The old woman could scarcely believe her eyes; but she pocketed the
notes with great satisfaction, and began to express her admiration for
such honorable conduct in a very voluble manner. Lettice cut her short
and got rid of her, and then, if the truth must be confessed, she sat
down and had a comfortable cry over the speedy dissipation of her
savings.




CHAPTER VII.

MRS. HARTLEY AT HOME.


After her first Christmas in London, Lettice began to accept invitations
to the houses of her acquaintance.

She dined several times at the Grahams', where there were never more
than eight at table, and, being a bright talker and an appreciative
listener--two qualities which do not often go together--she was always
an impressive personality without exactly knowing it. Clara was
accustomed to be outshone by her in conversation, and had become used to
it, but some of the women whom Lettice was invited to meet looked at her
rather hard, as though they would have liked to draw her serious
attention to the fact that they were better looking, or better dressed,
or older or younger than herself, as the case might be, and that it was
consequently a little improper in her to be talked to so much by the
men.

Undoubtedly Lettice got on well with men, and was more at her ease with
them than with her own sex. It was not the effect of forwardness on her
part, and indeed she was scarcely conscious of the fact. She conversed
readily, because her mind was full of reading and of thought, and her
moral courage was never at a loss. The keenness of her perception led
her to understand and respond to the opinions of the cleverest men whom
she met, and it was not unnatural that they should be flattered.

It does not take long for a man or woman to earn a reputation in the
literary circles of London, provided he or she has real ability, and is
well introduced. The ability will not, as a rule, suffice without the
introductions, though introductions have been known to create a
reputation, lasting at any rate for a few months, without any real
ability. Lettice advanced rapidly in the estimation of those whose good
opinion was worth having. She soon began to discriminate between the
people who were worth cultivating and the people who were not. If a
person were sincere and straightforward, could say what he meant and say
it with point and vivacity, or if he possessed for her those vaguely
attractive and stimulating qualities which draw people together without
their exactly knowing why (probably through some correlation of
temperament), Lettice would feel this person was good to know, whether
the world approved her choice of friends or not. And when she wanted to
know man or woman, she exerted herself to please--mainly by showing that
she herself was pleased. She did not exactly flatter--she was never
insincere--but it amounted to much the same thing as flattery. She
listened eagerly; her interest was manifested in her face, her attitude,
her answers. In fact she was her absolute self, without reserve and
without fence. No wonder that she incurred the jealousy of half the
women in her set.

But this is how an intellectual woman can best please a man who has
passed the childish age, when he only cared for human dolls and dolls'
houses. She must carry her intellect about with her, like a brave
costume--dressing, of course, with taste and harmony--she must not be
slow to admire the intellectual costume of others, if she wants her own
to be admired; she must be subtle enough at the same time to forget that
she is dressed at all, and yet never for a moment forget that her
companion may have no soul or heart except in his dress. If he has, it
is for him to prove it, not for her to assume it.

It was because Lettice had this art of intellectual intercourse, and
because she exercised it in a perfectly natural and artless manner, that
she charmed so many of those who made her acquaintance, and that they
rarely paused to consider whether she was prettier or plainer, taller or
shorter, more or less prepossessing, than the women who surrounded her.

In due time she found herself welcomed at the houses of those dear and
estimable ladies, who--generally old and childless themselves--love to
gather round them the young and clever acolytes of literature and art,
the enthusiastic devotees of science, the generous apprentices of
constructive politics, for politicians who do not dabble in the
reformation of society find other and more congenial haunts. This
many-minded crowd of acolytes, and devotees, and apprentices, owe much
to the hospitable women who bring them together in a sort of indulgent
dame's school, where their angles are rubbed down, and whence they
merge, perhaps, as Arthur Hallam said, the picturesque of man and man,
but certainly also more fitted for their work in the social mill than if
they had never known that kindly feminine influence.

Lettice became especially fond of one of these minor queens of literary
society, who received her friends on Sunday afternoon, and whose
drawing-room was frequently attended by a dozen or a score of
well-reputed men and women. Mrs. Hartley was an excellent hostess. She
was not only careful, to begin with, about her own acquaintance,
cultivating none but those whom she had heard well spoken of by
competent judges, but she knew how to make a second choice amongst the
chosen, bringing kindred spirits together with a happy, instinctive
sense of their mutual suitabilities. In spite of her many amiable and
agreeable qualities, however, it took Lettice a little time to believe
that she should ever make a friend of Mrs. Hartley, whose habit of
assorting and labelling her acquaintances in groups struck her at first
as artificial and conventional. Lettice objected, for her own part, to
be classified.

She had been entreated so often by Clara to go to one of Mrs. Hartley's
afternoons that it was with some compunction of heart that she prepared
at last to fulfil her long-delayed promise. She walked from Brook Green
to Edwardes Square, about three o'clock one bright Sunday afternoon, in
February, and found Clara waiting for her. Clara was looking very trim
and smart in a new gown of inexpensive material, but the latest, and she
surveyed Lettice in a comprehensive manner from top to toe, as if to
ascertain whether a proper value had been attached to Mrs. Hartley's
invitation.

"You look very nice," was her verdict. "I am so glad that you have
relieved your black at last, Lettice. There is no reason why you should
not wear a little white or lavender."

And indeed this mitigation of her mourning weeds was becoming to
Lettice, whose delicate bloom showed fresh and fair against the black
and white of her new costume. She had pinned a little bunch of sweet
violets into her jacket, and they harmonized excellently well with the
grave tranquillity of her face and the soberness of her dress.

"I don't know why it is, but you remind me of a nun," Clara said,
glancing at her in some perplexity. "The effect is quite charming, but
it is nun-like too----"

"I am sure I don't know why; I never felt more worldly in my life," said
Lettice, laughing. "Am I not fit for Mrs. Hartley's drawing-room?"

"Fit? You are lovely; but not quite like anybody else. That is the best
of it; Mrs. Hartley will rave of you," said Clara, as they set forth.
And the words jarred a little on Lettice's sensitive mind; she thought
that she should object to be raved about.

They took an omnibus to Kensington High Street, and then they made their
way to Campden Hill, where Mrs. Hartley's house was situated. And as
they went, Clara took the opportunity of explaining Mrs. Hartley's
position and claims to distinction. Mrs. Hartley was a widow, childless,
rich, perfectly independent: she was very critical and very clever (said
Mrs. Graham), but, oh, _so_ kind-hearted! And she was sure that Lettice
would like her.

Lettice meekly hoped that she should, although she had a guilty sense of
wayward dislike to the woman in whose house, it appeared, she was to be
exhibited. For some words of Graham's lingered in her mind. "Mrs.
Hartley? The lion-hunter? Oh! so _you_ are to be on view this afternoon,
I understand." Accordingly, it was with no very pleasant anticipation
that Lettice entered the lion-hunter's house on Campden Hill.

A stout, little grey-haired lady in black, with a very observant eye,
came forward to greet the visitors. "This is Miss Campion, I feel sure,"
she said, putting out a podgy hand, laden with diamond rings. "Dear Mrs.
Graham, how kind of you to bring her. Come and sit by me, Miss Campion,
and tell me all about yourself. I want to know how you first came to
think of literature as a profession?"

This was not the way in which people talked at Angleford. Lettice felt
posed for a moment, and then a sense of humor came happily to her
relief.

"I drifted into it, I am afraid," she answered, composedly.

"Drifted? No, I am sure you would never drift. You don't know how
interested I am, Miss Campion, in the development of the human mind, or
you would not try to evade the question. Now, which interests you most,
poetry or prose?"

"That depends upon my mood; I am not sure that I am permanently
interested in either," Lettice said, quietly.

Her hostess' observant eye was upon her for a moment; then Mrs.
Hartley's face expanded in a benignant smile.

"Ah, I see you are very clever," she said. "I ask the question--not from
idle curiosity, because I have representatives of both in the room at
the present moment. There is a poet, whom I mean to introduce you to by
and by, if you will allow me; and there is the very embodiment of prose
close beside you, although I don't believe that he writes any, and, like
M. Jourdain, talks it without knowing that it is prose."

Lettice glanced involuntarily at the man beside her, and glanced again.
Where had she seen his face before? He was a rather stout, blonde man,
with an honest open countenance that she liked, although it expressed
good nature rather than intellectual force.

"Don't you remember him?" said Mrs. Hartley, in her ear. "He's a cousin
of mine: Brooke Dalton, whose uncle used to live at Angleford. He has
been wanting to meet you very much; he remembers you quite well, he
tells me."

The color rose in Lettice's face. She was feminine enough to feel that a
connecting link between Mrs. Hartley and her dear old home changed her
views of her hostess at once. She looked up and smiled. "I remember Mr.
Dalton too," she said.

"What a sweet face!" Mrs. Hartley said to herself. "Now if Brooke would
only take it into his head to settle down----"

And aloud she added: "Brooke, come and be introduced to Miss Campion.
You used to know her at Angleford."

"It seems a long time since I saw you," Mr. Dalton said, rather
clumsily, as he took Lettice's hand into a very cordial clasp. "It was
that day in December when your brother had just got his scholarship at
Trinity."

"Oh, yes; that day! I remember it very well," said Lettice, drawing a
long breath, which was not exactly a sigh, although it sounded like one.
"I gave up being a child on that day, I believe!"

"There have been many changes since then." Brooke Dalton was not
brilliant in conversation.

"You have heard of them all, I suppose? Yes, my mother and I are in
London now."

"You will allow me to call, I hope?"

Lettice had but time to signify her consent, when Mrs. Hartley seized on
her again, but this time Lettice did not so much object to be
cross-examined. She recognized the fact that Mrs. Hartley's aim was
kindly, and she submitted to be asked questions about her work and her
prospects, and to answer them with a frankness that amazed herself. But
in the very midst of the conversation she was conscious of being much
observed by two or three people in the room; notably by Brooke Dalton,
who had planted himself in a position from which he could look at her
without attracting the other visitors' remark; and also by a tall man
with a dark, melancholy face, deep-set eyes, and a peaked Vandyke beard,
whose glances were more furtive than those of Dalton, but equally
interested and intent. He was a handsome man, and Lettice found herself
wondering whether he were not "somebody," and somebody worth talking to,
moreover; for he was receiving, in a languid, half-indifferent manner, a
great deal of homage from the women in the room. He seemed bored by it,
and was turning away in relief from a lady who had just quoted
half-a-dozen lines of Shelley for his especial behoof, when Mrs.
Hartley, who had been discussing Feuerbach and the German materialists
with Lettice, caught his eye, and beckoned him to her side.

"Mr. Walcott," she said, "I never heard that you were a materialist, and
I don't think it is very likely; so you can condole with Miss Campion on
having been condemned to translate five hundred pages of Feuerbach. Now,
isn't that terrible?"

"I don't know Feuerbach," said the poet, after he had bowed to Lettice,
"but it sounds warm and comfortable on a wintry day. Nevertheless, I do
condole with her."

"I am not sure that I need condolence," said Lettice. "The work was
really very interesting, and one likes to know what any philosopher has
to say for himself, whether one believes in his theories or not. I must
say I have enjoyed reading Feuerbach,--though he _is_ a German with a
translatable name."

This was a flippant speech, as Lettice acknowledged to herself; but,
then, Mr. Walcott's speech had been flippant to begin with, and she
wanted to give as good as she got.

"You read German, then?" said Walcott, sitting down in the chair that
Mrs. Hartley had vacated, and looking at Lettice with interest, although
he did not abandon the slight affectation of tone and manner that she
had noted from the beginning of her talk with him. "How nice that must
be! I often wish I knew something more than my schoolboy's smattering of
Greek, Latin, and French."

Lettice had read Mr. Walcott's last volume of poems, which were just
then exciting considerable interest in the literary world, and she could
not help recalling one or two lyrics and sonnets from Uhland, Filicaja,
and other Continentals. As though divining her thoughts, Walcott went on
quickly, with much more sincerity of tone:

"I do try now and then to put an idea that strikes me from German or
Italian into English; but think of my painful groping with a dictionary,
before the cramped and crippled idea can reach my mind! I am the
translator most in need of condolence, Miss Campion!"

"Yet, even without going to other languages," said Lettice, "there is an
unlimited field in our own, both for ideas and for expression--as well
as a practically unlimited audience."

"The artists and musicians say that their domains are absolutely
unlimited--that the poet sings to those who happen to speak his
language, whilst they discourse to the whole world and to all time. I
suppose, in a sense, they are right."

He spoke listlessly, as if he did not care whether they were right or
wrong.

But Lettice's eyes began to glow.

"Surely in a narrow sense! They would hardly say that Handel or
Beethoven speaks to a wider audience than Homer or Shakspeare, and
certainly no musician or painter or sculptor can hope to delight mankind
for as many centuries as a poet. And, then, to think what an idea can
accomplish--what Greek ideas have done in England, for instance, or
Roman ideas in France, or French ideas in nearly every country of
Europe! Could a tune make a revolution, or a picture destroy a
religion?"

"Perhaps, yes," said Walcott, wishing to draw her out, "if the tunes or
the pictures could be repeated often enough, and brought before the eyes
and ears of the multitude."

"I do not think so. And, at any rate, that could not be done by way of
systematic and comprehensive teaching, so that your comparison only
suggests another superiority in literary expression. A poet can teach a
whole art, or establish a definite creed; he can move the heart and
mould the mind at the same time; but one can hardly imagine such an
effect from the work of those who speak to us only through the eye or
ear."

By this time Alan Walcott was fairly interested. What Lettice said might
be commonplace enough, but it did not strike him so. It was her manner
that pleased him, her quiet fervor and gentle insistance, which showed
that she was accustomed to think for herself, and suggested that she
would have the honesty to say what she thought. And, of course, he
applied to himself all that she said about poets in general, and was
delighted by her warm championship of his special vocation. As they went
on talking for another quarter of an hour he recognized, without framing
the admission in words, that Miss Campion was an exceedingly well-read
person, and that she knew many authors--even poets--with whom he had the
slightest acquaintance. Most of the people whom he met talked idle
nonsense to him, as though their main object was to pass the time, or
else they aired a superficial knowledge of the uppermost thoughts and
theories of the day, gleaned as a rule from the cheap primers and
magazine articles in which a bustled age is content to study its
science, art, economy, politics, and religion. But here was a woman who
had been a voracious reader, who had gone to the fountain-head for her
facts, and who yet spoke with the air of one who wanted to learn, rather
than to display.

"We have had a very pleasant talk," he said to her at last. "I mean that
I have found it very pleasant. I am going now to dine at my club, and
shall spend my evening over a monologue which has suggested itself since
I entered this room. As you know the Grahams I may hope to meet you
again, there if not here. A talk with you, Miss Campion, is what the
critics in the _Acropolis_ might call very suggestive!"

Again Lettice thought the manner and the speech affected, but there was
an air of sincerity about the man which seemed to be fighting down the
affectation. She hardly knew whether she liked him or not, but she knew
that he had interested her and made her talk--for which two things she
half forgave him the affectation.

"I knew you two would get on together," said Mrs. Hartley, who came up
at the moment and dropped into Alan Walcott's chair. "I am not easily
deceived in my friends, and I was sure you would have plenty to say to
each, other. I have been watching you, and I declare it was quite a case
of conversation at first sight. Now, mind you come to me often, Miss
Campion. I feel that I shall like you."

And the fat good-natured little woman nodded her grey head to emphasize
the compliment.

"It is kind of you to say that," said Lettice, warmly. "I will certainly
take you at your word."

"My dear," said Mrs. Hartley, when Alan Walcott had left them, "he is a
very nice and clever man--but, oh, so melancholy! He makes me feel quite
unhappy. I never saw him so animated as he was just now, and it must be
thoroughly good for him to be drawn out in that way."

"I suppose it is the natural mood of poets," Lettice answered with a
smile. "It is an old joke against them."

"Ah, but I think the race is changing its characteristics in these days,
and going in for cheerfulness and comfort. There is Mr. Pemberton, for
instance--how aggravatingly prosperous he looks! Do you see how he beams
with good nature on all the world? I should say that he is a jovial
man--and yet, you know, he has been down there, as they said of Dante."

"Perhaps it goes by opposites. What I have read of Mr. Walcott's poetry
is rather light than sad--except one or two pieces in _The Decade_."

"Poor man! I think there is another cause for his melancholy. He lost
his wife two or three years ago, and I have been told that she was a
charming creature, and that her death upset him terribly. He has only
just begun to go about again."

"How very unfortunate!" said Lettice. "And that makes it still more
strange that his poems should be so slightly tinged with melancholy. He
must live quite a double life. Most men would give expression to their
personal griefs, and publish them for everybody to read; but he keeps
them sacred. That is much more interesting."

"I should think it is more difficult. It seems natural that a poet,
being in grief, should write the poetry of grief."

"Yes--no doubt it is more difficult."

And Lettice, on her way home and afterwards, found herself pondering on
the problem of a man who, recently robbed of a well-beloved wife, wrote
a thousand verses without a single reference to her.

She took down his "Measures and Monologues," and read it through, to see
what he had to say about women.

There were a few cynical verses from Heine, and three bitter stanzas on
the text from Balzac:--"Vous nous promettiez le bonheur, et finissiez
par nous jeter dans une precipice;" but not one tender word applied to a
woman throughout the book. It was certainly strange; and Lettice felt
that her curiosity was natural and legitimate.

Alan Walcott, in fact, became quite an interesting study. During the
next few months Lettice had many opportunities of arriving at a better
knowledge of his character, and she amused herself by quietly pushing
her inquiries into what was for her a comparatively new field of
speculation. The outcome of the research was not very profitable. The
more she saw of him the more he puzzled her. Qualities which appeared
one day seemed to be entirely wanting when they next met. In some subtle
manner she was aware that even his feelings and inclinations constantly
varied; at one time he did not conceal his craving for sympathy, at
another he was frigid and almost repellent. Lettice still did not know
whether she liked or disliked him. But she was now piqued as well as
interested, and so it happened that Mr. Walcott began to occupy more of
her thoughts than she was altogether willing to devote to him.

So far, all their meetings were in public. They had never exchanged a
word that the world might not hear. They saw each other at the Grahams'
dinner-parties, at Mrs. Hartley's Sunday afternoon "at homes," and at
one or two other houses. To meet a dozen times in a London season
constitutes intimacy. Although they talked chiefly of books, sometimes
of men and women, and never of themselves, Lettice began to feel that a
confidential tone was creeping into their intercourse--that she
criticized his poems with extraordinary freedom, and argued her opinions
with him in a way that would certainly have staggered her brother Sydney
if he had heard her. But in all this friendly talk, the personal note
had never once been struck. He told her nothing of his inner self, of
his past life, or his dreams for the future. All that they said might
have been said to each other on their first meeting in Mrs. Hartley's
drawing-room. It seemed as if some vague impalpable barrier had been
erected between them, and Lettice puzzled herself from time to time to
know how this barrier had been set up.

Sometimes--she did not know why--she was disposed to associate it with
the presence of Brooke Dalton. That gentleman continued to display his
usual lack of brilliance in conversation, together with much
good-heartedness, soundness of judgment, and thoughtfulness for others;
and in spite of his slowness of speech Lettice liked him very much. But
why would he persist in establishing himself within earshot when Alan
was talking to her? If they absolutely eluded him, he betrayed
uneasiness, like that of a faithful dog who sees his beloved mistress in
some danger. He did not often interrupt the conversation. He sat silent
for the most part, unconsciously throwing a wet blanket over both
speakers, and sometimes sending Walcott away in a state of almost
irrepressible irritation. And yet he seemed to be on good terms with
Alan. They spoke to each other as men who had been acquaintances, if not
friends, for a good number of years; and he never made an allusion to
Alan, in his absence, which could in the least be deemed disparaging.
And yet Lettice felt that she was watched, and that there was some
mysterious anxiety in Dalton's mind.

Having no companions (for Clara was too busy with her house and her
children to be considered a companion for the day-time), Lettice
sometimes went for solitary expeditions to various "sights" of London,
and, as usual in such expeditions, had never once met anybody she knew.
She had gone rather early one summer morning to Westminster Abbey, and
was walking slowly through the dim cloistered shades, enjoying the
coolness and the quietness, when she came full upon Alan Walcott, who
seemed to be doing likewise.

They both started: indeed, they both changed color. For the first time
they met outside a drawing-room; and the change in their environment
seemed to warrant some change in their relation to one another. After
the first greeting, and a short significant pause--for what can be more
significant than silence between two people who have reached that stage
of sensitiveness to each other's moods when every word or movement seems
like self-revelation?--Alan spoke.

"You love this place--as I do; I know you love it."

"I have never been here before," said Lettice, letting her eyes stray
dreamily over the grey stones at her feet.

"No, or I should have seen you. I am often here. And I see you so
seldom----"

"So seldom?" said Lettice in some natural surprise. "Why, I thought we
met rather often?"

"Under the world's eye," said Alan, but in so low a voice that she was
not sure whether he meant her to hear or not. However, they both smiled;
and he went on rather hurriedly, "It is the place of all others where I
should expect to meet you. We think so much alike----"

"Do we?" said Lettice doubtfully. "But we differ very much."

"Not in essentials. Don't say that you think so," he said, in a tone
that was almost passionately earnest? "I can't tell you how much it is
to me to feel that I have a friend who understands--who sympathizes--who
_would_ sympathize, I am sure, if she knew all----"

He broke off suddenly, and the emotion in his voice so far touched
Lettice that she remained silent, with drooping head and lowered eyes.

"Yes," he went on, "you owe me your sympathy now. You have given me so
much that you must give me more. I have a right to it."

"Mr. Walcott!" said Lettice, raising her head quickly, "you can have no
_right_----"

"No right to sympathy from a friend? Well, perhaps not," he answered
bitterly. "I thought that, although you were a woman, you could allow me
the claim I make. It is small enough, God knows! Miss Campion, forgive
me for speaking so roughly. I ask most earnestly for your friendship and
your sympathy; will you not give me these?"

Lettice moved onward towards the door. "Do you think that we ought to
discuss our personal concerns in such a place as this?" she asked,
evading the question in a thoroughly feminine manner.

"Why not? But if not here, then in another place. By the bye"--with a
sudden change of manner, as they stepped into the light of day--"I have
a rare book that I want to show you. Will you let me bring it to your
house to-morrow morning? I think that you will be interested. May I
bring it?"

"Yes," said Lettice mechanically. The change from fierce earnestness to
this subdued conventionality of tone bewildered her a little.

"I will come at twelve, if that hour will suit you?"

"It will suit me very well."

And then he raised his hat and left her. Lettice, her pulses throbbing
strangely, took her way back to Hammersmith. As she grew calmer, she
wondered what had agitated her so much; it must have been something in
his look or in his tone, for every effort to assure herself by a
repetition of his words that they were mere commonplaces of conversation
set her heart beating more tumultuously than ever. She walked all the
way from Westminster to Brook Green without once reflecting that she
might save herself that fatigue by hailing a passing omnibus.




CHAPTER VIII.

AT THE OLIGARCHY CLUB.


Sydney Campion had done a year's hard and remunerative work since he
paid his last visit to Angleford, and the result more than answered his
expectations.

When the courts were sitting he was fully absorbed in his briefs; but
now and again he took life easily enough--at any rate, so far as the law
was concerned. In the autumn it had been his custom to live abroad for a
month or two; at Christmas and Easter he invariably found his way to his
club in the afternoon, and finished the evening over a rubber of whist.

It was a rare occasion when Sydney was able, in the middle of term, to
leave his chambers between three and four o'clock, and stroll in a
leisurely way along the Embankment, peacefully smoking a cigar. The
chance came to him one sultry day in June. There was no case for him to
master, nothing proceeding in which he was specially interested, and he
did not feel disposed to sit down and improvise a case for himself, as
he used to do in his earlier days. He was minded to be idle; and we may
accompany him in his westward walk along the river side to Hungerford
Bridge, and up the Avenue to Pall Mall.

On the steps of the Oligarchy Club he found his old friend, Pynsent,
just starting for the House. The time was one of great excitement for
those who had not lost their interest in the politics of the day. The
Irish Land Bill was in Committee, and the Conservatives had strenuously
opposed it, fighting, as they knew, a losing battle, yet not without
consolations. This very week they had run the Government so close that
the transfer of three votes would have put them in a minority; and Sir
John Pynsent, who was always a sanguine man, had convinced himself that
the Liberal party was on the point of breaking up.

"They are sure to go to pieces," he said to Campion; "and it would be a
strange thing if they did not. What Heneage has done already some other
Whig with a conscience will do again, and more effectually. You will see
we shall be back in office before the year is out. No Ministry and no
majority could bear the strain which the Old Man is putting on his
followers--it is simply impossible. The worth and birth of the country
are sick of this veiled communism that they call justice to
Ireland--sick of democratic sycophancy--deadly sick of the Old Man. You
mark my words, dear boy: there will be a great revolt against him before
many months have passed. I see it working. I find it in the House, in
the clubs, in the drawing-rooms; and I don't speak merely as my wishes
lead me."

"No doubt you are right as to London; but how about the country?"

"The provinces waver more than the metropolis, I admit; but I don't
despair of seeing a majority even in the English boroughs. Ah, Campion I
never see you without saying to myself, 'There goes the man who lost us
Dormer.' You would have won that election, I am certain."

"Well," said Sydney, "you know why I could not fight. The will, the
money, everything was ready: but----"

"True, I forgot. I beg your pardon!"

"Not at all! But I will fight for you some day--as soon as you like.
Bear that in mind, Pynsent!"

"To be sure I will, my dear fellow. We must have you in the House. I
have often said so."

And the energetic baronet hurried away, whilst Sydney entered the Club,
and made straight for the smoking-room. Here he found others just as
eager to predict the downfall of the Government as Sir John Pynsent had
been; but he was not in the mood to listen to a number of young men all
of the same mind, all of-doubtful intellectual calibre, and all sure to
say what he had heard a dozen times already. So he passed on to the
billiard-room, and finding that a pool was just beginning, took a ball
and played.

That served to pass the time until six o'clock, when he went upstairs
and read the evening papers for an hour; and at seven he had his dinner
and a bottle of wine. Meanwhile he had met two or three friends, with
whom he kept up a lively conversation on the events of the day, seasoned
by many a pungent joke, and fatal (for the moment) to many a reputation.
It is a habit fostered by club life--as, no doubt, it is fostered in the
life of the drawing-room, for neither sex is exempt--to sacrifice the
repute of one's absent acquaintance with a light heart, not in malice,
but more as a parrot bites the finger that feeds it, in sport, or even
in affection. If we backbite our friends, we give them free permission
to backbite us, or we know that they do it, which amounts to pretty much
the same thing. The biting may not be very severe, and, as a rule, it
leaves no scars; but, of course, there are exceptions to the rule.

The secret history of almost every man or woman who has mixed at all in
polite society is sure to be known by some one or other in the clubs and
drawing-rooms. If there is anything to your discredit in your past life,
anything which you would blot out if you could with rivers of repentance
or expiation, you may be pretty sure that at some time, when you might
least expect it, this thing has been, or will be, the subject of
discourse and dissection amongst your friends. It may not be told in an
injurious or exaggerated manner, and it may not travel far; but none the
less do you walk on treacherous shale, which may give way at any moment
under your feet. The art of living, if you are afraid of the passing of
your secret from the few who know to the many who welcome a new scandal,
is to go on walking with the light and confident step of youth, never so
much as quailing in your own mind at the thought that the ground may
crumble beneath you--that you may go home some fine day, or to your
club, or to Lady Jane's five o'clock tea, and be confronted by the
grinning skeleton on whom you had so carefully turned your keys and shot
your bolts.

No doubt there are men and women so refined and kindly in their nature
that they have absolutely no appetite for scandal--never speak it, or
listen to it, or remember what they have overheard. Sydney and his
friends were troubled by no such qualms, and, if either of them had
been, he would not have been so ill-mannered as to spoil sport for the
rest.

After dinner they had gone upstairs to the members' smoking room, in a
comfortable corner of which they were lazily continuing their
conversation. It turned by chance on a certain barrister of Sydney's
inn, a Mr. Barrington Baynes, whom one of the party not incorrectly
described as "that beautiful, bumptious, and briefless barrister, B. B."

"He gives himself great airs," said Captain Williams, a swaggering,
supercilious man, for whom Sydney had no affection, and who was not one
of Sydney's admirers. "To hear him talk one would imagine he was a high
authority on every subject under the sun, but I suspect he has very
little to go upon. Has he ever held a brief, Campion?"

"I never heard of it, if he did. One of those poor devils who take to
journalism, and usually end by going to the dogs. You will find his name
on the covers of magazines, and I fancy he does something, in the
reviewing way."

It was an unfortunate speech for Sydney to make, and Captain Williams
did not fail to seize his opportunity of giving the sharp-tongued
lawyer--who perhaps knew better how to thrust than to parry in such
encounters--a wholesome snub.

Fortune favored him. The current number of _The Decade_ was lying on the
table beside him. He took it up in a casual sort of way, and glanced at
the list of contents.

"By the bye, Campion," he said, "you are not a married man, are you? I
see magazine articles now and then signed Lettice Campion; no relation,
I suppose."

"That is my sister," Sydney answered, quietly enough. But it was plain
that the hit had told; and he was vexed with himself for being so
snobbish as to deserve a sneer from a man like Williams.

"I have had the pleasure of meeting Miss Campion two or three times
lately at Mrs. Hartley's, in Kensington," said another of the quartette.
This was none other than Brooke Dalton, whom Sydney always liked. He
spoke in a confidential undertone, with the kindly intention of covering
Sydney's embarrassment. "Mrs. Hartley is a cousin of mine; and, though I
say it, she brings some very nice people together sometimes. By the way,
have you ever seen a man of the name of Walcott--Alan Walcott: a man who
writes poetry, and so forth?"

"I know him by name, that is all. I have heard people say he is one of
the best poets we have; but I don't pretend to understand our latter-day
bards."

"You never met him?"

"No."

"Well, then," said Mr. Dalton, who, though a justice of the peace, and
the oldest of the four, could give them all points and beat them as a
retailer of gossip; "well, then, that leaves me free to tell you as
curious a little history as any I know. But mind, you fellows," he
continued, as the others pricked up their ears and prepared to listen,
"this is not a story for repetition, and I pledge you to silence before
I say another word."

"Honor bright!" said Charles Milton; and the captain nodded his head.

"The facts are these: Five or six years ago, I knew a little of Alan
Walcott. I had made his acquaintance in a fortuitous way, and he once
did me a good turn by coming forward as a witness in the police court."

"Confession is good for the soul," Milton interjected.

"Well, I was summoned for thrashing a cabman, and I should certainly
have been fined if Walcott had not contrived to put the matter in its
proper light. For a month or two we saw a good deal of each other, and I
rather liked him. He was frank and open in his ways, and though not a
well-to-do man, I never observed anything about him that was mean or
unhandsome. I did not know that he was married at first, but gradually I
put two and two together, and found that he came out now and again to
enjoy a snatch of personal freedom, which he could not always make sure
of at home.

"Once I saw his wife, and only once. She was a strikingly handsome
Frenchwoman, of that bold and flaunting type which generally puts an
Englishman on his guard--all paint and powder and cosmetics; you know
the style!"

"Not exactly a poetic ideal," said Sydney.

"That is just what I thought at the time; and she seems to have been
still less so in character. When I saw her she was terribly excited
about some trifle or other--treated Walcott like a dog, without the
slightest consideration for his feelings or mine, stood over him with a
knife, and ended with a fit of shrieking hysterics."

"Drink or jealousy?" Captain Williams asked.

"Perhaps a little of both. Walcott told me afterwards that that was his
daily and nightly experience, and that he was making up his mind to end
it. I never knew what he meant by that, but it was impressed upon my
memory by the cool sort of way in which he said it, and a quiet look in
his eyes which evidently meant mischief. About a fortnight later they
went abroad, rather in a hurry; and for some time I heard nothing more
of them. Then I went to Aix-les-Bains, and came on the scene just after
a frightful row. It seems that a French admirer of hers had followed her
to Aix, and attacked Walcott, and even struck him in the hotel gardens.
The proprietor and the police had to interfere, and I came across
Walcott just as he was looking for some one to act as second. There had
been a challenge, and all that sort of thing; and, un-English as it
seems, I thought Walcott perfectly right, and acted as his friend
throughout the affair. It was in no way a remarkable duel: the French
fellow was shot in the arm and got away to Switzerland, and we managed
to keep it dark. Walcott was not hurt, and went back to his hotel."

"What did the woman do?" asked Williams, curiously.

"That's the odd part of it. Husband and wife seem to have made it up,
for in a day or two they went on to Culoz, had luncheon there, and went
out for a walk together. From that walk, Mrs. Alan Walcott did not
return. Now comes the mystery: what happened in the course of that walk
near Culoz? All that is known is that the landlady saw Walcott returning
by himself two or three hours later, and that when she questioned him he
replied that madame had taken her departure. What do you think of that
for a bit of suggested melodrama?"

"It lacks finish," said Milton.

"I can't see where the poetry comes in," observed the captain.

"It certainly looked black for Walcott," Sydney remarked. "I suppose
there was a regular hue and cry--a search for the body, and all that
kind of thing?"

"So far as I know, there was nothing of the sort. Nobody seems to have
had any suspicion at the time. The peasants at Culoz seemed to have
talked about it a little, and some weeks afterwards the English people
at Aix-les-Bains got hold of it, and a friend of mine tried to extract
information from the landlady. But he was unsuccessful: the landlady
could not positively affirm that there was anything wrong. And--perhaps
there was not," Mr. Dalton concluded, with a burst of Christian charity
which was creditable to him, considering how strong were his objections
to Walcott's friendship with Miss Campion.

The captain leaned his head back, sent a pillar of smoke up to the
ceiling, and laughed aloud.

"There is no question about it," said Milton, "that Walcott got out of
it cheaply. I would not be in his shoes for any money, even now."

"Is this business widely known?" Sydney asked. "It is strange that I
never heard anything about it."

He was thinking that the acquaintance of Mr. Alan Walcott could not in
any case be a desirable thing for Miss Lettice Campion. From the manner
in which Dalton had introduced the subject he felt pretty sure that the
attention paid by this man to his sister had been noticed, and that his
friend was actuated by a sense, of duty in giving him warning as to the
facts within his knowledge.

"I don't wonder you never heard of it," said Dalton. "I am not aware of
anyone in England who ever did, except myself. I have not mentioned it
before, because I am not sure that it is fair to Walcott to do so. But I
know you men will not repeat what I have been telling you."

"Not a word," said Captain Williams and Charles Milton, in a breath.

Yet in less than a week from that time the whole story made its
appearance in one of the baser personal journals, and people were
discussing who the "well-known poet" was, and whether "the buried
secret" would presently come to light again.

And Alan Walcott saw the paragraph, and felt that he had not yet quite
done with his past, and wondered at the dispensation of Providence which
permitted the writers of such paragraphs to live and thrive.

But a good deal was to happen before that paragraph was printed; and in
the meantime Dalton and Campion went off to look for partners in a
rubber, without supposing for a moment that they had delivered a stab in
the back to one who had never done an injury to either of them.




CHAPTER IX.

LETTICE RECEIVES A VISITOR.


The day following that on which Sydney Campion paid his afternoon visit
to his club in Pall Mall was one of considerable importance to his
sister Lettice.

She was an early riser, and generally contrived to write half-a-dozen
pages of easy translation or straightforward fiction before ten o'clock.
That was the hour when she was due in her mother's room, to help her in
dressing, and to settle her comfortably in her arm-chair, with her Bible
and spectacles at her side, and a newspaper or magazine waiting its turn
after the lessons for the day had been read. Mrs. Campion was growing
very feeble, both in mind and in body, but she got through her waking
hours with a fair amount of satisfaction, thanks to the attention which
was paid to all her wants and wishes. Lettice did not suffer anything to
interfere with the regular routine which she had marked out for her
mother's comfort. She and her maid Milly between them kept the old lady
in peace of mind and constant good humor; and if Mrs. Campion still
believed that Sydney was their great benefactor, and that it behoved her
to comport herself with dignity and grace as the mother of a Lord
Chancellor, Lettice did not attempt the hopeless task of undeceiving
her.

On this particular day there had been a poor pretence of morning work.
She had arranged her papers, the ink and pen were ready to her hand, and
a few lines were actually written. But her ideas were all in confusion,
and eluded her when she tried to fix them. She could not settle to
anything, and instead of writing she found herself drawing figures on
the blotting-pad. She knew that of old as a bad symptom, and gave up
trying to be industrious. The French window stood open, and the balmy
June morning tempted her out into the garden. She picked some flowers
for her vases, and pinned a rosebud on the collar of her soft grey
dress. It was a simple, straight-flowing dress, of the make which suits
every woman best, tall or short, handsome or plain, depending for its
beauty on shape and material alone, without any superfluous trimmings;
for Lettice had a man's knack of getting her dressmaker to obey orders,
and would have scorned to wear and pay for, as a matter of course,
whatever trappings might be sent home to her in lieu of what she wanted.

Clearly there were special reasons for her perturbation of mind, and if
any other woman had been at her side, and watched her in and out of the
house for ten minutes at a time, she would have had no difficulty in
divining that Lettice expected a visitor. She would probably go further
than this, and draw some confident conclusion as to the kind of welcome
likely to be accorded to the visitor; but here, at any rate, the
criticism would have been premature. Lettice did expect a visitor--Mr.
Alan Walcott to wit; but she had not the slightest notion as to how she
should receive him, or whether she would prefer that he should come or
stay away.

Her friendship with the poet had grown steadily since their first
meeting, and they were now on tolerably familiar terms. His manner had
made it impossible for her to doubt that he liked to talk and listen to
her, that he sought her company, and even considered himself entitled to
her sympathy. But when on the previous day he had gone so far as to
assert his title in words, he had done so with what seemed to her
remarkable audacity. And, although she had given him permission to come
to her house this morning, she was thinking now whether it would not
have been better if she had suggested the transfer of the volume of
which he spoke at Mrs. Hartley's on the following Sunday, or if she had
made her hint still broader by praising the cheapness and despatch of
the Parcels Delivery Company.

She had done nothing of this kind. She had been neither rude nor
effusive, for it was not in her nature to be either. He was coming "some
time after twelve," and in fact, punctually as the clock struck twelve,
Mr. Alan Walcott was at the door.

Milly announced him demurely. She observed him carefully, however, as
she admitted him into Lettice's room, and studied his card with interest
while carrying it to Miss Campion. No man so young and handsome had ever
called at Maple Cottage in her time before.

Lettice had been sitting with her mother, and she came down to her study
and received her visitor with a frank smile.

"It is really, very kind of you," she said, taking the innocent book
which he held out as a sort of warrant for his intrusion, "to be at all
this trouble. And this is a splendid copy, it reminds me of the volumes
my father used to be so fond of. I will take great care of it. How long
did you say I might keep it?"

"Till you have read it, at any rate. Or till I ask you for it
again--which I don't think I shall. You say that you used to see volumes
like this on your father's bookshelves. I should not wonder if you had
seen this very book there. It is a strange coincidence that I should
have had it in my possession for some time, and yet never noticed until
this morning, when I took it down to bring to you, that it had your name
on the fly-leaf. Look!"

He opened the book and held the fly-leaf against the window. The name
had been rubbed out with a wet finger, after the manner of second-hand
booksellers, but the "Lawrence Campion" was still easily legible.
Lettice could not restrain a little cry of delight.

"Yes, that is his dear handwriting, I know it so well! And this is his
book-plate, too, and his motto--'Vive ut vivas in vitam aeternam.' Oh,
where did you get the book? But I suppose my father's library was
scattered all over the country."

"No doubt it was. I have a few--perhaps twenty--with the same plate. My
uncle gave me them. I--a--Miss Campion--I came this morning--"

Apparently he did not quite know why he came, or at any rate he did not
find it easy to say. Lettice spoke again in order to relieve his
embarrassment, which she did not understand.

"It is so strange that I should have one of his books in my hand again.
You can imagine what a grief it was to him when he had to let them go."

"I am so glad to have restored to you something that was your father's.
I want you to give me a great pleasure, Miss Campion. These books--there
are not more than forty outside--I want you to have them. They are
yours, you know, because they were his, and he ought never to have been
deprived of them."

"I could not take them, indeed, Mr. Walcott. You are most kind to think
of it, but I could not!"

"Why?"

"That is hardly a reasonable question," she said, with a quiet little
laugh. "How could I?"

"I see very well how you could, but why should you not? It will be a
good deed, and there is no good deed without a sacrifice."

"And you want to sacrifice these books, which are so valuable!"

"No, it is no sacrifice to me, as I could easily prove to you. Believe
that it pleases me, and sacrifice your own feelings by taking them."

"I don't see why you should ask me. It is too great a present to make,
and--oh, dear me, I am afraid I do not know how to say what I mean! But
if you will give me this one book, with my father's name in it, I will
take it from you, and thank you very much for it."

"I shall not be satisfied if I may not send the rest. Miss Campion, I
came to say----"

Again he stammered and broke down. Lettice, who thought that he had
already delivered himself of his mental burden, was a little startled
now, especially as he got up and stood by her chair at the window.

"What a lovely little garden!" he said. "Why, you are quite in the
country here. What delightful roses! I--I want to say something else,
Miss Campion!"

"Yes," said Lettice, faintly, and doing her best to feel indifferent.

"We have not known each other long, but it seems to me that we know each
other well--at any rate that I know you well. Before I met you I had
never made the acquaintance of a woman who at the same time commanded my
respect, called my mind into full play, and aroused my sympathy. These
last few months have been the happiest of my life, because I have been
lifted above my old level, and have known for the first time what the
world might yet be to me. There is something more I want to say to you.
I think you know that I have been married--that my wife is--is no more.
You may or may not have heard that miserable story, of my folly,
and----"

"Oh, no!" cried Lettice, impulsively. "It is true that Mrs. Hartley told
me of the great trouble which fell upon you in the loss of which you
speak."

"The great trouble--yes! That is how Mrs. Hartley would put it. And the
Grahams, have they told you nothing?"

"Nothing more."

A look as of relief passed across his face, followed by a spasm of pain;
and he stood gazing wearily through the window.

"Perhaps they do not know, for I have never spoken of it to anyone. But
I want to speak; I want to get rid of some of the wretched burden, and
an irresistible impulse has brought me here to you. I am utterly
selfish; it is like taking your money, or your manuscripts, or your
flowers, or anything that you value, to come in this way and almost
insist on telling you my sordid story. It is altogether
unjustifiable--it is a mad presumption which I cannot account for,
except by saying that a blind instinct made me think that you alone, of
all the people in this world, could help me if you would!"

Lettice was deeply moved by various conflicting emotions; but there was
no hesitation in the sympathy which went out to meet this strange
appeal. Even her reason would probably have justified him in his
unconventional behavior; but it was sympathy, and not reason, which
prompted her to welcome and encourage his confidence.

"If I can help you--if it helps you to tell me anything, please speak."

"I knew I was not mistaken!" he said, with kindling eyes, as he sat down
in a low chair opposite to her. "I will not be long--I will not tell you
all; that would be useless, and needlessly painful. I married in haste,
after a week's acquaintance, the daughter of a French refugee, who came
to London in 1870, and earned a living by teaching his language to the
poorest class of pupils. Don't ask me why I married her. No doubt I
thought it was for love. She was handsome, and even charming in her way,
and for some months I tried to think I was happy. Then, gradually, she
let me wake from my fool's paradise. I found--you will despise me for a
dupe!--that I was not the first man she had pretended to love. Nay, it
was to me that she pretended--the other feeling was probably far more of
a reality. Before the year was out she had renewed her intimacy with my
rival--a compatriot of her own. You will suppose that we parted at once
when things came to this pass; but for some time I had only suspicion to
go upon. I knew that she was often away from home, and that she had even
been to places of amusement in this man's company; but when I spoke to
her she either lulled my uneasiness or pretended to be outraged by my
jealousy. Soon there was no bond of respect left between us; but as a
last chance, I resolved to break up our little home in England, and go
abroad. I could no longer endure my life with her. She had ceased to be
a wife in any worthy sense of the word, and was now my worst enemy, an
object of loathing rather than of love. Still, I remember that I had a
gleam of hope when I took her on the Continent, thinking it just
possible that by removing her from her old associations, I might win her
back to a sense of duty. I would have borne her frivolity; I would have
endured to be bound for life to a doll or a log, if only she could have
been outwardly faithful.

"Well, to make a long story short, we had not been abroad more than six
weeks when this man I have told you about made his appearance on the
scene. She must have written to him and asked him to come, at the very
moment when she was cheating me with a show of reviving affection; and I
own that the meeting of these two one day in the hotel gardens at
Aix-les-Bains drove me into a fit of temporary madness. We quarrelled; I
sent him a challenge, and we fought. He was not much hurt, and I escaped
untouched. The man disappeared, and I have never seen him from that day
to this, but I have some reason to think that he is dead."

He paused for a moment or two; and Lettice could not refrain from
uttering the words, "Your wife?" in a tone of painful interest.

"My wife?" he repeated slowly. "Ah yes, my wife. Well, after a stormy
scene with her, she became quiet and civil. She even seemed anxious to
please me, and to set my mind at rest. But she was merely hatching her
last plot against me, and I was as great a fool and dupe at this moment
as I had ever been before."

And then, with averted face, he told the story of his last interview
with her on the hills beyond Culoz. "I will not repeat anything she
said," he went on--it was his sole reservation--"although some of her
sentences are burned into my brain for ever. I suppose because they were
so true."

"Oh, no!" Lettice murmured involuntarily, and looking at him with
tear-dimmed eyes. She was intensely interested in his story, and Alan
Walcott felt assured by her face that the sympathy he longed for was not
withheld.

"My wound was soon healed," he said when the details of that terrible
scene were told; "but I was not in a hurry to come back to England. When
I did come back, I avoided as much as possible the few people who knew
me; and I have never to this moment spoken of my deliverance, which I
suppose they talk of as my loss."

"They think," said Lettice, slowly, for she was puzzled in her mind, and
did not know what to say, "that you are a widower?"

"And what am I?" he cried, walking up and down the room in a restless
way. "Am I not a widower? Has she not died completely out of my life? I
shall never see her again--she is dead and buried, and I am free? Ah, do
not look at me so doubtfully, do not take back the sympathy which you
promised me! Are you going to turn me away, hungry and thirsty for
kindness, because you imagine that my need is greater than you thought
it five minutes ago? I will not believe you are so cruel!"

"We need not analyze my feelings, Mr. Walcott. I could not do that
myself, until I have had time to think. But--is it right to leave other
people under the conviction that your wife is actually dead, when you
know that in all probability she is not?"

"I never said she was dead! I never suggested or acted a lie. May not a
man keep silence about his own most sacred affairs?"

"Perhaps he may," said Lettice. "It is not for me to judge you--and at
any rate, you have told me!"

She stood up and looked at him with her fearless grey eyes, whilst his
own anxiously scanned her face.

"I am very, very sorry for you. If I can do anything to help you, I
will. You must not doubt my sympathy, and I shall never withdraw my
promise. But just now I cannot think what it would be best to do or say.
Let me have time to think."

She held out her hand, and he took it, seeing that she wanted him to go.

"Good-bye!" he said. "God bless you for being what you are. It has done
me good to talk. When we meet again--unless you write and give me your
commands--I promise to do whatever you may tell me."

And with that, he went away.




CHAPTER X.

THE POET SPEAKS.


As soon as her visitor was gone, Lettice fell into a deep study. She had
two things especially to think about, and she began by wondering what
Mrs. Hartley would say if she knew that Alan Walcott's wife was alive,
and by repeating what he had said to her that morning: that a man was
not bound to tell his private affairs to the world. No! she told
herself, it was impossible for any man of self-respect to wear his heart
on his sleeve, to assume beforehand that people would mistake his
position, and to ticket himself as a deserted husband, lest forward
girls should waste their wiles upon him.

The thought was odious; and yet she had suggested it to him! Had she not
done more than that? Had she not implied that he had done a dishonorable
thing in concealing what he was in no way bound to reveal? What would he
think of her, or impute to her, for raising such a point at the very
moment when he was displaying his confidence in her, and appealing for
her sympathy? She blushed with shame at the idea.

He was already completely justified in her mind, for she did not go so
far as to put the case which a third person might have put in her own
interest. If Alan had been unfair or inconsiderate to anyone, it was
surely to Lettice herself. He had spoken familiarly to her, sought her
company, confessed his admiration in a more eloquent language than that
of words, and asked for a return of sentiment by those subtle appeals
which seem to enter the heart through none of the ordinary and ticketed
senses. It is true that he had not produced in her mind the distinct
impression that she was anything more to him than an agreeable talker
and listener in his conversational moods; but that was due to her
natural modesty rather than to his self-restraint. He had been
impatient, at times, of her slowness to respond, and it was only when he
saw whither this impatience was leading him that he resolved to tell her
all that she ought to know. It was not his delay, however, that
constituted the injustice of his conduct, but the fact of his appealing
to her in any way for the response which he had no right to ask.

Lettice was just as incapable of thinking that she had been unjustly
treated as she was of believing that Alan Walcott loved her. Thus she
was spared the humiliation that might have fallen on her if she had
understood that his visit was partly intended to guard her against the
danger of giving her love before it had been asked.

Having tried and acquitted her friend, and having further made up her
mind that she would write him a letter to assure him of his acquittal,
she summoned herself before the court of her conscience; and this was a
very different case from the one which had been so easily decided. Then
the presumption was all in favor of the accused; now it was all against
her. The guilt was as good as admitted beforehand, for as soon as
Lettice began to examine and cross-examine herself, she became painfully
aware of her transgressions.

What was this weight which oppressed her, and stifled her, and covered
her with shame? It was not merely sorrow for the misfortunes of her
friend. That would not have made her ashamed, for she knew well that
compassion was a woman's privilege, for which she has no reason to
blush. Something had befallen her this very morning which had caused her
to blush, and it was the first time in all her life that Lettice's cheek
had grown red for anything she had done, or thought, or said, or
listened to, in respect of any man whatever. Putting her father and
brother on one side, no man had had the power, for very few had had the
opportunity, to quicken the pulses in her veins as they were quickened
now. She had not lived to be six and twenty years old without knowing
what love between a man and woman really meant, but she had never
appropriated to herself the good things which she saw others enjoying.
It was not for want of being invited to the feast, for several of her
father's curates had been ready to grace their frugal boards by her
presence, and to crown her with the fillets of their dignity and
self-esteem. The prospect held up to her by these worthy men had not
allured her in any way; she had not loved their wine and oil, and thus
she had remained rich, according to the promise of the seer, with the
bread and salt of her own imaginings.

It would be wrong to suppose that Lettice had no strong passions,
because she had never loved, or even thought that she loved. The woman
of cultivated mind is often the woman of deepest feeling; her mental
strength implies her calmness, and the calm surface indicates the
greatest depth. It is in the restless hearts which beat themselves
against the shores of the vast ocean of womanhood that passion is so
quick to display itself, so vehement in its shallow force, so broken in
its rapid ebb. The real strength of humanity lies deep below the
surface; but a weak woman often mistakes for strength her irresistible
craving for happiness and satisfaction. It is precisely for this reason
that a liberal education and a full mind are even more essential to the
welfare of a woman than they are to the welfare of a man. The world has
left its women, with this irresistible craving in their hearts,
dependent, solitary, exposed to attack, and unarmed for defence; and as
a punishment it has been stung almost to death by the scorpions which
its cruelty generates. But a woman who has been thoroughly educated, a
woman of strong mind and gentle heart, is not dependent for happiness on
the caprice of others, or on the abandonment of half the privileges of
her sex, but draws from an inexhaustible well to which she has constant
access.

So Lettice, with the passions of her kind, and the cravings of her sex,
had been as happy as the chequered circumstances of her outer life would
permit; but now for the first time her peace of mind was disturbed, and
she felt the heaving of the awakened sea beneath.

Why had her heart grown cold when she heard that Alan Walcott's wife was
still alive? Why had her thought been so bitter when she told herself
that she had no right to give the man her sympathy? Why had the light
and warmth and color of life departed as soon as she knew that the woman
whom he had married, however unworthy she might be, was the only one who
could claim his fidelity? Alas, the answer to her questions was only too
apparent. The pain which it cost her to awake from her brief summer's
dream was her first admonition that she had dreamed at all. Not until
she had lost the right to rejoice in his admiration and respond to his
love, did she comprehend how much these things meant to her, and how far
they had been allowed to go.

The anguish of a first love which cannot be cherished or requited is
infinitely more grievous when a woman is approaching the age of thirty
than it is at seventeen or twenty. The recoil is greater and the
elasticity is less. But if Lettice suffered severely from the sudden
blow which had fallen upon her, she still had the consolation of knowing
that she could suffer in private, and that she had not betrayed the
weakness of her heart--least of all to him who had tried to make her
weak.

In the course of the evening she sat down and wrote to him--partly
because he had asked her to write, and partly in order that she might
say without delay what seemed necessary to be said.

     "DEAR MR. WALCOTT,--After you were gone this morning I thought a
     great deal about all that you said to me, and as you asked me for
     my opinion, and I promised to give it, perhaps I had better tell
     you what I think at once. I cannot see that you are, or have been,
     under any moral compulsion to repeat the painful events of your
     past life, and I am sorry if I implied that I thought you were. Of
     course, you may yourself hold that these facts impose a certain
     duty upon you, or you may desire that your position should be
     known. In that case you will do what you think right, and no one
     else can properly decide for you.

     "I was indeed grieved by your story. I wish it was in my power to
     lessen your pain; but, as it is not, I can only ask you to believe
     that if I could do so, I would.

     "You will be hard at work, like myself (as you told me), during the
     next few months. Is not hard work, after all, the very best of
     anodynes? I have found it so in the past, and I trust you have done
     so too, and will continue to do so.

     "Believe me, dear Mr. Walcott, yours very sincerely,

     "LETTICE CAMPION."

She hesitated for some time as to whether she had said too much, or too
little, or whether what she had said was expressed in the right way. But
in the end she sent it as it was written.

Then, if she had been a thoroughly sensible and philosophical young
woman, she would have forced herself to do some hard work, by way of
applying the anodyne of which she had spoken. But that was too much to
expect from her in the circumstances. What she actually did was to go to
bed early and cry herself to sleep.

She had not considered whether her letter required, or was likely to
receive an answer, and she was therefore a little surprised when the
postman brought her one on the afternoon of the following day. Not
without trepidation, she took it to her room and read it.

"DEAR MISS CAMPION"--so the letter began--"I thank you very much for
your kindness. I have learned to find so much meaning in your words that
I think I can tell better than anyone else how to interpret the spirit
from the letter of what you say. So, when you tell me that no one can
decide for me what it is my duty to do, I understand that, if you were
in my position at this moment, you would rather desire that it should be
known. Henceforth I desire it, and I shall tell Mrs. Hartley and Mrs.
Graham as much as is necessary the next time I see them. This will be
equivalent to telling the world--will it not?

"Two other things I understand from your letter. First, that you do not
wish to meet me so often in future; and, second, that though you know my
pain would be diminished by the frank expression of your sympathy, and
though you might find it in your heart to be frankly sympathetic, yet
you do not think it would be right, and you do not mean to be actively
beneficent. Am I wrong? If I am, you must forgive me; but, if I am not,
I cannot accept your decision without entering my protest.

"Think, my dear friend--you will allow me that word!--to what you
condemn me if you take your stand upon the extreme dictates of
conventionality. You cannot know what it would mean to me if you were to
say, 'He is a married man, and we had better not meet so frequently in
future.' To you, that would be no loss whatever. To me, it would be the
loss of happiness, of consolation, of intellectual life. Listen and have
pity upon me! I could not say it to your face, but I will say it now,
though you may think it an unpardonable crime. You have become so
necessary to me that I cannot contemplate existence without you. Have
you not seen it already--or, if you have not, can you doubt when you
look back on the past six months--that respect has grown into affection,
and affection into love? Yes, I love you, Lettice!--in my own heart I
call you Lettice every hour of the day--and I cannot live any longer
without telling you of my love.

"When I began this letter I did not mean to tell you--at any rate not
to-day. Think of the condition of my mind when I am driven by such a
sudden impulse--think, and make allowance for me!

"I am not sure what I expected when I resolved to make my sad story
known to you. Perhaps, in my madness, I thought, 'There is a right and a
wrong above the right and wrong of society's judgments; and she is on
the higher levels of humanity, and will take pity on my misfortunes.' I
only say, perhaps I thought this. I don't know what I thought. But I
knew I could not ask you to be my wife, and I determined that you should
know why I could not.

"Oh, how I hate that woman! I believe that she is dead. I tell myself
every day that she is dead, and that there is nothing to prevent me from
throwing myself at your feet, and praying you to redeem me from misery.
Is not my belief enough to produce conviction in you? No--you will not
believe it; and, perhaps, if you did, you would not consent to redeem
me. No! I must drag my lengthening chain until I die! I must live in
pain and disgust, bound to a corpse, covered with a leprosy, because the
angel whose mission it is to save me will not come down from her heaven
and touch me with her finger.

"You shall not see these words, Lettice--my dear Lettice! They are the
offspring of a disordered brain. I meant to write you such a calm and
humble message, telling you that your counsel was wise--that I would
follow it--that I knew I had your sympathy, and that I reverenced you as
a saint. If I go on writing what I do not mean to send, it is only
because the freedom of my words has brought me peace and comfort, and
because it is good that I should allow myself to write the truth, though
I am not allowed to write it to _you_!

"Not allowed to write the truth to you, Lettice? That, surely, is a
blasphemy! If I may not write the truth to you, then I may not know
you--I may not worship you--I may not give my soul into your keeping.

"I will test it. My letter shall go. You will not answer it--you will
only sit still, and either hate or love me; and one day I shall know
which it has been. ALAN."

Whilst Lettice read this wild and incoherent letter, she sank on her
knees by her bedside, unable in any other attitude to bear the strain
which it put upon her feelings.

"How dare he?" she murmured, at the first outbreak of his passionate
complaint; but, as she went on reading, the glow of pity melted her
woman's heart, and only once more she protested, in words, against the
audacious candor of her lover.

"How could he?"

And as she finished, and her head was bowed upon her hands, and upon the
letter which lay between them, her lips sought out the words which he
had written last of all, as though they would carry a message of
forgiveness--and consolation to the spirit which hovered beneath it.




CHAPTER XI.

SYDNEY GIVES ADVICE.


The day after Sydney Campion had heard Brooke Dalton's story of the
disappearance of Alan Walcott's wife had been a very busy one for him.
He had tried to get away from his work at an early hour, in order that
he might pay one of his rare visits to Maple Cottage, and combine with
his inquiries into the welfare of his mother certain necessary cautions
to his sister Lettice. It was indispensable that she should be made to
understand what sort of man this precious poet was known to be, and how
impossible it had become that a sister of his should continue to treat
him as a friend.

Why, the fellow might be--probably was--a murderer! And, if not that, at
all events there was such a mystery surrounding him, and such an
indelible stain upon his character, that he, Sydney Campion, could not
suffer her to continue that most objectionable acquaintance.

But his duties conspired with his dinner to prevent the visit from being
made before the evening, and it was nearly eight o'clock when he arrived
at Hammersmith. He had dined with a friend in Holborn, and had taken a
Metropolitan train at Farringdon Street, though, as a rule, he held
himself aloof from the poison-traps of London, as he was pleased to call
the underground railway, and travelled mostly in the two-wheeled
gondolas which so lightly float on the surface of the stream above.

As he was about to leave the station, his eye encountered a face and
figure which attracted him, and made him almost involuntarily come to a
standstill. It was Milly Harrington, Lettice's maid, who, having posted
her mistress' letter to Alan Walcott, had turned her listless steps in
this direction.

Milly's life in London had proved something of a disappointment to her.
The cottage on Brook Green was even quieter than the Rectory at
Angleford, where she had at least the companionship of other servants,
and a large acquaintance in the village. Lettice was a kind and
considerate mistress, but a careful one: she did not let the young
country-bred girl go out after dark, and exercised an unusual amount of
supervision over her doings. Of late, these restrictions had begun to
gall Milly, for she contrasted her lot with that of servants in
neighboring houses, and felt that Miss Lettice was a tyrant compared
with the easy-going mistresses of whom she heard. Certainly Miss Lettice
gave good wages, and was always gentle in manner and ready to sympathize
when the girl had bad news of her old grandmother's health; but she did
not allow Milly as much liberty as London servants are accustomed to
enjoy, and Milly, growing learned in her rights by continued comparison,
fretted against the restraints imposed upon her.

She might have "kept company" with the milkman, with the policeman, with
one of the porters at the station: for these, one and all, laid their
hearts and fortunes at her feet; but Milly rejected their overtures with
scorn. Her own prettiness of form and feature had been more than ever
impressed upon her by the offers which she refused; and she was
determined, as she phrased it, "not to throw herself away."

Her fancy that "Mr. Sydney" admired her had not been a mistaken one.
Sydney had always been susceptible to the charms of a pretty face; and
Nature had preordained a certain measure of excuse for any man who felt
impelled to look twice at Milly, or even to speak to her on a flimsy
pretext. And Milly was on Nature's side, for she did not resent being
looked at or spoken to, although there was more innocence and ignorance
of evil on her side than men were likely to give her credit for.
Therefore Sydney had for some time been on speaking terms with her, over
and above what might have been natural in an occasional visitor to the
Rectory and Maple Cottage. He saw and meant no harm to her in his
admiration, and had no idea at present that his occasional smile or idle
jesting compliment made the girl's cheeks burn, her heart beat fast,
made her nights restless and her days long. He took it for granted that
gratified vanity alone made her receive his attentions with pleasure.
His gifts--for he could be lavish when he liked--were all, he thought,
that attracted her. She was a woman, and could, no doubt, play her own
game and take care of herself. She had her weapons, as other women had.
Sydney's opinion of women was, on the whole, a low one; and he had a
supreme contempt for all women of the lower class--a contempt which
causes a man to look on them only as toys--instruments for his
pleasure--to be used and cast aside. He believed that they
systematically preyed on men, and made profit out of their weakness.
That Milly was at a disadvantage with him, because she was weak and
young and unprotected, scarcely entered his head. He would have said
that she had the best of it. She was pretty and young, and could make
him pay for it if he did her any harm. She was one of a class--a class
of harpies, in his opinion--and he did not attribute any particular
individuality to her at all.

But Milly was a very real and individual woman, with a nature in which
the wild spark of passion might some day be roused with disastrous
results. It is unsafe to play with the emotions of a person who is
simply labelled, often mistakenly and insufficiently, in your mind as
belonging to a class, and possessing the characteristics of that class.
There is always the chance that some old strain of tendency, some freak
of heredity, may develop in the way which is most of all dangerous to
you and to your career. For you cannot play with a woman's physical
nature without touching, how remotely soever, her spiritual constitution
as well; and, as Browning assures us, it is indeed "an awkward thing to
play with souls, and matter enough to save one's own."

Sydney Campion, however, concerned himself very little with his own
soul, or the soul of anybody else. He went up to Milly and greeted her
with a smile that brought the color to her face.

"Well, Milly," he said, "are you taking your walks abroad to-night? Is
your mistress pretty well? I was just going to Maple Cottage."

"Yes, sir, mistress is pretty well; but I don't think Miss Lettice is,"
said Milly, falling back into her old way of speaking of the rector's
daughter. "She mentioned that she was going to bed early. You had better
let me go back first and open the door for you."

"Perhaps it would be best. Not well, eh? What is the matter?"

"I don't know, but I think Miss Campion has a bad headache. I am sure
she has been crying a great deal." Milly said this with some hesitation.

"I am sorry to hear that."

"I am afraid Mr. Walcott brought her bad news in the morning, for she
has not been herself at all since he left."

"Do you say that Mr. Walcott was there this morning?"

Sydney spoke in a low tone, but with considerable eagerness, so that the
girl knew she had not thrown her shaft in vain.

"Milly, this concerns me very much. I must have a little talk with you,
but we cannot well manage it here. See! there is no one in the
waiting-room; will you kindly come with me for a minute or two? It is
for your mistress' good that I should know all about this. Come!"

So they went into the dreary room together, and they sat down in a
corner behind the door, which by this time was almost dark. There Sydney
questioned her about Alan Walcott, with a view to learning all that she
might happen to know about him. Milly required little prompting, for she
was quite ready to do all that he bade her, and she told him at least
one piece of news which he was not prepared to hear.

Five minutes would have sufficed for all that Milly had to say; but the
same story may be very long or very short according to the circumstances
in which it is told. Half-an-hour was not sufficient to-night: at any
rate, it took these two more than half-an-hour to finish what they had
to say. And even then it was found that further elucidations would be
necessary in the future, and an appointment was made for another
meeting. But the talk had turned on Milly herself, and Milly's hopes and
prospects, before that short half-hour had sped.

"Good-night, Milly," said Sydney, as they left the station. "You are a
dear little girl to tell me so much. Perhaps you had better not say to
your mistress that you saw me to-night. I shall call to-morrow
afternoon. Good-night, dear."

He kissed her lightly, in a shadowy corner of the platform, before he
turned away; and thought rather admiringly for a minute or two of the
half-frightened, half-adoring eyes that were riveted upon his face.
"Poor little fool!" he said to himself, as he signalled a cab. For even
in that one short interview he had mastered the fact that Milly was
rather fool than knave.

The girl went home with a light heart, believing that she had done a
service to the mistress whom she really loved, and shyly, timorously
joyous at the thought that she had met at last with an admirer--a lover,
perhaps!--such as her heart desired. Of course, Miss Lettice would be
angry if she knew; but there was nothing wrong in Mr. Sydney's
admiration, said Milly, lifting high her little round white chin; and if
he told her to keep silence she was bound to hold her tongue.

This was a mean thing that Sydney had done, and he was not so hardened
as to have done it without a blush. Yet so admirably does our veneer of
civilization conceal the knots and flaws beneath it that he went to
sleep in the genuine belief that he had saved his sister from a terrible
danger, and the name of Campion from the degradation which threatened
it.

On the next day he reached Maple Cottage between four and five o'clock.

"How is your mistress?" he said to Milly.

She had opened the door and let him in with a vivid blush and smile,
which made him for a moment, and in the broad light of day, feel
somewhat ashamed of himself.

"Oh, sir, she is no better. She has locked herself in, and I heard her
sobbing, fit to break her heart," said Milly, in real concern for her
mistress' untold grief.

"Let her know that I am here. I will go to Mrs. Campion's room."

"Well, mother!" he said, in the hearty, jovial voice in which he knew
that she liked best to be accosted, "here is your absentee boy again.
How are you by this time?"

"Not very bright to-day, Sydney," said his mother. "I never am very
bright now-a-days. But what are you doing, my dear? Are you getting on
well? Have they----"

"No, mother, they have not made me Lord Chancellor yet. We must wait a
while for that. But I must not complain; I have plenty of work, and my
name is in the papers every day, and I have applied for silk, and--have
you found your spectacles yet, mother?"

Details of his life and work were, as he knew, absolutely unmeaning to
Mrs. Campion.

"Oh, the rogue! He always teased me about my spectacles," said Mrs.
Campion, vaguely appealing to an unseen audience. "It is a remarkable
thing, Sydney, but I put them down half an hour ago, and now I cannot
find them anywhere."

"Well, now, that is strange, Mrs. Campion; but not very unusual. If I
remember right, you had lost your spectacles when I was here last; and
as I happened to pass a good shop this morning, it occurred to me that
you would not object to another pair of pebbles. So here they are; and I
have bought you something to test them with."

He produced a cabinet portrait of himself, such as the stationers were
beginning to hang on the line in their shop windows. The fact marked a
distinct advance in his conquest of popularity; and Sydney was not
mistaken in supposing that the old lady would appreciate this portrait
of her handsome and distinguished son. So, with her spectacles and her
picture, Mrs. Campion was happy.

When Sydney's knock came to the door, Lettice was still crouching by her
bedside over the letter which had reached her an hour before. She sprang
up in nervous agitation, not having recognized the knock, and began to
bathe her face and brush her hair. She was relieved when Milly came and
told her who the caller was; but even Sydney's visit at that moment was
a misfortune. She was inclined to send him an excuse, and not come down;
but in the end she made up her mind to see him.

"My dear child," Sydney said, kissing her on the cheek, "how ill you
look! Is anything the matter?"

"No, nothing. Don't take any notice of me," Lettice said, with a
significant look at her mother.

They conversed for a time on indifferent matters, and then Sydney asked
her to show him the garden. It was evident that he wanted to speak to
her privately, so she took him into her study; and there, without any
beating about the bush, he began to discharge his mind of its burden.

"I want to talk to you seriously, Lettice, and on what I'm afraid will
be a painful subject; but it is my manifest duty to do so, as I think
you will admit before I go. You are, I believe, on friendly
terms--tolerably familiar terms--with Mr. Walcott?"

This was in true forensic style; but of course Sydney could not have
made a greater mistake than by entering solemnly, yet abruptly, on so
delicate a matter. Lettice was in arms at once.

"Stay a moment, Sydney. You said this was to be a painful subject to me,
and then you mention the name of Mr. Walcott. I do not understand."

"Well!" said Sydney, somewhat disconcerted; "I don't know what made me
conclude that it would be painful. I did not mean to say that. I am very
glad it is not so."

He stopped to cough, then looked out of the window, and softly whistled
to himself. Lettice, meanwhile, cast about hastily in her mind for the
possible bearing of what her brother might have to say. She was about to
take advantage of his blunder, and decline to hear anything further; but
for more than one reason which immediately occurred to her, she thought
that it would be better to let him speak.

"I do not think you could have any ground for supposing that such a
subject would be specially painful to me; but never mind that. What were
you going to say?"

Now it was Sydney's turn to be up in arms, for he felt sure that Lettice
was acting a part.

"What I know for a fact," he said, "is that you have seen a good deal of
Mr. Walcott during the past six months, and that people have gone so far
as to remark on your--on his manifest preference for your company. I
want to say that there are grave reasons why this should not be
permitted to go on."

Lettice bit her lip sharply, but said nothing.

"Do you know," Sydney continued, becoming solemn again as he prepared to
hurl his thunderbolts, "that Mr. Walcott is a married man?"

"Whether I know it or not, I do not acknowledge your right to ask me the
question."

"I ask it by the right of a brother. Do you know that if he is not a
married man, he is something infinitely worse? That the last time his
wife was seen in his company, they went on a lonely walk together, and
he came back again without her?"

"How do you know this?" Lettice asked him faintly. He set down her
agitation to the wrong cause, and thought that his design was
succeeding.

"I know it from the man who was most intimately connected with Walcott
at the time. And I heard it at my club--in the course of the same
conversation in which your name was mentioned. Think what that means to
me! However, it may not have gone too far if we are careful to avoid
this man in future. He does not visit here, of course?"

"He has been here."

"You surely don't correspond?"

"We have corresponded."

"Good heavens! it is worse than I thought. But you will promise me not
to continue the acquaintance?"

"No, I cannot promise that!"

"Not after all I have told you of him?"

"You have told me nothing to Mr. Walcott's discredit. I have answered
your questions because you are, as you reminded me, my brother. Does it
not strike you that you have rather exceeded your privilege?"

Sydney was amazed at her quiet indifference.

"I really cannot understand you, Lettice. Do you mean to say that you
will maintain your friendship with this man, although you know him to be
a----"

"Well?"

"At any rate, a _possible_ murderer?"

"The important point," said Lettice coldly, "seems to be what Mr.
Walcott is actually, not what he is possibly. Your 'possible' is a
matter of opinion, and I am very distinctly of opinion that Mr. Walcott
is an innocent and honorable man."

"If you believe him innocent, then you believe that his wife is living?"

"I know nothing about his wife. That is a question which does not
concern me."

"Your obstinacy passes my comprehension." When Sydney said this, he rose
from the chair in which he had been sitting and stood on the hearth-rug
before the grate, with his hands behind him and his handsome brows
knitted in a very unmistakable frown. It was in a lower and more
regretful voice that he continued, after a few minutes' silence: "I must
say that the independent line you have been taking for some time past is
not very pleasing to me. You seem to have a perfect indifference to our
name and standing in the world. You like to fly in the face of
convention, to----"

"Oh, Sydney, why should we quarrel?" said Lettice, sadly. Hitherto she
had been standing by the window, but she now came up to him and looked
entreatingly into his face. "Indeed, I will do all that I can to satisfy
you. I am not careless about your prospects and standing in the world;
indeed, I am not. But they could not be injured by the fact that I am
earning my own living as an author. I am sure they could not!"

"You say that you will do all you can to satisfy me," said Sydney, who
was not much mollified by her tenderness. "Will you give up the
acquaintance of that man?"

"I am not certain that I shall ever see Mr. Walcott again; but if you
ask me whether I will promise to insult him if I do see him, or to cut
him because he has been accused of dishonorable acts, then I certainly
say, No!"

"How you harp upon his honor! The honor of a married man who has
introduced himself to you under a false name!"

"What do you mean?" said Lettice, starting and coloring. "Are there any
more charges against him?"

"You seem to be so well prepared to defend him that perhaps you will not
be surprised to hear that his name is not Walcott at all, but
Bundlecombe, and that his mother kept a small sweet-stuff shop, or
something of that kind, at Thorley. Bundlecombe! No wonder he was
ashamed of it!"

This shaft took better than either of the others. Lettice was fairly
taken aback. The last story did not sound as if it had been invented,
and Sydney had evidently been making inquiries. Moreover, there flashed
across her mind the remembrance of the book which Alan Walcott had given
her--only yesterday morning. How long ago it seemed already! Alan
Bundlecombe! What did the name signify, and why should any man care to
change the name that he was born with? She recollected Mrs. Bundlecombe
very well--the old woman who came and took her first twenty pounds of
savings; the widow of the bookseller who had bought part of her father's
library. If he was her son, he might not have much to be proud of, but
why need he have changed his name?

Decidedly this was a blow to her. She had no defence ready, and Sydney
saw that she was uncomfortable.

"Well," he said, "I must not keep you any longer. I suppose, even
now"--with a smile--"you will not give me your promise; but you will
think over what I have told you, and I dare say it will all come right."

Her eyes were full of wistful yearning as she put her hand on his
shoulder and kissed him.

"You believe that I _mean_ to do right, don't you, Sydney?" she asked.

He laughed a little. "We all mean to do right, my dear. But we don't all
go the same way to work, I suppose. Yes, yes; I believe you mean well;
but do, for heaven's sake, try to act with common-sense. Then, as I
said, everything will come right in the end."

He went back to his mother's room, and Lettice stood for some minutes
looking out of the window, and sighing for the weariness and disillusion
which hung like a cloud upon her life.

"All will come right?" she murmured, re-echoing Sydney's words with
another meaning. "No. Trouble and sorrow, and pain may be lived down and
forgotten; but without sincerity _nothing_ can come right!"




BOOK III.

AMBITION.

              "I count life just a stuff
    To try the soul's strength on, educe the man,
    Who keeps one end in view makes all things serve."

    ROBERT BROWNING.




CHAPTER XII.

ALAN WALCOTT.


Alan Walcott knew perfectly well that he had done a mad, if not an
unaccountable thing in writing his letter to Miss Campion. He knew it,
that is to say, after the letter was gone, for when he was writing it,
and his heart was breaking through the bonds of common-sense which
generally restrained him, he did not feel the difficulty of accounting
either for his emotions or for his action. The wild words, as he wrote
them, had for him not only the impress of paramount truth, but also the
sanction of his convictions and impulse at the moment. No stronger
excuse has been forthcoming for heroic deeds which have shaken the world
and lived in history.

Who amongst us all, when young and ardent, with the fire of generosity
and imagination in the soul, has not written at least one such letter,
casting reserve and prudence to the winds, and placing the writer
absolutely at the mercy of the man or woman who received it?

This man was a poet by nature and by cultivation; but what is the
culture of a poet save the fostering of a distempered imagination? I do
not mean the culture of a prize poet, or a poet on a newspaper staff, or
a gentleman who writes verses for society, or a professor of poetry, or
an authority who knows the history and laws of prosody in every tongue,
and can play the bard or the critic with equal facility. Alan Walcott
had never ceased to work in distemper, because his nature was
distempered to begin with, and his taste had not been modified to suit
the conventional canons of his critics. Therefore it was not much to be
wondered at if his prose poem to the woman he loved was a distempered
composition.

The exaltation of the mood in which he had betrayed himself to Lettice
was followed by a mood of terrible depression, and almost before it
would have been possible for an answer to reach him, even if she had sat
down and written to him without an hour's delay, he began to assure
himself that she intended to treat him with silent contempt--that his
folly had cost him not only her sympathy but her consideration, and that
there was no hope left for him.

He had indeed told her that he did not expect a reply; but now he
tortured himself with the belief that silence on her part could have
only one explanation. Either she pitied him, and would write to prevent
his despair, or she was indignant, and would tell him so, or else she
held him in such contempt that she would not trouble herself to take the
slightest notice of his effusion. He craved for her indignation now as
he had craved for her sympathy before; but he could not endure her
indifference.

A man of five-and-thirty whose youth has been spent amongst the prodigal
sons and daughters of the world's great family, who has wasted his moral
patrimony, and served masters and mistresses whom he despised, is not
easily brought to believe that he can be happy again in the love of a
pure woman. He has lost confidence in his own romantic feelings, and in
his power to satisfy the higher needs of a woman's delicate and exacting
heart. Usually, as was once the case with Walcott, he is a cynic and a
professed despiser of women, affecting to judge them all by the few whom
he has met, in spite of the fact that he has put himself in the way of
knowing only the weakest and giddiest of the sex. But when such a man,
gradually and with difficulty, has found a pearl among women, gentle and
true, intellectual yet tenderly human, with whom his instinct tells him
he might spend the rest of his life in honor and peace, he is ready in
the truest sense to go and sell all that he has in order to secure the
prize. Nothing has any further value for him in comparison with her, and
all the roots of his nature lay firm hold upon her. Alas for this man if
his mature love is given in vain, or if, like Alan Walcott, he is
debarred from happiness by self-imposed fetters which no effort can
shake off!

For four-and-twenty hours he struggled with his misery. Then, to his
indescribable joy, there came a message from Lettice.

It was very short, and it brought him bad news; but at any rate it
proved that she took an interest in his welfare, and made him
comparatively happy.

     "I think you should hear"--so it began, without any introductory
     phrase--'that the story you told me of what happened at
     Aix-les-Bains is known to men in this country who cannot be your
     friends, since they relate it in their own fashion at their clubs,
     and add their own ill-natured comments. Perhaps if you are
     forewarned you will be fore-armed.

     "Lettice Campion."

Not a word as to his letter; but he was not much troubled on this score.
That she had written to him at all, and written evidently because she
felt some concern for his safety, was enough to console him at the
moment.

When he began to consider the contents of her note it disturbed him more
than a little. He had not imagined that his secret, such as it was, had
passed into the keeping of any other man, still less that it had become
club-talk in London. He saw at once what evil construction might be put
upon it by malicious gossip-mongers, and he knew that henceforth he was
face to face with a danger which he could do little or nothing to avert.

What should he attempt in his defence? How should he use the weapon
which Lettice had put into his hand by forewarning him? One reasonable
idea suggested itself, and this was that he should tell the true story
to those who knew him best, in order that they might at any rate have
the power to meet inventions and exaggerations by his own version of the
facts. He busied himself during the next few days in this melancholy
task, calling at the house of his friends, and making the best pretext
he could for introducing his chapter of autobiography.

He called on the Grahams, amongst others, and was astonished to find
that they knew the story already.

"I have told the facts to one or two," he said, "for the reason that I
have just mentioned to you, but I think they understood that it would do
me no good to talk about it, except in contradiction of unfriendly
versions. How did you hear it?"

Graham took out of his pocket a copy of _The Gadabout_ and said,

"I'm afraid you have made enemies, Walcott, and if you have not seen
this precious concoction it would be no kindness to you to conceal it.
Here--you will see at a glance how much they have embellished it."

Walcott took the paper, and read as follows:--

"It is probable that before long the public may be startled by a
judicial inquiry into the truth of a story which has been told with much
circumstantiality concerning the remarkable disappearance of the wife of
a well-known poet some three or four years ago."

Then came the details, without any mention of persons or places, and the
paragraph concluded in this fashion. "It is not certain how the matter
will come into court, but rumor states that there is another lady in the
case, that the buried secret came to light in a most dramatic way, and
that evidence is forthcoming from very unexpected quarters."

The victim of this sorry piece of scandal gazed at the paper in a state
of stupefaction.

"Of course," said Graham, "it is not worth while to notice that rag.
Half of what it says is clearly a downright invention. If only you could
get hold of the writer and thrash him, it might do some good; but these
liars are very hard to catch. As to the 'other lady,' there is nothing
in that, is there?"

Both Graham and his wife looked anxiously at Walcott. They knew of his
attentions to Lettice, and were jealous of him on that account; and they
had been discussing with each other the possibility of their friend's
name being dragged into a scandal.

Walcott was livid with rage.

"The cur!" he cried; "the lying hound! He has entirely fabricated the
beginning and the end of this paragraph. There is no ground whatever for
saying that a case may come into court. There is no 'lady in the case'
at all. He has simply put on that tag to make his scrap of gossip worth
another half-crown. Is it not abominable, Graham?"

"It is something more than abominable. To my mind this sort of thing is
one of the worst scandals of the present day. But I felt sure there was
nothing in it, and the few who guess that it refers to you will draw the
same conclusion. Don't think any more about it!"

"A lie sticks when it is well told," said Walcott, gloomily. "There are
plenty of men who would rather believe it than the uninteresting truth."

But the Grahams, relieved on the point that mainly concerned them, could
not see much gravity in the rest of the concoction, and Walcott had
scant pity from them. He went home disconsolate, little dreaming of the
reception which awaited him there.

He occupied a floor in Montagu Place, Bloomsbury, consisting of three
rooms: a drawing-room, a bed-room, and a small study; and, latterly,
Mrs. Bundlecombe, whose acquaintance the reader has already made, had
used a bed-room at the top of the house.

Alan's mother and Mrs. Bundlecombe had been sisters. They were the
daughters of a well-to-do farmer in Essex, and, as will often happen
with sisters of the same family, brought up and cared for in a precisely
similar way, they had exhibited a marked contrast in intellect, habits
of thought, and outward bearing. The one had absorbed the natural
refinement of her mother, who had come of an old Huguenot family long
ago settled on English soil; the other was moulded in the robust and
coarse type of her father. Bessy was by preference the household
factotum not to say the drudge of the family, with a turn for puddings,
poultry, and the management of servants. Lucy clung to her mother, and
books (though both were constant students of _The Family Herald_), and
was nothing if not romantic. Both found some one to love them, and both,
as it happened, were married on the same day. Their parents had died
within a year of each other, and then the orphaned girls had come to
terms with their lovers, and accepted a yoke of which they had
previously fought shy. Bessy's husband was a middle-aged bookseller in
the neighboring town of Thorley, who had admired her thrifty and homely
ways, and had not been deterred by her want of intelligence. Lucy,
though her dreams had soared higher, was fairly happy with a
schoolmaster from Southampton, whose acquaintance she had made on a
holiday at the seaside.

Alan, who was the only offspring of this latter union, had been well
brought up, for his father's careful teaching and his mother's
gentleness and imagination supplied the complementary touches which are
necessary to form the basis of culture. The sisters had not drifted
apart after their marriage so much as might have been expected. They had
visited each other, and Alan, as he grew up, conceived a strong
affection for his uncle at Thorley, who--a childless man himself--gave
him delightful books, and showed him others still more delightful, who
talked to him on the subjects which chiefly attracted him, and was the
first to fire his brain with an ambition to write and be famous. Aunt
Bessy was tolerated for her husband's sake, but it was Uncle Samuel who
drew the lad to Thorley. In due time Alan began to teach in his father's
school, and before he was twenty-one had taken his degree at London
University. Then his mother died, and shortly afterwards he was left
comparatively alone in the world.

Now, school-keeping had never been a congenial occupation to Alan, whose
poetic temperament was chafed by the strict and ungrateful routine of
the business. His father had been to the manner born, and things had
prospered with him, but Alan by himself would not have been able to
achieve a like success. He knew this, and was proud of his incapacity;
and he took the first opportunity of handing over the establishment to a
successor. The money which he received for the transfer, added to that
which his father had left, secured him an income on which it was
possible to live, and to travel, and to print a volume of poems. For a
short time, at least, he lived as seemed best in his own eyes, and was
happy.

When he was in England he still occasionally visited Thorley; and it was
thus that Milly Harrington came to know him by sight. Her grandmother
did not know the Bundlecombes, but Milly came to the conclusion that
Alan was their son, and this was the tale which she had told to Sydney
Campion, and which Sydney had repeated to his sister.

The last visit paid by Alan to Thorley was some time after his uncle's
death, and he had then confided to his aunt the story of his marriage,
and of its unfortunate sequel. He happened to have learned that the man
with whom he had fought at Aix-les-Bains was back in London, and it
seemed not improbable at that moment that he would soon hear news of his
fugitive wife. When he mentioned this to the widow--who was already
taking steps to sell her stock-in-trade--she immediately conceived the
idea that her boy, as she called Alan, was in imminent danger, that the
wife would undoubtedly turn up again, and that it was absolutely
necessary for his personal safety that he should have an intrepid and
watchful woman living in the same house with him. So she proposed the
arrangement which now existed, and Alan had equably fallen in with her
plan. He did not see much of her when she came to London, and there was
very little in their tastes which was congenial or compatible; but she
kept him straight in the matter of his weekly bills and his laundress,
and he had no desire to quarrel with the way in which she managed these
affairs for him.

When Alan came home after his call at the Grahams', weary and
disconsolate, with a weight on his mind of which he could not rid
himself, the door was opened by his aunt. Her white face startled him,
and still more the gesture with which she pointed upstairs, in the
direction of their rooms. His heart sank at once, for he knew that the
worst had befallen him.

"Hush!" said his aunt in a hoarse whisper, "do not go up. She is there.
She came in the morning and would not go away."

"How is she? I mean what does she look like?"

He was very quiet; but he had leaned both hands upon the hall table, and
was gazing at his aunt with despairing eyes.

"Bad, my boy, bad! The worst that a woman can look, Oh, Alan, go away,
and do not come near her. Fly, immediately, anywhere out of her reach!
Let me tell her that you have gone to the other end of the world rather
than touch her again. Oh, Alan, my sister's child!--go, go, and grace
abounding be with you."

"No, Aunt Bessy, that will never do. I cannot run away. Why, don't you
see for one thing that this will prove what lies they have been telling
about me? They said I was a murderer--" he laughed somewhat wildly as he
spoke--"and here is the murdered woman. And they said there was evidence
coming to prove it. Perhaps she will tell them how it happened, and how
she came to life again. There, you see, there is good in
everything--even in ghosts that come to life again!"

Then his voice dropped, and the color went out of his face.

"What is she doing?" he asked, in a sombre tone.

"She went to sleep on the sofa in the drawing-room. She made me send out
for brandy, and began to rave at me in such a way that I was bound to do
it, just to keep her quiet. And now she is in her drunken sleep!"

Alan shuddered. He knew what that meant.

"Come," he said: "let us go up. We cannot stand here any longer."

They went into his study, which was on the same floor as the
drawing-room, and here Alan sank upon a chair, looking doggedly at the
closed door which separated him from the curse of his existence. After a
while he got up, walked across the landing, and quietly opened the door.

There she lay, a repulsive looking woman, with the beauty of her youth
corrupted into a hateful mask of vice. She had thrown her arms above her
head and seemed to be fast asleep.

He returned to the study, shut the door again, and sat down at the
table, leaning his head upon his hands. Aunt Bessy came and sat beside
him--not to speak, but only that he might know he was not alone.

"That," he muttered to himself at last, "is my wife!"

The old woman at his side trembled, and laid her hand upon his arm.

"I am beginning to know her," he said, after another long pause. "Some
men discover the charms of their wives before marriage; others--the
fools--find them out after. In the first year she was unfaithful to me.
Then she shot me like a dog. What will the end be?"

"It can be nothing worse, my boy. She has ruined you already; she cannot
do it twice. Oh, why did you ever meet her! Why did not Heaven grant
that a good woman, like Lettice Campion----"

"Do not name her here!" he cried sharply. "Let there be something sacred
in the world!"

He looked at his aunt as he spoke; but she did not return his gaze. She
was sitting rigid in her chair, staring over his shoulder with
affrighted eyes. Alan turned round quickly, and started to his feet.

The woman in the other room had stealthily opened the door, and stood
there, disheveled and half-dressed, with a cunning smile on her face.

"Alan, my husband!" she said, in French, holding out both hands to him,
and reeling a step nearer, "here we are at last. I have longed for this
day, my friend--let us be happy. After so many misfortunes, to be
reunited once again! Is it not charming?"

She spoke incoherently, running her words into one another, and yet
doing her best to be understood.

Alan looked at her steadily. "What do you want?" he asked. "Why have you
sought me out?"

"My faith, what should I want? Money, to begin with."

"And then?"

"And then--justice! Bah! Am I not the daughter of Testard, who dispensed
with his own hand the justice of Heaven against his persecutors?"

"I have heard that before," Alan said. "It was at Aix-les-Bains. And you
_still_ want justice!"

"Justice, my child. Was it not at Aix-les-Bains that you tried to kill
Henri de Hauteville? Was it not in the park hard by that you shot at me,
and almost assassinated me? But, have no fear! All I ask is money--the
half of your income will satisfy me. Pay me that, and you are
safe--unless my rage should transport me one of these fine days! Refuse,
and I denounce you through the town, and play the game of scandal--as I
know how to play it! Which shall it be?"

"You are my wife. Perhaps there is a remedy for that--now that you are
here, we shall see! But, meanwhile, you have a claim. To-morrow morning
I Will settle it as you wish. You shall not be left to want."

"It is reasonable. Good-night, my friend! I am going to sleep again."

She went back into the drawing-room, laughing aloud, whilst Alan, after
doing his best to console Mrs. Bundlecombe, departed in search of a
night's lodging under another roof.




CHAPTER XIII.

SIR JOHN PYNSENT PROPHESIES.


On a sultry evening in the middle of August, a few choice spirits were
gathered together in one of the smoking-rooms of the Oligarchy.

All but one were members of the Upper or Lower House, and they were
lazily enjoying the unusual chance (for such busy men, and at such a
critical period of the session) which enabled them to smoke their cigars
in Pall Mall before midnight on a Tuesday. Either there had been a
count-out, or there was obstruction in the House, which was no immediate
concern of theirs, or they had made an arrangement with their Whip, and
were awaiting a telegram which did not come; but, whatever the reason,
here they were, lazy and contented.

There was our old friend, Sir John Pynsent; and Charles Milton, Q.C.,
certain to be a law officer or a judge, as soon as the Conservatives had
their chance; and Lord Ambermere; and the Honorable Tom Willoughby, who
had been trained at Harrow, Oxford, and Lord's Cricket Ground, and who
was once assured by his Balliol tutor that his wit would never make him
a friend, nor his face an enemy. The last of the circle was Brooke
Dalton, of whom this narrative has already had something to record.

"So Tourmaline has thrown up the sponge, Pynsent?" Charles Milton began,
after a short pause in the conversation. "Had enough of the Radical crew
by this time!"

"Yes. Of course, he has been out of sympathy with them for a long while.
So have twenty or thirty more, if the truth were known."

"As you know it!" Dalton interjected.

"Well, I know some things. The line of cleavage in the Liberal party is
tolerably well marked, if you have eyes to see."

"Why does Tourmaline leave the House? I hear he would stand an excellent
chance if he went to Vanebury and started as an Independent."

"No doubt he would; but in a weak moment he pledged himself down there
not to do it."

"What hard lines!" said Tom Willoughby. "Just one pledge too many!"

"And so," continued Pynsent, without noticing the interruption, "we have
had to look out for another candidate. I settled the matter this
afternoon, and I am glad to say that Campion has promised to go down."

"Just the man for the job," said Milton, who looked upon Sydney as sure
to be a formidable rival in Parliament, and more likely than any other
young Conservative to cut him out of the Solicitorship. "He has tongue,
and he has tact--and he has something else, Sir John, which is worth the
two put together--good friends!"

"We think very highly of Campion," said Sir John Pynsent, "and I am very
glad you confirm our opinion."

"I certainly think he will make his mark," said Dalton. "He comes of a
very able family."

Dalton found himself recalling the appearance and words of Miss Lettice
Campion, whom he had met so often of late at the house of his cousin,
Mrs. Hartley, and who had made a deeper impression than ever on his
mind. Impressions were somewhat fugitive, as a rule, on Brooke Dalton's
mind; but he had come to admire Lettice with a fervor unusual with him.

"From all I can learn," said the baronet, "we ought to win the seat; and
every two new votes won in that way are worth half-a-dozen such as Tom
Willoughby's, for instance, whose loyalty is a stale and discounted
fact."

"Oh, yes, I know that is how you regard us buttresses from the counties!
I declare I will be a fifth party, and play for my own hand."

"It isn't in you, my boy," said Lord Ambermere; "I never knew you play
for your own hand yet."

"Then what am I in Parliament for, I should like to know?"

"For that very thing, of course; to learn how to do it." Willoughby
laughed good-naturedly. He did not object to be made a butt of by his
intimate friends.

"Seriously, Tom, there is plenty of work for a fellow like you to do."

It was Pynsent who spoke, and the others were always ready to lend him
their ears when he evidently wanted to be listened to.

"The main thing is to get hold of the Whigs, and work at them quietly
and steadily until the time comes to strike our blow. The great Houses
are safe, almost to a man. When it comes to choosing between Democracy
rampant, with Gladstone at its head, assailing the most sacred elements
of the Constitution, and a great National Party, or Union of Parties,
guarding Property and the Empire against attack, there is no question as
to how they will make their choice. But if every Whig by birth or family
ties came over to us at once, that would not suffice for our purpose.
What we have to do is get at the--the Decent Men of the Liberal
Party, such as the aldermen, the shipowners, the great contractors and
directors of companies, and, of course, the men with a stake in the
land. No use mentioning names--we all know pretty well who they are."

"And when you have got at them?" asked Willoughby.

"Why, lay yourself out to please them. Flatter them--show them all the
attention in your power; take care that they see and hear what is
thought in the highest quarters about the present tendency of
things--about Ireland, about the Empire, about the G. O. M. Let them
understand how they are counted on to decide the issue, and what they
would have to look for if we were once in power. Above all, ride them
easy! It is impossible that they should become Tories--don't dream of
such a thing. They are to be Liberals to the end of their days, but
Liberals with an Epithet."

"Imperi----"

"No, no, no, no, my dear boy! Any number of noes. You must not live so
much in the past. The great idea to harp upon is Union. Union against a
common enemy. Union against Irish rebels. Union against Gladstone and
the Democracy; but draw this very mild until you feel that you are on
safe ground. Union is the word, and Unionist is the Epithet. Liberal
Unionists. That is the inevitable phrase, and it will fit any crisis
that may arise."

"But suppose they dish us with the County franchise?"

"We must make a fight over that; but for my part I am not afraid of
franchises. There is a Tory majority to be picked out of manhood
suffrage, as England will surely discover some day. Possibly the County
franchise must be cleared out of the way before we get our chance. What
will that mean? Why, simply that Gladstone will think it necessary to
use his first majority in order to carry some great Act of Confiscation;
to make Hodge your master; or to filch a bit of your land for him; or to
join hands with Parnell and cut Ireland adrift. Then we shall have our
opportunity; and that is what we have to prepare for."

Lord Ambermere, and Dalton, and Milton, Q.C., nodded their heads. They
had heard all this before; but to Willoughby it was new, for he had only
just begun to put himself into the harness of political life.

"How can we help ourselves," he said, "if the laborers have returned a
lot of new men, and there is a big Liberal majority?"

"That is the point, of course. Well, put it at the worst. Say that
Gladstone has a majority of eighty, without Parnell, and say that
Parnell can dispose of eighty. Say, again, that the Irishmen are ready
to support Gladstone, in the expectation of favors to come. Now let the
Old Man adopt either a Nationalist policy or an out-and-out Democratic
policy, and assume that the Union for which we have been working takes
effect. In order to destroy Gladstone's majority of one hundred and
sixty, at least eighty of his nominal followers must come over. Of
these, the pure Whigs will count for upwards of forty, and another forty
must be forthcoming from the men I have just described. That is putting
it at the worst--and it is safer to do so. Now the question is, Tom
Willoughby, what can you do, and whom can you tackle? I don't want you
to give me an answer, but only to think it over."

"Oh, if you only want thinking, I'm the beggar to think. But--suppose
you land your alderman, and he don't get re-elected in 1885 or
thereabouts? That would be a frightful sell, don't you know!"

"Why, that is just where the beauty of the plan comes in! A seat in the
House of Commons will always be more or less of a vested interest,
however low the franchise may descend; and the men we are speaking of
are precisely those most likely to continue in the House. It is
especially so in the case of very wealthy men, who have made their own
money; for they look out for comfortable seats to begin with, and then
nurse their constituencies by large charitable donations, so that the
chances are all in their favor. At any rate this is the best way of
setting to work--and who can tell whether the struggle may not come to a
crisis in the present Parliament?"

"And you feel as confident as ever, Sir John, that this Union will be
effected?"

"My dear Lord Ambermere, I assure you I am more confident than ever, and
if I were at liberty to say all I know, and to show my private
memoranda, you would be astonished at the progress which has been made
in this Confederation of Society against the Destructive Elements."

It was a great comfort in listening to Sir John Pynsent, that one could
always tell where he wanted to bring in his capital letters. And there
was no doubt at all about the uncial emphasis with which he spoke of the
Confederation of Society against the Destructive Elements.

At this moment Sydney Campion came in and the conclave was broken up.

Sydney was full of excitement about his contest at Vanebury, and he
received the congratulations and good wishes of his friends with much
complacency. He was already the accepted Conservative candidate, being
nominated from the Oligarchy Club in response to an appeal from the
local leaders. He had even been recommended by name in a letter from Mr.
Tourmaline, the retiring member, whose secession to the Conservative
party had demoralized his former friends in the constituency, and filled
his old opponents with joy. He was going down the next day to begin his
canvass, and to make his first speech; and he had come to the Club
to-night for a final consultation with Sir John Pynsent.

This Vanebury election would not, there was reason to think, be so much
affected by money-bags as the election at Dormer was supposed to be,
sixteen or eighteen months before. Yet money was necessary, and Sydney
did not on this occasion refuse the aid which was pressed upon him. He
was responding to the call of his party, at a moment which might be
(though it was not) very inconvenient for him; and, having put down the
foot of dignity last year, he could now hold out the hand of expediency
with a very good grace.

So he took his money, and went down, and before he had been in Vanebury
six hours the Conservatives there understood that they had a very strong
candidate, who would give a good account of himself, and who deserved to
be worked for.

His personal presence was imposing, Sydney was above the middle height,
erect and broad-shouldered, with a keen and handsome, rather florid,
face, a firm mouth, and penetrating steel-blue eyes. He was careful of
his appearance, too, and from his well-cut clothes and his well-trimmed
brown hair, beard, and whiskers, it was easy to see that there was
nothing of the slipshod about this ambitious young emissary from the
Oligarchy Club.

In manner he was very persuasive. He had a frank and easy way of
addressing an audience, which he had picked up from a popular
tribune--leaning one shoulder towards them at an angle of about eighty
degrees, and rounding his periods with a confidential smile, which
seemed to assure his hearers that they were as far above the average
audience as he was above the average candidate. He did not feel the
slightest difficulty in talking for an hour at a stretch, and two or
three times on the same day; and, indeed, it would have been strange if
he had, considering his Union experience at Cambridge and his practice
at the Bar.

Sydney won upon all classes at Vanebury, and the sporting gentlemen in
that thriving borough were soon giving odds upon his chance of success.
The Liberals were for the most part careless and over-confident. Their
man had won every election for twenty years past, and they could not
believe that this Tory lawyer was destined to accomplish what all the
local magnates had failed in attempting. But a few of the wisest amongst
them shook their heads, for they knew too well that "Tourmaline the
Traitor and Turncoat" (as the posters described him) was by no means
alone in his discontent with the tendencies of the party.

The attention of the country was fixed upon the Vanebury election, and
Sydney Campion had become at once the observed of all observers. He knew
it, and made the most of the situation, insisting in his speeches that
this was a test-election, which would show what the country thought of
the government, of its bribes to ignorance and its capitulation to
rebellion, of its sacrifice of our honor abroad and our interests at
home. He well knew what the effect of this would be on his friends in
London, and how he would have earned their gratitude if he could carry
the seat on these lines.

On the day before the poll, Sir John Pynsent came to Vanebury, to attend
the last of the public meetings.

"Admirably done, so far!" he said, as he grasped Sydney's hand at the
station. "How are things looking?"

"It is a certain win!" said Sydney. "No question about it."

And a win it was, such as any old campaigner might have been proud of.
The numbers as declared by the returning officer were:

    Campion (C.)      4765
    Hawkins (L.)      4564
                      ----
          Majority     201

At the last election Tourmaline had had a majority of six hundred over
his Conservative opponent, so that there had been a turnover of about
four hundred voters. And no one doubted that a large number of these had
made up their minds to turn since Campion had begun his canvass.

This was a complete success for Sydney. He was now Mr. Campion, M.P.,
with both feet on the ladder of ambition. Congratulations poured in upon
him from all sides, and from that moment he was recognized by everybody
as one of the coming men of the Conservative party.




CHAPTER XIV.

SYDNEY MAKES A MISTAKE.


There was a social side to Sydney's success which he was not slow to
appreciate. A poor and ambitious man, bent on climbing the ladder of
promotion, he was willing to avail himself of every help which came in
his way. And Sir John Pynsent was good-naturedly ready to give him a
helping hand.

During the past season he had found himself welcome in houses where the
best society of the day was wont to congregate. He had several
invitations for the autumn to places where it was considered a
distinction to be invited; and, being a man of much worldly wisdom, he
was disposed to be sorry that he had made arrangements to go abroad for
two or three months. He was vague in detailing his plans to his friends;
but in his own mind he was never vague, and he knew what he meant to do
and where he was going to spend the vacation well enough, although he
did not choose to take club acquaintances into his confidence.

But one invitation, given by Sir John Pynsent, for the Sunday subsequent
to his election--or rather, from Saturday to Monday--he thought it
expedient as well as pleasant to accept. Vanebury was a very few miles
distant from St. John's country-house, and when the baronet, in capital
spirits over his friend's success, urged him to run over to Culverley
for a day or two, he could not well refuse.

"I am going for the Sunday," Sir John said confidentially, "but my wife
doesn't expect me to stay longer until the session is over. I run down
every week, you know, except when she's in town; but she always leaves
London in June. My sister is under her wing, and she declares that late
hours and the heat of London in July are very bad for girls. Of course,
I'm glad that she looks after my sister so well."

Sydney recognized the fact that he had never before been taken into Sir
John's confidence with respect to his domestic affairs.

"Lady Pynsent asked me the other day whether I could not get you to come
down to us," Sir John continued. "I am always forgetting her messages;
but if you can spare a couple of days now, we shall be very glad to have
you. Indeed, you must not refuse," he said, hospitably. "And you ought
to see something of the county."

Sydney had met Lady Pynsent in town. She was a large, showy-looking
woman, with fair hair and a very aquiline nose; a woman who liked to
entertain, and who did it well. He had dined at the Wentworths' house
more than once, and he began to search in his memory for any face or
figure which should recall Sir John's sister to his mind. But he could
not remember her, and concluded, therefore, that she was in no way
remarkable.

"I think I have not met Miss Pynsent," he took an opportunity of saying,
by way of an attempt to refresh his memory.

"No? I think you must have seen her somewhere. But she did not go out
much this spring: she is rather delicate, and not very fond of society.
She's my half-sister, you know, considerably younger than I am--came out
the season before last."

Another acquaintance of Sydney's privately volunteered the information
later in the day that Miss Pynsent had sixty thousand pounds of her own,
and was reputed to be clever.

"I hate clever women," Sydney said, with an inward growl at his sister
Lettice, whose conduct had lately given him much uneasiness. "A clever
woman and an heiress! Ye gods, how very ugly she must be."

His friend laughed in a meaning manner, and wagged his head
mysteriously. But what he would have said remained unspoken, because at
that moment Sir John rejoined them.

Sydney flattered himself that he was not impressible, or at least that
the outward trappings of wealth and rank did not impress him. But he was
distinctly pleased to find that Sir John's carriage and pair, which met
them at the station, was irreproachable, and that Culverley was a very
fine old house, situated in the midst of a lovely park and approached by
an avenue of lime-trees, which, Sir John informed him, was one of the
oldest in the country. Sydney had an almost unduly keen sense of the
advantage which riches can bestow, and he coveted social almost as much
as professional standing for himself. It was, perhaps, natural that the
son of a poor man, who had been poor all his life, and owed his success
to his own brains and his power of continued work, should look a little
enviously on the position so readily attained by men of inferior mental
calibre, but of inherited and ever-increasing influence, like Sir John
Pynsent and his friends. Sydney never truckled: he was perfectly
independent in manner and in thought; but the good things of the world
were so desirable to him that for some of them--as he confessed to
himself with a half-laugh at his own weakness--he would almost have sold
his soul.

They arrived at Culverley shortly before dinner, and Sydney had time for
very few introductions before going to the dining-room. He was surprised
to find a rather large party present. There were several London men and
women whom he knew already, and who were staying in the house, and there
was a contingent of county people, who had only come to dinner. The new
member for Vanebury was made much of, especially by the county folk; and
as Sydney was young, handsome, and a good talker, he soon made himself
popular amongst them. For himself, he did not find the occasion
interesting, save as a means of social success. Most of the men were
dull, and the women prim and proper: there were not more than two pretty
girls in the whole party.

"That's the heiress, I suppose," thought Sydney, hearing a spectacled,
sandy-haired young woman who looked about five-and-twenty addressed as
Miss Pynsent. "Plain, as I thought. There's not a woman here worth
looking at, except Mrs. George Murray. I'll talk to her after dinner.
Not one of them is a patch on little Milly. I wonder how she would look,
dressed up in silks and satins. Pynsent knows how to choose his wine and
his cook better than his company, I fancy."

But his supercilious contempt for the county was well veiled, and the
people who entered into conversation with Sydney Campion, the new M.P.
for Vanebury, put him down as a very agreeable man, as well as a rising
politician.

His own position was pleasant enough. He was treated with manifest
distinction--flattered, complimented, well-nigh caressed. In the
drawing-room after dinner, Sydney, surrounded by complacent and
adulating friends, really experienced some of the most agreeable
sensations of his life. He was almost sorry when the group gradually
melted away, and conversation was succeeded by music. He had never
cultivated his taste for music; but he had a naturally fine ear, upon
which ordinary drawing-room performances jarred sadly. But, standing
with his arms folded and his back against the wall, in the neighborhood
of Mrs. George Murray, the prettiest woman in the room, he became
gradually aware that Lady Pynsent's musicians were as admirable in their
way as her cook. She would no more put up with bad singing than bad
songs; and she probably put both on the same level. She did not ask
amateurs to sing or play; but she had one or two professionals staying
in the house, who were "charmed" to perform for her; and she had secured
a well-known "local man" to play accompaniments. In the case of one at
least of the professionals, Lady Pynsent paid a very handsome fee for
his services; but this fact was not supposed to transpire to the general
public.

When the professionals had done their work there was a little pause,
succeeded by the slight buzz that spoke of expectation. "Miss Pynsent is
going to play," Mrs. Murray said to Sydney, putting up her long-handled
eyeglass and looking expectantly towards the grand piano. "Oh, now, we
shall have a treat."

"Sixty thousand pounds," Sydney said to himself with a smile; but he
would not for the world have said it aloud. "We must put up with bad
playing from its fortunate possessor, I suppose." And he turned his head
with resignation in the direction of the little inner drawing-room, in
which the piano stood. This room should, perhaps, be described as an
alcove, rather than a separate apartment: it was divided from the great
drawing-room by a couple of shallow steps that ran across its whole
width, so that a sort of natural stage was formed, framed above and on
either side by artistically festooned curtains of yellow brocade.

"Isn't it effective?" Mrs. Murray murmured to him, with a wave of her
eyeglass to the alcove. "So useful for tableaux and plays, you know.
Awfully clever of Lady Pynsent to use the room in that way. There used
once to be folding doors, you know--barbarous, wasn't it? Who _would_
use doors when curtains could be had?"

"Doors are useful sometimes," said Sydney. But he was not in the least
attentive either to her words or to his own: he was looking towards the
alcove.

Miss Pynsent--the young woman with sandy locks and freckled face, on
which a broad, good-humored smile was beaming--was already seated at the
piano and turning over her music. Presently she began to play, and
Sydney, little as was his technical knowledge of the art, acknowledged
at once that he had been mistaken, and that Miss Pynsent, in spite of
being an heiress, played remarkably well. But the notes were apparently
those of an accompaniment only--was she going to sing? Evidently not,
for at that moment another figure slipped forward from the shadows of
the inner drawing-room, and faced the audience.

This was a girl who did not look more than eighteen or nineteen: a
slight fragile creature in white, with masses of dusky hair piled high
above a delicate, pallid, yet unmistakably beautiful, face. The large
dark eyes, the curved, sensitive mouth, the exquisite modelling of the
features, the graceful lines of the slightly undeveloped figure, the
charming pose of head and neck, the slender wrist bent round the violin
which she held, formed a picture of almost ideal loveliness. Sydney
could hardly refrain from an exclamation of surprise and admiration. He
piqued himself on knowing a little about everything that was worth
knowing, and he had a considerable acquaintance with art, so that the
first thing which occurred to him was to seek for a parallel to the
figure before him in the pictures with which he was acquainted. She was
not unlike a Sir Joshua, he decided; and yet--in the refinement of every
feature, and a certain sweetness and tranquillity of expression--she
reminded him of a Donatello that he had seen in one of his later visits
to Florence or Sienna. He had always thought that if he were ever rich
he would buy pictures; and he wondered idly whether money would buy the
Donatello of which the white-robed violin-player reminded him.

One or two preliminary tuning notes were sounded, and then the violinist
began to play. Her skill was undoubted, but the feeling and pathos which
she threw into the long-drawn sighing notes were more remarkable even
than her skill. There was a touch of genius in her performance which
held the listeners enthralled. When she had finished, she disappeared
behind the curtains as rapidly as she had emerged from the shadows of
the dimly-lighted inner room; and in the pause that followed, the
opening and shutting of a door was heard.

"Who is she?" said Sydney to his neighbor.

"Oh, Miss Pynsent, of course," said Mrs. Murray. "Delightful, isn't
she?"

"I don't mean Miss Pynsent," said Sydney, in some confusion of mind; "I
mean----"

But Mrs. Murray had turned to somebody else, and scraps of conversation
floated up to Sydney's ears, and gave him, as he thought, the
information that he was seeking.

"So devoted to Lady Pynsent's children! Now that little Frankie has a
cold, they say she won't leave him night or day. They had the greatest
trouble to get her down to play to-night. Awfully lucky for Lady
Pynsent," and then the voices were lowered, but Sydney heard something
about "the last governess," and "a perfect treasure," which seemed to
reveal the truth.

"The governess! A violin-playing governess," he thought, with a mixture
of scorn and relief, which he did not altogether understand in himself.
"Ah! that's the reason she did not come down to dinner. She is a very
pretty girl, and no doubt Lady Pynsent keeps her in the nursery or
schoolroom as much as possible. I should like to see her again. Perhaps,
as to-morrow is Sunday, she may come down with the children."

It will be evident to the meanest capacity that Sydney was making an
absurd mistake as to the identity of the violinist. The most
unsophisticated novel-reader in the world would cast contempt and
ridicule on the present writers if they, in their joint capacity,
introduced the young lady in white as actually Lady Pynsent's governess.
To avoid misunderstanding on the point, therefore, it may as well be
premised that she was in fact Miss Anna Pynsent, Sir John's half sister,
and that Mr. Campion's conclusions respecting her position were
altogether without foundation.

Having, however, made up his mind about her, Sydney took little further
interest in the matter. One or two complimentary remarks were made in
his hearing about Miss Pynsent's playing; but he took them to apply to
the sandy-haired Miss Pynsent whom he had seen at dinner, and only made
a silent cynical note of the difference with which the violinist and the
accompanist were treated. He never flew in the face of the world
himself, and therefore he did not try to readjust the balance of
compliment: he simply acquiesced in the judgment of the critics, and
thought of the Donatello.

A long conference in the smoking-room on political matters put music and
musicians out of his head; and when he went to sleep, about two o'clock
in the morning, it was to dream, if he dreamt at all, of his maiden
speech in Parliament, and that elevation to the woolsack which his
mother was so fond of prophesying.

Sydney was an early riser, and breakfast on Sundays at Culverley was
always late. He was tempted by the beauty of the morning to go for a
stroll in the gardens; and thence he wandered into the park, where he
breathed the fresh cool air with pleasure, and abandoned himself, as
usual, to a contemplation of the future. The park was quickly crossed,
for Sydney scarcely knew how to loiter in his walking, more than in any
other of his actions; and he then plunged into a fir plantation which
fringed a stretch of meadow-land, now grey and drenched with dew and
shining in the morning sun. Even to Sydney's unimaginative mind the
scene had its charm, after the smoke of London and the turmoil of the
last few days: he came to the edge of the plantation, leaned his elbows
on the topmost rail of a light fence, and looked away to the blue
distance, where the sheen of water and mixture of light and shade were,
even in his eyes, worth looking at. A cock crowed in a neighboring
farmyard, and a far-away clock struck seven. It was earlier than he had
thought.

Two or three figures crossing the meadow attracted his attention. First
came a laboring man with a pail. Sydney watched him aimlessly until he
was out of sight. Then a child--a gentleman's child, judging from his
dress and general appearance--a boy of six or seven, who seemed to be
flying tumultuously down the sloping meadow to escape from his governess
or nurse. The field ran down to a wide stream, which was crossed at one
point by a plank, at another by stepping-stones; and it was towards
these stepping-stones that the boy directed his career. Behind him, but
at considerable distance, came the slender figure of a young woman, who
seemed to be pursuing him. The child reached the stream, and there stood
laughing, his fair curls floating in the wind, his feet firmly planted
on one of the stones that had been thrown into the water.

Sydney was by no means inclined to play knight-errant to children and
attendant damsels, and he would probably have continued to watch the
little scene without advancing, had not the girl, halting distressfully
to call the truant, chanced to turn her face so that the strong morning
light fell full upon it. Why, it was the violinist! Or was he deceived
by some chance resemblance? Sydney did not think so, but it behoved him
instantly to go and see.

Indeed, before he reached the stream, his help seemed to be needed. The
boy, shouting and dancing, had missed his footing and fallen headlong in
the stream, which, fortunately, was very shallow and not very swift.
Sydney quickened his pace to a run, and the girl did the same; but
before either of them reached its bank the boy had scrambled out again,
and was sitting on the further side with a sobered countenance and in a
very drenched condition.

"Oh, Jack!" said the girl reproachfully, "how _could_ you?"

"I want some mushrooms. I said I would get them," Jack answered,
sturdily.

"You must come back at once. But--how are you to get over?" she said,
contemplating the slippery stones with some dismay. For Jack's fall had
displaced more than one of them, and there was now a great gap between
the stones in the deepest part of the little stream.

"Can I be of any assistance?" said Sydney, availing himself of his
opportunity to come forward.

She turned and looked at him inquiringly, the color deepening a little
in her pale face.

"I am staying at Culverley," he said, in an explanatory tone. "I had the
pleasure of hearing you play last night."

"You are Mr. Campion, I think?" she said. "Yes, I shall be very glad of
your help. I need not introduce myself, I see. Jack has been very
naughty: he ran away from his nurse this morning, and I said that I
would bring him back. And now he has fallen into the brook."

"We must get him back," said Sydney, rather amused at her matter-of-fact
tone. "I will go over for him."

"No, I am afraid you must not do that," she answered. "There is a plank
a little further down the stream; we will go there."

But Sydney was across the water by this time. He lifted the child
lightly in his arms and strode back across the stones, scarcely wetting
himself at all. Then he set the boy down at her side.

"There!" he said, "that is better than going down to the plank. Now,
young man, you must run home again as fast as you can, or you will catch
cold."

"I am very much obliged to you," said the young lady, looking at him, as
he thought, rather earnestly, but without a smile. "Jack, you know, is
Sir John Pynsent's eldest son."

"So I divined. I think he would get home more quickly if I took one of
his hands and you took the other, and we hurried him up the hill; don't
you think so?"

He had no interest at all in Jack, but he wanted to talk with this
dark-eyed violin-playing damsel. Sydney had indulged in a good deal of
flirtation in his time, and he had no objection to whiling away an hour
in the company of any pretty girl; and yet there was some sort of
dignity about this girl's manner which warned him to be a little upon
his guard.

"You are member for Vanebury," she said, rather abruptly, when they had
dragged little Jack some distance up the grassy slope.

"I have that honor."

"I hope," she said, with a mixture of gentleness and decision which took
him by surprise, "that you mean to pay some attention to the condition
of the working-classes in Vanebury?"

"Well, I don't know; is there any special reason?"

"They are badly paid, badly housed, over-worked and under-educated," she
said, succinctly; "and if the member for Vanebury would bestir himself
in their cause, I think that something might be done."

"Even a member is not omnipotent, I'm afraid."

"No, but he has influence. You are bound to use it for good," she
returned.

Sydney raised his eyebrows. He was not used to being lectured on his
duties, and this young lady's remarks struck him as slightly
impertinent. He glanced at her almost as if he would have told her so;
but she looked so very pretty and so very young that he could no more
check her than he could have checked a child.

"You have very pretty scenery about here," he said, by way of changing
the conversation.

The girl's face drooped at once; she did not answer.

"What an odd young woman she is," said Sydney to himself. "What an odd
governess for the children!"

Suddenly she looked up, with a very sweet bright look. "I am afraid I
offended you," she said, deprecatingly. "I did not mean to say anything
wrong. I am so much interested in the Vanebury working people, although
we are here some miles distant from them, that when I heard you were
coming I made up my mind at once that I would speak to you."

"You have--friends, perhaps, in that district?" said Sydney.

"N--no--not exactly," she said, hesitating. "But I know a good deal
about Vanebury."

"Nan goes there very often, don't you, Nan?" said little Jack, suddenly
interposing. "And papa says you do more harm than good."

"Nan" colored high. "You should not repeat what papa says," she
answered, severely. "You have often been told that it is naughty."

"But it's true," Jack murmured, doggedly. And Sydney could not help
smiling at the discomfited expression on "Nan's" face.

However, he was--or thought he was--quite equal to the occasion. He
changed the subject, and began talking adroitly about her tastes and
occupations. Nan soon became at ease with him and answered his questions
cheerfully, although she seemed puzzled now and then by the strain of
compliment into which he had a tendency to fall. The house was reached
at last; and Jack snatched his hands from those of his companions, and
ran indoors. Nan halted at a side-door, and now spoke with the sweet
earnestness that impressed Sydney even more than her lovely face.

"You have been very kind to us, Mr. Campion. I don't know how to thank
you."

It was on the tip of Sydney's tongue to use some badinage such as he
would have done, in his light and easy fashion, to a servant-maid or
shop-girl. But something in her look caused him, luckily, to refrain. He
went as near as he dared to the confines of love-making.

"Give me the flower you wear," he said, leaning a little towards her.
"Then I shall at least have a remembrance of you."

His tone and his look were warmer than he knew. She shrank back, visibly
surprised, and rather offended. Before he could add a word she had
quietly taken the rosebud from her dress, handed it to him, and
disappeared into the house, closing the door behind her in a somewhat
uncompromising way. Sydney was left alone on the gravelled path, with a
half-withered rosebud in his hand, and a consciousness of having made
himself ridiculous.

"She seems to be rather a little vixen," he said to himself, as he
strolled up to his rooms to make some change in his clothes, which were
damper than he liked. "What business has a pretty little governess to
take that tone? Deuced out of place, I call it. I wonder if she'll be
down to breakfast. She has very fetching eyes."

But she was not down to breakfast, and nothing was said about her, so
Sydney concluded that her meals were taken in the schoolroom with the
children.

"Such a pity--poor dear Nan has a headache," he heard Lady Pynsent
saying by and by. "I hoped that she would come down and give us some
music this evening, but she says she won't be able for it."

Sydney consoled himself with pretty Mrs. Murray.

"The fair violinist is out of tune, it seems," he said, in the course of
an afternoon stroll with the new charmer.

"Who? Oh, Nan Pynsent."

"Pynsent? No. At least, I don't mean the pianiste: I mean the young lady
who played the violin last night."

"Yes, Nan Pynsent, Sir John's half-sister. The heiress--and some people
say the beauty of the county. Why do you look so stupefied, Mr.
Campion?"

"I did not know her, that was all. I thought--who, then, is the lady who
played the piano?"

"Mary Pynsent, a cousin. You surely did not think that _she_ was the
heiress?"

"Why did not Sir John's sister come down to dinner?" said Sydney, waxing
angry.

"She has a craze about the children. Their governess is away, and she
insists on looking after them. She is rather quixotic, you know; full of
grand schemes for the future, and what she will do when she comes of
age. Her property is all in Vanebury, by the bye: you must let her talk
to you about the miners if you want to win her favor. She will be of age
in a few months."

"I shall not try to win her favor."

"Dear me, how black you look, Mr. Campion. Are you vexed that you have
not made her acquaintance?"

"Not at all," said Sydney, clearing his brow. "How could I have looked
at her when you were there?"

The banal compliment pleased Mrs. Murray, and she began to talk of
trivial matters in her usual trivial strain. Sydney scarcely listened:
for once he was disconcerted, and angry with himself. He knew that he
would have talked in a very different strain if he had imagined for one
moment that Jack's companion was Miss Pynsent. He had not, perhaps,
definitely _said_ anything that he could regret; but he was sorry for
the whole tone of his conversation. Would Miss Pynsent repeat his
observations, he wondered, to her sister-in-law? Sydney did not often
put himself in a false position, but he felt that his tact had failed
him now. He returned to the house in an unusually disturbed state of
mind; and a sentence which he overheard in the afternoon did not add to
his tranquillity.

He was passing along a corridor that led, as he thought, to his own
room; but the multiplicity of turnings had bewildered him, and he was
obliged to retrace his steps. While doing so, he passed Lady Pynsent's
boudoir. Although he was unconscious of this fact, his attention was
attracted by the sound of a voice from within. Nan Pynsent's voice was
not loud, but it had a peculiarly penetrating quality; and her words
followed Sydney down the corridor with disagreeable distinctness.

"Selina," she was saying--Selina was Lady Pynsent's name--"I thought you
said that Mr. Campion was a _gentleman_!"

"Well, dear----" Lady Pynsent was beginning; but Sydney, quickening his
steps, heard no more. He was now in a rage, and disposed to vote Miss
Pynsent the most unpleasant, conceited young person of his acquaintance.
That anybody should doubt his "gentilhood" was an offence not to be
lightly borne. He was glad to remember that he was leaving Culverley
next day, and he determined that he would rather avoid the female
Pynsents than otherwise when they came to town. He could not yet do
without Sir John, and he was vexed to think that these women should have
any handle--however trifling--against him. He thanked his stars that he
had not actually made love to Miss Anna Pynsent; and he hurried back to
town next morning by the earliest train, without setting eyes on her
again. In town, amidst the bustle of political and social duties, he
soon forgot the unpleasant impression that this little episode of his
visit to Culverly had left upon his mind.

He went to Maple Cottage on the very day of his return to London, to
hear what his mother and sister had to say about his success. And he
took an opportunity also of telling Milly Harrington something of the
glories which he had achieved, and the privilege which he enjoyed in
being able to absent himself from his native country for two or three
months at a stretch.

About the end of August, Lettice had to look out for a new maid. Milly
went away, saying that she had heard of a better place. She had obtained
it without applying to her mistress for a character. She had not been so
attentive to her duties of late as to make Lettice greatly regret her
departure; but remembering old Mrs. Harrington's fears for her
grand-daughter, Lettice made many inquiries of Milly as to her new
place. She received, as she thought, very satisfactory replies, although
she noticed that the girl changed color strangely, and looked confused
and anxious when she was questioned. And when the time came for her to
go, Milly wept bitterly, and was heard to express a wish that she had
resolved to stay with Miss Lettice after all.




CHAPTER XV.

SOME UNEXPECTED MEETINGS.


Two or three months had passed since Alan's wife came back to him.

He had arranged, with the aid of a lawyer, to allow her a certain
regular income--with the consequence to himself that he had been obliged
to give up his floor in Montagu Place and settle down in the humbler and
dingier refuge of Alfred Place. Meanwhile, he had taken steps to collect
sufficient evidence for a divorce. He had not yet entered his suit, and
he felt pretty certain that when he did so, and Cora was made aware of
it in the usual manner, she would find some way of turning round and
biting him.

But the desire to be free from his trammels had taken possession of him
with irresistible force, and he was prepared to risk the worst that she
could do to him in order to accomplish it. Even as it was, he had reason
to think that she was not true to her undertaking not to slander or
molest him so long as she received her allowance. He had twice received
offensive post-cards, and though there was nothing to prove from whom
they came, he could have very little doubt that they had been posted by
her in moments when jealous rage or intoxication had got the better of
her prudence.

The scandal which began to fasten upon his name after Sydney Campion had
heard Brooke Dalton's story in the smoking-room of the Oligarchy was
almost forgotten again, though it lurked in the memory of many a
thoughtless retailer of gossip, ready to revive on the slightest
provocation.

More for Lettice's sake than his own, he lived in complete retirement,
and scarcely ever left his lodgings except to spend a few hours in the
Museum Reading Room. In this way he avoided the chance of meeting her,
as well as the chance of encountering his wretched wife, concerning
whose mode of life he had only too trustworthy evidence from the lawyer
to whom he had committed his interests.

Then there came a day when he could not deny himself the pleasure of
attending a conversazione for which tickets had been sent him by an old
friend. The subject to be discussed in the course of the evening was one
in which he was specially interested, and his main object in going was
that he might be made to forget for a few hours the misery of his
present existence, which the last of Cora's post-cards had painfully
impressed upon him.

He had not been there more than half-an-hour, when, moving with the
crowd from one room to another, he suddenly came face to face with
Lettice and the Grahams. All of them were taken by surprise, and there
was a little constraint in their greeting. Perhaps Lettice was the least
disturbed of the four--for the rest of them thought chiefly of her,
whilst she thought of Alan's possible embarrassment, which she did her
best to overcome, with the ready tact of an unselfish woman.

Alan had grown doubly sensitive of late, and his one idea had been that
Lettice must be preserved from all danger of annoyance, whether by the
abandoned woman who had so amply proved the shrewdness of her malice, or
by himself--who had no less amply proved his weakness. In pure
generosity of mind he would have contented himself with a few grave
words, and passed on. But it seemed to her as if he had not the courage
to remain, taking for granted her resentment at his unfortunate letter.
To her pure mind there was not enough, even in that letter, to cause
complete estrangement between them. At any rate, it was not in her to
impose the estrangement by any display of anger or unkindness. The
sublime courage of innocence was upon her as she spoke.

"See," she said, "the professor is going to begin. The people are taking
their seats, and if we do not follow their example all the chairs will
be filled, and we shall have to stand for an hour. Let us sit down."

She just glanced at Alan, so that he could regard himself as included in
the invitation; and, nothing loth, he sat down beside her. The lecturer
did not start for another ten minutes, and Lettice occupied the interval
by comparing notes with Clara Graham: for these two dearly loved a
gossip in which they could dissect the characters of the men they knew,
and the appearance of the women they did not know. It was a perfectly
harmless practice as indulged in by them, for their criticism was not
malicious. The men, after one or two commonplaces, relapsed into
silence, and Alan was able to collect his thoughts, and at the same time
to realize how much happiness the world might yet have in store for him,
since this one woman, who knew the worst of him, did not think it
necessary to keep him at a distance.

Then the professor began to speak. He was a small and feeble man, wheezy
in his delivery, and, it must be confessed, rather confused in his
ideas. He had been invited to make plain to an audience, presumably well
read and instructed, the historical bearings of certain recent
discoveries in Egypt; and the task was somewhat difficult for him. There
were seven theories, all more or less plausible, which had been started
by as many learned Egyptologists; and this worthy old gentleman, though
quite as competent to give an opinion, and stick to it, as any of the
rest, was so modest and self-depreciatory that he would not go further
than to state and advocate each theory in turn, praising its author, and
defending him against the other six. After doing this, he was bold to
confess that he did not altogether agree with any of the seven. He was
on the point of launching his own hypothesis, which would have been
incompatible with all the rest, when his heart failed him. He therefore
ended by inviting discussion, and sat down, blushing unseen beneath his
yellow skin, exactly as he used to blush half a century ago when he was
called up to construe a piece of Homer. Three of the seven Egyptologists
were present, and they now rose, one after another, beginning with the
oldest. Each of them stated his own theory, showing much deference to
the lecturer as "the greatest living authority" on this particular
subject; and then, after politely referring to the opinions of the two
rival savants whom he saw in the audience, became humorous and sarcastic
at the expense of the absent four.

But, as the absent are always wrong in comparison with the present, so
youth is always wrong in comparison with age. The youngest
Egyptologist--being in truth a somewhat bumptious man, fresh from Oxford
by way of Cairo and Alexandria--had presumed to make a little feint of
sword-play with one of the lecturer's diffident remarks. This brought up
the other two who had already spoken; and they withered that young man
with infinite satisfaction to themselves and the male part of the
audience.

The victim, however, was not young and Oxford-bred for nothing. He rose
to deprecate their wrath. He was not, he said, contesting the opinion of
the lecturer, whose decision on any detail of the matter under
consideration he would take as absolutely final. But he pointed out that
the opinion he had ventured to examine was expressed by his friend, Dr.
A., in a paper read before the Diatribical Society, six weeks before,
and it was manifestly at variance with the canon laid down by his
friend, Dr. B., as a fundamental test of knowledge and common-sense in
the domain of Egyptology.

Thus discord was sown between Dr. A. and Dr. B., and the seed instantly
sprang up, and put an end to all that was useful or amicable in that
evening's discussion.

Yet everyone agreed that it had been a most interesting conference, and
the audience dispersed in high good humor.

It took nearly a quarter of an hour to clear the crowded rooms, and as
Alan had offered his arm to Lettice, in order to guide her through the
crush, he had an opportunity of speaking to her, which he turned to good
account.

"I am glad to see that your brother is in Parliament," he said.

"Yes; of course we were pleased."

"He will make his mark--has made it already, indeed. He is very
eloquent; I have heard him speak more than once. He is a most skillful
advocate; if I were ever in trouble I would rather have him on my side
than against me."

He was speaking lightly, thinking it must please her to hear her brother
praised. But she did not answer his last remark.

"I hope Mrs. Campion is well?"

"Not very well, unfortunately. I am afraid she grows much weaker, and
her sight is beginning to fail."

"That must be very trying. I know what that means to an old lady who has
not many ways of occupying herself. I was making the same observation at
home this morning."

"With regard to your mother?"

"Oh, no. My mother died when I was little more than a boy. But I have an
aunt living with me, who must be nearly seventy years old, and she was
telling me to-day that she could scarcely see to read."

"Oh," said Lettice, with a rush of blood to her face, "is Mrs.
Bundlecombe your aunt?"

"Yes," he said, looking rather surprised, "you spoke as if you knew her.
Did you ever see Mrs. Bundlecombe?"

"I--I had heard her name."

"At Angleford? Or Thorley?"

"Of course, I heard of Mr. Bundlecombe there."

"Is it not strange," Alan said, after a short pause, "that I never knew
you came from Angleford until that morning when I brought you one of
your father's books? Then I asked my aunt all about you. I was never at
Angleford in my life, and if I had heard the rector's name as a boy I
did not recollect it."

"Yes, it is strange. One is too quick at coming to conclusions. I have
to beg your pardon, Mr. Walcott, for I really did think that--that Mrs.
Bundlecombe was your mother, and that----"

"That I was not going under my own name? That I was the son of a
bookseller, and ashamed of it?"

He could not help showing a trace of bitterness in his tone. At any
rate, she thought there was bitterness. She looked at him humbly--for
Lettice was destitute of the pride which smaller natures use in
self-defence when they are proved to be in the wrong--and said,

"Yes, I am afraid I thought so at the moment."

"At what moment?"

"Do not ask me! I am very sorry."

"And glad to find that you were mistaken?"

"I am very glad."

He tried to meet her eyes, but she did not look at him again.

"It was my own fault," he said. "I was going to mention my connection
with your father's bookseller that morning; but--you know--my feelings
ran away with me. I told you things more to my discredit, did I not?"

"I remember nothing to your discredit. Certainly what you have told me
now is not to your discredit."

"If you had met my aunt in London, of course you would have known. But
she does not visit or entertain anyone. You knew she was in London?"

"Yes."

"But you never saw her?"

"Yes, once."

"Oh, I did not know that. When?"

"A long time ago. It was quite a casual and unimportant meeting. Oh, Mr.
Walcott, who is that terrible woman?"

They were out of the building by this time, standing on the pavement.
Graham had called a cab, and whilst they were waiting for it to draw up
Lettice had become aware of a strikingly-dressed woman, with painted
face and bold eyes, who was planting herself in front of them, and
staring at her with a mocking laugh.

Alan was horrified to see that it was his wife who stood before them,
with the mad demoniac look in her eyes which he knew too well.

"Alan, my dear Alan," she cried in a shrill voice, causing everyone to
look round at the group, "tell her this terrible woman's name! Tell her
that I am your wife, the wife that you have plunged into misery and
starvation----"

"For heaven's sake!" said Alan, turning to Graham, "where is your cab?
Take them away quickly!"

"Tell her," the virago screamed, "that I am the woman whom you tried to
murder, in order that you might be free----"

Here the harangue was cut short by a policeman, who knew the orator very
well by sight, and who deftly interposed his arm at the moment when Cora
was reaching the climax of her rage. At the same instant the cab drew
up, and Lettice was driven away with her friends, not, however, before
she had forced Alan to take her hand, and had wished him good-night.

"That must have been his wife," said Clara, whose face was white, and
who was trembling violently.

"Yes, confound her!" said her husband, much annoyed by what had
happened.

"Could you not stay to see what happens? You might be of some use to Mr.
Walcott."

"What good can I do? I wish we had not met him. I have a horror of these
scenes; some people, apparently, take them more coolly."

He was out of temper with Lettice, first for sitting by Alan at the
conversazione, and then for ostentatiously shaking hands with him on the
pavement. Her instinct told her what he was thinking.

"I am sorry it happened," she said; "but when a man is unfortunate one
need not take the opportunity of punishing him. It was far worse for him
than for us."

"I don't see that," said Graham. "And everyone has to bear his own
troubles. Besides, why should a man with such a frightful infliction
attach himself to ladies in a public place, and subject them to insult,
without so much as warning them what they might expect to meet with?"

"Were you unwarned?"

"I was not thinking of myself. You were not warned."

"I beg your pardon, I was."

"You knew his wife was alive--and--what she is?"

"Yes."

"I must say I cannot understand it."

"You would not have me kind to a man who, as you say, is frightfully
afflicted? It was for that very reason I thought we ought to be kind to
him to-night."

"My sense of duty does not lead me quite so far; and I do not wish that
Clara's should, either!"

"I am sorry," said Lettice, again.

Then there was silence in the cab; but the undutiful Clara was squeezing
her friend's hand in the dark, whilst her lord and master fumed for five
minutes in his corner. After that, he pulled the check-string.

"What are you going to do?" said Clara.

"Going back again," he said. "You women understand some things better
than we do. All the same, I don't know what would happen if you always
let your hearts lead you, and if you had no men to look after you. I
shall take a hansom and follow on."

He was too late, however, to do any good. The stream of life had swept
over the place where Alan and his wife had met, as it sweeps over all
the great city's joys and sorrows, glories and disgrace, leaving not a
vestige behind.




CHAPTER XVI.

CONCEIVED IN SORROW.


Two days later, as Lettice was hard at work in her study on a romance
which she had begun in June, at the suggestion of a friendly publisher,
she was interrupted by a knock at the door. It was a feeble knock, as of
one who was half afraid, and the voice, which she heard inquiring for
her immediately afterwards was a feeble voice, which she did not
recognize.

Nor did she at first remember the face of Mrs. Bundlecombe, when that
lady was brought into her room, so much had she changed since her last
visit to Maple Cottage. She looked ten years older than when she
transferred to her pocket the twenty pounds which Lettice had paid her,
though that was barely twelve months ago.

Lettice was better pleased to see her this time; but there was a sinking
at her heart as she thought from whom the old lady had come, and
wondered what her coming might mean.

Mrs. Bundlecombe produced from her bag a little roll of paper, and laid
it on the table with trembling hands.

"There, Miss Campion," she said, taking the chair which Lettice had put
for her, "now I feel better already, and I can answer your kind
inquiries. I cannot say that I am very well, but there is nothing you
can do for me, except take the money back that I came and asked you for
a year ago. Don't say anything against it, my dear, for my Alan says it
must be done, and there is no use in trying to turn him. It is the right
method for peace of conscience, as the good Mr. Baxter said, and that
must be my apology, though I am sure you will not think it was nothing
but sinful self-seeking that made me come to you before."

"I don't understand, Mrs. Bundlecombe! I simply paid you a debt, did I
not? If it was right for my father to pay (as he would have done if he
had lived), it was right for me to pay; and as it was right for me to
pay, it was right for you to ask. And it gave me pleasure, as I told you
at the time, so that I object to taking the money back again."

"That is what I said to Alan, but he would not listen to me. 'Miss
Campion was not bound to pay her father's debt,' he said, 'any more than
Mr. Campion, and therefore it was wrong for you to ask either of them.
But to go to a woman,' he said, 'was more than wrong, it was mean; and I
can never look in her face again if you do not take it back and beg her
pardon.' He can be very stern, my dear, when he is not pleased, and just
now I could not disobey him if he was to tell me to go on my knees
through London town."

"How did he know that I had paid you?"

"Well, it was yesterday; we had been in great trouble"--and here Mrs.
Bundlecombe broke down, having been very near doing it from the moment
when she entered the room. Lettice comforted her as well as she could,
and made her drink a glass of wine; and so she gradually recovered her
voice.

"Well, as I was saying, my dear, in the evening, when we were quiet by
ourselves, he said to me, 'Aunt Bessy, I met Miss Campion last night,
and I gather from what she told me that you had seen one another in
London. You never mentioned that to me. When was it?' I did not want to
make a clean breast of it, but he has such a way of cross-questioning
one that I could not keep it back; and that is how it all came out. So
you must put up with it, for my sake. I dare not touch the money again,
was it ever so."

"Then I must speak to Mr. Walcott about it myself, the next time I see
him, for I think he has not been just to you."

"Oh yes, my dear, he has! He is always so just, poor boy!" There was an
ominous quaver here. "And it is not as if we wanted money. I had three
or four hundred from selling the business, and Alan has nearly that
every year--but now he gives two pounds a week----"

Then there was another collapse, and Lettice thought it best to let the
old woman have her cry out. Only she went over and sat by her side, and
took one of the thin hands between her own, and cried just a little to
keep her company.

"Oh, my dear," said Mrs. Bundlecombe at last, "it is such a comfort to
have a woman to talk to. I have not had a good talk to one of my own sex
since I came up to London, unless it is the landlady in Montagu Place,
and she is a poor old antiquity like myself, with none of your soft and
gentle ways. It would do me good to tell you all we have gone through
since that bad creature found us out, but I have no right to make you
miserable with other people's sorrows. No--I will go away before I begin
to be foolish again; and my boy will be waiting for me."

"If you think Mr. Walcott would not object to your telling me, and if it
will be any relief to you, do! Indeed, I think I would rather hear it."

So Mrs. Bundlecombe poured out her tale to sympathetic ears, and gave
Lettice an account of Alan's married life so far as she knew it, and of
the return of the runaway, and of the compact which Alan had made with
her, and of the post-cards, and the slandering and the threats.

"And the night before last he came home in a terrible rage--that would
be after seeing you, my dearie--and he walked about the room for ever so
long before he would tell me a word. And then he said,

"'I have seen her again, Aunt Bessy, and she has molested me horribly
out in the street, when I was with----'

"And there he stopped short, and fell on the sofa, and cried--yes, dear,
he cried like a woman, as if his heart would break; and I guessed why it
was, though he did not mention your name. For you know," said Mrs.
Bundlecombe, looking at Lettice with mournful eyes, "or leastways you
don't know, how he worships the ground----"

"Don't," said Lettice, "don't tell me more than he would like. I--I
cannot bear to hear it all!"

"Maybe I have said too much; but you must forgive me if I have. And so,
when he was a bit better he said that he should go next morning and tell
the lawyer that she had broken her compact, and he would not pay her any
more money, but give her notice of the divorce.

"'All the heart and all the mercy is crushed out of me,' he said; 'she
has turned her venom on _her_, and she shall suffer for it.'

"So in the morning he went to his lawyer. And it was the day when she
used to call for her money, and she must have called for it and been
refused, for early in the afternoon she came round to our lodgings, and
went on like a mad woman in the street, shrieking and howling, and
saying the most horrible things you can imagine. I could not tell you
half she said, about--about us all. Oh dear, oh dear! I had heard what
one of those Frenchwomen could be, but I never saw anything like it
before, and I hope I never may again!"

"Was he there?"

"Yes, he was there. And he said to me, 'If I give her in charge, it will
have to go into the police court, and anything is better than that!' But
then she mentioned--she began to say other things, and he said, 'My God,
if this is not stopped, I shall do her an injury!' So I went out, and
fetched a policeman, and that put an end to it for the time.

"You can fancy that my poor Alan is nearly out of his mind, not knowing
what she may be up to next. One thing he is afraid of more than
anything: and to be sure I don't think he cares for anything else. Ever
since I let out your name on that first night he has been dreading what
might happen to you through her spite and malice!"

Lettice was deeply moved by Mrs. Bundlecombe's story, and as the old
woman finished she kissed her on the cheek.

"Tell him," she said, "that I have heard what he has suffered--that I
asked you, and you told me. Tell him not to think of me because I am
forewarned, and am not afraid of anything she can do. And tell him that
he should not think of punishing her, for the punishment she has brought
upon herself is enough."

"I will repeat it word for word, my dearie, and it will comfort him to
have a message from you. But I doubt he will not spare her now, for she
is more than flesh and blood can bear."

Then Lettice took her visitor to her mother's room, and made tea for
her, and left the two to compare notes with each other for half an hour.
Thus Mrs. Bundlecombe went away comforted, and took some comfort back
with her to the dingy room in Alfred Place.

It was hard for Lettice to turn to her work again, as though nothing had
happened since she last laid down her pen. The story to which she had
listened, and the picture which it brought so vividly before her mind of
the lonely, persecuted man who pined for her love when she had no right
to give it, nor he to ask for it, compelled her to realize what she had
hitherto fought away and kept in the background. She could no longer
cheat herself with the assurance that her heart was in her own keeping,
and that her feeling for Alan was one of mere womanly pity.

She loved him; and she would not go on lying to her own heart by saying
that she did not.

Her character was not by any means perfect; but, as with all of us, a
mixture of good and ill--the evil and the good often springing out of
the same inborn qualities of her nature. She had a keen sense of
enjoyment in hearing and seeing new things, in broaching new ideas and
entering upon fresh fields of thought; and her appetite in these
respects was all the stronger for the gloom and seclusion in which the
earlier years of her womanhood had been spent. She was lavish in
generosity to her friends, and did not count the cost when she wanted to
be kind. But as the desire for enjoyment may be carried to the length of
self-indulgence, so there is often a selfishness in giving and a
recklessness in being over kind. Lettice, moreover, was extravagant in
the further sense that she did not look much beyond the present month or
present year of existence. She thought her sun would always shine.

Her blemishes were quite compatible with her virtues, with the general
right-mindedness and brave performance of duty which had hitherto marked
her life. She was neither bad nor perhaps very good, but just such a
woman as Nature selects to be the instrument of her most mysterious
workings.

If Lettice admitted to herself the defeat which she had sustained in one
quarter, she was all the less disposed to accept a check elsewhere. Her
will to resist a hopeless love was broken down, but that only increased
the strength of her determination to conceal the weakness from every
eye, to continue the struggle of life as though there were no flaw in
her armor, and to work indefatigably for the independence of thought and
feeling and action which she valued above all other possessions.

So she chained herself to her desk, and finished her romance, which in
its later chapters gained intensity of pathos and dramatic insight from
the constant immolation of her own heart as she imagined the martyrdoms
and sacrifices of others.

The story which was to make her famous had been conceived in sorrow, and
it became associated with the greatest sufferings of her life. She had
scarcely sent it off to the publisher, in the month of October, when her
mother, who had been gradually failing both in body and in mind, quietly
passed away in her sleep. No death could have been easier. The heart had
done its work, and ceased to beat; but though Lettice was spared the
grief which she would have felt if her mother had lingered long on a
painful death-bed, the shock was still very severe. For a time she was
entirely prostrated by it. The manifold strain upon her mind had tried
her too much, and for several weeks after the funeral Clara Graham was
nursing her through a dangerous illness.




CHAPTER XVII.

"TO THY CHAMBER WINDOW, SWEET!"


The message which had been sent by Lettice to Alan, by the mouth of Mrs.
Bundlecombe, had not lost much in its transit.

"Tell him," she had said, "that I have heard what he has suffered. Tell
him not to trouble for me because I am forewarned, and am not afraid of
anything she can do. And tell him that he should not think of punishing
her, for the punishment she has brought on herself is enough."

It had consoled him greatly to have this assurance of her sympathy. He
did not presume too far on the mere fact of her having sent him a
message, and the words themselves did not amount to very much. But if
she had cared nothing at all, she would have said nothing at all; and
perhaps the description which his aunt gave him of Lettice's kindness to
her, and of her interest in the story which she had heard, did more to
appease his heart than anything else.

It was his full intention to do all that was possible to deliver himself
from the bondage of his unhappy marriage, and in the meantime he would
take every precaution to prevent Lettice from being annoyed by this
termagant of a woman. But he rejoiced to think that Lettice herself was
in some manner prepared for what might happen to her, and was on her
guard against the danger.

There was a certain sweetness in the thought that they shared this
danger between them, that his enemy was hers also, and that she had
voluntarily ranged herself by his side. A feeling of satisfaction
flashed through his mind at this community of interests with the woman
whom he loved, but it was merged at once in the conviction that he could
not be content for one single moment to leave her exposed to the
possibility of insult from Cora.

She had commanded him not to punish his wife. It was very difficult for
him to obey. This bitterness against the degraded wretch was roused to
its highest pitch by her last outbreak. If she would only die out of his
life--die in any sense, so that he might hear and see her no more--he
would not ask for her punishment. If she would cease to be his wife, and
enable him to stand beside the pure and steadfast woman whose gentle
influence had transformed his soul, he would forgive her. There was no
way in which this could be done except by exposing her before the world,
and depriving her of all right to look to him for support, and in the
doing of this he knew full well there would be no room for weak pity and
misgiving.

He could not forgive her if that was to mean that he should keep her as
his wife, and go on trying to buy her silence. He did not want to
inflict pain upon her out of mere resentment, and if he could have his
way in the matter of the divorce he was quite willing that she should
have some of his money. He would be so rich without her that he would
gladly go out into the street then and there, stripped of everything
that he possessed, if in that way he could shake off the galling fetters
that weighed upon him.

To-morrow he would tell his lawyer that she was to have her weekly money
again, on condition of her solemnly renewing her engagement not to
molest him in any way, and not to interfere with any of his friends. She
would probably regard the offer as a sign of weakness, but at any rate
it would put her on her good behavior for a time. He would do this for
Lettice's sake, if not for his own.

He knew with whom he had to deal, and of what this raving woman was
capable. If she had been English, or German, and had gone utterly to the
bad, she might by this time have been lethargically besotted, and would
have given him very little trouble so long as she received her two
pounds a week. But Cora was Latin, and belonged to the same race as the
poet who drew the harpies, and the Gorgons, and mad Dido, and frenzied
Camilla, who had painted in a hundred forms the unrestrained fury of his
countrywomen, when the grace and tenderness of their sex had deserted
them. She also was besotted at times, but whenever she was not besotted
her mind was full of vivacity, and her anger was as a whirlwind, and
neither fear nor prudence could hold her in check. Alan knew her only
too well, even before she had tried to kill him in France, and he had no
doubt that the outbreak of the last few days was only the beginning of a
persecution which she would maintain so long as she had the power to
injure him.

For himself he had already resolved what to do. Even his aunt must not
be subject to these annoyances, and he bade her pack up her things and
go to an old friend of hers in the country. He would leave his present
lodging and get housed somewhere out of her reach. Why should he remain
at her mercy, when it did not matter to any one where he lived, and when
certainly no householder would endure a lodger who was liable to be
visited by a madwoman?

But Lettice? How could she be defended from attack? It was clear that
Cora was jealous of her, or at all events maliciously set against her.
It had required very little to produce that effect. Heaven knew that
Lettice had done nothing to excite jealousy even in the mind of a
blameless wife, entitled to the most punctilious respect and
consideration of her husband. If only Lettice could be placed in safety,
carried away from London to some happy haven where no enemy could follow
and torment her, and where he might guard her goings and comings, he
would be content to play the part of a watch-dog, if by that means he
could be near her and serve her!

Something impelled him to get up and leave the house. It was dark by
this time, and he wandered aimlessly through the streets; but by and by,
without any conscious intention, he found himself walking rapidly in the
direction of Hammersmith.

Eight o'clock had struck when he left his lodgings in Alfred Place, and
it was after nine when he stood at the corner where the main-road passes
by the entrance to Brook Green. He had never once looked behind him;
and, even if he had, he would scarcely have detected in the darkness the
figure which dogged his steps with obstinate persistence.

He hesitated for a minute or more at the corner, and then walked slowly
round the Green. Opposite to Maple Cottage there was a large tree, and
underneath it, barely visible from the pavement, a low wooden seat. Here
he sat down, and watched the dimly-lighted windows.

Why had he come there? What was in his mind when he turned his face to
Lettice's cottage, and sat patiently looking out of the darkness? He
could not have answered the questions if they had been put to him. But
he felt a sense of comfort in knowing that she was so near, and pleased
himself with the thought that even for these few minutes he was guarding
her from unseen dangers.

He may have been sitting there for half-an-hour--a hundred images
chasing each other through his disordered brain--when suddenly a blind
in the cottage was drawn up. For a moment he saw the form of Lettice as
she stood at the window, with a lamp in her hand, framed like a picture
by the ivy which covered the wall. Then the shutters closed, and he was
left alone in the darkness. Alone, as he thought: but he was not alone.
He had started to his feet when her face appeared at the window, and
stood with his arms extended, as though he would reach through space to
touch her. Then, as she disappeared, he softly murmured her name.

"Lettice! My Lettice!"

A harsh laugh grated on his ears. It came from the other side of the
tree, and Alan sprang in the direction of the sound. He need not have
hastened, for his wife had no desire to conceal her presence. She was
coming forward to meet him; and there, in the middle of the Green,
shrouded in almost complete darkness, the two stood face to face.

"Tiens, mon ami; te voila!"

She was in her mocking mood--certain to be quiet for a few minutes, as
Alan told himself the moment he recognized her. What was she doing here?
He had thought that she did not know where Lettice lived; how had she
discovered the place? It did not occur to him that his own folly had
betrayed the secret; on the contrary, he blessed the instinct which had
brought him to the spot just when he was wanted. "A spirit in my feet
hath led me to thy chamber window, sweet!" All this passed through his
mind in a couple of seconds.

"Yes, I am here. And you! How came you here?"

"Nothing more simple. I came on my feet. But you walked quick, my dear;
I could hardly keep up with you at times."

"You followed me!"

"Yes, I followed you--all the way from Alfred Place. I wanted so much to
know where she lived, and I said, 'He shall show me. He, who would not
for worlds that I should know--he will be my sign-post.' Pouf! you men
are stupid creatures. I must be cunning with you, my good husband who
would leave me to starve--who would divorce me, and marry this woman,
and cut the hated Cora out of your life. But no, my poor child, it shall
not be. So long as we live, we two, Cora will never desert you. It is my
only consolation, that I shall be able to follow every step of your
existence as I followed you to-night, without your knowing where I am,
or at what moment I may stand before you."

"Let us walk," said Alan, "and talk things over. Why stand here?"

"You are afraid that I shall make another scandal, and rouse the
virtuous Lettice from her pillow, with the sound of her name screamed
out in the night? Ha, ha! How the poor coward trembles! Have no fear!
Twice in a week your brutal police have seized me, and I do not love
their kind attentions. Now and then I may defy them, when I need an
excitement of that kind; but not to-night. To-night I mean to be clever,
and show you how I can twist a cold-blooded Englishman round my finger.
If you go, then I will scream--it is a woman's bludgeon, my child, as
her tongue is her dagger. Bah! be quiet and listen to me. You shall not
divorce me, for if you try I will accuse you of all sorts of
things--basenesses that will blast your name for ever."

"I am not afraid of you," said Alan. "For anything I know, you have a
pistol under your cloak--shoot me. I took you to love and cherish, and
you have made my life a hell. What good is it? Shoot!"

"No; that makes a noise. In Paris I would shoot you, for it is you who
have destroyed my life. But in London you do not understand these
things, so that I must act differently. Listen! If you try to divorce
me, and do not pay me my money, I have one or two little pistol-shots a
l'anglaise which will suit you perfectly. Shall I tell you what I would
say, to anyone who would listen to me--in court, in the street,
anywhere?"

"As you please."

"First, that you fired at me at Culoz, and that I can bring forward
witnesses of the attempted assassination."

"That is pure nonsense; I am not to be frightened by such child's play."

"Second, so far as the divorce is concerned, that whatever my offence
may have been, you have condoned it. Do you not understand, my friend?
Did I not find shelter in your rooms in Montagu Place? I would have a
good lawyer, who would know how to make the most of that."

"Have you nothing stronger to rely on?"

"Listen; you shall tell me. My third pistol-shot is this--that you were
wont to make private assignations with Miss Lettice Campion, and that
you had been seen dropping from her window, here in Brook Green, at
midnight. What do you think of that, for example?"

"Vile wretch!" said Alan. "Your malice has robbed you of your senses.
Who would believe you?"

"Do not be a child. Are you English, and do you ask who would believe a
woman telling these tales of a man? Do you not know that men are ruined
every day in England by the lies of women? The better the man, the more
abandoned the woman, the more incredible her lies, so much the more
certain is his condemnation. Bah, you know it! I should not hesitate
about the lies, and, if I made them sufficiently repulsive, your noble
countrymen would not hesitate to believe them. Do you doubt it? What
think you of my plan?"

He made no answer; he was trying to command himself.

"Now, tell me! Shall I have my money as usual?"

"Before I left the house," he said, "I had resolved that the money ought
to be paid to you. So long as you are my wife, you ought not to starve."

"Good! It is an annuity for life!"

"No. I would give a hand or an eye to be free from you."

"They would be useless to me, my dear. Would you give the fair fame of
Lettice? It will cost no less."

"Let that pass!"

"Yes, we will let that pass. Then, I receive my money as usual?"

"Go to Mr. Larmer to-morrow; he will pay it."

"I hate this Mr. Larmer--he is an animal without manners. But no matter.
I am glad you are reasonable, my friend. You buy a respite for a few
weeks. I shall forget you with all my heart--until I have a migraine,
and suddenly remember you again. But it is too cheap; I cannot live
decently on this paltry sum. Good-bye, my child--and gare
aux-migraines!"

She was gone, and Alan was left alone. He had dug his nails into the
palms of his hands, in the effort to restrain himself, until the blood
came; and long after the mocking fiend had departed he sat silent on the
bench, half-stupefied with rage and despair.

Was he really the coward that he felt himself, to listen to her
shameless threats, and tremble at the thought of her machinations?
Lettice had told him that she was not afraid; but ought he not to be
afraid for her, and do all that was possible to avert a danger from her
which he would not fear on his own account?

Ah, if he could only take counsel with her, how wise and brave she would
be; how he would be encouraged by her advice and strengthened by her
sympathy! But he knew that it was impossible to call to his aid the
woman whom it was his first duty to protect from annoyance. She should
never know the torture he was enduring until it had came to an end, and
he could tell it with his own lips as an indifferent story of the past.




CHAPTER XVIII.

A SLEEPY NOOK.


Three miles from Angleford, on the other side of the river, and hidden
away by trees on every side, sleeps the lazy little village of
Birchmead. So lazy is the place--so undisturbed have been its slumbers,
from generation to generation, that it might puzzle the most curious to
think why a village should be built there at all. There is no ford
through the river, and, though a leaky ferryboat makes occasional
journeys from one side to the other, the path which leads to the bank is
too precipitous for any horse to tread. The only route by which a cart
can enter Birchmead branches off from the Dorminster Road, across a
quarter of a mile of meadows: and when the gate of the first meadow is
closed, the village is completely shut in on every side. The world
scarcely knows it, and it does not know the world--its life is "but a
sleep and a forgetting."

The place has a history of its own, which can be told in a couple of
sentences. Two hundred years ago an eccentric member of the family to
which the country-side belonged had chosen to set up here a little
community on his own account, shaped on a model which, universally
applied would doubtless regenerate the world. He built, out of stone, a
farmhouse and barns, and a score of cottages for his working-men, and
there he spent his life and his money, nursing for some thirty years his
dream of hard work and perfect satisfaction. Then he died, and a farmer
without his faith and wealth succeeded him, and the hamlet lost its
originality, and became as much like other hamlets as its love of sleep
and pride of birth would allow.

One thing saves it from desertion and extinction. It has a reputation,
over half a county, for being one of the most healthy and
life-prolonging spots in England. It certainly contains a remarkable
number of old men and women, some of whom have come from the neighboring
towns to end their lives in the weather-proof stone cottages and fertile
allotments which remain at this day precisely as they were built and
measured out by the philanthropic squire in the seventeenth century.
Other cottages have been run up in the meantime, and a few villas of a
more pretentious character; but there is always a brisk competition for
the substantial domiciles, as snug and sound as any almshouse, which
encircle the village green of Birchmead.

In one of these cottages Mrs. Bundlecombe found a refuge when Alan sent
her away from London. It was in the occupation of an old friend with
whom she had been on intimate terms at Thorley--a widow like herself,
blessed by Heaven with a perennial love of flowers and vegetables, and
recognized by all her neighbors as the best gardener and neatest
housewife in the community. With Mrs. Chigwin, Alan's aunt was happier
than she had ever hoped to be again, and the only drawback to her
felicity was the thought of her nephew's troubles and solitude.

The next cottage to Mrs. Chigwin's was inhabited by old Mrs. Harrington,
the grandmother of Lettice's first maid. There had been no love lost
between Mrs. Bundlecombe and Mrs. Harrington, when they once lived in
the same town. The grudge had arisen out of a very small matter. The
bookseller's' wife had sold a Bible to Mrs. Harrington, in the absence
of her husband, for twopence more than Mr. Bundlecombe had demanded for
the same book, from some common acquaintance of both parties to the
bargain, on the previous day; and this common acquaintance having seen
the book and depreciated it a few weeks later, the purchaser had an
abiding sense of having been outrageously duped and cheated. She had
come to the shop and expressed herself to this effect, in no moderate
terms; and Mrs. Bundlecombe, whilst returning the twopence, had made
some disparaging remarks on the other lady's manners, meanness, dress,
age, and general inferiority. The affront had never been quite forgotten
on either side, and it was not without much ruffling of their mental
plumage that the two old bodies found themselves established within a
few yards of each other.

The squire's cottages at Birchmead were detached, but their ample
gardens had only a low wall between them, so that the neighboring
occupiers could not well avoid an occasional display of their mutual
disposition, whether good or bad. It was close upon winter when Mrs.
Bundlecombe arrived in the village, and very wet weather, so that there
was no immediate clashing of souls across the garden wall; but in
November there came a series of fine warm days, when no one who had a
garden could find any excuse for staying indoors. Accordingly, one
morning Mrs. Chigwin, who knew what was amiss between her friends,
seeing Mrs. Harrington pacing the walk on the other side of the wall,
determined to bring about a meeting, and, if possible, a reconciliation.

"Elizabeth, my dear, that gravel looks perfectly dry. You must come out
in the sun, and see the last of my poor flowers."

"Martha Chigwin," said her visitor, with a solemn face; "do you see that
woman?"

"Yes, I see her. What then?"

"I do not nurse wrath, my love, but I cannot abide her."

"Are not six years long enough to remember a little thing of that sort?
Come along, Elizabeth; you will find that she has grown quite civil and
pleasant-spoken since you used to know her."

So they went out into the garden, and the two ancient foes sniffed and
bridled at each other as they approached through the transparent screen
of tall yellow chrysanthemums which lined Mrs. Chigwin's side of the
wall.

"Mrs. Harrington," said the peacemaker, "there is no need for me to
introduce you to my old friend, Elizabeth Bundlecombe, who has come to
pay me a nice long visit. We shall be her neighbors and close friends, I
hope, and if you will do me the favor to come in this afternoon and
drink a cup of tea with us, we shall be very glad to see you."

"Thank you kindly, Mrs. Chigwin. Good-morning to you, Mrs. Bundlecombe.
I hear you have been living in London, ma'am, quite grand, as the saying
is!"

"No, Mrs. Harrington, not grand at all, ma'am. Don't say so. I have
known what trouble is since my poor dear husband died, and I shall never
feel like being grand again."

"Never again, ma'am? Well, I am sure that Mrs. Bundlecombe knows how to
bear her fortune, whether good or bad. Did you say never again, ma'am?"

The old lady seemed to take this phrase as a kind of comprehensive and
dignified apology for the past, which ought to be met in a conciliatory
manner.

"Well, well, Mrs. Bundlecombe, bygones is bygones, and there's no more
to be said about it. Not but what principle is principle, be it twopence
or twenty pounds."

"Allowance must be made, Mrs. Harrington, for the feelings of the
moment."

"On both sides, ma'am," said Mrs. Harrington.

"Like reasonable parties," said Mrs. Bundlecombe.

Then they nodded at each other with much vigor, and shook hands across
the top of the wall through the branches of the chrysanthemums. Thus
vaguely, but with a clear understanding on the part of both combatants,
peace was made, and good relations were established. Mrs. Chigwin was
delighted at the easy way in which the difficulty had been overcome, and
in the afternoon she treated her friends in such a genuinely hospitable
and considerate fashion that they were soon perfectly at their ease.
Indeed, the three old people became very intimate, and spent their
Christmas together in peace and charity.

Alan came over one day early in February to see his aunt, and make sure
that she was as comfortable as she professed to be. It was a
characteristic proceeding on his part. Mrs. Bundlecombe, as the reader
may have observed, was not very poetic in her taste, and not so refined
in manners as most of the women with whom Alan now associated. But he
always thought of her as the sister of his mother, to whom he had been
romantically attached; and he had good reason, moreover, to appreciate
her devotion to himself during the last year or so. He found her fairly
happy, and said nothing which might disturb her peace of mind. Lettice
Campion, he told her, had recovered from a serious illness, and had gone
on the Continent for a few weeks with Mrs. Hartley. He was bent on
obtaining a divorce, and expected the case to come on shortly. This he
treated as a matter for unmixed rejoicing; and he casually declared that
he had not seen "the Frenchwoman" for eight or ten weeks; which was true
enough, but only because he was carefully keeping out of her way. And it
was a poor equivocation, as the reader will presently see.

So Mrs. Bundlecome flattered herself that things were going fairly well
with her nephew, and she possessed her soul in patience.

Now as Alan sat talking to his aunt in Mrs. Chigwin's best room, looking
out upon the garden on Mrs. Harrington's side, he suddenly started, and
stopped short in what he was saying.

"Why, Aunt Bessy, who on earth is living next door to you?"

Mrs. Bundlecombe looked where he pointed, and was almost as much
surprised as himself to see Lettice's former maid, Milly, walking in the
garden with all the airs and graces of a grand lady. She had on a fur
cloak, and a little cap to match, and she looked so handsome and
well-dressed that it would not have been surprising if Alan had not
recognized her. But Milly's pretty face, once seen, was not easily
forgotten; and, as she was associated with Lettice in Alan's mind, he
had all the more reason for recalling her features.

"That is the first I have seen of her in these parts," said Mrs.
Bundlecombe. "You remember that Miss Campion had a Thorley girl at Maple
Cottage, who left her five or six months ago?"

"I remember your telling me so--Milly, she used to be called?"

"Yes, Emily Harrington. That is the girl, without a doubt. Her
grandmother lives over yonder; but I never knew that she was expecting a
visit from this fine lady. Only last week she was telling me that she
had not heard from Milly for several months. There was a letter from her
before Christmas, to say that she was married and traveling abroad."

Mrs. Bundlecombe shook her head dubiously from side to side, and
continued the motion for some time. She was thinking how much money it
would have taken to buy that sealskin cloak; but, however far her doubts
may have carried her, she did not give utterance to them in words.

"She is certainly very nice-looking," said Alan. "And she seems to be
getting on in the world. Perhaps she has made a good marriage; I should
not at all wonder."

"Well, it is charitable to hope so," said Aunt Bessy, with an expression
in her face that was anything but hopeful. "I can't forgive her for
leaving Miss Campion in such a hurry. I suppose she wanted to better
herself, as those minxes always say. As if anyone could be better off
than living with _her_!"

Alan turned round to the window again, and looked out. His aunt's words
touched a chord in his heart, which vibrated strongly. To live with her,
in any capacity whatever--assuredly that would be the highest attainable
good. To draw from her gentle presence that bliss of absolute rest and
ease which he had never known until he came to know her--to talk and
listen without a shadow of reserve, forgetting self, unashamed of any
inferiority which his mind might show in comparison with hers, unafraid
of giving offense to that sweet and well-poised nature--to look upon her
face, almost infantile in its ingenuous expression, yet with indomitable
strength in the clear grey eyes which revealed the soul within--to live
with her would indeed be perfect happiness!

And the more he felt this, the less hopeful he was of realizing his
aspiration. She had been ill, at the point of death, and he could not be
near her. He had inquired of her progress at the Grahams' house, but
always in fear lest he should bring sorrow to her, or annoyance to them.
The creature whom he had made his wife was never absent from his
thoughts. In his most despondent moments he ceased to believe that he
would ever be able to shake her off. She haunted him, asleep or awake,
at his meals and at his books, in his quiet lodging or when he stole out
for a solitary walk. He tried to persuade himself that he exaggerated
his trouble, and that there were plenty of men under similar
circumstances who would not allow their peace of mind to be disturbed.
But if he was weaker than others, that did not make his pain less
bitter. He feared her, and dreaded the fulfilment of her threats; yet
not so much on his own account as because they were directed against
Lettice.

It was no consolation to him to think that the law would punish
her--that the police would remove her as a drunken brawler--that the
courts could give him his divorce, or perhaps shut her up as a madwoman.
What good would even a divorce be to him if she had slandered Lettice,
blackened his character, alienated all whom he loved, and remained alive
to be the curse and poison of his existence?

As he pondered these things in his heart, the trouble which he had
fought off when he came down into the country that morning returned upon
him with renewed force. He had fled from town to escape from the agony
of shame and disgust which she had once more inflicted on him, and he
groaned aloud as he thought of what had happened in the last few days.

"I think I must have a touch of the gout," he said, turning round to
where his aunt was sitting, with a pleasant smile on his face. "It
catches me sometimes with such a sudden twinge that I cannot help crying
out like that."

Aunt Bessy looked hard at him, and shook her head; but she said nothing.

Soon after that, Alan went away; and he had not been gone half-an-hour,
when there came a gentle rap at the cottage door.

Mrs. Bundlecombe opened it at once, and found, as she had expected, that
the visitor was none other than our old friend Milly. Aunt Bessy had had
a few minutes to prepare herself for this scene, and was therefore able
to comport herself, as she imagined, with proper dignity. Affecting not
to see the pretty hand which was held out to her, she started back,
looked inquisitively into the other's face, and then cried out, as she
turned her head round upon her shoulders, "Well, Martha! Martha Chigwin!
Here is an old acquaintance come to see us. Emily Harrington, love, Mrs.
Harrington's grand-daughter, who went to live with Miss Campion in
London. Well, you did surprise me!" she said in a more quiet voice.
"Come in and sit down, Emily Harrington!"

"Granny told me you were here," said Milly, a little taken aback by this
reception, "so I thought I must come in and see how you were."

"We are very well, thank you kindly, Milly. And how are you? But there
is no need to ask you, for you look a picture of health, and spirits,
and--and good luck, Milly Harrington!"

"Oh yes, I am very well. You don't know that I have been married since
you saw me last. My name is Mrs. Beadon now."

She drew off her glove as she spoke, and let her long hand fall upon her
lap, so that the old ladies might see her wedding-ring and keeper.

"Well, my dear," said Mrs. Bundlecombe, in a mollified voice, "if you
are married to a good man, I am very glad, indeed. And I hope he is well
to-do, and makes you happy. You are nicely dressed, Milly, but nice
clothes are not everything, are they?"

"No, indeed, they are not. Oh, yes, Mr. Beadon is good to me in every
way, so you need not trouble yourself on my account."

After that preliminary sparring, they became friendly enough. Milly was
quite at her ease when her position as a wife was established, and she
amused her hearers by a lively account of her recent fortunes and
adventures--some of them, perhaps, slightly fictitious in character,
others exaggerated and glorified. Her husband, she told them, was a
great traveler, and was sometimes out of England for six months or a
year at a time. He had just gone abroad again, and she had taken the
opportunity of coming to see her grandmother--and even of living with
her for awhile, if she found Birchmead supportable. They were not rich,
but Mr. Beadon allowed her quite enough to live comfortably upon.

So she played the grand lady in the hamlet, to her own infinite
satisfaction. But now and again she had business to transact in London,
and then she would send to Thorley for a cab, and take the afternoon
train to Liverpool Street, and return in about twenty-four hours,
generally with some little present in her bag for her grandmother, or
grandmother's friends.

None the less did poor Milly find that time hung heavy on her hands. She
had not yet clipped the wings of her ambition, and she still pined for a
wider sphere in which to satisfy her vague and restless longings.
However she might brave it out to others, she was very far from being
happy; and now and then she took herself to task, and admitted that all
she had, and all she hoped for, would be but a small price to give if
she could purchase once more the freedom of her girlhood.




CHAPTER XIX.

SIR JOHN'S GLOXINIAS.


Whatever may have been the intention of Nature when she produced Sir
John Pynsent, there was no doubt as to his own conception of the part
which he was fitted to play in the world.

He considered himself, and indeed he was, above all things, a
manipulator of men. His talents in this direction had been displayed at
school and at college, and when he settled down to political life in
London, and impulsively began to suggest, to persuade, to contrive, and
to organize, everyone with whom he came in contact acknowledged a
superior mind, or, at any rate, a more ingenious and fertile mind. He
had refused to bind himself down to an office, as his friends wanted him
to do, or to take part in the direction of a "Central Association" for
dealing with men in the lump. It was absurd to think of tying Sir John
to a place, or a routine, or a pledge of any kind. His art was to be
ubiquitous; he aspired to be the great permeator of the Conservative
party; and by sheer force of activity he soon became the best known and
most popular of the younger generation of Tories.

His triumphs as a manager of men were not confined to public life. He
was one of a numerous family, and he managed them all. Every Pynsent
deferred to Sir John's opinion, not merely because he was the head of
the house, but because he had assumed the command, and justified the
assumption by his shrewdness and common-sense.

The one person in the family who gave most anxiety was his half-sister,
Anna. Sir John's father had married a second time, when his son was a
youth at Eton, and Anna, the fruit of this union, inherited, not only
her mother's jointure of twenty thousand pounds, but a considerable
fortune from her mother's elder brother, who had been a manufacturer in
Vanebury. This fortune had been allowed to accumulate for the last
eighteen years, as her father, and after him, her brother, had provided
her with a home, and disdained to touch "Nan's money." Sir John was a
very good brother to her, and it was even rumored that he had married
early chiefly for the purpose of providing Nan with an efficient
chaperon. Whether this was true or not, he had certainly married a woman
who suited him admirably; Lady Pynsent sympathized in all his tastes and
ambitions, gave excellent dinner parties, and periodically brought a
handsome boy into the world to inherit the family name and embarrass the
family resources. At present there were five of these boys, but as the
family resources were exceedingly large, and Sir John was a most
affectionate parent, the advent of each had been hailed with increasing
satisfaction.

It was a great relief to Sir John's mind to find that his wife and his
sister were such good friends. He might be a manipulator of man, but he
was not--he acknowledged to himself--always successful in his
manipulation of women. If Selina had found Nan in the way, or if Nan had
been jealous of Selina and Selina's babies, Sir John felt that he would
have been placed on the horns of a dilemma. But this had not been the
case. Nan was in the schoolroom when Lady Pynsent first arrived at
Culverley, and the child had been treated with kindness and discretion.
Nan repaid the kindness by an extravagant fondness for her little
nephews, who treated her abominably, and the discretion by an absolute
surrender of her will to Lady Pynsent's as far as her intercourse with
the outer world was concerned. With her inner life, she considered that
Lady Pynsent had not much to do, and it was in its manifestation that
Sir John observed the signs which made him anxious.

Nan, he said to himself, was a handsome girl, and one whom many men were
sure to admire. Also, she had sixty thousand pounds of her own, of which
she would be absolute mistress when she was twenty-one. It was a sum
which was sure to attract fortune-hunters; and how could he tell whether
Nan would not accept her first offer, and then stick to an unsuitable
engagement with all the obstinacy which she was capable of displaying?
Nan sometimes made odd friends, and would not give them up at anybody's
bidding. How about the man she married? She would have her own way in
that matter--Sir John was sure of it--and, after refusing all the
eligible young men within reach, would (he told his wife repeatedly) end
by taking up with a crooked stick at last.

"I don't think she'll do that," said Lady Pynsent when her husband
appealed in this way to her. "Nan is very _difficile_. She is more
likely to remain unmarried than marry an unsuitable man."

"Unmarried!" Sir John threw up his hands. "She _must_ marry! Why, if she
doesn't marry, she is just the girl to take up a thousand fads--to make
herself the laughing-stock of the county!"

"She will not do that; she has too much good taste."

"Good taste won't avail her! You know what her plans are already, to
live in Vanebury as soon as she is twenty-one, and devote herself to the
welfare of the working-people! Don't you call that a fad? Won't she make
a laughing stock of herself and of us too? Why, it's worse than
Radicalism--it's pure Socialism and Quixotry," said poor Sir John, who
was proud of his Toryism.

His wife only shook her head, and said, drily, that she would not
undertake to prophesy.

"Prophesy? My dear Selina, I merely want you to exert common caution and
foresight. There is but one thing to do with Anna. We must get her
married as soon as ever we can, before she is twenty-one, if possible.
She must marry a man on our own side, some years older than herself--a
man of the world, who will look after her property and teach her
common-sense--a man who can restrain her, and guide her, and make her
happy. I would give a thousand pounds to find such a man."

But in his own heart the baronet believed that he had found him, for he
thought of his friend, Sydney Campion.

Campion had small private means, if any; he knew that; but then he
seemed likely to be one of the foremost men of the day, and if he could
achieve his present position at his age, what would he not be in ten
years' time? Quite a match for Anna Pynsent, in spite of her beauty and
her sixty thousand pounds. If Nan had been a little more commonplace,
Sir John would have aspired higher for her. But there was a strain of
"quixotry," as he called it, in her nature, which made him always
uncertain as to her next action. And he felt that it would be a relief
to him to have her safely married to a friend of his own, and one whom
he could influence, if necessary, in the right direction, like Sydney
Campion.

Campion was a handsome fellow, too, and popular, Sir John believed, with
the ladies. It was all the more odd and unaccountable that Nan seemed to
have taken a dislike to him. She would not talk about his doings; she
would go out if she thought that he was likely to call. Sir John could
not understand it. And Campion seemed shy of coming to the house in
Eaton Square when the Pynsents returned to town; he was pleasant enough
with Sir John at the Club, but he did not appear to wish for much social
intercourse with Sir John's wife and sister. The worthy baronet would
have been a little huffed, but for the preoccupation of his mind with
other matters, chiefly political.

But this was in November and December; and he knew that Campion's mother
had lately died, and that he was anxious about that clever sister of
his, who had lately written a good novel, and then been ill, and had
gone to Italy. There was that Walcott affair, too, which had lately come
to Sir John's ears, a very awkward affair for Campion to have his
sister's name mixed up in. Probably that was the reason why he was
holding back. Very nice of Campion, very nice. And Sir John became
doubly cordial in his manner, and pressed Sydney to dine with him next
week.

With some reluctance, Sydney accepted the invitation. He had been
perilously near making a fool of himself with Miss Pynsent, and he knew
that she had found it out. It was quite enough to make him feel angry
and resentful, and to wish to avoid her. At the same time, he was
conscious of a feeling of regret that he had muddled matters so
completely--for Miss Pynsent was a lovely girl, her violin-playing was
delicious, she had sixty thousand pounds, and Sir John was his friend.

Sydney lost himself for a moment in a reverie.

"Not very likely," he said, waking up with a rather uneasy laugh. "At
the best of times, I should never have had much chance. There are a good
many reasons against it now." And it was with a slight shade upon his
brow that he dismissed the matter from his mind and applied himself to
business.

He need not have troubled himself. When he went to dine in Eaton Square,
Miss Pynsent was absent. She had gone to spend the evening with a
friend. Evidently, thought Sydney, with an odd feeling of discomfiture,
because she wanted to avoid him. How ridiculous it was! What a
self-conscious little fool she must be to take offense at a compliment,
even if it were rather obvious, and not in the best possible taste! He
began to feel angry with Miss Pynsent. It did not occur to him for some
time that he was expending a great deal of unusual warmth and irritation
on a very trifling matter. What were Miss Pynsent and her opinions to
him? Other women admired him, if she did not; other women were ready
enough to accept his flattery. But just because there was one thing out
of his reach, one woman who showed a positive distaste for his society,
Sydney, like the spoiled child of the world that he was, was possessed
by a secret hankering for that one thing, for the good opinion of the
woman who would have none of him. Vanity was chiefly to blame for this
condition of things; but Sydney's vanity was a plant of very long and
steady growth.

He saw nothing more of the Pynsents, however, until February, when, on
the day of the first drawing-room, he ran up against Sir John in
Piccadilly.

"Come along," said Sir John instantly, "I want you to come to my wife's.
I'm late, and she won't scold me if you are with me. I shall use you as
a buffer."

Sydney laughed and shook his head. "Very sorry, too busy, I'm afraid,"
he began.

But Sir John would not be baffled. He had put his hand within Sydney's
arm and was walking him rapidly down ---- Street.

"My dear fellow, we've not seen you for an age. You may just as well
look in this afternoon. Nan's been presented to-day, and there's a
drawing-room tea going on--a function of adoration to the dresses, I
believe. The women will take it as a personal compliment if you come and
admire them."

Mentally, Sydney shrugged his shoulders. He had had enough of paying
compliments to Miss Pynsent. But he saw that there was no help for it.
Sir John would be offended if he did not go, and really he had no
engagement. And he rather wondered how Miss Pynsent would look in Court
attire. She had worn a plain cotton and a flapping straw hat when he saw
her last.

Lady Pynsent's drawing-room was crowded, but she greeted her husband and
Mr. Campion with great cordiality. She was wearing an elaborate costume
of blue velvet and blush-rose satin, and bore an indescribable
resemblance to a cockatoo. A dowager in black satin and two _debutantes_
in white, who belonged to some country place and were resting at Lady
Pynsent's house before going home in the evening, were also present; but
at first Sydney did not see Nan Pynsent. She had entered a little
morning-room, with two or three friends of her own age, who wanted to
inspect her dress more narrowly; and it was not until Sydney had been in
the room for five or ten minutes that she reappeared.

Was this stately and beautiful woman Nan Pynsent indeed? Sydney was not
learned in the art of dress, or he might have appraised more exactly the
effect produced by the exquisite lace, the soft white ostrich feathers,
the milk-white pearls, that Nan was wearing on this memorable occasion.
He was well accustomed by this time to the sight of pretty girls and
pretty dresses; but there was something in Miss Pynsent's face and
figure which struck him with a new and almost reluctant sort of
admiration.

He was looking at her, without knowing how intent his gaze had become,
when she glanced round and caught his eye. She bowed and colored
slightly; then, after saying a word to Lady Pynsent, she came towards
him. Sydney was uncomfortably conscious that her evident intention to
speak to him made her a little nervous.

She held out her long, slim hand, and favored him with the pleasantest
of smiles.

"How do you do, Mr. Campion? I have not met you for a long time, I
think. How good of you to come to-day! Lady Pynsent is so pleased."

There was nothing for Sydney to do but to respond in the same gracious
strain; but he was certainly more reserved than usual in his speech, and
behaved with an almost exaggerated amount of respect and formality.
After the first two or three sentences he noticed that her eyes began to
look abstractedly away from him, and that she answered one of his
remarks at random. And while he was wondering, with some irritation,
what this change might mean, she drew back into a bow window, and
motioned to him almost imperceptibly to follow her. A heavy window
curtain half hid them from curious eyes, and a bank of flowers in the
window gave them an ostensible pretext for their withdrawal.

"Look at John's gloxinias," said Nan. "They came from Culverley, you
know. Oh, Mr. Campion, I want to tell you--I'm sorry that I was so rude
to you at Culverley last summer."

This proceeding was so undignified and so unexpected that Sydney was
stricken dumb with amaze.

"Perhaps you have forgotten it," said Nan, coloring hotly; "but I have
not. It all came from you not knowing who I was, I suppose--Mrs. Murray
told me that she believes you thought I was the governess; and if I had
been, how odd it must have seemed to you that I should talk about your
duties to the Vanebury laborers! You know I have some property there,
and so----"

"Oh, it was perfectly natural, and I never thought of it again," said
Sydney lamely. But she went on unheeding--

"And then I felt vexed, and when you asked me for a flower"--how
innocently it was said!--"I know I banged the door in your face. Selina
said I must have been very rude to you. And so I was."

But Selina had not meant that she should acknowledge her "rudeness" to
Mr. Campion, nor had Nan told her of the bold admiration that she had
read in Sydney's eyes.

"Will you forgive me, Mr. Campion? You are such a friend of John's that
I should not like to think I had offended you."

"You never offended me, Miss Pynsent. In fact, I'm afraid--I--was very
dense." He really did not know what to say; Miss Pynsent's _naivete_
almost alarmed him.

"Then you are not angry with me?"

How lovely were the eyes that looked so pleadingly into his face! Was
she a coquette? But he could only answer as in duty bound--

"Not angry in the very least, Miss Pynsent."

"I am so glad. Because I want to talk to you about Vanebury one day. But
I must not stop now, for there are all these people to talk to, you
know."

"I may ask you to forgive the stupidity of my mistake, then?" said
Sydney quickly.

"It was not stupid: how could you know who I was?----There, John, I have
been showing Mr. Campion your gloxinias. Don't you think them lovely,
Mr. Campion?"

And she glided away with the sweetest smile, and Sydney, after a few
words with Sir John, took his departure, with a feeling of mingled
gratification and amusement which he found rather pleasant. So she had
not thought him impertinent, after all? She did not seem to have noticed
the compliment that he had tried to pay her, and which he now
acknowledged to himself would have suited for Milly Harrington better
than Sir John Pynsent's sister. Was she really as childlike as she
seemed, or was she a designing coquette?

The question was not a very important one, but it led Sydney to make a
good many visits to Sir John's house during the next few weeks, in order
to determine the answer. Miss Pynsent's character interested him, he
said to himself; and then she wanted to discuss the state of the
working-classes in Vanebury. He did not care very much for the state of
the working-classes, but he liked to hear her talk to him about them. It
was a pity that he sometimes forgot to listen to what she was saying;
but the play of expression on her lovely face was so varied, the lights
and shadows in her beautiful eyes succeeded each other so rapidly, that
he was a little apt to look at her instead of attending to the subject
that she had in hand.

This was quite a new experience to Sydney, and for some time his mind
was so much occupied by it that the season was half over before he
actually faced the facts of the situation, and discovered that if he
wanted to pluck this fair flower, and wear it as his own, Sir John
Pynsent was not the man to say him nay.




BOOK IV.

SORROW.

    "Wer nie sein Brod mit Thraenen ass,
    Wer nie die kummervollen Naechte
    Auf seinen Bette weinend sass,
    Er kennt Euch nicht, ihr himmlische Maechte!"

    GOETHE.




CHAPTER XX.

"I WAS THE MORE DECEIVED."


Milly Harrington had passed two months at Birchmead, and her
grandmother's neighbors were beginning to speculate on the probabilities
of her staying over the summer.

"Poor soul; it's lonely for her," Mrs. Chigwin said to her friend,
Elizabeth. "I do hope that Mr. Beadon, or whatever her husband's name
is, will come back before very long. She must be fretting for him, and
fretting's so bad for her."

"You think there is a husband to come, do you?" asked Mrs. Bundlecombe,
mysteriously.

"Why not, Bessy? She says she's married, and she wears a wedding-ring;
and her clothes is beautiful."

"I'd like to see her marriage lines," said Mrs. Bundlecombe. "But,
there! maybe I'm hard on her, poor thing, which I ought not to be,
seeing that I know what trouble is, and how strangely marriages do turn
out sometimes. But if there is a husband in the case, it's shameful the
way he neglects her, never coming to see her, and going abroad on
business, as she says, while she stays with her grandmother!"

"She pays Mrs. Harrington," remarked Mrs. Chigwin, reflectively, "and
she always seems to have plenty of money; but she do look sad and
mournful now and then, and money's not everything to those that want a
little love."

As she concluded her moral observation, she started up, for a shadow
darkened the open doorway: and on looking up, she saw that Milly herself
was standing just outside. The girl's beautiful face was pale and
agitated; and there were tears in her eyes. The old woman noticed that
she was growing haggard, and that there were black lines beneath her
eyes; they exchanged significant looks, and then asked her to step in
and sit down.

"You run about too much and fatigue yourself," said Mrs. Chigwin. "Now
you sit there and look at my flowers, how still they keep; they wouldn't
be half so fine if I was always transplanting them. You want a good,
quiet home for yourself: not to be moving about and staying with
friends, however fond of you they may be."

Milly had sunk into the chair offered to her, with a look of extreme
exhaustion and fatigue, but at Mrs. Chigwin's words she sat up, and her
eyes began to grow bright again.

"I think so myself, Mrs. Chigwin. I shall be glad to get back to my own
nice quiet home again. As for looking tired, it is only because I have
been packing up my things and getting ready to go. Mr. Beadon has
written to me to join him in London, and I am going to start this very
afternoon."

The rosy color came back into her face: she smiled triumphantly, but her
lips quivered as she smiled.

"That's right, my dear. I don't approve of young husbands and wives
living separate, unless there's some very good cause for it," said Mrs.
Bundlecombe, thinking of her beloved Alan. "It always gives occasion to
the enemy, and I think you're very wise to go back. Perhaps you had some
little bit of a tiff or misunderstanding with Mr. Beadon----"

"Oh no," said Milly. The color in her face was painfully hot now. "Mr.
Beadon is always very good and kind. But," she continued, looking down
and pushing her wedding-ring to and fro, "he is very busy indeed, and he
is obliged to go abroad sometimes on business. He travels--I think he
calls it--for a great London house. He is getting on very well, he says,
in his own particular line."

"Ah, that is nice!" said Mrs. Chigwin, comfortably. "And how glad you
will be to see each other."

"Oh, yes," faltered Milly. There was a curiously pathetic look in her
great blue eyes such as we sometimes see in those of a timid child.
"Yes--very glad."

"And you'll bring him down here to see your grandmother, I suppose?
She's not set eyes on him yet, has she? And how nice it will be for you
to come down now and then--especially when you have a family, my dear,
Birchmead being so healthy for children, and Mrs. Harrington such a good
hand with babies----"

Suddenly, and to Mrs. Chigwin's infinite surprise, Milly burst into
tears. The loud, uncontrolled sobs frightened the two old women for a
moment; then Mrs. Chigwin got up and fetched a glass of water, clicking
her tongue against the roof of her mouth, and audibly expressing her
fear that Milly's exertions had been "too much for her." But Mrs.
Bundlecombe sat erect, with a look of something like disapproval upon
her comely old face. She had her own views concerning Milly and her good
fortune; and soft and kind-hearted by nature as she was, there were some
things that Aunt Bessy never forgave. The wickedness of Alan's wife had
hardened her a little to youthful womankind.

"I'm better, thank you," said Milly, checking her sobs at last, and
beginning to laugh hysterically. "I don't know what made me give way so,
I'm sure."

"You're tired, love," said Mrs. Chigwin, sympathetically, "and you're
not well, that's easy to see. You must just take care of yourself, or
you'll be laid up. You tell your good husband _that_ from me, who have
had experience, though without a family myself."

Milly wiped the tears away, and rose from her chair.

"I'll tell him," she said. "But--oh, there's no need: he takes an awful
lot of care of me, you've no idea! Why, it was he that said I had better
come to my grandmother while he was away: he knew that granny would take
care of me; and now, you see"--with hasty triumph--"he wants me home
again!"

She pocketed her handkerchief, and raised her head.

"I thought you said he had been abroad?" said Mrs. Bundlecombe.

"Of course I did, because he _has_ been abroad," the girl said, laughing
nervously. "But he's in London now. Well, good-bye, Mrs. Chigwin;
good-bye, Mrs. Bundlecombe; you'll go in and comfort granny a bit when
I'm gone, won't you? She's been fretting this morning about my going
away."

"Bless you, love," said Mrs. Chigwin. "I'll go in every day if you think
it will do her any good. And if you write to her, Milly, she'll be
pleased, I'm sure."

"I _will_ write," said Milly, in rather a shame-faced way. "I was so
busy--or I'd have written oftener. Good-bye."

She looked at them wistfully, as if reluctant to take her leave; and her
expression so wrought upon Mrs. Chigwin's feelings that she kissed the
girl's cheek affectionately.

"Good-bye, love," she said; "you know where to find us when you want us,
you know."

Milly departed, and the two friends remained silent until her light
figure had passed the window, and the click of the garden gate told them
that she was well out of hearing. Then Mrs. Chigwin began, in rather a
puzzled tone:

"You weren't very hearty with her, Elizabeth. You looked as if you had
something against her."

"I've this against her," said Mrs. Bundlecombe, smoothing down her black
apron with dignity, "that I believe there's something wrong about that
marriage, and that if I were Mrs. Harrington I wouldn't be satisfied
until I'd seen her marriage lines."

"Perhaps she has seen them," said Mrs. Chigwin, the pacific. "And we've
nothing to go upon, Bessy, and I'm sure the idea would never have
entered my head but for you."

"Why did she burst out crying when you talked of her husband and
children coming down here?" asked Mrs. Bundlecombe, acutely. "It may be
that she isn't to blame; but there's something wrong somewhere. She's
hurried and flurried and worried."

And this was true. The summons which Milly had received was of the
briefest and least intelligible character. It was in a handwriting that
she knew well, and although it was unsigned she was tremulously ready
and eager to obey it at once. "Come back to your old lodgings at
Hampstead," the writer said. "Do not stay any longer at Birchmead: I
want you in London." And that was almost all.

Milly hovered all day long between alternations of wild hope and wild
despair. If she had been accustomed to self-analysis, she herself might
have been surprised to see how widely her present moods differed from
those which had dominated her when she lived at Maple Cottage. She was
then a vain, self-seeking little damsel, affectionate and uncorrupted,
with an empty head, indeed, but an innocent heart. Now both self-seeking
and vanity were being scourged out of her by force of the love which she
had learnt to feel. She was little changed in manner, and an observer
might have said that she was as childishly pleased as ever with a new
gaud or a pretty toy; but behind the self-sufficiency of her demeanor,
and the frivolity of her tastes, there was something new--something more
real and living than mere self-indulgence and conceit. The faculty of
giving and spending herself for others had sprung into being with the
first love she had known. For the man with whom she had gone away from
Lettice's house she was willing to lay down her life if he would but
accept the gift. And when he seemed loath to accept it, Milly became
conscious of a heart-sick shame and pain which had already often brought
tears that were not unworthy to her pretty childish eyes. The strength
of her own feelings frightened her sometimes: she did not know how to
resist the surging tide of passion and longing and regret that rose and
fell within her breast, as uncontrollable by her weak will as the waves
by the Danish king of history. Poor Milly's soul had been born within
her, as a woman's soul is often born through love, and the acquisition
cost her nothing but pain as yet, although it might ultimately lead her
to a higher life.

She arrived at the lodgings in Hampstead which had formerly been hers,
about five o'clock in the afternoon. The landlady received her
cordially, saying that "the gentleman had bespoke the rooms," and Milly
was taken at once into the sitting-room, which looked west, and was
lighted by a flood of radiance from the setting sun. Milly sank down on
a sofa, in hopeless fatigue.

"Did he say that he would be home to-night?" she asked of the landlady.

"No, Mrs. Beadon, he didn't; but he said that he was very busy in the
city and would write or send if he couldn't come himself."

"How was he looking?"

"Oh, very well, but a bit worried, I thought," said Mrs. Capper. "Now
let me take your things, ma'am, and then I'll bring up the tea: you
don't look as if your stay in the country had done you much good after
all."

"Oh, I'm very well," said Milly, unfastening her mantle and coloring
with nervousness under the woman's sharp eye. "I daresay Mr. Beadon will
come to-morrow, if he doesn't come to-night."

But nobody came, although she sat up watching and waiting for many hours
after Mrs. Capper had betaken herself to her bed. What did this silence
and absence mean? Her heart contracted with a curious dread. She loved,
but she had never believed herself capable of retaining love.

About eleven o'clock next day, she was informed that a gentleman wanted
to speak to her. "A young-looking, fair gentleman, like a clerk," said
Mrs. Capper. "Shall I show him up? It's from your good 'usband, most
likely, I should think."

Milly started from the chair by the window, where she had been sitting.
"Oh, show him up, at once, please."

With one hand on the table, and her delicate face flushed, she presented
a picture of loveliness such as the man who entered did not often see.
He even paused for a moment on the threshold as if too much amazed to
enter, and his manner was somewhat uneasy as he bowed to her, with his
eyes fixed in a rather furtive manner on her face.

He was a man of thirty-five, although his smooth-shaven face and fair
hair made him look younger than his years. It was a commonplace
countenance, shrewd and intelligent enough, but not very attractive.
There was a certain honesty in his eyes, however, which redeemed the
plainness of his insignificant and irregular features.

"Mrs. Beadon, I think?" he said. "My name's Johnson. I come from
Mr.--Mr. Beadon with a message."

"Yes?" said Milly, her hand upon her side. "What is it, please? Tell me
quickly--is he coming to-day?"

The man looked at her oddly. There was something like pity in his eyes.

"Not to-day, madam," he replied.

Milly sank down on her chair again and sighed deeply. The color left her
cheeks.

"I have a communication to make, madam," said the clerk, rather
hesitatingly, "which I am afraid may be a little painful, though not,
Mr. Beadon tells me, unexpected by you. I hope that you will be
prepared----"

"Go on," said Milly, sharply. "What is it? Why have you come?"

"Mr. Beadon wishes you to understand, madam, that he is going abroad
again very shortly. He advises you to inform the landlady of this fact,
which will explain his absence. But he also commissions me to put into
your hands a sum for your present expenses, and to inform you that he
will be quite willing to assist you at any time if you make application
to him through me--at the address which I am to give you. Any personal
application to himself will be disregarded."

"But, do you mean," said Milly, her cheeks growing very white, "that he
is not coming--to say good-bye--before he goes abroad?"

"He thinks it better to spare you and himself an interview that might be
unpleasant," said Mr. Johnson. "You understand, I suppose--a--that Mr.
Beadon--my principal, that is--wishes to close his relations with you
finally."

Milly started to her feet and drew herself to her full height. Her
cheeks were blazing now, her eyes on fire. "But I am _his wife_!" she
cried.

Johnson looked at her for a moment in silent admiration. He had not
liked the errand on which he was sent, and he liked it now less than
ever.

"Pardon me, madam," he said, in some embarrassment; "but Mr. Beadon is
under the impression that you understand--that you have understood all
along--that you were not legally in that position----"

"You mean," she said, her whole form quivering in her excitement, "that
what he told me was false?--that when he said that our declaration
before witnesses that we were man and wife was a true marriage--you mean
that that was a lie?"

Johnson looked at the walls and the ceiling--anywhere but at poor
Milly's agonized face.

"It was not a marriage, madam," he said, in a regretful tone.

"Then he--he--deceived me--purposely? Oh, he is wicked! he is base! And
I thought myself--I thought myself----"

Her fingers clutched at the neck of her dress, as if to tear it open,
and so relieve the swelling of her throat.

"Does he think that he can make it up to me with money? Oh, I'll take
nothing from him any more. Let him go if he will, and his money too--I
shall die and be forgotten--I won't live to bear the shame of it--the
pain--the----"

She did not finish her sentence. Her slight form was swaying to and fro,
like a reed shaken by the wind; her face had grown whiter and whiter as
she went on: finally she flung up her arms and fell senseless to the
floor. The end of all her hopes and fears--of all her joys and longing
and desire, was worse to her than death.

Johnson lifted her to the sofa, with a sort of awkward tenderness, which
perhaps he would not have liked to acknowledge to his master; and then,
before summoning Mrs. Capper, he thrust into Milly's pocket the envelope
containing the banknotes and the address which he had brought with him.
He knew that his master was "doing the thing handsomely," as far as
money was concerned, and he had no doubt but that the forsaken woman
would see, when she had got over her first mad frenzy of despair, that
she had better accept and use his gifts. So he stowed the envelope away
in her pocket, so that it might not attract the curious eyes of prying
servant or landlady.

Then he called to Mrs. Capper, and gave her a brief explanation of
Milly's swoon. "The lady's a little overcome," he said. "Mr. Beadon has
got to go abroad, and couldn't find time to see her before he went."

"Hard-heated brute!" said the landlady, as she chafed Milly's hands, and
held a smelling-bottle to her nose.

"Oh, dear, no!" said Mr. Johnson, briskly. "Family ties must not stand
in the way of business. I wish you good-day, and hope the lady will soon
be better."

And he left the house rather hurriedly, for he had no desire to
encounter the despairing appeal of Milly's eyes when she recovered from
her swoon.

"It is a little too bad to make me his messenger," he said to himself.
"He may do his dirty work himself another time. I thought she was quite
a different sort of person. Poor thing! I wonder how he feels about her,
or whether he feels anything at all."

He had an opportunity of putting his master's equanimity to the test
when he made his report of the interview--a report which was made that
very afternoon, in spite of his representations that Mr. Beadon had
already gone abroad.

"Well, you saw her?" he was asked.

"Yes, sir. I said what you desired, and gave her the money."

"Any fuss?"

"She fainted--that was all," said Johnson, grimly.

"But she kept the money?"

"She had no choice. I put it into her pocket while she was unconscious,
and then summoned the landlady."

"Ah, yes, that was right. And she understands----"

"Everything that you wish her to understand," said the clerk, with a
touch of disrespect in his manner, which his employer noticed, and
silently resented.

"Well, it had to be done, and the sooner the better," he said, turning
away.

"So I suppose," said Johnson.




CHAPTER XXI.

THE TONGUE OF SCANDAL.


Alan returned to town with the full knowledge that he had something
formidable to face and overcome.

He had gone to Birchmead partly in redemption of an old promise to his
aunt, not knowing when he might be able to keep it if he did not do so
now, and partly because his mind had been distracted by a fresh outbreak
of violence in his wife, and he found it absolutely impossible to sit
still and endure in patience.

The country journey refreshed him, and he came back stronger and braver
than before. He was resolved to press for his divorce, and as Lettice
was in Italy, no time could be better than the present for proving to
the desperate woman, who was trying to terrify him, that there were laws
in England to which she must yield obedience. He assured himself that he
was now prepared for any fate; and yet that which had happened before he
left town was an earnest of what he had to expect.

What had happened was this.

A few days before Cora had been served with a notice to appear and
defend the suit for divorce which her husband was bringing against her;
and this had set her inflammable soul on fire. She had tried hard to
discover his whereabouts, without success. She had gone to Maple Cottage
and banged at the door in such furious style, that a policeman, who
happened to be passing, came up to see what was wrong, just as the new
occupants made their appearance, in mingled alarm and indignation.

"I want Miss Campion," said Cora, who was half-intoxicated, but still
more excited by rage and jealousy.

"She no longer lives here," said the man at the door.

"Where is she?"

"I don't know. And I should not tell you if I did. Policeman, take this
woman in charge for annoying me! You must have seen her knocking like a
fury--and now she is evidently tipsy."

Her rage increased rather than diminished when she found that her
intended prey had escaped her, she began to declaim at the top of her
voice, and to shriek hysterically; and the policeman, regarding it as a
simple case of "drunk and disorderly," took her off to the station,
where she was locked up.

The first that Alan heard of it was from the papers next morning. In one
of these, which he was accustomed to read after breakfast, he found the
following report:--

"At Hammersmith, a dissipated-looking woman, who gave the name of Cora
Walcott, was charged with being drunk and disorderly on the previous
day, and annoying Mr. Peter Humphreys, of Maple Cottage, Brook Green.
Sergeant T 14 stated that he had observed the prisoner behaving in an
extraordinary manner outside Mr. Humphreys' house, and knocking at the
door in a most violent manner. As she would not go away, and her conduct
was a serious annoyance to the neighbors, he was compelled to take her
into custody. In reply to the prisoner, the witness said that she was
undoubtedly drunk. She had asked for Miss Campion, and he had
ascertained that that lady did previously live at Maple Cottage. She had
told him that she was the wife of Mr. Alan Walcott, who had deserted
her, after making an attempt on her life. The magistrate here
interposed, and said that the prisoner's questions were totally
irrelevant. What she had stated, even if true, was no excuse whatever
for the conduct of which she had been guilty. Prisoner (excitedly):
'This woman had taken my husband from me.' Magistrate: 'Be silent.'
Prisoner: 'Am I to starve in the streets, whilst they are living in
luxury?' Magistrate: 'You are fined five shillings and costs. If you
have grievances you must find another way of remedying them. If you say
any more now, I shall have to send you to prison without the option of a
fine.' The money was paid by a gentleman in court."

As soon as Alan had read this he went to the solicitor who knew all his
affairs, and got him to go to the Hammersmith Police Court. The
magistrate permitted him to make a statement contradicting the lies told
by Cora, and the newspapers printed what he said. But how many persons
read the first report who never saw the second? And how many of those
who read both preferred to believe the scandal, taking the contradiction
as a matter of course?

The "gentleman in court" who paid Cora's fine was an enterprising
reporter, who thought it might be worth his while to hear what this
deserted wife had to say. He knew two or three papers which would
welcome a bit of copy dealing with the marital troubles of a well-known
literary man. The story of this French wife might be a tissue of
lies--in which case it would be a real advantage to Mr. Walcott and Miss
Campion to have it printed and refuted. Or it might be partly or wholly
true--in which case it was decidedly in the interest of the public to
make it known. The argument is familiar to everyone connected with a
popular newspaper, and it proves that sensational journalists have their
distinct place in the cosmogony of nature, being bound to print what is
scandalous, either for the sake of those who are libelled or out of
simple justice to those who start and spread the libel. This desire to
give fair play all round, even to slanderers and malefactors, and the
common father of these, is the crown and apex of civilization.

The consequence of this gentleman's activity was that Cora found plenty
of assistance in her malicious design, to take away the characters of
Alan and Lettice. The charges which she brought against her husband were
printed and commented on in some very respectable newspapers, and were
repeated with all kinds of enlargement and embellishment wherever the
retailers of gossip were gathered together. If Alan had been under a
cloud before, he was now held up to scorn as a mean-spirited creature
without heart or conscience, who had allowed his lawful wife to sink
into an abyss of degradation. However bad she might be, the blame
certainly rested with him as the stronger. If it was impossible to live
with her now, he might, at any rate, have stretched out his hand long
ago, and rescued her from the slough of despond into which she had
fallen.

This was not, of course, the universal judgment; but it was the popular
one. It might not even have been the popular judgment a year before, or
a year after, but it was the judgment of the day. The multitude is
without responsibility in such cases, it decides without deliberation,
and it often mistakes its instincts for the dictates of equity. Alan was
judged without being heard, or what he did say in his defence was
received as though it were the mere hard-swearing of a desperate man.

The storm had begun to rage when he went to Birchmead, and it reached
its height soon after he returned. His lawyer advised him to bring an
action for libel against one paper which had committed itself more
deeply than the rest, and the threat of this had the effect of checking
public references to his case; but the mischief was already done.
Nothing could make him more disgusted and wretched than he had been for
some time past, so far as his own interests were concerned. It was only
the dragging of Lettice's name into the miserable business which now
pained and tormented him.

But there was one who had more right than himself to come forward as the
champion of Lettice's fair fame, and was able to do it with better
effect. When a man is a Member of Parliament and a Queen's Counsel, he
occupies a position which his fellow-countrymen are inclined to regard
as one of very considerable dignity. Editors and sub-editors think twice
before they print unsubstantiated rumors about the near relatives of
such distinguished individuals as Mr. Sydney Campion, Q.C., M.P. Thus,
after the first report of the proceedings at the police court, Lettice's
name scarcely appeared again. She was, indeed, referred to as "the lady
who seems, reasonably or unreasonably, to have excited the jealousy of
the unfortunate wife," or "the third party in this lamentable case, also
well-reputed in the world of letters, with whom the tongue of scandal
has been busy;" but she was not mentioned by name. And therein the
scandal-mongers exercised a wise discretion, for Sydney had secured the
assistance of Mr. Isaacs, one of the smartest solicitors in London, who
found means to impress upon everyone whom it might concern that it would
be a very serious matter indeed to utter anything approaching to a libel
on Miss Lettice Campion.

Moreover, the worthy Mr. Isaacs had an interview with Cora, whom he
found in a sober mood, and so terrified her by his warnings and menaces,
but most of all by the impressive manner and magnetic eye wherewith he
was wont to overawe malefactors of every kind and degree, that she
ceased for a time to speak evil of Lettice.

Yet in Lettice's case also the mischief had been done already. All who
made a point of hearing and remembering the ill that is spoken of their
fellow-creatures, knew what had been said of her, and retailed it in
private for the amusement of their friends. The taint had spread from
Alan to her, and her character suffered before the world for absolutely
no fault of hers, but solely because she had the misfortune to know him.
That was Sydney's way of putting it--and, indeed, it was Alan's way
also, for there was no other conclusion at which it was possible to
arrive.

It was a great consolation for both these men that Lettice was out of
the country at this time. Sydney wrote to her, hinting as delicately as
he could that it was essential to her interests and to his own that she
should remain abroad for at least two or three months longer. Alan wrote
about the same time to Mrs. Hartley, telling her in detail what had
happened, and entreating her to put off her return to London as late as
she could. It was not a time, he thought, to hesitate as to whether
anything could justify him in making such a request.

Mrs. Hartley was treating Lettice very well at Florence, and had no
intention of letting her come back in a hurry. She did not see fit to
tell her of Alan's letter, for her recovery had been very slow, and
fresh mental worry appeared to be the last thing to which she ought to
be subjected. Nor was Lettice made aware of anything connected with Alan
and his troubles, although her companion heard yet more startling news
within the next few weeks. Mrs. Hartley had come to be very fond of
Lettice, and she guarded her jealously, with all the tyranny of an old
woman's love for a young one. The first thing, in her mind, was to get
rid of the nervous prostration from which Lettice had been suffering,
and to restore her to health and strength.

"We shall not go back to London," she said, in answer to a mild
expostulation from her friend, "until you are as well as ever you were.
Why should we? You have no ties there, no house, no friends who cannot
spare you for a month or two. By and by you can begin to write, if you
must write; but we shall quarrel if you insist on going back. What makes
you so restless?"

"I am idle; and I hate to have nothing to do. Besides, how can one tell
what is going on, so far away from all one's friends and connections? If
one of your friends were in difficulties or danger, would you not wish
to be near him (or her), and do what you could to help?"

"Of whom are you thinking, dear?" Mrs. Hartley turned round on her
quickly as she asked this question.

"I put it generally," Lettice said, looking frankly at her friend, but
feeling hot and troubled at the same time.

"Oh, it was a mere hypothesis?"

"Well, no; it was not."

"I am not questioning you, my darling. At least, I don't want to. But
you can do no good to anybody just now--believe me! You must get quite
well and strong, and then perhaps you can fight for yourself or for
other people. I don't dispute your title to fight, when and where and
how you like; and if ever I am in trouble, the Lord send me such a
champion! But get strong first. If you went out with your shield this
morning, you would come back upon it to-night."

So Lettice had to be patient yet awhile.




CHAPTER XXII.

LETTICE TRIUMPHS.


But there was news of another kind which Mrs. Hartley did not conceal
from Lettice. Her novel had been published, and it was a great success.
The critics, who already knew something of her literary powers, had with
one consent written long and special articles about "Laurels and
Thorns," hailing it as a veritable triumph. It was original, and
philosophic, and irresistibly pathetic; the style sufficed to mark its
author as one of the few novelists whose literary form was
irreproachable. Perhaps the praise was here and there extravagant, but
it was practically universal. And it was not confined to the critics.
The reading world more than endorsed it. Second and third editions of
the book were called for within a month. Writers of leading articles and
speakers on public platforms began to quote and commend her.

Most remarkable of all, her novel made a conquest of her brother Sydney.
He did not care for novels as a rule, but he read "Laurels and Thorns,"
and was desperately interested in it. Perhaps the phenomenal success
which had crowned it had some effect upon him; and Lady Pynsent wrote
him a nice letter of congratulation, expressing a great desire to know
his "_distinguished_ sister." At all events, the thing was done, and
Lettice must now be definitely accepted as a writer of books. What
chiefly puzzled him was to think where she had learned her wisdom, how
she came to be witty without his knowing it, and whence proceeded that
intimate acquaintance with the human heart of which the critics were
talking. He had not been accustomed to take much account of his sister,
in spite of her knack with the pen; and even now he thought that she
must have been exceedingly lucky.

It will readily be supposed that the breath of scandal which had passed
over Lettice was in no way a drawback to the triumph of her book. The
more she was talked about in connection with that sorry business, the
more her novel came to be in demand at the libraries, and thus she had
some sort of compensation for the gross injustice which had been done to
her. One small-minded critic, sitting down to his task with the
preconceived idea that she was all that Cora Walcott had declared her to
be, and finding in "Laurels and Thorns" the history of a woman who
regarded the essence of virtue as somewhat more important than the
outward semblance, attacked her vehemently for a moral obliquity which
existed in his own vision alone. This review also stimulated the run
upon her book, and carried it into a fourth edition.

Lettice's fortune was made. She had nothing to do for the remainder of
her life but to choose where she would live, to take a house, to fill it
with furniture, to gratify every reasonable want, on the one condition
that she should devote herself to honest hard work, and give to her
fellow-creatures the best that she was capable of producing.

It was all that her ambition had ever led her to desire, and it came to
her at a time of life when her enjoyment was likely to be most keen and
complete. Unless her own hand put aside the cup, it was hers to drink
and to be satisfied.

And what did Alan think of it? She wondered dimly now and then if he had
read it, and what he thought of the words that she had spoken out of a
full heart to him and to him alone. Did he guess it? And would he ever
know? She would have been answered if she could have seen him on a
certain day in April, when she was in Florence and he in London town.

Alan Walcott sat in his room, on the first floor of a house between the
Strand and the River Thames, reading Lettice Campion's book. He had read
it once, from beginning to end, and now he was turning back to the
passages which had moved him most deeply, anxious not to lose the light
from a single facet of the gem that sparkled in his hands. It would have
been a gem to Alan even if the world had not seen its beauty, and he was
jealous of those who could lavish their praise on this woman whom he
knew and worshipped, when his own hard fate compelled him to be silent.

How well he recognized her thoughts and moods in every page of the
story! How familiar were many of the reflections, and even the very
words which she employed! Here and there the dialogue recalled to his
mind conversations which he had held with her in the happy days gone by.
In one case, at least, he found that she had adopted a view of his own
which he had maintained in argument against her, and which at the time
she had not been willing to accept. It rejoiced him to see the mark of
his influence, however slight, upon one who had so deeply impressed her
image on his mind.

The novel was a revelation to him in more ways than one. It was as if
she had spoken to him, for himself alone, words of wisdom and comfort
and encouragement. That, indeed, was precisely what she had
done--consciously and of set purpose--though he did not know it. The
plot went home to his heart. When the heroine spoke to the hero he
seemed to catch the very tones of her voice, to see the lips in motion,
and to read in her eyes the spirit and confirmation of the words. There
was nothing in the incidents of "Laurels and Thorns" which resembled his
own troubles or the relations which had existed between them--except the
simple fact of the mutual intellectual and moral sympathy of the two
central characters. The hero had won his crown of laurels and wore his
crown of thorns; the heroine, who could not love him in his triumph, had
loved him in his humiliation.

Both descended in the scale of material prosperity to rise in the scale
of honor and mutual respect; the glory of life was extinguished, but it
gave place to the glory of love. Alan read again and again the borrowed
words with which Lettice's heroine concluded her written confession of
love for the man whom she had once rejected, and who thought himself
precluded by his disgrace from coming to her again.

            "He fixed thee mid this dance
            Of plastic circumstance,
    This Present, thou, forsooth, wouldst fain arrest:
            Machinery just meant
            To give thy soul its bent,
    Try thee, and turn thee forth, sufficiently impressed.

            "What though the earlier grooves
            That ran the laughing loves
    Around thy base no longer pause and press?
            What though, about thy rim,
            Scull things in order grim
    Grow out, in graver mood, obey the sterner stress?

            "Look not thou down but up!
            To uses of a cup,
    The festal board, lamp's flash and trumpet's peal,
            The new wine's foaming flow,
            The Master's lips a-glow!
    Thou, heaven's consummate cup, what needst thou with earth's wheel?"

These were words of comfort to Alan, if only he dare take them to
himself, if he dare imagine that Lettice had had him in her mind as she
wrote, and had sent him that message to restore his self-respect and
save him from despair.

He sat for some time with the book before him, and then another thought
came into his head. Why should he not write to her, just a few words to
let her know that what she had written had gone home to his heart, and
that amongst all her critics there was not one who understood her better
than he? He was entitled to do this; it was almost due to himself to do
it. He would take care not to make a fool of himself this time, as he
had done in his first letter to her.

So he took a pen and wrote:

"I have read your book. You would not expect to find me amongst the
critics: I only write to thank you for the pleasure and the courage it
has given me. Some parts have fitted my case so exactly that I have
applied them and made use of them, as any chance comer is permitted to
do with any work of art.

"This is a great work you have produced, and I always knew that you
would do great things. Count me not last of those who praise you, and
who look to see your future triumphs. ALAN WALCOTT."

He put the letter in an envelope, sealed and addressed it. Then he
leaned back in his chair, and began to muse again.

What a failure his life had been! He had told himself so a hundred times
of late, but the truth of the verdict was more and more vivid every day.
Surely he had set out from the beginning with good intentions, with high
motives, with an honorable ambition. No man ever had a more just father,
a more devoted mother, a happier home, a more careful and conscientious
training. He had never seen a flaw in either of his parents, and it had
been his single purpose to imitate their devotion to duty, their piety,
their gentle consideration for all with whom they had to deal. It had
struck him sometimes as almost strange (he had suspected once that it
was a trifle unpoetical) that he had rather sought out than shunned his
humbler relatives in the little shop at Thorley, taking the utmost care
that their feelings should never be hurt by his more refined education
and tastes. Of these three friends of his youth who were dead he could
honestly say (but he did not say all this), that he had been dutiful to
them, and that he had not wilfully brought sorrow upon any one of them.

Where had he gone so far astray as to merit, or even to bring about, the
anguish which had fallen upon him? True, he had given himself to
pleasure for the few years which succeeded his father's death. He had
traveled, he had enjoyed the society of men and women, he had lived an
idle life--except inasmuch as he aspired to be a poet, and wrote two or
three volumes which the world had accepted and thanked him for, but the
standard of his boyhood had never been rejected--he had been considerate
of the feelings of every man and woman (Lettice alone, perhaps, having
the right to deny it), and had not permitted himself one pleasure, or
action, or relaxation, which might give pain to another. That had been
his rule of life. Was it not enough?

He had teased himself, as thoughtful men and women often have done, and
more often will do, about the problem of human morals. It had not
occurred to him that the morals which have no conscious basis are likely
to be more sound and permanent than those which are consciously built
up; and, as a matter of fact, his own were of that kind, though he had
his rule and considered himself to be guided by it. "That which gives no
pain to another, and does not deteriorate another, or oneself, or any
sentient being, cannot be immoral, though circumstances may make it
inexpedient." He had written that sentence in his diary before he was
twenty, at an age when the expanding soul craves for talismans and
golden maxims, and he had clung to it ever since. For what violation of
the law did he suffer now?

This was not Lettice's way of looking at it. The hero of her story was
an urn in the hands of a divine artist, and a sterner stress was
necessary for the consummate work. But he, Alan, was no hero. Horace'
verse was nearer the mark with him.

                      Amphorae coepit
    Institui; currente rota cur urceus exit?

As water to wine were all the uses of his life henceforth, compared with
that which might have been.

But, sad as he was, if Lettice could have read within his heart she
would have been satisfied with her work.




CHAPTER XXIII.

"AM I A MURDERER?"


Footsteps outside his door roused Alan from his train of thoughts. Only
his landlady came along that passage, for there were no lodgers on the
same floor, nor on the one above it. A louder knock than Mrs. Gorman was
wont to give made him start from his seat.

"Come in!" he cried; but before the words were spoken the door was
thrown open and Cora made her appearance. Alan turned sick at heart, and
stood leaning on the end of the mantelpiece, gazing at her without a
word.

"Ah, my dear," she said, with a little laugh of amusement as she saw the
disconcerted look on his face, "they have not deceived me! They did not
offer to conduct me, but they said I should find you here--first floor
front--and here you are! It is long since we met, is it not? You have
sent huissiers, and gendarmes, and police to bring me your messages, as
a king to his subject, or a judge to a criminal. You should have come
yourself, my friend, for I have longed to see you. Are you not glad that
we meet thus, alone, face to face, without fear of intrusion?"

She had shut the door behind her, and sat down in his easy chair by the
table, inviting him with a gesture to take a seat by her side.

"Approach!" she said, in a soft but mocking voice. "Be amiable! Let us
talk. I come for peace, not for war. Let us make terms with each other.
I am sick of this farce of hostility between husband and wife--let us
arrange our little disagreements. Come!"

Her familiar tone was odious to him. The sudden perversion of his
thoughts from Lettice to this creature, from his dream of purity and
elevation to this degrading reality, filled him with disgust. Nay,
something more than disgust entered his mind as he saw the smile on her
besotted face. A demon of revenge seized upon him, and all but gained
the mastery. For one instant he was perilously near to springing on her
where she sat, and strangling the life out of her. All passions and all
possibilities are in the soul of every one of us, at every moment; only
the motive power, the circumstance, the incitement, are needed to make
us cross the boundary of restraint. If Alan was not a murderer, it was
not because the thing was impossible to him, but because at the crisis
of temptation his heart had been penetrated by the influence of the
woman whom he revered, and filled with higher thoughts--even through the
channel of humiliation and self-contempt.

He answered her calmly.

"There is no arranging what has happened between us two--nor do you wish
it any more than I. Say what you want to say, and go."

"Good! I will say what I want to say--but I will not go. I mean to stay
with my husband; it is my right. Till death do us part--are not those
the pretty words of the farce we played together?"

"Who made it a farce--did I?"

"Listen, my friend. This is one thing I want to say. Assuredly it was
you, and no other, who made our marriage a miserable failure. You took
me from a life I loved, from friends who loved me, from a freedom which
I valued, and you made no effort to study my tastes and accommodate
yourself to my habits."

"God knows I made the effort. But what were those tastes and habits?
Think of them--think of them all! Could I have accommodated myself to
all--even to those you concealed from me?"

"Bah! you should have known whom you had married. You were so blind and
foolish, that I had a right to think you would never interfere with my
liberty. I was the child of liberty--and liberty is a sacred possession,
which it is an outrage to take away from any woman. You expected me to
change, to become all at once another being, cold and impassive like
yourself--while, as for you, you were to change in nothing! It was your
duty to come to my level--at least to approach it. I would have met you
halfway; we could have made our contract, and I would have kept my part
of the bargain. You demanded too much, and that is why you lost
everything. I condemn you--humanity condemns you. The ruin was your
work!"

"There is something novel in the theory, but I don't think many people
would accept it." He was prepared to talk seriously with her, if she
wished it, but no man could be serious in view of such a preposterous
claim. So he fell back upon the cold, ironical calmness which
exasperated Cora far more than a storm of rage would have done. "At any
rate," he said, "I did not deprive you of your liberty. You retained
that!"

"I kept it for myself. You would have taken it away, and you hated me
for keeping it. I keep it still. I have been free to go where I would,
free to wander over this terrible and desolate city, free now to come
back to you, and stay with you, until you swear to cease your
persecutions, and swear to make a new compact on more equitable terms."

"It is impossible to make terms with you, for you do not observe them.
The law will bind you down more strictly. Meanwhile you cannot remain
here, as you propose."

"Do you mean to throw me into the street?" she asked, passionately.
"Alive or dead, I stay here until the compact is made."

"You need have no fear of me; I am not going to kill you."

"Fear! Of you! Do not flatter yourself, my friend!"

With an insulting laugh she plucked a thin stiletto from under her
cloak, and brandished it before him. Alan recognized it as one which he
had missed after her visit to Montagu Place.

"Look there! Would you like to feel if it is sharp, or will you take my
word for it? We may want that before we part. I do not much care whether
you use it or I; but I will not leave this room unless you concede all
that I ask. Do not stand so far from me, coward. You smile, but you are
afraid!"

"Why should I fear your play-acting? You will not touch me, for so long
as I live you hope to get money from me, and if I were dead you would
starve."

"Miserable hound! Do you not think that hate is stronger even than love
of gold?"

"Not your hate. Throw that useless toy away. Love of gold and love of
self make us both perfectly safe."

"Listen to my terms."

"No; they are refused before you ask them. The law is in motion--nothing
shall prevent me from getting my divorce."

"That you may marry this woman!" she blazed forth, jumping from her
seat, with Lettice's book in her hand. It had been lying before her, and
the name had caught her eye. "You shall never marry her--I swear it by
my father's grave. You shall never divorce me!"

She flung the book in his face.

"Let me pass!" he said, moving quietly to the door.

"Never!"

She seized the dagger, and stood before him, swaying with her violent
emotion.

"Let me pass," he said again, still pressing forward.

She raised the weapon in her hand. Not a moment too soon he grasped her
wrist, and tried to take it from her with his other hand.

There was a struggle--a loud scream--a heavy fall--and silence.

A minute later Mrs. Gorman, attracted by the noise, burst into the room.

Cora was lying on the floor, and Alan, with white face and bloody hand,
was drawing the fatal weapon from her breast.

Mrs. Gorman's first act was to rush to the open window, and call for the
police. Then she knelt by Cora's body, and tried to staunch the flowing
blood.

A lodger from the floor beneath, who had come in behind the landlady,
was looking at the prostrate body. He was a medical student, and perhaps
thought it necessary to give his opinion in a case of this sort.

"She cannot live ten minutes," he said; but that did not prevent him
from assisting Mrs. Gorman in her work.

Alan had staggered back against the wall, still holding the dagger in
his hand. He scarcely knew what had happened, but the words of the last
speaker forced themselves upon him with terrible distinctness.

"My God," he cried, "am I a murderer?"

And he fell upon the chair, and buried his face in his hands.




CHAPTER XXIV.

HOPELESS.


"If she dies," Graham said to his wife, in answer to Clara's anxious
questioning, on the morning after Alan Walcott's arrest, "it will be a
case of murder or manslaughter. If she gets over it he will be charged
with an attempt to murder, or to do grievous bodily harm, and as there
would be her evidence to be considered in that case the jury would be
sure to take the worst view of it. That might mean five or ten years,
perhaps more. The best thing that could happen for him would be her
death, then they might incline to believe his statement, and a clever
counsel might get him off with a few months' imprisonment."

"Poor man," said Clara, "how very shocking it is!" She was thinking not
of Alan alone, but of Alan's friends. "Is there no hope of his being
acquitted altogether?"

"How could there be? The evidence is only too clear. The landlady heard
them quarrelling and struggling together, then there was a loud scream,
and just as she entered the room the poor wretch was falling to the
ground. Walcott had his hand on the dagger, which was still in his
wife's breast. Then the other lodger came in, and he declares that he
heard Walcott say he was a murderer. It seems as plain as it could
possibly be."

"But think of the two, as we know them to have been, and the relations
which have existed between them for years past. Surely that must tell in
his favor?"

"We are not the jury, remember. And, as for that, it would only go to
show a motive for the crime, and make a conviction all the more certain.
No doubt it might induce them to call it manslaughter instead of murder,
and the judge might pass a lighter sentence."

"I do hope she will not die. It would be terrible to have her death on
his conscience."

"Well, of course, death is an ugly word, and no one has a right to wish
that another might die. At the same time, I should say it would be a
happy release for such a creature, who can have nothing but misery
before her. But it will make little difference to him. He is entirely
ruined, so far as his reputation is concerned. He could never hold his
ground in England again, though he might have a second chance at the
other side of the world. What Britain can't forget, Australia forgives.
Heaven created the Antipodes to restore the moral balance of Europe."

"That is a poor satisfaction," said Clara, "to a man who does not want
to live out of his own country."

"Unfortunately, my dear, we cannot always choose our lot, especially
when we have had the misfortune to kill or maim somebody in a fit of
passion."

"I cannot believe that it is even so bad as that. It must have been an
accident."

"I wish I could think so; but if it is, no doubt the man may have the
courage of his conscience, and then there will be nothing to prevent him
from trying to live it down in London. I should not care for that sort
of thing myself. I confess I depend too much on other people's
opinions."

"It would be a terrible fight to live it down in London--terrible, both
for him and his friends."

"Ah," said Graham, quickly, "it is a good thing that he has nobody in
particular depending on him, no specially intimate friends that we are
aware of."

Clara looked steadily at the wall for two or three minutes, whilst her
husband finished his breakfast.

"I wrote to Lettice last night," she said at last, "but, of course, I
knew nothing of this business then."

"I am very glad you did not. What on earth put Lettice into your head?
She has no conceivable interest in this miserable affair."

"I think it is rather too much to say that she has no interest at all.
We know that she was interested in him."

"We know that he is a married man."

Graham's tone was growing a little savage, as it did sometimes,
especially with his wife, whom he very sincerely loved. But Clara did
not heed the warning note.

"Facts are facts, and we should not ignore them. I am sure they like
each other, and his misfortune will be a great grief to her."

"It was just what was wanted, then, to bring her to her senses. She may
recognize now that Walcott is a man of ungovernable passions. In all
probability he will be a convicted felon before she comes back to
England, and she will see that it is impossible to know any more of
him."

"Oh, James, how hard you are! She will never think of him as a felon. No
more shall I!"

"He will be one, whatever you may think. As you said yourself, facts are
facts, and they will have their proper influence upon you sooner or
later."

"But do you think that Lettice is the woman to change her opinion of a
man just because he is unfortunate, or to despise him as soon as he gets
into trouble? I am perfectly sure she is not."

"We shall see," said Graham. "I give her credit for more sense. I don't
think you recognize yet the sort of offence which Walcott has committed,
so we may as well drop the subject for a time. I hope, however, that you
will not do anything which might bring her home just now. Clearly she
could not do any good, and even on your own showing it would be a
needless vexation to her."

He went off to his study, and Clara set about her household tasks with a
heavy heart.

The fact was that she could hardly doubt that Alan Walcott had injured
his wife in a moment of desperation, when he was not fully responsible
for his actions; but she certainly doubted the justice of any law which
could condemn him as a murderer; or doom him to be an outcast amongst
his fellowmen. Her sense of equity might have suited the Saturnian reign
better than our matter-of-fact nineteenth century, in which the precise
more or less of criminality in the soul of an accused man is not the
only thing which has to be taken into consideration.

Was there ever a malefactor condemned to imprisonment or torment for
whom the heart of some woman or other did not plead in mitigation of his
sentence? Yet the man-made laws against which untutored hearts will now
and again protest are often essentially merciful in comparison with the
wild and hasty judgments that outrun the law--whether in mercy or in
severity.

It was so in Alan's case. The popular opinion was evidently against him.
The great majority thought this case of attempted wife-murder too clear
for argument, and too cold-blooded to warrant anything like sympathy for
the accused. Alan's private affairs had been made public property for
some time past, and he now suffered from a storm of hostility and
prejudice against which it was impossible to contend. His story, or the
world's story about him, had been current gossip for the last few
months, as the reader has already seen; and a large number of people
appeared to have fixed upon him as a type of the respectable and
hypocritical sinner, prosperous, refined, moving in good society and
enjoying a fair reputation, yet secretly hardened and corrupt. It was
not often that the underhand crimes of such men were plainly exposed to
view, and, when they were, an example ought to be made of the offender
as a warning to his class. Ever since Cora had gained a hearing in the
police-court at Hammersmith, Alan was set down as a heartless libertine,
who had grown tired of his wife, or, at any rate, as one who wanted to
wash his hands of her, and throw the burden of maintaining her upon the
rates. Thus it became quite a popular pastime to hound down "Poet
Walcott."

This is how the outcry originally began. One or two newspapers with an
ethical turn, which had borrowed from the pulpit a trick of improving
the sensational events of the day for the edification of their readers,
and which possessed a happy knack of writing about anything and anybody
without perpetrating a libel or incurring a charge of contempt of court,
had printed articles on "The Poet and the Pauper," "Divorce Superseded,"
and the like. Stirred up by these interesting homilies, a few shallow
men and women, with too much time on their hands, began to write inept
letters, some of which were printed; and then the editors, being accused
of running after sensations, pointed to their correspondents as evidence
of a public opinion which they could not control, and to which they were
compelled to give utterance. They were, in fact, not dishonest but only
self-deceived. They really persuaded themselves that they were
responding to a general sentiment, though, such as it was, their own
reports and articles had called it into existence. The "gentleman in
court" who paid Cora's fine at Hammersmith began the outcry in its last
and worst form, the editorials nursed and encouraged it, and the
correspondents gave it its malignant character. All concerned in the
business were equally convinced that they were actuated by the best
possible motives.

The news that Walcott had stabbed his wife with a dagger did not take
these charitable people by surprise, though it added fuel to the fire of
their indignation. What else could be expected from a man who had first
deserted and then starved the unfortunate woman whom he had taken to
wife? It was only natural that he should try to get rid of her; but what
a cruel wretch he was! Hanging would be too good for him if his poor
victim should die.

It is unnecessary to say that a great deal of interest was displayed by
the public, when the case came on for hearing at Bow Street; but no real
facts were elicited beyond those which had already been in print. Two
remands were taken, in the hope that Cora might recover sufficiently to
give her evidence, but though she was at last declared to be out of
danger, the house-surgeon at the hospital would not take the
responsibility of saying that she could safely attend at the
police-court. Ultimately, the magistrate having heard all the evidence
that was forthcoming, and Alan's solicitor reserving his defence, the
accused was committed to take his trial at the Central Criminal Court on
a charge of wounding with intent to inflict grievous bodily harm.

Nevertheless, Alan was allowed to go out on bail. He had not cared to
claim this privilege, and would almost have preferred to stay in prison.
His solicitor had made much of the necessity of preparing his defence,
and of the indispensable conferences between himself and his client; but
Alan had not the slightest hope of being acquitted. He told Mr. Larmer
precisely how the whole thing had happened--how his wife had brought the
dagger with her, how she had raised it in her hand, how he seized her
wrist, and how he had never touched the weapon himself until he drew it
from the wound as she lay on the floor.

"They won't believe me," he said. "You know what a prejudice there is
against me, and you will never persuade a jury to take my word against
hers. She will certainly say that I stabbed her with my own dagger; and
it was my dagger once: it has my name upon it."

"That is an awkward fact. If only we could prove that she brought it
with her, it would go a long way towards acquitting you."

"But we can't prove it. Then, you see, Mrs. Gorman says I had my hand on
the weapon as she was falling."

"We can easily shake her in that."

"And Hipkins says that I admitted the crime--called myself a murderer."

"We can shake that too. You said, 'Am I a murderer?' It was an odd thing
to say, but your nerves were unstrung. Men in such predicaments have
been known to say a great deal more than that."

"I assure you Larmer, my mind is so confused about it that I cannot
remember whether I said 'Am I' or 'I am.' I rather incline to think that
I said 'I am a murderer;' for I believed her to be as good as dead at
the time, and I certainly thought I had killed her."

"How could you think that? You are clear in your mind that you never
touched the dagger."

"Yes, but I touched the hand that held the dagger."

Larmer looked at his friend and client in a dubious way, as though he
could not feel quite sure of his sanity.

"My dear Walcott," he said, "you are out of tune--upset by all this
miserable business; and no wonder. You say you touched the hand that
held the dagger that stabbed the woman. We know you did; what then? What
moved the fingers that touched the hand that held the dagger, etcetera?
Was it a good motive or a bad motive, tell me!"

"That is just what I can't tell you, for I don't know. Perhaps it was an
instinct of self-defence; but I have no recollection of being afraid
that she would stab me. I had a confused notion that she was going to
stab herself; perhaps, I only got as far as thinking that the bodkin
would be better out of her hand."

"This is a touch of your old subtlety. I do believe you could work
yourself up to thinking that you actually wanted to hurt her!"

"Subtlety or no subtlety, these impressions are very acute in my own
mind. I can see the whole of that scene as plainly as I see you at this
moment. It comes before my eyes in a series of pictures, vivid and
complete in every twist and turn; only the motives that guided me are
blurred and confused. I grasped her wrist, and she struggled frantically
to shake me off. Our faces were close together, and there was a horrible
fascination in her eyes--the eyes of a madwoman at that moment, beyond
all question."

"I am convinced that she is mad, and has been so for years," said Mr.
Larmer, positively.

"She was mad then, foaming at the mouth, and trying to bite me in her
impotent fury. I could not hold her wrist firmly--she plunged here and
there so violently that one or other of us was pretty sure to be hurt,
unless I could force her to drop the murderous weapon. I was ashamed
that I could not do it; but she had the strength of a demon, and I
really wonder that she did not master me. Then the end came. Suddenly
her resistance ceased. The desperate force with which I had been holding
her hand must have been fully exerted at the very instant when her
muscles relaxed--when the light went out of her eyes and the body
staggered to the ground. It all happened at once. Did she faint? At any
rate, my fingers never touched the dagger until after she was stabbed."

"It was a pure accident--as clear as can be; and the whole blame of it
is on her own shoulders. She brought the weapon, she held it, she
resisted you when you tried to prevent mischief. She, not you, had the
disposition to injure, and you have not an atom of responsibility."

"That is your view, as a friend. It is not the view of the
scandal-mongers outside. It will not be the view of the jury. And it is
not my view."

"What do you mean?"

"I really do not know where my responsibility began or where it ended. I
don't know if her strength failed her at the critical moment, or if it
was simply overcome by mine--if, in fact, she was injured whilst
resisting my violence. One thing I am sure of, and that is that my heart
was full of hatred towards her. There was vengeance in my soul if not in
my intention. Who is to discriminate between motives so near allied?
Your friendship may acquit me, Larmer, but your instincts as a lawyer
cannot; and at any rate, I cannot acquit myself of having entertained
the feeling out of which crimes of violence naturally spring. To all
intents and purposes I am on exactly the same footing as many a man who
has ended his life on the gallows."

"I suppose you think that tribulation is good for your soul. I cannot
see any other ground on which you torment yourself in this way about
things you have not done and acts you have never contemplated. I
understand that you entrusted me with your defence!" Mr. Larmer was
waxing impatient--almost indignant--at his client's tone.

"So I do, entirely. Assuredly I have no desire to go to prison."

"Then for goodness' sake don't talk to anyone else the nonsense you have
been talking to me!"

"I am not likely. I have known you since we were boys together, and I
wanted to relieve my mind. It seemed right that you should know
precisely what is on my conscience in the matter."

"Well, you have told me, and the effect of it has been to convince me
more than ever of your innocence. But that sort of thing would scarcely
convince anybody else. Now take my advice, and think as little about the
case as possible. You cannot do any good--you will only demoralize
yourself still more. Everything depends on how the judge and jury may be
disposed to regard our story. I shall give a brief to the best man that
can be had, and then we shall have done all that lies in our power."

"I know I could not be in better hands. If anyone could get me off
scot-free you are the man to do it, Larmer. But I don't expect it, and I
am not sure that I care for it."

Then they parted, and Alan went to Surrey Street and cleared out his
goods and chattels, very much to the relief of Mrs. Gorman, who assured
Mr. Hipkins that she could not have slept comfortably at night with that
outrageous man under the same roof.

He found in his desk the message which he had written to Lettice on the
day of his crowning misfortune.

"Thank heaven I did not send it," he muttered to himself, as he tore it
in pieces. "One week has made all the difference. Nothing could ever
justify me in speaking to her again."




CHAPTER XXV.

MR. LARMER GIVES A BRIEF.


Mr. Larmer was not insensible to the notoriety which attached to him as
solicitor for the defence in a case which was the talk of the town, and
a topic of the sensational press. Not that it gave him any satisfaction
to make capital out of the misfortunes of a friend; but he would have
been something more than man and less than lawyer if he had despised the
professional chance which had come in his way.

And in fact he did not despise it. There were one or two inexact
statements in the reports of the proceedings at Bow Street--he had
written to the papers and corrected them. Several caterers for the
curiosity of the public hashed up as many scandals as they could find,
and served them hot for the entertainment of their readers. It happened
that these tales were all more or less to the discredit of Alan Walcott,
and to print them before his trial was grossly unfair. Mr. Larmer wrote
a few indignant words on this subject also, and, made about two in a
thousand of the scandal-mongers ashamed of themselves. Not content with
this he supplied a friend with one or two paragraphs relating to the
case, which had the effect of stimulating the interest already aroused
in it. By this plan he secured the insertion of a statement in the best
of the society journals, which put the matter at issue in a fair and
unprejudiced way, dwelling on such facts as the pending divorce-suit,
the fining of Mrs. Walcott at Hammersmith, her molestation of her
husband on various recent occasions, and her intrusion upon him in
Alfred Place. This article, written with manifest knowledge of the
circumstances, yet with much reserve and moderation, was a very
serviceable diversion in Alan's favor, and did something to diminish the
odium into which he had fallen.

Mr. Larmer would not have selected trial by ordeal in the columns of the
newspapers as the best preparation for a trial before an English judge
and jury; but the process was begun by others before he had a word to
say in the matter, and his efforts were simply directed to making the
most of the situation which had been created. A mass of prejudice had
been introduced into the case by the worthy gentlemen who maintain that
in these evil days the press is the one thing needful for moral and
political salvation, and who never lose an opportunity of showing how
easy it would be to govern a nation by leading articles, or to redeem
humanity by a series of reports and interviews. Alan had given himself
up for lost when he found himself in the toils of this prejudice; but
Mr. Larmer saw a chance of turning it to good account both for his
client and for himself, and not unnaturally took advantage of the
awakened curiosity to put his friend's case clearly and vividly before
the popular tribunal.

Alan nearly upset the calculation of the lawyer by his impatience of the
interviewing tribe. Half-a-dozen of them found him out at different
times, and would not take his no for an answer. At last worried by the
pertinacity of one bolder and clumsier than all the rest, he took him by
the shoulders and bundled him out of his room, and the insulted
ambassador, as he called himself, wrote to his employer a particularly
spiteful account of his reception, with sundry embellishments perhaps
more picturesque than strictly accurate.

The next thing that Mr. Larmer had to do was to retain counsel, and he
determined to secure as big a man as possible to conduct the defence.
The case had assumed greater importance than would attach to an ordinary
assault upon a wife by her husband. It was magnified by the surrounding
circumstances, so that the interest felt in it was legitimate enough,
apart from the spurious notoriety which had been added to it. Alan's
literary fame had grown considerably within the last year, and his
friends had been terribly shocked by the first bald statement that he
had stabbed his unfortunate wife in a fit of rage.

They had begun by refusing to believe it, then they trusted that he
would be able to prove his innocence, but by this time many of his
warmest admirers were assuring each other that, "after all, the artistic
merit of a poem never did and never would depend upon the moral
character of the poet." They hoped for the best, but were quite prepared
for the worst, and thus they looked forward to the trial with an anxiety
not unmingled with curious anticipation.

The indirect connection of Lettice Campion with a case of this kind was
another intelligible reason for the concern of the respectable public.
Lettice's name was in everybody's mouth, as that of the young novelist
who had made such a brilliant success at the outset of her career, and
all who happened to know how she had been mixed up at an earlier stage
in the quarrel between Walcott and his wife, were wondering if she would
put in an appearance, willingly or unwillingly, at the Central Criminal
Court.

Mr. Larmer clearly saw that the business was sufficiently important to
justify the intervention of the most eminent counsel. As he was running
over the list and balancing the virtues of different men for an occasion
of this sort, his eye fell on the name of Sydney Campion. He started,
and sank back in his chair to meditate.

The idea of having Mr. Campion to defend a man with whom his sister's
name had been unjustly associated was a bold one, and it had not
occurred to him before. Was there any reason against it? What more
natural than that this rising pleader should come into court for the
special purpose of safeguarding the interests of Miss Campion? The
prosecution would not hesitate to introduce her name if they thought it
would do them any good--especially as they would have the contingency of
the divorce case in their minds; and Campion was just the man to nip any
attempt of that kind in the bud. At all events, the judge was more
likely to listen to him on such a point than to anyone else. But would
not the practice and etiquette of the bar put it absolutely out of the
question.

The thing was worth considering--worth talking over with Campion
himself. So Mr. Larmer put on his hat at once, and went over to the
Temple.

"I have come to see you on a rather delicate matter," he said, by way of
introduction, "as you will understand if you happen to have seen my name
in connection with the Walcott assault case. There are sundry matters
involved which make it difficult to keep the case within its proper
limits, and I thought that an informal consultation on the subject,
before I proceed to retain counsel, might facilitate matters."

"Perhaps it might; but I hardly see how I can help you."

"Well, it occurred to me that if you were in court during the trial, you
would have the opportunity of checking anything that might arise of an
irrelevant character--any references----"

"And what do you propose?" said Sydney, interrupting.

"It would be hard that we should be prevented from putting our case in
the hands of such counsel as we consider best calculated to bring it to
a successful issue. If there is no strong personal reason against it,
but on the other hand (as it seems to me) an adequate reason in its
favor, I trust that you will allow me to send you a brief."

"Let me ask you--did you come to me in any sense at the instance of your
client?" said Sydney, suspiciously.

"By no means. Mr. Walcott does not know I have thought of you in
connection with his defence."

"Nor at the instance of another?"

"Certainly not. It is entirely my own idea."

Sydney looked relieved. He could not ask outright if there had been any
communication with his sister, but that was what he was thinking about.

"I hope we may rely upon you," said Mr. Larmer.

"I don't know. I am not sure that you can. This is, as you said, a
perfectly informal conversation, and I may frankly tell you that what
you ask is out of the question. I hope you will think no more about it."

Mr. Larmer was troubled.

"It seemed to me, Mr. Campion, that the idea would commend itself at
once. I fear you did not quite take my meaning when I spoke of possible
side issues and irrelevant questions which might arise during the
trial?"

"Surely I did. You meant that counsel for the prosecution might think to
advance his cause by referring to other proceedings, past or future, and
might even go so far as to name a lady who has been most wantonly and
cruelly maligned by one of the parties to this case?"

"Exactly. You use the very words in regard to it which I would have used
myself. That is a contingency, I imagine, which you would strongly
desire to avoid."

"So strongly do I desire it, that you would not be surprised if I had
already taken measures with that end in view."

"Decidedly not. But it will be only natural that the prosecution should
try and damage Walcott as much as possible--showing the motive he would
have for getting rid of his wife, and, going into the details of their
former quarrels. The question is whether any man can be expected, in
doing this, to abstain from mentioning the names of third parties."

"Has it never occurred to you, Mr. Larmer, that there is one way, and
only one way, in which I could certainly guarantees that the name of the
lady in question should not be mentioned? Your plan, if you will excuse
my saying so, is clumsy and liable to fail. Mine is perfectly secure
against failure, and perhaps a little more congenial."

Larmer's face fell.

"You do not mean," he said, "that you have taken a brief from the
prosecution!"

"If I had, I should have stopped you as soon as you began to speak, and
told you so. But I may say as much as this--if I am retained by them I
shall go into court; and, if they retain anyone else, I shall have good
reason to know that the case will be conducted precisely as I should
conduct it myself. I imagine that this matters very little to you, Mr.
Larmer. I have not done much with this class of cases, and there will be
no difficulty in finding a stronger man."

Mr. Larmer was silent for a minute or two. Sydney Campion's manner took
him aback.

"I am sorry to hear what you have said," he remarked at last. "I fear it
must inevitably prejudice my client if it is known that you are on the
other side."

"I don't see why it should," Sydney said, with manifest indifference.
"At any rate, with respect to the point you were mentioning, it is clear
that the lady's name will not be introduced by the prosecution."

"Let it be equally clear," said Larmer, "that it will not be introduced
by the defence. This was the first instruction which I received from my
client--who, I may say, was a schoolfellow of mine, and in whose honor,
and not only honor, but technical innocence, I have the utmost
confidence."

"You have undertaken his defence, and I am sure he is in very good
hands," said Sydney with a rather cynical smile. "But, perhaps, the less
said the better as to the honor of a married man who, under false
pretenses, dares to pay attentions to an unmarried lady."

"Believe me you are mistaken! Alan Walcott has done nothing of the
kind."

"He has done enough to create a scandal. You are not denying that his
attitude has been such as to bring the name of the lady forward in a
most objectionable manner, without the slightest contribution on her
part to such a misfortune?"

"I do deny it, most emphatically, and I beg you to disabuse your mind of
the idea. What possible ground can you have for such a charge? The mere
tipsy ravings of this unfaithful wife--whom I should probably have no
difficulty in proving insane, as well as unfaithful and intemperate.
What is actually known is that she has been heard by the police, on one
or two occasions, referring by name to this lady. How far would you as a
lawyer, Mr. Campion, allow that fact to have weight as evidence in
support of the charge? And can you mention, beyond that, one tittle of
evidence of any kind?"

Sydney shrugged his shoulders.

"We are not considering evidence as you know very well. We are talking
as two men of the world, quite competent to draw the right deduction
from admitted facts. I say that when a lady has been so grievously
insulted as Miss Campion has been, under circumstances of such great
aggravation, the man who has brought that indignity upon her, however
indirectly, must be held directly responsible for his conduct."

"It is useless to argue the point--the more so as I fancy that Mr.
Walcott himself would be very much inclined to agree with you--which I
am not. He most bitterly regrets the annoyance to which Miss Campion has
been subjected, and regards it as the greatest of all the injuries
inflicted upon him by his degraded wife. Having said this on his behalf,
let me add that any charge brought against him on this score, by that
woman or by anyone else, is absolutely without foundation, and that we
shall know how to defend his reputation, in or out of court, whenever
and by whomsoever it may be attacked."

"Your warmth does you credit, Mr. Larmer. I will be equally frank with
you. You speak as a friend, I speak as a brother. After all that has
happened I do not hold myself bound, nor do I intend, to consider anyone
or anything in comparison with the credit of the name which has been so
foully aspersed. It is for me to protect that name from discredit, and I
shall adopt every expedient within my reach to carry out my purpose."

"No doubt you are perfectly justified in doing so. I will merely remark
that hostility to my client cannot assist you in your object."

"Well," said Sydney, rising from his seat, "there can be no use in
continuing the conversation." And he added, in a lighter tone, "I am
sorry, Mr. Larmer, that I should be compelled to decline the first brief
you have offered me."

Larmer went back to his office a little crestfallen, but not at all
sorry that he had had this interview with Campion. He was better
prepared now for the course which the trial was likely to follow. He had
no doubt that Campion would be bold enough to undertake the prosecution,
and that he would do his best to get a conviction against Walcott, whom
he manifestly disliked. He was less sanguine from that moment as to the
result of his efforts; but, of course, he did not relax them. He
retained Mr. Charles Milton, a man with an excellent reputation in
criminal business, and one who, as he thought, would do his utmost to
avoid losing a case to Campion.

Milton, in effect, took the matter up with much zeal. He had (so far as
his professional instinct allowed him) accepted the theory of Walcott's
guilt, rather respecting him, if the truth were known, for refusing to
put up any longer with the persecutions of a revolted wife. But he had
no sooner received his brief in the case than he was perfectly convinced
of Walcott's innocence. The story told him by Mr. Larmer seemed not only
natural but transparently true, and when he heard that his club-mate of
the Oligarchy was actively interested for the other side, he determined
that no effort on his part should be wanting to secure a verdict.

Not that he had any grudge against Sydney; but they belonged to the same
profession, the same party, and the same club--three conceivable reasons
for Mr. Milton's zeal.

Thus Alan's defence was well provided for, and Mr. Larmer began to feel
more easy in his mind.

When Alan heard that the prosecution was likely to be conducted by
Sydney Campion, he took the news quietly, though it was a very serious
matter for him. He did not doubt its seriousness, but his heart had
already fallen so low that it could scarcely sink lower. He saw at once
that the motive of Lettice's brother in angling for this brief (as Alan
concluded that he must have done) was to protect the interests of
Lettice; and so far, the fact was a matter of congratulation. It was his
own great desire, as Larmer knew, to prevent her name from being
mentioned, and to avoid reference to anything in which she had been
indirectly concerned, even though the reference might have been made
without using her name. When Larmer pointed out that this quixotism, as
he called it, would make it almost impossible for his counsel to show
the extreme malignity of his wife and the intolerable persecution to
which he had been subjected, he had answered shortly and decisively,

"Let it be impossible. The first object is not my defence, but hers."

"Your vision is distorted," Larmer had said angrily. "This may seem to
you right and generous, but I tell you it is foolish and unnecessary."

"I will not be guided in this particular thing," Alan rejoined, "by your
reason, but by my feeling. An acquittal at her cost would mean a
lifelong sorrow."

"If I know anything of women, Miss Campion, who does not quite hate you,
would insist on having the whole story told in open court. Perhaps she
may return to England in time for the trial, and then she can decide the
point herself."

"Heaven forbid!" Alan had said. And he meant it. Worse than that, he
tortured himself with the idea, which he called a firm belief, that
Lettice had heard, or would hear, of his disgraceful position, that she
would be unable to doubt that he had struck the fatal blow, and that he
would be dropped out of her heart and out of her life as a matter of
course. How could it be otherwise? What was he to her, that she should
believe him innocent in spite of appearances; or that, believing him
merely unfortunate and degraded, she should not think less well of him
than when he held his name high in the world of letters and in society?

"That dream is gone," he said. "Let me forget it, and wake to the new
life that opens before me. A new life--born in a police cell, baptized
in a criminal court, suckled in a prison, and trained in solitary
adversity. That is the fate for which I have been reserved. I may be
nearly fifty when I come out--a broken-down man, without reputation and
without a hope. Truly, the dream is at an end; and oh, God of Heaven,
make her forget me as though we had never met!"

So, when Mr. Larmer frankly told him all that Sydney Campion had said,
Alan could not find it in his heart to blame Lattice's brother for his
hostility.




CHAPTER XXVI.

IN COURT.


No doubt it was from some points of view an unprofessional act of Sydney
Campion to appear in court as counsel for the prosecution of Alan
Walcott. Sydney knew that he was straining a rule of etiquette, to say
the least of it; but, under the circumstances, he held himself justified
in fishing for the brief.

The matter had been taken up by the Treasury, and Sydney had asked an
intimate friend, who was also a friend of the Attorney-General, to give
the latter a hint. Now Sir James was, above all things, a suave and
politic man of the world, who thought that persons of position and
influence got on best in the intricate game of life by deftly playing
into each other's hands. When one gentleman could do something for
another gentleman, to oblige and accommodate him, it was evidently the
proper course to do it gracefully and without fuss. Campion's motives
were clearly excellent. As he understood the business (although the
ambassador put it very delicately indeed), a lady's reputation was at
stake; and if Sir James prided himself on one thing more than another,
it was his gallantry and discretion in matters of this kind. So he told
his friend to go back and set Mr. Campion's mind at rest; and in the
course of a day or two Sydney received his brief.

"Who is going to defend?" he asked his clerk, when he had glanced at his
instructions.

"I heard just now that Larmer had retained Mr. Charles Milton."

"Charles Milton! The deuce! It will be a pretty little fight, Johnson!"

"They don't seem to have a leg to stand on; the evidence is all one way,
even without the wife. I don't know what his story is, but it cannot
have any corroboration--and hers is well supported."

"I am told she will be able to appear. She seems to be a terrible
talker--that is the worst of her. I must keep her strictly within the
ropes."

"The other side will not have the same motives," said Johnson, who knew
all about the scandal which had preceded the assault, and who wanted to
get his employer to speak.

"You think Mr. Milton will draw her on?"

"Sure to, I should say. If I were defending (since you ask me), I would
not loose my grip until I had got her into a rage; and from all I hear
that would make the jury believe her capable of anything, even of
stabbing herself and swearing it on her husband."

"But, my good fellow, you are not defending him! And I'll take care she
is not worked up in that fashion. Thanks for the suggestion, all the
same. They will contend that it was done in a struggle."

"Against that, you have her evidence that the blow was deliberate; and I
think the jury will believe her."

"They can't help themselves: motive, incitements, favoring
circumstances, are all too manifest. And that just makes the difficulty
and delicacy of the case for me. I want the jury to see the whole thing
impartially, that they may do justice, without bias and without foolish
weakness; and yet there are certain matters connected with it which need
not be dwelt upon--which must, in fact, be kept in the background
altogether. Do you see?"

"I think I do." Johnson was a good deal in Sydney's confidence, being a
man of much discretion, and with considerable knowledge of the law. He
felt that his advice was being asked, or at any rate his opinion, and he
met Mr. Campion's searching gaze with one equally cool and serious.

"I have no doubt you know as much about it as I could tell you. You seem
to hear everything from one source or another. Do you understand why it
is that I am going into court? It is not altogether a regular thing to
do, is it?"

"I suppose you wish to keep the evidence well in hand," Johnson replied,
readily. "A lady's name has been used in a very unwarrantable manner,
and--since you ask me--you have undertaken to see that there is no
unnecessary repetition of the matter in court."

"Precisely so--no repetition at all."

"You will examine your own witness, and, of course, you need not go
behind the scene in Surrey Street, at which the crime was actually
committed--except in opening your case. What the jury will say is this:
husband and wife on bad terms, separated, and divorce pending; wife
comes to husband's rooms, reproaches him; recriminations; dagger handy
on the table (very bad for him that); a sudden temptation, a sudden
blow, and there's an end of it. No need to prove they were on bad terms,
with all those facts before you."

"But then comes the defence."

"Well, sir, what is their line going to be? If they want to persuade the
jury that she did it herself, or that it was an accident, they will not
dwell upon all the reasons which might have tempted him to take her
life. That would be weakening their own case."

"And Milton is capable of doing it!" said Sydney, talking to himself.

"But if they think the jury will be bound to believe that he stabbed
her, no doubt they would go in for blackening her, and then they might
cross-examine her about those other things."

"That is where the danger comes in."

Sydney's words were equivalent to another question, but Johnson
preserved a perfectly stolid face. It was all very well for him to
advise his employer, and work up his cases for him if necessary. He was
accustomed to do both these things, and his help had been invaluable to
Sydney for several years past. But it was out of his line to display
more confidence than was displayed in him, or to venture on delicate
ground before he had received a lead.

"Yes, that's were the danger comes in," Sydney repeated. "I have reason
to believe that there is a disposition on their part to keep the lady's
name out of the case; but they are not pledged to it; and if they find
things looking very bad for Walcott, they may show fight in that
direction. Then there is Mr. Milton--no instructions can altogether gag
counsel. I don't know that I have ever given him cause of offence, but I
have an instinctive feeling that he would rather enjoy putting me in a
hole."

"I think you would have the judge with you in any objection which you
might take."

"But it would be a misfortune, as things stand, even to have to take
objection. Not only do I want to avoid the introduction of these
extraneous matters, but I should strongly object to figure in any way as
watching Miss Campion's interests. It would be very bad indeed for me to
have to do that. What I desire is that her interests should at no moment
of the trial appear, even to those who know the circumstances, to be
involved."

"I quite see," said Johnson. "And since you ask me, I don't think you
have much to fear. It is a delicate position, but both sides are of the
same mind on the particular point, and it is most improbable that any
indiscretion will occur. Prosecution and defence both want to avoid a
certain pitfall--when they won't struggle on the edge of it. What do you
say, Mr. Campion, to setting forth in your opening statement all that is
known about their previous quarrels, not concealing that the woman has
been rather outrageous, in her foreign fashion, but quietly ignoring the
fact of her jealousy?"

"That would be too bold--it would excite her, and possibly move the
defence to needless retorts."

"As for exciting her, if she is thoroughly convinced that his conviction
will spoil his chance of a divorce, she will take the whole thing coolly
enough. My idea was that by opening fully, and touching on every point,
you would escape the appearance of shirking anything. And at the same
time you would be suggesting these motives for violence on Walcott's
part which, as you said, it would be their business to avoid."

"There is a good deal in that," said Sydney, reflectively. "It is worth
considering. Yes, two heads are certainly better than one. I see that I
am instructed to ask about the attempt on her life at Aix-les-Bains.
Why, what a rascal the man has been to her! No wonder she is venemous
now."

When the trial took place, the court was crowded with men and women who
were anxious to see the principal actors in what was popularly known as
the Surrey Street Mystery. They were both there--Alan pale and haggard
from his long suspense, and Cora, much pulled down by what she had gone
through. Of the two, she was, perhaps, the more interesting. Illness and
loss of blood had done something to efface the dissipated look which had
become habitual with her; she was languid and soberly dressed; and,
moreover, she understood, as Mr. Johnson had said she would, that the
conviction of her husband would put his divorce out of the question, at
any rate for some time to come. So it was her business to look
interesting, and injured, and quiet; and she was cunning enough to play
this part successfully.

Alan, on the other hand, was completely indifferent as to the opinion
which might be formed of him, and almost indifferent as to the verdict.
When he came into court he looked carefully round at the women who were
present among the spectators, but, not seeing the one face which he had
both dreaded and hoped to see, he fell back into his former lethargy,
and took very little interest in the proceedings.

Sydney Campion opened the case for the prosecution in a business-like
way, just glancing at the unhappy relations which had existed between
the prisoner and his wife for several years past, and freely admitting
that there appeared to have been faults on both sides. He took the
common-sense view of a man of the world speaking to men of the world,
and did not ask the sympathies of the jury for the injured woman who had
come straight from the hospital to that court, but only their impartial
attention to the evidence which would be brought before them, and the
expression of their deliberate opinion on the innocence or guilt of the
accused.

Nothing could be more fair than his observations--or so it appeared to
the majority of Campion's hearers. No doubt he had referred to the
affair at Aix-les-Bains as though it were a matter of evidence, instead
of mere allegation, and to the recent quarrels in England as though the
"faults on both sides" had been clearly established. But he was supposed
to be speaking in strict accordance with his instructions, and, of
course, it was open to the defence to question anything which he had
said.

Then came the evidence for the prosecution, the substance of which is
already known to the reader; but Cora's account of the quarrel in Surrey
Street was so ingeniously colored and distorted that Alan found himself
listening with something like genuine amusement to the questions of
counsel and the replies of his lying wife.

"And so," said Mr. Campion, after she had spoken of her earnest appeal
for the renewal of friendship, and of her husband's insulting refusal,
"you came to high words. Did you both keep the same positions whilst you
were talking?"

"For a long time, until I lost patience, and then--yes, let me speak the
whole truth--I threw a certain book at him."

Cora was on the point of saying why she threw the book, and whose name
was on the title-page, but she checked herself in time. It had been very
difficult to persuade her that her interests were safe in the hands of
Lettice's brother, and even now she had occasional misgivings on that
point. Sydney went on quickly.

"A book lying close to your hand, you mean?"

"She said a certain book," Mr. Milton interjected.

"You must make allowance for her," said the judge. "You know she is
French, and you should follow her in two languages at once. No doubt she
meant 'some book or other.' The point has no importance."

"And then," said Sydney, "you altered your positions?"

"We stood facing each other."

"What happened next?"

"Suddenly--I had not moved--an evil look came in his face. He sprang to
the table, and took from the drawer a long, sharp poignard. I remembered
it well, for he had it when we were married."

"What did he do then?"

"He raised it in his hand; but I had leaped upon him, and then began a
terrible struggle."

The court was excited. Alan and his counsel were almost the only persons
who remained perfectly cool.

"It was an unequal struggle?"

"Ah, yes! I became exhausted, and sank to the ground."

"Before or after you were stabbed?"

"He stabbed me as I fell."

"Could it have been an accident?"

"Impossible, for I fell backward, and the wound was in front."

After Sydney had done with his witness, Mr. Milton took her in hand; and
this was felt by every one to be the most critical stage of the trial.
Milton did his best to shake Cora's evidence, not without a certain kind
of success. He turned her past life inside out, made her confess her
infidelity, her intemperance, her brawling in the streets, her
conviction and fine at the Hammersmith Police Court. It was all he could
do to restrain himself from getting her to acknowledge the reason of her
visit to Maple Cottage; but his instructions were too definite to be
ignored. He felt that the introduction of Miss Campion's name would have
told in favor of his client--at any rate, with the jury; and he would
not have been a zealous pleader if he had not wished to take advantage
of the point.

By this time Cora was in a rage, and she damaged herself with the jury
by giving them a specimen of her ungovernable temper. The trial had to
be suspended for a quarter of an hour, whilst she recovered from a fit
of hysterics; but it said much for her crafty shrewdness that she was
able to adhere, in the main, to the story which she had told. She was
severely cross-examined about the scene in Surrey Street, and especially
about the dagger. She feigned intense surprise at being asked and
pressed as to her having brought the weapon with her; but Mr. Milton
could not succeed in making her contradict herself.

Then the other witnesses were heard and counsel had an opportunity of
enforcing the evidence on both sides. Mr. Milton was very severe on his
learned friend for introducing matter in his opening speech, on which he
did not intend to call witnesses; but in his own mind he had recognized
the fact that there must be a verdict of guilty, and he brought out as
strongly as he could the circumstances which he thought would weigh with
the court in his client's favor. Sydney was well content with the result
of the trial as far as it had gone. There had been no reference of any
kind to his sister Lettice; and, as he knew that this was due in some
measure to the reticence of the defence, it would have argued a want of
generosity on his part to talk of the cruelty of the prisoner in
stopping his wife's allowance because she had molested him in the
street.

The judge summed up with great fairness. He picked out the facts which
had been sworn to in regard to the actual receiving of the wound, which,
he said, were compatible with the theory of self-infliction, with that
of wilful infliction by the husband, and with that of accident. As for
the first theory, it would imply that the dagger had passed from the
prisoner's hands to those of his wife, and back again, and it seemed to
be contradicted by the evidence of the landlady and the other lodger.
Moreover, it was not even suggested by the defence, which relied upon
the theory of accident. An accident of this kind would certainly be
possible during a violent struggle for the possession of the dagger. Now
the husband and wife virtually accused each other of producing this
weapon and threatening to use it. It was for the jury to decide which of
the two they would believe. There was a direct conflict of evidence, or
allegation, and in such a case they must look at all the surrounding
circumstances. It was not denied that the dagger belonged to the
prisoner, but it was suggested in his behalf that the wife had purloined
it some time before, and had suddenly produced it when she came to her
husband's apartments in Surrey Street. If that could be proved, then the
woman had been guilty of perjury, and her evidence would collapse
altogether. Now there were some portions of her evidence which were most
unsatisfactory. She had led a dissolute life, and was cursed with an
ungovernable temper. But, on the other hand, she had told a consistent
tale as to the occurrences of that fatal afternoon, and he could not go
so far as to advise the jury to reject her testimony as worthless.

His lordship then went over the remaining evidence, and concluded as
follows:--

"Gentlemen, I may now leave you to your difficult task. It is for you to
say whether, in your judgment, the wound which this woman received was
inflicted by herself or by her husband. If you find that it was
inflicted by her husband, you must further decide, to the best of your
ability, whether the prisoner wounded his wife in the course of a
struggle, without intending it, or whether he did at the moment
wittingly and purposely injure her. The rest you will leave to me. You
have the evidence before you, and the constitution of your country
imposes upon you the high responsibility of saying whether this man is
innocent or guilty of the charge preferred against him."

The jury retired to consider their verdict, and after about
three-quarters of an hour they returned into court.

"Gentlemen of the jury," said the clerk, "are you agreed upon your
verdict?"

"We are," said the foreman.

"Do you find the prisoner guilty or not guilty?"

"We find him guilty of wounding, with intent to inflict grievous bodily
harm."

Alan turned his face to the judge. The whole thing had been so precisely
rehearsed in his mind that no mere detail would take him by surprise. He
had expected the verdict, and it had come. Now he expected the sentence;
let it come, too. It would hardly be worse than he was prepared for.

To say that Mr. Justice Perkins was dissatisfied with the verdict would
be going a little too far; but he almost wished, when he heard it, that
he had dwelt at greater length upon the untrustworthy character of Mrs.
Walcott's evidence. However, he had told the jury that this was a matter
for their careful consideration; and he had always been wont, even more
than some of his brother judges, to leave full responsibility to his
juries in matters of opinion and belief.

"Alan Walcott," he said to the convicted man, "you have had a fair trial
before twelve of your peers, who have heard all the evidence brought
before them, whether favorable to you or the reverse. In the exercise of
their discretion, and actuated as they doubtless have been by the purest
motives, they have found you guilty of the crime laid to your charge. No
words of mine are necessary to make you appreciate this verdict.
Whatever the provocation which you may have received from this miserable
woman, however she may have forgotten her duty and tried you beyond
endurance--and I think that the evidence was clear enough on these
points--she was still your wife, and had a double claim upon your
forbearance. You might well have been in a worse position. From the
moment when you took that deadly weapon in your hands, everything was
possible. You might have been charged with wilful murder, if she had
died, or with intent to murder. You have been defended with great
ability; and if the jury believed, as they manifestly did, that your
defence, so fat as concerns the introduction of the dagger, could not be
maintained then they had no alternative but to find as they actually did
find. It only remains for me to pass upon you such a sentence, within
the discretion left me by the law, as seems to be appropriate to your
offence, and that is that you be imprisoned and kept to hard labor for
the term of six calendar months."

Then the prisoner was removed; the court and the spectators dispersed to
dine and amuse themselves; the reporters rushed off to carry their last
copy to the evening newspapers; and the great tide of life swept by on
its appointed course. No foundering, ship on its iron-bound coast, no
broken heart that sinks beneath its waves, disturbs the law-abiding ebb
and flow of the vast ocean of humanity.




BOOK V.

LOVE.

    "Let us be unashamed of soul,
      As earth lies bare to heaven above!
    How is it under our control
      To love or not to love?"

    ROBERT BROWNING.




CHAPTER XXVII.

COURTSHIP.


Busy as Sydney Campion was, at this juncture of his career, public
affairs were, on the whole, less engrossing to him than usual; for a new
element had entered into his private life, and bade fair to change many
of its currents.

The rector's education of his son and daughter had produced effects
which would have astonished him mightily could he have traced their
secret workings, but which would have been matter of no surprise to a
psychologist.

He himself had been in the main an unsuccessful man, for, although he
had enjoyed many years of peace and quiet in his country parish, he had
never attained the objects with which he set out in life. Like many
another man who has failed, his failure led him to value nothing on
earth so highly as success. It is your fortunate man who can afford to
slight life's prizes. The rector of Angleford was never heard to utter
soothing sentiments to the effect that "life may succeed in that it
seems to fail," or that heaven was the place for those who had failed on
earth. He did not believe it. Failure was terrible misfortune in his
eyes: intellectual failure, greatest of all. Of course he wanted his
children to be moral and religious; it was indeed important that they
should be orthodox and respectable, if they wanted to get on in the
world; but he had no such passion of longing for their spiritual as he
had for their mental development. Neither was it money that he wished
them to acquire, save as an adjunct; no man had more aristocratic
prejudices against trade and pride of purse than Mr. Campion; but he
wanted them--and especially he wanted Sydney--to show intellectual
superiority to the rest of the world, and by that superiority to gain
the good things of life. And of all these good things, the best was
fame--the fame that means success.

Thus, from the very beginning of Sydney's life, his father sedulously
cultivated ambition in his soul, and taught him that failure meant
disgrace. The spur that he applied to the boy acted with equal force on
the girl, but with different results. For with ambition the rector sowed
the seeds of a deadly egotism, and it found a favorable soil--at least
in Sydney's heart. That the boy should strive for himself and his own
glory--that was the lesson the rector taught him; and he ought not to
have been surprised when, in later years, his son's absorption in self
gave him such bitter pain.

Lettice, with her ambition curbed by love and pity, accepted the
discipline of patience and self-sacrifice, set before her by the
selfishness of other people; but Sydney gave free rein to his ambition
and his pride. He could not make shift to content himself, as his father
had done, with academic distinction alone. He wanted to be a leader of
men, to take a foremost place in the world of men. He sometimes told
himself that his father had equipped him to the very best of his power
for the battle of life, and he was grateful to him for his care; but he
did not think very much about the sacrifices made for him by others. As
a matter of fact, he thought himself worth them all. And for the prize
he desired, he bartered away much that makes the completer man: for he
extinguished many generous instincts and noble possibilities, and
thought himself the gainer by their loss.

In Lettice, the love of fame was also strong, but in a modified form.
Her tastes were more literary than those of Sydney, but success was as
sweet to her as to him. The zest with which she worked was also in part
due to the rector's teaching; but, by the strange workings-out of
influence and tendency, it had chanced that the rector's carelessness
and neglect had been the factors that disciplined a nature both strong
and sweet into forgetfulness of self and absorption in work rather than
its rewards.

But already Nature had begun with Sydney Campion her grand process of
amelioration, which she applies (when we let her have her way) to all
men and women, most systematically to those who need it most, securing
an entrance to their souls by their very vices and weaknesses, and
invariably supplying the human instrument or the effective circumstances
which are best calculated to work her purpose. Such beneficent work of
Nature may be called, as it was called by the older writers, the Hand of
God.

Sydney's great and overweening fault was that form of "moral stupidity"
which we term selfishness. Something of it may have come with the
faculties which he had inherited--in tendencies and inclinations
mysteriously associated with his physical conformation; much had been
added thereto by the indulgence of his parents, by the pride of his
university triumphs, and by the misfortune of his association in London
with men who aggravated instead of modifying the faults of his natural
disposition. The death of his father had produced a good effect for the
time, and made him permanently more considerate of his mother's and
sister's welfare. But a greater and still more permanent effect seemed
likely to be produced on him now, for he had opened his heart to the
influences of a pure and elevating affection; and for almost the first
time there entered into his mind a gradually increasing feeling of
contrition and remorse for certain past phases of his life which he knew
to be both unworthy in themselves and disloyal (if persisted in) to the
woman whom he hoped to make his wife. By a determined effort of will, he
cut one knot which he could not untie, but, his thoughts being still
centred upon himself, he considered his own rights and needs almost
entirely in the matter, and did not trouble himself much about the
rights or needs of the other person concerned. He had broken free, and
was disposed to congratulate himself upon his freedom; vowing,
meanwhile, that he would never put himself into any bonds again except
the safe and honorable bonds of marriage.

Thus freed, he went down with Dalton to Angleford for the Easter recess,
which fell late that year. He seemed particularly cheery and confident,
although Dalton noticed a slight shade of gloom or anxiety upon his brow
from time to time, and put it down to his uncertainty as to the
Pynsents' acceptance of his attentions to Miss Anna Pynsent, which were
already noticed and talked about in society. Sydney was a rising man,
but it was thought that Sir John might look higher for his beautiful
young sister.

The Parliamentary success of the new member for Vanebury had been as
great as his most reasonable friends anticipated for him, if not quite
as meteoric as one or two flatterers had predicted. Meteoric success in
the House of Commons is not, indeed, so rare as it was twenty years ago,
for the studied rhetoric which served our great-grandfathers in their
ambitious pursuit of notoriety has given place to the arts of audacity,
innovation, and the sublime courage of youthful insolence, which have
occasionally worked wonders in our own day.

Sydney had long been a close observer of the methods by which men gained
the ear of the House, and he had learned one or two things that were
very useful to him now that he was able to turn them to account.

"We have put the golden age behind us," he said one day to Dalton, with
the assured and confident air which gave him so much of his power
amongst men, "and also the silver age, and the age of brass. We are
living in the great newspaper age, and, if a public man wants to get
into a foremost place before he has begun to lose his teeth, he must
play steadily to the readers of the daily journals. In my small way I
have done this already, and now I am in the House, I shall make it my
business to study and humor, to some extent, the many-faced monster who
reads and reflects himself in the press. In other times a man had to
work himself up in _Hansard_ and the Standing Orders, to watch and
imitate the old Parliamentary hands, to listen for the whip and follow
close at heel; but, as I have often heard you say, we have changed all
that. Whatever else a man may do or leave undone, he must keep himself
in evidence; it is more important to be talked and written about
constantly than to be highly praised once in six months. I don't know
any other way of working the oracle than by doing or saying something
every day, clever or foolish, which will have a chance of getting into
print."

He spoke half in jest, yet he evidently more than half meant what he
said.

"At any rate, you have some recent instances to support your theory,"
Dalton said, with a smile. They were lighting their cigars, preparatory
to playing a fresh game of billiards, but Sydney was so much interested
in the conversation, that, instead of taking up his cue, he stood with
his back to the fire and continued it.

"Precisely so--there can be no doubt about it. Look at Flumley, and
Warrington, and Middlemist--three of our own fellows, without going any
further. What is there in them to command success, except not deserving
it, and knowing that they don't? The modest merit and perseverance
business is quite played out for any man of spirit. The only line to
take in these days is that of cheek, pluck, and devil-may-care."

"Do you know, Campion, you have grown very cynical of late?" said Brooke
Dalton, rather more gravely than usual. "I have been rather disposed to
take some blame to myself for my share in the heartless kind of talk
that used to go on at the Oligarchy. I and Pynsent were your sponsors
there, I remember. You may think this an odd thing to say, but the fact
is I am becoming something of a fogy, I suppose, in my ideas, and I
daresay you'll tell me that the change is not for the better."

"I don't know about that," said Sydney, lightly. "Perhaps it is for the
better, after all. You see, _you_ are now laying yourself out to
persuade your fellowmen that you can cure them of all the ills that
flesh is heir to! But I'll tell you what I have noticed, old man, and
what others beside me have noticed. We miss you up in town. You never
come to the Club now. The men say you must be ill, or married, or
breaking up, or under petticoat government--all stuff and nonsense, you
know; but that is what they say."

"They can't be all right," said Brooke, with a rather embarrassed laugh,
"but some of them may be." He made a perfectly needless excursion across
the room to fetch a cue from the rack that he did not want, while Sydney
smoked on and watched him with amused and rather curious eyes. "I
suppose I am a little under petticoat government," said Dalton,
examining his cue with interest, and then laying it down on the table,
"as you may see for yourself. But my sister manages everything so
cleverly that I don't mind answering to the reins and letting her get me
well in hand."

"No one ever had a better excuse for submitting to petticoat government.
But you know what is always thought of a man when he begins to give up
his club."

"I am afraid it can't be helped. Then again--perhaps there is another
reason. Edith, you know, has a little place of her own, about a mile
from here, and she tells me that she will not keep house for me much
longer--even to rescue me from club life. The fact is, she wants me to
marry."

"Oh, now I see it all; you have let the cat out the bag! And you are
going to humor her in that, too?"

"Well, I hardly think I should marry just to humor my sister. But--who
knows? She is always at me, and a continual dropping----"

"Wears away the stony heart of Brooke Dalton. Why, what a converted
clubbist you will be!"

"There was always a corner of my heart, Campion, in which I rebelled
against our bachelor's paradise at the Oligarchy--and you would have
opened your eyes if you could have seen into that corner through the
smoke and gossip of the old days in Pall Mall."

"The old days of six months ago!" said Sydney, good-humoredly.

"Do you know that Edith and I are going abroad next week?"

The question sounded abrupt, but Dalton had not the air of a man who
wants to turn the conversation.

"No," said Sydney, in some surprise. "Where are you going?"

"Well, Edith wants to go to Italy, and I should not wonder if we were to
come across a cousin of mine, Mrs. Hartley, who is now at Florence. You
know her, I believe?"

"I hardly know her, but I have heard a good deal about her. She has been
very kind to my sister--nursed her through a long illness, and looked
after her in the most generous manner possible. I am under great
obligations to Mrs. Hartley. I hope you will say so to her if you meet."

"All right. Anything else I can do for you? No doubt we shall see your
sister. We are old friends, you know. And I have met her several times
at my cousin's this winter."

"At those wonderful Sunday gatherings of hers?"

"I dropped in casually one day, and found Miss Campion there--and I
admit that I went pretty regularly afterwards, in the hope of improving
the acquaintance. If I were to tell you that I am going to Florence now
for precisely the same reason, would you, as her brother, wish me good
speed, or advise me to keep away?"

"Wish you good speed?"

"Why, yes! Is not my meaning clear?"

"My dear Dalton, you have taken me absolutely by surprise," said Sydney,
laying down his cigar. "But, if I understand you aright, I do wish you
good speed, and with all my heart."

"Mind," said Dalton hurriedly, "I have not the least idea what my
reception is likely to be. I'm afraid I have not the ghost of a chance."

"I hope you will be treated as you deserve," said Sydney, rather
resenting this constructive imputation on his sister's taste. Privately,
he thought there was no doubt about the matter, and was delighted with
the prospect of so effectually crushing the gossip that still hung about
Lettice's name. The memory of Alan Walcott's affairs was strong in the
minds of both men as they paused in their conversation, but neither
chose to allude to him in words.

"I could settle down here with the greatest pleasure imaginable, under
some circumstances," said Brooke Dalton, with a faint smile irradiating
his fair, placid, well-featured countenance. "Do you think your sister
would like to be so near her old home?"

"I think she would consider it an advantage. She was always fond of
Angleford. Your wife will be a happy woman, Dalton, whoever she may
be--sua si bona norit!"

"Well, I'm glad I spoke to you," said Brooke, with an air of visible
relief. "Edith knows all about it, and is delighted. How the time flies!
We can't have a game before dinner, I'm afraid. Must you go to-morrow,
Campion?"

"It is necessary. The House meets at four; and besides, I have arranged
to meet Sir John Pynsent earlier in the day. I want to have a little
talk with him."

"To put his fate to the touch, I suppose," meditated Brooke, glancing at
Sydney's face, which had suddenly grown a little grave. "I suppose it
would be premature to say anything--I think," he said aloud, "that we
almost ought to be dressing now."

"Yes, we've only left ourselves ten minutes. I say, Dalton, now I think
of it, I'll give you a letter to my sister, if you'll be kind enough to
deliver it."

"All right."

"There will be no hurry about it. Give it to her whenever you like. I
think it would be serviceable, and I suppose you can trust my
discretion; but, understand me--you can deliver the letter or not, as
seems good to you when you are with her. I'll write it to-night, and let
you have it to-morrow morning before I go."

It would not have occurred to Brooke Dalton to ask for a letter of
recommendation when he went a-courting, but Sydney's words did not
strike him as incongruous at the time, and he was simple enough to
believe that a brother's influence would weigh with a woman of Lettice's
calibre in the choice of a partner for life.

Sydney delivered the letter into his keeping next day, and then went up
to town, where he was to meet Sir John Pynsent at the Club.

Dalton had been mistaken when he conjectured that Sydney's intentions
were to consult Sir John about his pretension to Miss Pynsent's hand.
Sydney had not yet got so far. He had made up his mind that he wanted
Anna Pynsent for a wife more than he had ever wanted any woman in the
world; and the encouragement that he had received from Sir John and Lady
Pynsent made him conscious that they were not very likely to deny his
suit. And yet he paused. It seemed to him that he would like a longer
interval to pass before he asked Nan Pynsent to marry him--a longer
space in which to put away certain memories and fears which became more
bitter to him every time that they recurred.

It was simply a few words on political matters that he wanted with Sir
John; but they had the room to themselves, and Sydney was hardly
surprised to find that the conversation had speedily drifted round to
personal topics, and that the baronet was detailing his plans for the
autumn, and asking Sydney to form one of his house-party in September.
Sydney hesitated in replying. He thought to himself that he should not
care to go unless he was sure that Miss Pynsent meant to accept him.
Perhaps Sir John attributed his hesitation to its real cause, for he
said, more heartily than ever.

"We all want you, you know. Nan is dying to talk over your constituents
with you. She has got some Workmen's Club on hand that she wants the
member to open, with an appropriate speech, so you had better prepare
yourself."

"Miss Pynsent is interested in the Vanebury workmen. I shall be
delighted to help at any time."

"Too much interested," said Sir John, bluntly. "I'll tell her she'll be
an out and out Radical by and by. You know she has a nice little place
of her own just outside Vanebury, and she vows she'll go and live there
when she is twenty-one, and work for the good of the people. My
authority over her will cease entirely when she is of age."

"But not your influence," said Sydney.

"Well--I don't know that I have very much. The proper person to
influence Nan will be her husband, when she has one."

"If I were not a poor man----" Sydney began impulsively, and then
stopped short. But a good-humored curl of Sir John's mouth, an inquiring
twinkle in his eye, told him that he must proceed. So, in five minutes,
his proposal was made, and a good deal earlier than he had expected it
to be. It must be confessed that Sir John had led him on. And Sir John
was unfeignedly delighted, though he tried to pretend doubt and
indifference.

"Of course I can't answer for my sister, and she is full young to make
her choice. But I can assure you, Campion, there's no man living to whom
I would sooner see her married than to yourself," he said at the
conclusion of the interview. And then he asked Sydney to dinner, and
went home to pour the story into the ears of his wife.

Lady Pynsent was not so much pleased as was he. She had had visions of a
title for her sister-in-law, and thought that Nan would be throwing
herself away if she married Sydney Campion, although he was a rising
man, and would certainly be solicitor-general before long.

"Well, Nan will have to decide for herself," said Sir John, evading his
wife's remonstrances. "After all, I couldn't refuse the man for her,
could I?" He did not say that he had tried to lead the backward lover
on.

"Yes, you could," said Lady Pynsent. "You could have told him it was out
of the question. But the fact is, you want it. You have literally thrown
Nan at his head ever since he stayed with us last summer. You are so
devoted to your friend, Mr. Campion!"

"You will see that he is a friend to be proud of," said Sir John, with
conviction. "He is one of the cleverest men of the day, he will be one
of the most distinguished. Any woman may envy Nan----"

"If she accepts him," said Lady Pynsent.

"Don't you think she will?"

"I have no idea. In some ways, Nan is so childish; in others, she is a
woman grown. I can never answer for Nan. She takes such idealistic views
of things."

"She's a dear, good girl," said Sir John, rather objecting to this view
of Nan's character.

"My dear John, of course she is! She's a darling. But she is quite
impracticable sometimes, as you know."

Yes, Sir John knew. And for that very reason, he wanted Nan to marry
Sydney Campion.

He warned his wife against speaking to the girl on the subject: he had
promised Campion a fair field, and he was to speak as soon as he got the
opportunity. "He's coming to dinner next Wednesday; he may get his
chance then."

But Sydney got it before Wednesday. He found that the Pynsents were
invited to a garden party--a social function which he usually avoided
with care--for which he also had received a card. The hostess lived at
Fulham, and he knew that her garden was large and shady, sloping to the
river, and full of artfully contrived sequestered nooks, where many a
flirtation was carried on.

"She won't like it so well as Culverley," said Sydney to himself, with a
half smile, "but it will be better than a drawing-room."

He did not like to confess to himself how nervous he felt. His theory
had always been that a man should not propose to a woman unless he is
sure that he will be accepted. He was not at all sure about Nan's
feelings towards him, and yet he was going to propose. He told himself
again that he had not meant to speak so soon--that if he saw any signs
of distaste he should cut short his declaration altogether and defer it
to a more convenient season; but all the same, he knew in his own heart
that he would be horribly disappointed if fate deprived him of the
chance of a decisive interview with Anna Pynsent.

Those who saw him at Lady Maliphant's party that afternoon, smiling,
handsome, debonnair, as usual faultlessly attired, with a pleasant word
for everyone he met and an eye that was perfectly cool and careless,
would have been amazed could they have known the leap that his heart
gave when he caught sight of Lady Pynsent's great scarlet parasol and
trailing black laces, side by side with Nan's dainty white costume. The
girl wore an embroidered muslin, with a yellow sash tied loosely round
her slender waist; the graceful curve of her broad-brimmed hat, fastened
high over one ear like a cavalier's, was softened by drooping white
ostrich feathers; her lace parasol had a knot of yellow ribbon at one
side, to match the tint of her sash. Her long tan gloves and the
Marechal Niel roses at her neck were finishing touches of the picture
which Sydney was incompetent to grasp in detail, although he felt its
charm on a whole. The sweet, delicate face, with its refined features
and great dark eyes, was one which might well cause a man to barter all
the world for love; and, in Sydney's case, it happened that to gain its
owner meant to gain the world as well. It spoke well for Sydney's
genuine affection that he had ceased of late to think of the worldly
fortune that Nan might bring him, and remembered only that he wanted Nan
Pynsent for herself.

She greeted him with a smile. She had grown a little quieter, a little
more conventional in manner of late: he did not like her any the worse
for that. But, although she did not utter any word of welcome, he
fancied from her face that she was glad to see him; and it was not long
before he found some pretext for strolling off with her to a shadowy and
secluded portion of the grounds. Even then he was not sure whether he
would ask her to be his wife that day, or whether he would postpone the
decisive moment a little longer. Nan's bright, unconscious face was very
charming, undisturbed by fear or doubt: what if he brought a shadow to
it, a cloud that he could not dispel? For one of the very few times in
his life, Sydney did not feel sure of himself.

"Where are you going this summer?" she asked him, as they stood beside
the shining water, and watched the eddies and ripples of the stream.

"I usually go abroad. But Sir John has been asking me to Culverley
again."

"You do not mean to go to Switzerland, then? You spoke of it the other
day."

"No, I think not. I do not want to be so far away from--from London."

"You are so fond of your work: you do not like to be parted from it,"
she said smiling.

"I am fond of it, certainly. I have a good deal to do."

"Oh!" said Nan, innocently, "I thought people who were in Parliament did
nothing but Parliamentary business-like John."

"I have other things to do as well, Miss Pynsent. And in Parliament even
there is a good deal to study and prepare for, if one means to take up a
strong position from the beginning."

"Which, I am sure, you mean to do," she said quickly.

"Thank you. You understand me perfectly--you understand my ambitions, my
hopes and fears----"

She did not look as if she understood him at all.

"Are you ambitious, Mr. Campion? But what do you wish for more than you
have already?"

"Many things. Everything."

"Power, I suppose," said Nan doubtfully; then, with a slightly
interrogative intonation--"and riches?"

"Well--yes."

"But one's happiness does not depend on either."

"It rarely exists without one or the other."

"I don't know. I should like to live in a cottage and be quite poor and
bake the bread, and work hard all day, and sleep soundly all night----"

"Yes, if it were for the sake of those you loved," said Sydney,
venturing to look at her significantly.

Nan nodded, and a faint smile curved her lips: her eyes grew tender and
soft.

"Can you not imagine another kind of life? where you spent yourself
equally for those whom you loved and who loved you, but in happier
circumstances? a life where two congenial souls met and worked together?
Could you not be happy almost anywhere with the one--the man--you
loved?"

Sydney's voice had sunk low, but his eyes expressed more passion than
his voice, which was kept sedulously steady. Nan was more aware of the
look in his eyes than of the words he actually used. She cast a
half-frightened look at him, and then turned rosy-red.

"Could you be happy with me?" he asked her, still speaking very gently.
"Nan, I love you--I love you with all my heart. Will you be my wife?"

And as she surrendered her hands to his close clasp, and looked half
smilingly, half timidly into his face, he knew that his cause was won.

But, alas, for Sydney, that at the height of his love-triumph, a bitter
drop of memory should suddenly poison his pleasure at the fount!




CHAPTER XXVIII.

A SLUMBERING HEART.


Time had hung heavily on Lettice's hands during the first month or two
of her stay on the Continent. No one could have been kinder to her than
Mrs. Hartley, more considerate of her needs and tastes, more anxious to
please and distract her. But the recovery of her nerves from the shock
and strain to which they had been subjected was a slow process, and her
mind began to chafe against the restraint which the weakness of the body
imposed upon it.

The early spring brought relief. Nature repairs her own losses as she
punishes her own excess. Lettice had suffered by the abuse of her energy
and power of endurance, but three months of idleness restored the
balance. The two women lived in a small villa on the outskirts of
Florence, and when they were not away from home, in quest of art or
music, scenery or society, they read and talked to each other, or
recorded their impressions on paper. Mrs. Hartley had many friends in
England, with whom she was wont to exchange many thousand words; and
these had the benefit of the ideas which a winter in Florence had
excited in her mind. Lettice's confidant was her diary, and she sighed
now and then to think that there was no one in the world to whom she
could write the inmost thoughts of her heart, and from whom she could
expect an intelligent and sympathetic response.

No doubt she wrote to Clara, and gave her long accounts of what she saw
and did in Italy; but Clara was absorbed in the cares of matrimony and
motherhood. She had nothing but actualities to offer in return for the
idealities which were Lettice's mental food and drink. This had always
been the basis of their friendship; and it is a basis on which many a
firm friendship has been built.

Lettice had already felt the elasticity of returning health in every
limb and vein when the news reached her of the success of her novel; and
that instantly completed the cure. Her publisher wrote to her in high
spirits, at each demand for a new edition, and he forwarded to her a
handsome cheque "on account," which gave more eloquent testimony of his
satisfaction than anything else. Graham sent her, through Clara, a
bundle of reviews which he had been at the pains of cutting out of the
papers, and Clara added many criticisms, mostly favorable, which she had
heard from her husband and his friends. Lettice had a keen appetite for
praise, as for pleasure of every kind, and she was intoxicated by the
good things which were spoken of her.

"There, dear," she said to Mrs. Hartley one morning, spreading out
before her friend the cheque which she had just received from Mr.
MacAlpine, "you told me that my stupid book had given me nothing more
than a nervous fever, but this has come also to pay the doctor's bill.
Is it not a great deal of money? What a lucky thing that I went in for
half profits, and did not take the paltry fifty pounds which they
offered me?"

"Ah, you need not twit me with what I said before I knew what your book
was made of," said Mrs. Hartley affectionately. "How was I to know that
you could write a novel, when you had only told me that you could
translate a German philosopher? The two things do not sound particularly
harmonious, do they?"

"I suppose I must have made a happy hit with my subject, though I never
thought I had whilst I was writing. I only went straight on, and had not
the least idea that people would find much to like in it. Nor had Mr.
MacAlpine either, for he did not seem at all anxious to publish it."

"It was in you, my darling, and would come out. You have discovered a
mine, and I daresay you can dig as much gold out of it as will suffice
to make you happy."

"Now, what shall we do with this money? We must have a big treat; and I
am going to manage and pay for everything myself starting from to-day.
Shall it be Rome, or the Riviera, or the Engadine; or what do you say to
returning by way of Germany? I do so long to see the Germans at home."

Mrs. Hartley was downcast at once.

"The first thing you want to do with your wealth," she said, "is to make
me feel uncomfortable! Have we not been happy together these six months,
and can you not leave well alone? You know that I am a rich woman,
through no credit of my own--for everything I have came from my husband.
If you talk of spending your money on anyone but yourself, I shall think
that you are pining for independence again, and we may as well pack up
our things and get home."

"Oh dear, what have I said? I did not mean it, my dearest friend--my
best friend in the world! I won't say anything like it again: but I must
go out and spend some money, or I shall not believe in my good fortune.
Can you lend me ten pounds?"

"Yes, that I can!"

"Then let us put our things on, and go into paradise."

"What very dissolute idea, to be sure! But come along. If you will be so
impulsive, I may as well go to take care of you."

So they went out together--the woman of twenty-six and the woman of
sixty, and roamed about the streets of Florence like a couple of
school-girls. And Lettice bought her friend a brooch, and herself a ring
in memory of the day; and as the ten pounds would not cover it she
borrowed fifteen; and then they had a delightful drive through the noble
squares, past many a venerable palace and lofty church, through richly
storied streets, and across a bridge of marble to the other side of the
Arno; so onward till they came to the wood-enshrouded valley, where the
trees were breaking into tender leafage, every shade of green
commingling with the blue screen of the Apennines beyond. Back again
they came into the city of palaces, which they had learned to love, and
alighting near the Duomo sought out a _pasticceria_ in a street hard by,
and ate a genuine school-girl's meal.

"It has been the pleasantest day of my life here!" said Lettice as they
reached home in the evening. "I have not had a cloud upon my
conscience."

"And it has made the old woman young," said Mrs. Hartley, kissing her
friend upon the cheek. "Oh, why are you not my daughter!"

"You would soon have too much of me if I were your daughter. But tell me
what a daughter would have done for you, and let me do it while I can."

"It is not to do, but to be. Be just what you are and never desert me,
and then I will forget that I was once a childless woman."

So the spring advanced, and drew towards summer. And on the first of May
Mrs. Hartley, writing to her cousin, Edith Dalton, the most intimate of
all her confidants, gave a glowing account of Lettice.

"My sweetheart here (she wrote) is cured at last. Three months have gone
since she spoke about returning to England, and I believe she is
thoroughly contented. She has taken to writing again, and seems to be
fairly absorbed in her work, but you may be sure that I shall not let
her overdo it. The death of her mother, and the break-up of their home,
probably severed all the ties that bound her to London; and, so far as I
can see, _not one of them_ remains. I laughed to read that you were
jealous of her. When you and Brooke come here I am certain you will like
her every bit as much as I do. What you tell me of Brooke is rather a
surprise, but I know you must be very happy about it. To have had him
with you for six months at a time, during which he has never once been
up to his club, is a great triumph, and speaks volumes for your clever
management, as well as for your care and tenderness. We shall see him
married and domesticated before a year has passed! I am impatient for
you both to come. Do not let anything prevent you."

It was quite true that Lettice had set to work again, and that she
appeared to have overcome the home-sickness which at one time made her
long to get back to London. Restored health made her feel more satisfied
with her surroundings, and a commission for a new story had found her
just in the humor to sit down and begin. She was penetrated by the
beauty of the Tuscan city which had been her kindly nurse, which was now
her fount of inspiration and inexhaustible source of new ideas. A plot,
characters, scenery, stage, impressed themselves on her imagination as
she wandered amongst the stones and canvasses of Florence; and they grew
upon her more and more distinctly every day, as she steeped herself in
the spirit of the place and time. She would not go back to the
picturesque records of other centuries but took her portraits from men
and women of the time, and tried to recognize in them the descendants of
the artists, scholars, philosophers, and patriots, who have shed undying
fame on the queen-city of northern Italy.

Entirely buried in her work, and putting away from her all that might
interfere with its performance, she forgot for a time both herself and
others. If she was selfish in her isolation it was with the selfishness
of one who for art's sake is prepared to abandon her ease and pleasure
in the laborious pursuit of an ideal. Mrs. Hartley was content to leave
her for a quarter of the day in the solitude of her own room on
condition of sharing her idleness or recreation during the rest of their
waking hours.

Had Lettice forgotten Alan Walcott at this crisis in the lives of both?
When Mrs. Hartley was assuring her cousin that all the ties which had
bound the girl to London were severed, Alan was expiating in prison the
crime of which he had been convicted, which, in his morbid abasement and
despair he was almost ready to confess that he had committed. Was he,
indeed, as he had not very sincerely prayed to be, forgotten by the
woman he loved?

It is no simple question for her biographer to answer off-hand. Lettice,
as we know, had admitted into her heart a feeling of sympathetic
tenderness for Alan, which, under other circumstances, she would have
accepted as worthy to dominate her life and dictate its moods and
duties. But the man for whom this sympathy had been aroused was so
situated that he could not ask her for her love, whilst she could not in
any case have given it if she had been asked. Instinctively she had shut
her eyes to that which she might have read in her own soul, or in his,
if she had cared or dared to look. She had the book before her, but it
was closed and sealed. Where another woman might, have said, "I must
forget him--there is a barrier between us which neither can cross," she
said nothing; but all her training, her instinct, her delicate feeling,
even her timidity and self-distrust, led her insensibly to shun the
paths of memory which would have brought her back to the prospect that
had allured and alarmed her.

Be it remembered that she knew nothing of his later troubles. She had
heard nothing about him since she left England; and Mrs. Hartley, who
honestly believed that Alan had practically effaced himself from their
lives by his own rash act, was sufficiently unscrupulous to keep her
friend in ignorance of what had happened.

So Lettice did not mention Alan, did not keep him in her mind or try to
recall him by any active exercise of her memory; and in this sense she
had forgotten him. Time would show if the impression, so deep and vivid
in its origin, was gradually wearing away, or merely hidden out of
sight. No wonder if Mrs. Hartley thought that she was cured.

Lettice heard of the arrival of the Daltons without any other feeling
than half-selfish misgiving that her work was to be interrupted at a
critical moment, when her mind was full of the ideas on which her story
depended for its success. She had created by her imagination a little
world of human beings, instinct with life and endowed with vivid
character; she had dwelt among her creatures, guided their steps and
inspired their souls, loved them and walked with them from day to day,
until they were no mere puppets dancing to the pull of a string, but
real and veritable men and women. She could not have deserted them by
any spontaneous act of her own, and if she was to be torn away from the
world, which hung upon her fiat, she could not submit to the banishment
without at least an inward lamentation. Art spoils her votaries for the
service of society, and society, as a rule, takes its revenge by
despising or patronizing the artist whilst competing for the possession
of his works.

Brooke Dalton and his sister were lodged in an old palace not far from
Mrs. Hartley's smaller and newer residence; and frequent visits between
the two couples soon put them all on terms of friendly intimacy. Lettice
had always thought well of Mr. Dalton. He reminded her of Angleford, and
the happy days of her early youth. In London he had been genial with
her, and attentive, and considerate in every sense, so that she had been
quite at her ease with him. They met again without constraint, and under
circumstances which enabled Dalton to put forth his best efforts to
please her, without exciting any alarm in her mind, to begin with.

Edith Dalton captivated Lettice at once. She was a handsome woman of
aristocratic type and breeding, tall, slender, and endowed with the
graceful manners of one who has received all the polish of refined
society without losing the simplicity of nature. A year or two younger
than her brother, she had reached an age when most women have given up
the thought of marriage; and in her case there was a sad and sufficient
reason for turning her back upon such joys and consolations as a woman
may reasonably expect to find in wedded life. She had been won in her
girlhood by a man thoroughly fitted to make her happy--a man of wealth
and talent, and honorable service in the State; who, within a week of
their marriage day, had been thrown from his horse and killed. Edith had
not in so many words devoted herself to perpetual maidenhood; but that
was the outcome of the great sorrow of her youth. She had remained
single without growing morose, and her sweet and gentle moods endeared
her to all who came to know her.

With such a companion Lettice was sure to become intimate; or at any
rate, she was sure to respond with warmth to the kindly feeling
displayed for her. Yet there were many points of unlikeness between her
and Edith Dalton. She too was refined, but it was the refinement of
mental culture rather than the moulding of social influences. She too
retained the simplicity of nature, but it was combined with an outspoken
candor which Edith had been taught to shun. Where Lettice would be ready
to assert herself, and claim the rights of independence, Edith would
shrink back with fastidious alarm; where the one was fitted to wage the
warfare of life, and, if need be, to stand out as a champion or pioneer
of her sex, the other would have suffered acutely if she had been forced
into any kind of aggressive combat.

When Brooke told his sister that he had met a woman whom he could love,
she was unfeignedly glad, and never thought of inquiring whether the
woman in question was rich, or well-connected, or moving in good
society. Perhaps she took the last two points for granted, and no doubt
she would have been greatly disappointed if she had found that Brooke's
choice had been otherwise than gentle and refined. But when she saw
Lettice she was satisfied, and set herself by every means in her power
to please and charm her new friend.

As Mrs. Hartley knew and backed the designs of the Daltons, Lettice was
not very fairly matched against the wiles and blandishments of the
three. Brooke Dalton, indeed, felt himself in a rather ridiculous
position, as though he were proceeding to the siege of Lettice's heart
relying upon the active co-operation of his sister and cousin, to say
nothing of her brother's letter which he carried in his pocket. But,
after all, this combination was quite fortuitous. He had not asked for
assistance, and he knew very well that if such assistance were too
openly given it would do his cause more harm than good.

Dalton was one of those good-tempered men who are apt to get too much
help in spite of themselves from the womenfolk of their family and
household, who are supposed to need help when they do not, and who have
only themselves to thank for their occasional embarrassment of wealth in
this particular form. Nature intends such men to be wife-ridden and
happy. If is not alien to their disposition that they should spend their
earlier manhood, as Dalton had done, amongst men who take life too
easily and lightly; but they generally settle down before the whole of
their manhood is wasted, and then a woman can lead them with a thread of
silk.

It was for Lettice, if she would, to lead this gentle-hearted English
squire, to be the mistress of his house and fair estate, to ensure the
happiness of this converted bachelor of Pall Mall, and to bid good-bye
to the cares and struggles of the laborious life on which she had
entered.

The temptation was put before her. Would she dally with it, and succumb
to it? And could anyone blame her if she did?




CHAPTER XXIX.

"IT WAS A LIE!"


Up the right-hand slopes of the Val d'Arno, between Florence and
Fiesole, the carriage-road runs for some distance comparatively broad
and direct between stone walls and cypress-hedges, behind which the
passer-by gets glimpses of lovely terraced gardens, of the winding river
far below his feet, of the purple peaks of the Carrara mountains far
away. But when the road reaches the base of the steep hill on which the
old Etruscans built their crow's-nest of a city--where Catiline gathered
his host of desperadoes, and under whose shadow, more than three
centuries later, the last of the Roman deliverers, himself a barbarian,
hurled back the hordes of Radegast--it winds a narrow and tortuous way
from valley to crest, from terrace to terrace, until the crowning stage
is reached.

Here in the shadow of the old Etruscan fortifications, the wayfarer
might take his stand and look down upon the wondrous scene beneath him.
"Never," as Hallam says, "could the sympathies of the soul with outward
nature be more finely touched; never could more striking suggestions be
presented to the philosopher and the statesman" than in this Tuscan
cradle of so much of our modern civilization, which even the untraveled
islander of the northern seas can picture in his mind and cherish with
lively affection. For was it not on this fertile soil of Etruria that
the art and letters of Italy had birth? and was it not in fair Florence,
rather than in any other modern city, that they were born again in the
fulness of time? Almost on the very spot where Stilicho vainly stemmed
the advancing tide which was to reduce Rome to a city of ruins, the new
light dawned after a millennium of darkness. And there, from the sacred
walls of Florence, Dante taught our earlier and later poets to sing;
Galileo reawoke slumbering science with a trumpet-call which frightened
the Inquisition out of its senses; Michael Angelo, Raffaelle, Da Vinci,
Del Sarto created models of art for all succeeding time. Never was there
in any region of the world such a focus of illuminating fire. Never will
there live a race that does not own its debt to the great seers and
creators of Tuscany.

Late on an autumn afternoon, towards the close of the September of 1882,
four English friends have driven out from Florence to Fiesole, and,
after lingering for a time in the strange old city, examining the
Cathedral in the Piazza and the remains of the Roman Theatre in the
garden behind it, they came slowly down the hill to the beautiful old
villa which was once the abode of Lorenzo the Magnificent. The carriage
waited for them in the road, but here, on the terrace outside the villa
gates, they rested awhile, feasting their eyes upon the lovely scene
which lay below.

They had visited the place before, but not for some months, for they had
been forced away from Florence by the fierce summer heat, and had spent
some time in Siena and Pistoja, finally taking up their residence in a
cool and secluded nook of the Pistojese Apennines. But when autumn came,
and the colder, mountain breezes began to blow, Mrs. Hartley hastened
her friends back to her comfortable little Florentine villa, proposing
to sojourn there for the autumn, and then to go with Lettice and perhaps
with the Daltons also, on to Rome.

"We have seen nothing so beautiful as this in all our wanderings,"
Lettice said at last in softened tones.

She was looking at the clustering towers of the city, at Brunelleschi's
magnificent dome, and the slender grace of Giotto's Campanile, and
thence, from those storied trophies of transcendant art, her gaze
wandered to the rich valley of the Arno, with its slopes of green and
grey, and its distant line of purple peaks against an opalescent sky.

"It is more beautiful in spring. I miss the glow and scent of the
flowers--the scarlet tulips, the sweet violets," said Mrs. Hartley.

"I cannot imagine anything more beautiful," Edith Dalton rejoined. "One
feels oppressed with so much loveliness. It is beyond expression."

"Silence is most eloquent, perhaps, in a place like this," said Lettice.
"What can one say that is worth saying, or that has not been said
before?"

She was sitting on a fragment of fallen stone, her hands loosely clasped
round her knees, her eyes fixed wistfully and dreamily upon the faint
amethystine tints of the distant hills. Brooke Dalton looked down at her
with an anxious eye. He did not altogether like this pensive mood of
hers; there was something melancholy in the drooping curves of her lips,
in the pathos of her wide gaze, which he did not understand. He tried to
speak lightly, in hopes of recalling her to the festive mood in which
they had all begun the day.

"You remind me of two friends of mine who are just home from Egypt. They
say that when they first saw the Sphinx they sat down and looked at it
for two hours without uttering a word."

"You would not have done that, Brooke," said Mrs. Hartley, a little
maliciously.

"But why not? I think it was the right spirit," said Lettice, and again
lapsed into silence.

"Look at the Duomo, how well it stands out in the evening light!"
exclaimed Edith. "Do you remember what Michael Angelo said when he
turned and looked at it before riding away to Rome to build St. Peter's?
'Come te non voglio: meglio di te non posso.'"

"I am always struck by his generosity of feeling towards other artists,"
remarked Mrs. Hartley. "Except towards Raffaelle, perhaps. But think of
what he said of Santa Maria Novella, that it was beautiful as a bride,
and that the Baptistery gates were worthy of Paradise. It is only the
great who can afford to praise so magnificently."

Again there was a silence. Then Mrs. Hartley and Edith professed to be
attracted by a group of peasant children who were offering flowers and
fruit for sale; and they strolled to some little distance, talking to
them and to a black-eyed _cantadina_, whose costume struck them as
unusually gay. They even walked a little in the shade of the cypresses,
with which the palazzo seemed to be guarded, as with black and ancient
sentinels; but all this was more for the sake of leaving Brooke alone
with Lettice than because they had any very great interest in the
Italian woman and her children, or the terraced gardens of the Villa
Mozzi. For the time of separation was at hand. The Daltons were
returning very shortly to England, and Brooke had not yet carried out
his intention of asking Lettice Campion to be his wife. He had asked
Mrs. Hartley that day to give him a chance, if possible, of half an
hour's conversation with Lettice alone; but their excursion had not
hitherto afforded him the coveted opportunity. Now, however, it had
come; but while Lettice sat looking towards the towers of Florence with
that pensive and abstracted air, Brooke Dalton shrank from breaking in
upon her reverie.

In truth, Lettice was in no talkative mood. She had been troubled in her
mind all day, and for some days previously, and it was easier for her to
keep silence than for any of the rest. If she had noticed the absence of
Mrs. Hartley and Edith, she would probably have risen from her seat and
insisted on joining them; but strong in the faith that they were but a
few steps away from her, she had thrown the reins of restraint upon the
necks of her wild horses of imagination, and had been borne away by them
to fields where Brooke's fancy was hardly likely to carry him--fields of
purely imaginative joy and ideal beauty, in which he had no mental
share. It was rest and refreshment to her to do this, after the growing
perplexity of the last few days. Absorbed in her enjoyment of the lucent
air, the golden and violet and emerald tints of the landscape; conscious
also of the passionate joy which often thrills the nerves of Italy's
lovers when they find them selves, after long years of waiting, upon
that classic ground, she had for the time put away the thoughts that
caused her perplexity, and abandoned herself to the sweet influences of
the time and place.

The Daltons had been in Italy since May, and she had seen a great deal
of Edith. Brooke Dalton had sometimes gone off on an expedition by
himself, but more frequently he danced attendance on the women; and
Lettice had found out that when he was absent she had a great deal more
of him than when he was present. So much had Edith and Mrs. Hartley to
say about him, so warmly did they praise his manners, his appearance,
his manly and domestic virtues, and his enviable position in the world,
that in course of time she knew all his good points by heart. She had
actually found herself the day before, more as a humorous exercise of
memory than for any other reason, jotting them down in her diary.

"B. D.--_testibus_ E. D. et M. H.

"He is handsome, has a manly figure, a noble head, blue eyes, chestnut
hair (it is turning grey--L. C.), a dignified presence, a look that
shows he respects others as much as himself.

"He is truthful, simple in tastes, easily contented, lavishly generous
(that I know--L. C.), knows his own mind (that I doubt--L. C.), is fond
of reading (?), a scholar (??), with a keen appreciation of literature
(???).

"He has one of the most delightful mansions in England (as I know--L.
C.), with gardens, conservatories, a park, eight thousand a year.

"He is altogether an enviable man, and the woman who marries him will be
an enviable woman (a matter of opinion--L. C.), and he is on the
look-out for a wife (how would he like to have that said of him?--L.
C.)."

Lettice had sportively written this in her diary, and had scribbled it
out again; but it represented fairly enough the kind of ideas which
Brooke Dalton's sister and cousin had busily instilled into her mind.
The natural consequence was that she had grown somewhat weary of
listening to the praises of their hero, and felt disposed to consider
him as either much too superior to be thoroughly nice, or much too nice
to be all that his womenfolk described him.

Of some of his estimable qualities, however, she had had personal
experience; and, notably of his lavish generosity. A few days ago he had
taken them all to the shop of a dealer of old-fashioned works of art and
rare curiosities, declaring that he had brought them there for the
express purpose of giving them a memento of Florence before they left
the city.

Then he bade them choose, and, leaving Edith and Mrs. Hartley to make
their own selection, which they did modestly enough, letting him off at
about a sovereign a-piece, he insisted on prompting and practically
dictating the choice of Lettice, who, by constraint and cajolery
together, was made to carry away a set of intaglios that must have cost
him fifty pounds at least.

She had no idea of their value, but she was uneasy at having taken the
gift. What would he conclude from her acceptance of such a valuable
present? It was true that she was covered to some extent by the fact
that Edith and Mrs. Hartley were with her at the time, but she could not
feel satisfied about the propriety of her conduct, and she had a subtle
argument with herself as to the necessity of returning the gems sooner
or later, unless she was prepared to be compromised in the opinion of
her three friends.

She had for the present, however, banished these unpleasant doubts from
her mind, and the guilty author of her previous discomfort stood idly by
her side, smoking his cigar, and watching the people as they passed
along the road. The other ladies were out of sight, and thus Brooke and
Lettice were left alone.

After a time she noticed the absence of her friends, and turned round
quickly to look for them. Brooke saw the action, and felt that if he did
not speak now he might never get such a good opportunity. So, with
nothing but instinct for his guide, he plunged into the business without
further hesitation.

"I hope you will allow, Miss Campion, that I know how to be silent when
the occasion requires it! I did not break in upon your reverie, and
should not have done so, however long it might have lasted."

"I am sorry you have had to stand sentinel," said Lettice; "but you told
me once that a woman never need pity a man for being kept waiting so
long as he had a cigar to smoke."

"That is quite true; and I have not been an object for pity at all.
Unless you will pity me for having to bring my holiday to an end. You
know that Edith and I are leaving Florence on Monday?"

"Yes, Edith told me; but she did not speak as though it would end your
holiday. She said that you might go on to Rome--that you had not made up
your mind what to do."

"That is so--it depends upon circumstances, and the decision does not
altogether rest with us. Indeed, Miss Campion, my future movements are
quite uncertain until I have obtained your answer to a question which I
want to put to you. May I put it now?"

"If there is anything I can tell you--" said Lettice, not without
difficulty. Her breath came quick, and her bosom heaved beneath her
light dress with nervous rapidity. What could he have to say to her? She
had refused all these weeks to face the idea which had been forcing
itself upon her; and he had been so quiet, so unemotional, that until
now she had never felt uneasy in his presence.

"You can tell me a great deal," said Brooke, looking down at her with
increased earnestness and tenderness in his eyes and voice. Her face was
half averted from him, but he perceived her emotion, and grew more
hopeful at the sign. "You can tell me all I want to know; but, unless
you have a good message for me, I shall wish I had not asked you my
question, and broken through the friendly terms of intercourse from
which I have derived so much pleasure, and which have lasted so long
between us."

Why did he pause? What could she say that he would care to hear?

"Listen to me!" he said, sinking down on the seat beside her, and
pleading in a low tone. "I am not a very young man. I am ten or twelve
years older than yourself. But if I spoke with twice as much passion in
my voice, and if I had paid you ten times as much attention and court as
I have done, it would not prove me more sincere in my love, or more
eager to call you my wife. You cannot think how I have been looking
forward to this moment--hoping and fearing from day to day, afraid to
put my fate to the test, and yet impatient to know if I had any chance
of happiness. I loved you in London--I believe I loved you as soon as I
knew you; and it was simply and solely in order to try and win your love
that I followed you to Italy. Is there no hope for me?"

She did not answer. She could not speak a word, for a storm of
conflicting feelings was raging in her breast. Feelings only--she had
not begun to think.

"If you will try to love me," he went on, "it will be as much as I have
dared to hope. If you will only begin by liking me, I think I can
succeed in gaining what will perfectly satisfy me. All my life shall be
devoted to giving you the happiness which you deserve. Lettice, have you
not a word to say to me?"

"I cannot--" she whispered at length, so faintly that he could scarcely
hear.

"Cannot even like me!"

"Oh, do not ask me that! I cannot answer you. If liking were all--but
you would not be content with that."

"Say that you like me. Lettice, have a little pity on the heart that
loves you!"

"What answer can I give? An hour ago I liked you. Do you not see that
what you have said makes the old liking impossible?"

"Yes--I know it. And I have thrown away all because I wanted more! I
spoke too suddenly. But do not, at any rate, forbid me still to nurse my
hope. I will try and be patient. I will come to you again for my
answer--when? In a month--in six months? Tell me only one thing--there
is no one who has forestalled me? You are not pledged to another?"

Lettice stood up--the effort was necessary in order to control her
beating heart and trembling nerves. She did not reply. She only looked
out to the sunlit landscape with wide, unseeing eyes, in which lurked a
secret, unspoken dread.

"Tell me before we part," he said, in a voice which was hoarse with
suppressed passion. "Say there is no one to whom you have given your
love!"

"There is no one!"--But the answer ended in a gasp that was almost a
sob.

"Thank God!" said Brooke Dalton, as a look of infinite relief came into
his face. "Then a month to-day I will return to you, wherever you may
be, and ask for my answer again."

Mrs. Hartley and Edith came back from the garden terraces. With kindly
mischief in their hearts, they had left these two together, watching
them with half an eye, until they saw that the matter had come to a
climax. When Lettice stood up, they divined that the moment had come for
their reappearance.

Lettice advanced to meet them, and when they were near enough Edith
passed her hand through her friend's still trembling arm.

"Those dear little Italian children!" said Mrs. Hartley. "They are so
beautiful--so full of life and spirits, I could have looked at them for
another hour. Now, good people, what is going to be done? We must be
getting home. Brooke, can you see the carriage? You might find it, and
tell the driver to come back for us."

Brooke started off with alacrity, and the women were left alone. Then
Edith began to chatter about nothing, in the most resolute fashion, in
order that Lettice might have time to pull herself together.

She was glad of their consideration, for indeed she needed all her
fortitude. What meant this suffocation of the heart, which almost
prevented her from breathing? It ached in her bosom as though someone
had grasped it with a hand of ice; she shuddered as though a ghost had
been sitting by her and pleading with her, instead of a lover. Her own
name echoed in her ears, and she remembered that Brooke Dalton had
called her "Lettice." But it was not his voice which was calling to her
now.

Dalton presently reappeared with the news that the carriage was waiting
for them in the road below.

So in an hour from that time they were at home again, and Lettice was
able to get to her own room, and to think of what had happened.

If amongst those who read the story of her life Lettice Campion has made
for herself a few discriminating friends, they will not need to be
reminded that she was not by any means a perfect character. She was, in
her way, quite as ambitious as her brother Sydney, although not quite so
eager in pursuit of her own ends, her own pleasure and satisfaction. She
was also more scrupulous than Sydney to the means which she would adopt
for the attainment of her objects, and she desired that others should
share with her the good things which fell to her lot; but she had never
been taught, or had never adopted the rule, that mere self-denial, for
self-denial's sake, was the soundest basis of morality and conduct. She
was thoroughly and keenly human, and she did but follow her natural
bent, without distortion and without selfishness, in seeking to give
happiness to herself as well as to others.

Brooke Dalton's offer of marriage placed a great temptation before her.
All the happiness that money, and position, and affection, and a
luxurious home could afford was hers if she would have it; and these
were things which she valued very highly. Edith Dalton had done her best
to make her friend realize what it would mean to be the mistress of
Brooke's house; and poor Lettice, with all her magnanimity, was dazzled
in spite of herself, and did not quite see why she should say No, when
Brooke made her his offer. And yet her heart cried out against accepting
it.

She had needed time to think, and now the process was already beginning.
He had given her a month to decide whether she could love him--or even
like him well enough to become his wife. Nothing could be more generous,
and indeed she knew that he was the soul of generosity and
consideration. A month to make up her mind whether she would accept from
him all that makes life pleasant, and joyful, and easy, and comfortable;
or whether she would turn her back upon the temptation, and shun
delights, and live laborious days.

Could she hesitate? What woman with nothing to depend upon except her
own exertions, and urged to assent (as she would be) by her only
intimate friends, would have hesitated in her place? Yet she did
hesitate, and it was necessary to weigh the reasons against accepting,
as she had dwelt upon the reasons in favor of it.

If it was easy to imagine that life at Angleford Manor might be very
peaceful and luxurious, there could be no doubt that she would have to
purchase her pleasure at the cost of a great deal of her independence.
She might be able to write, in casual and ornamental fashion; but she
felt that there would be little real sympathy with her literary
occupations, and the zest of effort and ambition which she now felt
would be gone. Moreover, independence of action counted for very little
in comparison with independence of thought--and how could she nurse her
somewhat heretical ideas in the drawing-room of a Tory High Church
squire, a member of the Oligarchy, whose friends would nearly all be
like-minded with himself? She had no right to introduce so great a
discord into his life. If she married him, she would at any rate try
(consciously, or unconsciously) to adopt his views, as the proper basis
of the partnership; and therefore to marry him unquestionably meant the
sacrifice of her independent judgment.

So much for the intellectual and material sides of the question. But,
Lettice asked herself, was that all?

No, there was something else. She had been steadily and obstinately, yet
almost unconsciously, trying to push it away from her all the time--ever
since Brooke Dalton began to betray his affection, and even before that
when Mrs. Hartley, unknown to her, kept her in ignorance of things which
she ought to have known. She had refused to face it, pressed it out of
her heart, made believe to herself that the chapter of her life which
had been written in London was closed and forgotten--and how nearly she
had succeeded! But she had not quite succeeded. It was there still--the
memory, the hope, the pity, the sacrifice.

She must not cheat herself any longer, if she would be an honest and
honorable woman. She would face the truth and not palter with it, now
that the crisis had really come. What was Alan Walcott to her? Could she
forget him, and dismiss him from her thoughts, and go to the altar with
another man? She went over the scenes which they had enacted together,
she recalled his words and his letters, she thought of his sorrows and
trials, and remembered how he had appealed to her for sympathy. There
was good reason, she thought, why he had not written to her, for he was
barred by something more than worldly conventionality. When she,
strong-minded as she thought herself, had shrunk from the display of his
love because he still had duties to his lawful wife, she had imposed
upon him her demand for conventional and punctilious respect, and had
rather despised herself, she now remembered, for doing it. He had obeyed
her, he had observed her slightest wishes--it was for her, not for him,
to break through the silence. How had she been able to remain so long in
ignorance of his condition, to live contentedly so many miles away from
him?

As she thought of all these things in the light of her new experience,
her heart was touched again by the old sympathy, and throbbed once more
with the music which it had not known since her illness began. It was a
harp which had been laid aside and forgotten, till the owner, coming by
chance into the disused room, strung it anew, and bade it discourse the
symphonies of the olden time.

Not until Lettice had reached this point in her retrospect did she
perceive how near she had gone to the dividing line which separates
honor from faithlessness and truth from falsehood. She had said, "There
is no one to whom my love is pledged." Was that true? Which is stronger
or more sacred--the pledge of words or the pledge of feeling? She had
tried to drown the feeling, but it would not die. It was there, it had
never been absent; and she had profaned it by listening to the
temptations of Brooke Dalton, and by telling him that her heart was
free.

"It was a lie!"

She sank on the sofa as she made the confession to herself. Alan's
letters were in her hand; she clasped them to her breast, and murmured,

"It was a lie--for I love you!"

If the poor wretch in his prison cell, who, worn out at last by daily
self-consuming doubts, lay tossing with fever on a restless bed, could
have heard her words and seen her action, he might have been called back
to life from the borderland of the grave.




CHAPTER XXX.

AWAKENED.


"What is it, darling?" Mrs. Hartley said to her friend when they met the
next morning at the late breakfast which, out of deference to foreign
customs, they had adopted. She looked observantly at the restless
movements of the girl, and the changing color in her cheeks. "You have
not eaten anything, and you do nothing but shiver and sigh."

Mrs. Hartley was quite convinced in her own mind that Lettice had
received an offer of marriage from her cousin Brooke Dalton. Possibly
she had already accepted it. She should hear all about it that morning.
The symptoms overnight had not been too favorable but she put down the
disturbance which Lettice had shown to an excess of nervous excitement.
Women do not all receive a sentence of happiness for life in precisely
the same manner, she reflected: some cry and some laugh, some dance and
sing, others collapse and are miserable. Lettice was one of the latter
kind, and it was for Mrs. Hartley to give her a mother's sympathy and
comfort. So she awaited the word which should enable her to cut the
dykes of her affection.

Lettice turned white and cold, and her grey eyes were fixed with a stony
look on the basket of flowers which decorated the breakfast table.

"I am not well," she said, "but it is worse with the mind than the body.
I have done a wicked thing, and to atone for it I am going to do a cruel
thing; so how could you expect me to have an appetite?"

"My dear pet!" said Mrs. Hartley, putting out her hand to touch the
fingers of her friend, which she found as cold as ice, "you need not
tell me that you have done anything wicked, for I don't believe it. And
I am sure you would not do anything cruel, knowing beforehand that it
was cruel."

"Is it not wicked to tell a lie?--for I have done that."

"No, no!"

"And will it not be cruel to you and to Edith that I should cause pain
to your cousin, and make him think me insincere and mercenary?"

"He could not possibly think so," said Mrs. Hartley with decision.

"He must."

"What are you going to do, Lettice?"

"I am going to tell him that I was not honest when I allowed him to say
that he would come for my answer in a month, and to think it possible
that the answer might be favorable--when God knows that it cannot."

"Brooke has asked you to be his wife?"

"Yes."

"And you told him to come for his answer in a month?"

"I agreed to it."

"Well, darling, I think that was very natural--if you could not say
'yes' at once to my cousin."

There was a touch of resentment in the words "my cousin," which Lettice
felt. Mrs. Hartley could not understand that Brooke Dalton should have
to offer himself twice over--even to her Lettice.

"Wait this month," she went on, "and we shall see what you think at the
end of it. You are evidently upset now--taken by surprise, little
innocent as you are. The fact is, you have never really recovered from
your illness, and I believe you set to work again too soon. A
hard-working life would not have suited you; but, thank Heaven, there is
an end of that. You will never have to make yourself a slave again!"

"Dear, you do not understand. I did a wicked thing yesterday, and now I
must tell Mr. Dalton, and ask him to forgive me."

"Nonsense, child!"

"Ah!" said Lettice, sadly, "it is the first time you have ever spoken
sharply to me, and that is part of my punishment!"

Mrs. Hartley sank back in her chair, and looked as though she was about
to take refuge in a quiet fit of weeping.

"I can't comprehend it," she said; "I thought we were going to be so
happy; and I am sure you and Brooke would suit each other exactly."

"Oh no, indeed; there are thousands of women who will make him a better
wife than I could ever have done."

"Now, do listen to me, and give yourself at least a week to think it
over, before you say all this to Brooke! That cannot make things worse,
either for him or for yourself. Why should you be so rash about it?"

"I wish I could see any other way out of it--but I cannot; and I have
been thinking and thinking all the night long. It is a case of
conscience with me now."

"You cannot expect me to see it, dear," said Mrs. Hartley, rising from
her chair. "It is simply incomprehensible, that you should first agree
to wait a month, and then, after a few hours, insist on giving such a
pointed refusal. Think, think, my darling!" she went on, laying a
caressing hand on Lettice's shoulder. "Suppose that Brooke should feel
himself insulted by such treatment. Could you be surprised if he did?"

Lettice buried her face in her hands, mutely despairing. Her punishment
was very hard to bear, and the tears which trickled through her fingers
showed how much she felt it. With an effort she controlled herself, and
looked up again.

"I will tell him all," she said. "He shall be the judge. If he still
wishes to renew his question in a month, I will hold myself to that
arrangement. I shall claim nothing and refuse nothing; but if he
voluntarily withdraws his offer, then, dear, you will see that there
could be no alternative."

Mrs. Hartley bent to kiss her.

"I suppose that is all that can be done, Lettice. I am very sorry that
my darling is in trouble; but if I could help you, you would tell me
more."

Then she left the room, and Lettice went to her desk and wrote her
letter.

     "DEAR MR. DALTON,--When you asked me yesterday if there was any one
     to whom I had given my love, I said there was no one. I ought to
     have thought at the time that this was a question which I could not
     fairly answer. I am obliged now to confess that my answer was not
     sincere. You cannot think worse of me than I think of myself; but I
     should be still more to blame if I allowed the mistake to continue
     after I have realized how impossible it is for me to give you the
     answer that you desire. I can only hope that you will forgive me
     for apparently deceiving you, and believe that I could not have
     done it if I had not deceived myself. Sincerely yours,

     "LETTICE CAMPION."

It was written; and without waiting to criticize her own phrases, she
sent it to the Palazzo Serafini by a special messenger.

Brooke Dalton knew that he did not excel in letter writing. He could
indite a good, clear, sensible business epistle easily enough; but to
express love or sorrow or any of the more subtle emotions on paper would
have been impossible to him. Therefore he did not attempt the task. He
at once walked over to Mrs. Hartley's villa and asked to see Miss
Campion.

He was almost sorry that he had done so when Lettice came down to him in
the little shaded _salon_ where Mrs. Hartley generally received
visitors, and he saw her face. It was white, and her eyes were red with
weeping. Evidently that letter had cost her dear, and Brooke Dalton
gathered a little courage from the sight.

She came up to him and tried to speak, but the words would not come.
Brooke was not a man of very quick intuitions, as a rule; but in this
case love gave him sharpness of sight. He took her hand in both his own
and held it tenderly while he spoke.

"There is no need for you to say anything," he said; "no need for you to
distress yourself in this way. I have only come to say one thing to you,
because I felt that I could say it better than I could write it. Of
course, I was grieved by your note this morning--terribly grieved
and--and--disappointed; but I don't think that it leaves me quite
without hope, after all."

"Oh," Lettice was beginning in protest; but he hushed her with a
pressure of his hand.

"Listen to me one moment. My last question yesterday was unwarrantable.
I never ought to have asked it; and I beg you to consider it and your
answer unspoken. Of course, I should be filled with despair if I
believed--but I don't believe--I don't conclude anything from the little
you have said. I shall still come to you at the end of the month and ask
for my answer then."

"It will be of no use," she said, sadly, with averted face and downcast
eyes.

"Don't say so. Don't deprive me of every hope. Let me beg of you to say
nothing more just now. In a month's time I will come to you, wherever
you are, and ask for your _final_ decision."

He saw that Lettice was about to speak, and so he went on hastily, "I
don't know if I am doing right, or wrong in handing you this letter from
your brother. He gave it me before I left England, and bade me deliver
it or hold it back as I saw fit."

"He knew?" said Lettice, trembling a little as the thought of her
brother's general attitude towards her wishes for independence and her
friendship for Alan Walcott. "You had told him?"

"Yes, he knew when he wrote it that I meant to ask you to be my wife. I
do not know what is in it; but I should imagine from the circumstances
that it might convey his good wishes for our joint happiness, if such a
thing could ever be! I did not make up my mind to give it to you until I
had spoken for myself."

Lettice took the letter and looked at it helplessly, the color flushing
high in her cheeks. Dalton saw her embarrassment, and divined that she
would not like to open the letter when he was there.

"I am going now," he said. "Edith and I leave Florence this afternoon.
We are going to Rome--I shall not go back to England until I have your
answer. For the present, good-bye."

Lettice gave him her hand again. He pressed it warmly, and left her
without another word. She was fain to acknowledge that he could not have
behaved with more delicacy or more generosity. But what should she say
to him when the month was at an end?

She sat for some time with Sydney's letter in her lap, wishing it were
possible for her to give Brooke Dalton the answer that he desired. But
she knew that she could not do it. It was reserved for some other woman
to make Brooke Dalton happy. She, probably, could not have done it if
she had tried; and she consoled herself by thinking that he would live
to see this himself.

Sydney's handwriting on the sealed envelope (she noticed that it was
Dalton's seal) caught her eye. What could he have to say to her in his
friend's behalf? What was there that might be said or left unsaid at Mr.
Dalton's pleasure? She had not much in common with Sydney now-a-days;
but she knew that he was just married, and that he loved his wife, and
she thought that he might perhaps have only kindly words in store for
her--words written perhaps when his heart was soft with a new sort of
tenderness. Lettice was hungering for a word of love and sympathy. She
opened, the letter and read:

     "ANGLEFORD, Easter Tuesday.

     "MY DEAR LETTICE,

     "I am writing this at the close of a short country holiday at
     Brooke Dalton's place. You know that Brooke has always been a good
     friend to me, and I owe him a debt of gratitude which I cannot
     easily repay.

     "It would be impossible to express the pleasure with which I heard
     from him that he had become attached to my only sister, and that he
     was about to make her an offer of marriage. You would properly
     resent anything I might say to you in the way of recommendation
     (and I am sure that he would resent it also), on the ground of his
     wealth, his excellent worldly position, and his ability to surround
     his wife with all the luxuries which a woman can desire. I will not
     suggest any considerations of that kind, but it is only right that
     I should speak of my friend as I know him. The woman who secures
     Brooke Dalton for a husband will have the love and care of one of
     the best men in the world, as well as the consideration of society.

     "I look forward, therefore, to a very happy time when you will be
     settled down in a home of your own, where I can visit you from time
     to time, and where you will be free from the harass and anxieties
     of your present existence. My own anxieties of late have been heavy
     enough, for the wear and tear of Parliamentary life, in addition to
     the ordinary labors of my profession, are by no means
     inconsiderable. And I have recently had some worrying cases. In one
     of these I was called upon to prosecute a man with whom you were at
     one time unfortunately brought into contact--Walcott by name. He
     was accused of wounding his wife with intent to do her grievous
     bodily harm, and it was proved that he almost murdered her by a
     savage blow with a dagger. There could not be a doubt of his guilt,
     and he was sentenced (very mercifully) to six months' hard labor.
     That illustrates the strange vicissitudes of life, for, of course,
     he is absolutely ruined in the eyes of all right-minded persons.

     "Brooke Dalton will probably give you this when you meet, and I
     shall no doubt hear from you before long. Meanwhile I need not do
     any more than wish you every possible happiness.

     "Believe me, your affectionate brother,

     "SYDNEY."

Mrs. Hartley was busy in the next room, arranging and numbering a large
collection of pictures which she had bought since she came to Florence,
and thinking how very useful they would be at her Sunday afternoon and
evening receptions, when she went back to London in October. That was
the uppermost thought in her mind when she began her work, but Brooke's
visit had excited her curiosity, and she was longing to know whether it
would succeed in removing her friend's incomprehensible scruples.

Suddenly she was startled by a cry from the other room. It was like a
cry of pain, sharp at the beginning, but stifled immediately. Mrs.
Hartley ran to the door and looked in. Lettice, with an open letter in
her hand, was lying back in her chair, half unconscious, and as white in
the face as the letter itself. A glance showed Mrs. Hartley that this
letter was not from Brooke; but her only concern at the moment was for
her friend.

Poor Lettice had been stunned by Sydney's blundering missive; and yet it
was not altogether Sydney's fault that the statement of facts came upon
her with crushing force. It was Mrs. Hartley herself who was mainly
responsible for the concealment of what had happened to Alan; and she no
doubt, had done her part with the best intentions. But the result was
disastrous so far as her intrigue and wishes were concerned.

With a little care and soothing, Lettice presently recovered from the
shock, at any rate sufficiently to stand up and speak.

"Read this," she said faintly to Mrs. Hartley, steadying herself against
the table. "Is it true? Is Alan Walcott in prison? Did you know it?"

"Yes, my darling, I knew it!"

"And never told me? When was it?"

Lettice looked at her friend reproachfully, yet without a trace of
anger.

"My dearest Lettice, would it have been wise for me to tell you at the
time--the trial was in April--when you were still dangerously weak and
excitable? It was not as if I had known that it would be--what shall I
say?--a matter of such great concern to you. Remember that we had never
mentioned his name since we left England, and I could not assume that
the old friendly interest in him survived."

"I do not blame you, dear," said Lettice faintly. "I do not blame
Sydney--unless it is for prosecuting him. I cannot think or reason about
it--I can only feel; and I suppose that what I feel amounts to my own
condemnation."

"Don't talk of condemnation! Your kind heart makes you loyal to everyone
whom you have called a friend--and what can be more natural? I was
terribly grieved for the unfortunate man when I heard of the trouble he
had brought on himself. But we cannot bear each other's sorrows in this
world. Each one must reap as he has sown."

"And do you think that Alan has sown what he is reaping? Do you believe
that he stabbed his wife?"

"My dear, I must believe it. Everyone believes it."

"Alan!" said Lettice, half raising her hand, and gazing out through the
open window, over the banks of the yellow-flowing Arno, with a look of
ineffable trust and tenderness in her face, "Alan, did you try to kill
the woman who has cursed and degraded you? Did you strike her once in
return for her thousand malicious blows? Did you so much as wish her ill
to gratify your anger and revenge? No!--there is one, at least, who does
not believe you guilty of this crime!"

"Lettice, darling!"

"I hear no voice but that of Alan, calling to me from his prison cell."
She sprang to her feet and stood as if listening to a far-off call.

"Lettice, for Heaven's sake, do not give way to delusions. Think of
those who love you best, who will be in despair if ill should befall
you."

"Yes, I will think of those who love me best! I must go to him. Dear
Mrs. Hartley, I am not losing my senses, but the feeling is so strong
upon me that I have no power to resist it. I must go to Alan."

"My child, consider! You cannot go to him. He is in prison."

"I will go and live at the gates until he comes out."

"You must not talk like this. I cannot let you go--you, a woman! What
would the world think of you?"

"What does the world think of him? It says he is guilty--when I know
that he is not!"

"You cannot know, Lettice. All that was proved against him is that in
some way or other, goaded by her reproaches, he stabbed her with his
dagger. But that was proved, and you cannot get over it. I can quite
believe that he is more unfortunate than maliciously guilty; yet,
surely, you must admit that he is ruined."

"Never!" said Lettice, passionately. She could almost have stamped her
foot with rage to hear another say what was already in her own mind. But
old habits of self-restraint came to her aid. She raised her head
proudly as she replied: "A man is never ruined. Alan Walcott has a
future."

"He may have a future, dear, but it is one in which we cannot be
concerned. Listen to me, Lettice--I do so strongly feel that this is the
crisis and turning point of your life! There are lines beyond which no
woman who respects herself, or who would be respected by the world, can
go. If you do not act with prudence and common sense to-day, you may
have to repent it all the rest of your life. You are strong--use your
strength to good purpose, and think, for Heaven's sake think, of the
courage and self-sacrifice which are expected from women of your
breeding and position." She ended with tears in her eyes, for although
she spoke conventionally, and as conventional women speak, her heart was
full of the truest anxiety and tenderness for her friend.

Lettice was looking out of the window again, as though for inspiration
in her difficulty. When she answered, it was with inexpressible sadness
and regret.

"You have been so good and kind to me that it cuts my heart to disagree
with you in any way. Have I reached such a turning point as you say?
Perhaps it is so--but I have been brought to it; I have not wilfully
walked up to it. You said that Alan's future was one in which we could
not be concerned. What I feel at this moment, more vividly than I ever
felt anything in my life, is that I am concerned and involved in his
future. I have fought against this, and put it aside, as you, my dear
friend, must know. I have tried to forget him--and my shame of the past
few weeks has been that I tried to care for some one else. Well, I
failed; and see how the very trying has brought me to this clear and
irresistible knowledge of my own heart! If I were superstitious, I
should say that it was my fate. I don't know what it is--I don't
know if my view or your view of my duty is right--but I am quite
sure of this, that I shall have to act on my own view. Courage and
self-sacrifice--yes! They are primary virtues in a woman; but courage
for what? Self-sacrifice for whom?"

"For society! For the world in general!"

"But the world in general has the world to help it. If one man needs a
woman's sacrifice, he has only one woman to look to. I am very, very
sorry that I cannot go my own way without giving you pain, and if only I
could think that by any act which it is in my power to do----"

"I don't know what you mean by going your own way, child; but I hope you
will come to a better mind before you take a decided step." Mrs. Hartley
was growing thoroughly alarmed.

"Indeed, I have come to the best, the only possible resolution; and the
question is, how soon I can be in London. We have been in Italy a long
time, have we not?"

"Eleven months."

"Do you wish to stay much longer?"

"I see very plainly, Lettice, that, if I did want to stay, it would end
in my being here alone. But I shall not let you travel by yourself. If
your interest in Italy has gone, so has mine. We will start on
Saturday."

Mrs. Hartley was sorely disappointed, and even angry with Lettice; but
she thought that at any rate she ought not to talk with her until they
were back again in London. And there was at least a hope that she would
be more prudent a week hence than she was to-day.

As for Lettice, she found it very hard to wait. If she had been alone
she would have left Florence within an hour of reading Sydney's letter,
for her heart was on fire with impatience.

She did not speak to Brooke Dalton again, except in the presence of her
friends; but after he and Edith had gone she wrote him another letter to
the address which he had given them. In this letter she begged him, as
kindly as she could, to consider her last answer as final. "Sydney's
note," she said, "has only strengthened my decision. Indeed, it has made
me ten times more decided. My heart is not mine to give. You will not
expect that I should say more than this. The best thing I can hope from
you is that you will judge me charitably, and that if others reproach me
you will not join in the chorus."

Poor Brooke Dalton kissed the letter quietly, and said nothing about it;
nor did he openly give utterance to the words which entered his mind in
reference to Sydney's intervention. Mrs. Hartley silently resolved to
see Sydney Campion as soon as she got back to London, and beg him to
reason with Lettice, and, if possible, bring her to a better mind. But
she was disappointed to find that Sydney was not in town. His marriage
had taken place in September and he had gone to Scotland with his wife.
She knew that he was on fairly good terms with Lettice, and had pressed
her to be present at the wedding, also that Miss Pynsent had sent a very
charming and affectionate letter to her future sister-in-law. But
whether Lettice had written to him and told him of her intentions and
opinions, Mrs. Hartley did not know.




CHAPTER XXXI.

AMBITION AT THE HELM.


Sydney Campion and Anna Pynsent were married early in September, while
Lettice was still in Italy. There had been a death in the Pynsent family
since the death of Sydney's mother, and Nan was not sorry to make this a
pretext for arranging every thing in the simplest possible manner. She
had no bridesmaids, and did without a wedding-feast; and, strange to
say, Sydney was perfectly well content.

For it might have been expected that Sydney--with whom the roots of
worldliness and selfishness had struck very deep--would desire a wedding
that would make a noise in the world, and would not be satisfied with a
bride in a severely simple white dress and a complete absence of all
display. But it seemed as if all that was good in his character had been
brought to the surface by a marriage which his club-friends chuckled
over as so absolutely unexceptionable from a worldly point of view. For
almost the first time in his life he was a little ashamed of his
worldliness. His marriage with Nan Pynsent was making--or so he
thought--everything easy for him! His selfishness was pampered by the
girl's adoring love, by her generosity, even by her beauty and her
wealth; and it recoiled upon itself in an utterly unexpected way.
Finding life no longer a battle, Sydney became suddenly ashamed of some
of his past methods of warfare; and, looking at his betrothed, could
only breathe a silent and fervent aspiration that she might never know
the story of certain portions of his life.

He was thoroughly in love with his wife; and--what was more important in
a man of his temperament--he admired as well as loved her. Her personal
charm was delightful to him, and the high-bred quietness of her manner,
the refinement of her accent, the aroma of dignity and respect which
surrounded the Pynsent household in general, were elements of his
feeling for her as strong as his sense of her grace and beauty. With his
high respect for position and good birth, it would have been almost
impossible for him to yield his heart for long to a woman in a lower
grade of society than his own; even a woman who might be considered his
equal was not often attractive to him; he preferred one--other
considerations apart--who was socially a little his superior, and could
make a link for him with the great families of England. Had Nan been the
pretty governess whom he thought her at first, not all her charm, her
talent and her originality of character, would have prevailed to make
him marry her.

But in spite of these defects, when once his judgment had assented, he
gave free rein to his heart. Nan satisfied his taste and his intellect,
to begin with; his senses were equally well content with her beauty; and
then--then--another kind of emotion came into play. He was a little
vexed and impatient with himself at first, to find the difference that
she made in his life. She interested him profoundly, and he had never
been profoundly interested in any woman before. Her earnestness charmed
while it half-repelled him. And her refinement, her delicacy of feeling,
her high standard of morality, perpetually astonished him. He remembered
that he had heard his sister Lettice talk as Nan sometimes talked. With
Lettice he had pooh-poohed her exalted ideas and thought them womanish;
in Nan, he was inclined to call them beautiful. Of course, he said to
himself, her ideas did not affect him; men could not guide their lives
by a woman's standard; nevertheless, her notions were pretty, although
puritanical; and he had no desire to see them changed. He would not have
Nan less conscientious for the world.

An appeal to Sydney's self-love had always been a direct appeal to his
heart. It was sometimes said of him that he cared for others chiefly in
proportion as they conferred benefits and advantages upon himself; but
he was certainly capable of warm affection when it had been called into
existence. He began to display a very real and strong affection for Nan.
She had found the way to his heart--though she little suspected
it--through his very weaknesses: she had conquered the man she loved by
means of his selfishness. The worldly advantages she conferred took his
nature by storm. It was not a high-minded way of contracting an
engagement for life; but, as a fragrant flower may easily grow upon a
very unpleasant dunghill, so the sweet flower of a true, pure love began
to flourish on the heap of refuse with which the good in Sydney's nature
had been overlaid.

Sydney was treated with considerable generosity by Nan's guardian and
trustees. Her fortune was of course to remain largely at her own
disposal; but an ambitious man like Sydney Campion was certain to profit
by it in some degree. Sir John Pynsent had always known that he was not
likely to possess the management of it for long, and the next best thing
was that it should be utilized for a member of the Conservative party,
one of his own special connection, whose future career he should be able
to watch over and promote. Campion must clearly understand that he owed
his position and prospects to the Pynsents. He was apt to be somewhat
off-hand and independent, but he would improve with a little judicious
coaching. A man cannot be independent who owes his seat to the
Oligarchy, his introduction in Parliament to individual favor, and his
private fortune to the daughter of a house which had always been devoted
to the interests of a particular party. This was Campion's position, and
Sir John felt that his brother-in-law would soon fall into line.

Sydney was made the proprietor of the London house in which they were to
live--the house at Vanebury was let for the present; but the whole of
the domestic charges were to be borne by his wife. His professional
income would be at his own disposal; and by special arrangement the sum
of twenty thousand pounds was set apart as a fund to be drawn upon from
time to time, by their joint consent, for the advancement of his purely
political interests, in such a manner as might be deemed most expedient.

This was a better arrangement than Sydney had allowed himself to
anticipate, and he was naturally elated by his success. He was so
grateful to Nan for the good things she had brought him that he studied
her tastes and consulted her inclinations in a way quite new to him. No
doubt there was selfishness even in the repression of self which this
compliance with her habits imposed upon him; but the daily repression
was a gain to him.

And Nan recompensed his considerate behavior by giving him that incense
of love and esteem and intellectual deference which is desired by every
man; and by convincing him that his ambitions--as she knew them--had in
her the most complete sympathy, and the most valuable aid. This she did
for him, and satisfied all the wishes of his heart.

They had a delightful honeymoon in the Tyrol, and returned to town late
in October. The house in Thurloe Square, where they were to reside, had
been newly decorated and furnished for them, and was pronounced by
critics to be a marvel of luxury and beauty. Sydney, though he did not
pretend to be well acquainted with aesthetic fashions, recognized that
the rooms had an attractive appearance, and set off Nan's beauty to the
best advantage. He fell easily and naturally into the position which his
good fortune had marked out for him, and thought, in spite of certain
bitter drops, in spite of a touch of gall in the honey, and a suspected
thorn on the rose, in spite of a cloud no bigger than a man's hand in an
otherwise clear sky, that Fate had on the whole been very kind to him.

Nan's first appearance as a bride was at her brother's house. Lady
Pynsent's whole soul was wrapped up in the art and mystery of
entertaining, and she hailed this opportunity of welcoming the Campions
into her "set" with unfeigned joy. Her gifts as a hostess had been her
chief recommendation in Sir John's eyes when he married her; he would
never have ventured to espouse a woman who could not play her part in
the drawing-room as well as he could play his part in the club.

A few days after the Campions' arrival in town, therefore, the Pynsents
gave a dinner at their own house, to which Lady Pynsent had invited a
number of men, Sydney Campion amongst the number, whom Sir John desired
to assemble together. The Benedicts came with their wives, and Nan made
her first entry into the charmed circle of matrons, where Sydney hoped
that she would one day lead and rule.

Sir John had an object in gathering these half-dozen congenial spirits
round his table. He always had, or invented, an object for his acts,
whatever they might be; a dinner party at home would have bored him
grievously if he could not have invested it with a distinct political
purpose. And, indeed, it was this power of throwing fine dust in his own
eyes which first made his party regard him as an important social
factor, worthy of being taken seriously at his own valuation. The spirit
of the age was just as strong in him, though in a somewhat different
sense, as it was in Lord Montagu Plumley, one of his guests on the
present occasion, who had shot up like a meteor from the comparative
obscurity of cadetship in a ducal family to the front rank of the Tory
pretenders, mainly by ticketing his own valuation on his breast, and
keeping himself perpetually front foremost to the world. The fault was
not so much Lord Montagu's as that of the age in which he lived. He had
merit, and he felt his strength, precisely as Sir John felt his strength
as a social pioneer, but in a generation of talented mediocrities he had
no chance of making his merit known by simply doing his duty. At any
rate, he had given up the attempt in despair, and on a memorable
evening, of which the history shall one day be written full and fair, he
had expounded to a select group of his intimate friends his great theory
on the saving of the Commonwealth, and his method of obtaining the
sceptre of authority, which implied the dispensation of honors to all
who believed in him.

A very good fellow in his way was Montagu Plumley, and Sir John was
anxious that Sydney Campion, now a connection as well as a friend,
should be brought within the influence of one whom the baronet had
always regarded as the Young Man of the future. Sydney had been wont to
sneer a little, after his fashion, at the individuals who interpreted
the new ideas, though he accepted the ideas themselves as irrefragable.
The nation must be saved by its young men--yes, certainly. As a young
man he saw that plainly enough, but it was not going to be saved by any
young man who could be named in his presence. He had said something like
this to Sir John Pynsent, not many days before his marriage, and Sir
John, who had taken Sydney's measure to a nicety, had resolved that his
promising brother-in-law should be converted at the earliest possible
opportunity into a faithful follower and henchman of Lord Montagu
Plumley.

Another old friend of the reader was amongst the guests who sat over
their wine round Sir John's hospitable board. This was the Honorable Tom
Willoughby, whom his host had initiated at the Oligarchy into the art of
fishing for men in the troubled waters of Liberalism. Tom Willoughby
was, and always would be, a light weight in the political arena, but he
was very useful when put to work that he could do. He was the spoiled
child of Sir John Pynsent, and was fast earning a character as the
chartered libertine of the House of Commons, where his unfailing good
humor made him friends on both sides. Sir John told him one day that he
was cut out to be an envoy extraordinary from the Conservative to the
Liberal ranks, whereupon the Honorable Tom had answered that he did not
mind discharging the function for his party to-day if he could see his
way to doing the same thing for his country hereafter. Whereat Sir John
laughed, and told him that if he wanted a mission of that kind he must
bow down to the rising sun; and it was then that he asked his friend to
come and dine with Lord Montagu.

Gradually, after the ladies had gone, the conversation shifted round to
politics, and Sir John began to draw his guests out. People had been
talking a good deal during the last few days about the resignation of
Mr. Bright, which, coming in the same session with that of Mr. Forster,
had made something of a sensation.

"How long will you give them now, Lord Montagu?" said the baronet. "Two
of their strongest men are gone--one over Ireland and the other over
Egypt. If the country could vote at this moment, I verily believe that
we should get a majority. It almost makes one wish for annual
Parliaments."

"I have more than once thought, Sir John, that the Tories would have had
a much longer aggregate of power in the past fifty years if there had
been a general election every year. When we come into office we make
things perfectly pleasant all round for the first twelve month. When
they come in, it rarely takes them a year to set their friends at
loggerheads. As it is, they will stick in to the last moment--certainly
until they have passed a Franchise Act."

"I suppose so. We must not go to the country on the Franchise."

"Rather not."

"And it will be too late to rely on Egypt."

"Heaven only knows what they are yet capable of in Egypt. But we shall
have something stronger than that to go upon--as you know very well."

"Ireland," said Campion.

"Not exactly Ireland, though the seed may spring up on Irish soil. The
main thing to do, the thing that every patriotic man ought to work for,
is to break down the present One Old Man system of government in this
country. The bane of Great Britain is that we are such hero-worshippers
by nature that we can only believe in one man at a time. We get hold of
a Palmerston or a Gladstone, and set him on a pedestal, and think that
everybody else is a pygmy. It may be that our idol is a tolerably good
one--that is, not mischievously active. In that case he cannot do much
harm. But when, as in the case of Gladstone, you have a national idol
who is actively mischievous, it is impossible to exaggerate the evil
which may be done. Therefore the object which we should all pursue in
the first instance is to throw off the old man of the sea, and not
merely to get the better of him in parliament, but to cover him with so
much discredit that he cannot wheedle another majority from the country.
It does not signify whether we do this through Irish or Egyptian
affairs, so long as we do it. Mr. Campion has shown us how seats are to
be won. We want fifty or sixty men at least to do the same thing for us
at the next election."

"There is no doubt," said Campion, "that with the present electorate we
might safely go to the poll at once. Liberalism, minus Bright, Forster,
and Goschen, and plus Alexandria and Phoenix Park, is no longer what it
was in 1880. I had the most distinct evidence of that at Vanebury."

"There was a considerable turnover of votes, I suppose?"

"Unquestionably, and amongst all classes."

"Yes, that is encouraging, so far. But in view of the new franchise, it
does not go nearly far enough. The idol must be overthrown."

"Who is to do it?" Sydney asked.

"That is hardly for me to say. But it will be done."

"The idol is doing it very fairly," said Willoughby, "on his own
account, especially in London. Wherever I go his popularity is decidedly
on the wane amongst his old supporters."

"Let that go on for a year or two," said Lord Montagu, "and then, when
the inevitable compact is made with Parnell, the great party which has
had its own way in England for so many years, at any rate up to 1874,
will crumble to pieces."

The talk was commonplace as beseemed the occasion; but Sir John's object
in bringing his men together was practically gained. Before the evening
was over, Lord Montagu was favorably impressed by Campion's ability and
shrewdness, whilst Sydney was more disposed from that time to regard
Plumley as one of the most likely aspirants for the leadership of his
party.

In the drawing-room, Nan had made herself as popular as her husband was
making himself in the dining-room. She was greatly improved by her
marriage, many of the matrons thought; she was more dignified and far
less abrupt than she used to be. She had always been considered pretty,
and her manners were gaining the finish that they had once perhaps
lacked; in fact, she had found out that Sydney set a high value on
social distinction and prestige; and, resolving to please him in this as
in everything else, she had set herself of late to soften down any
girlish harshness or brusquerie, such as Lady Pynsent used sometimes to
complain of in her, and to develop the gracious softness of manner which
Sydney liked to see.

"She will be quite the _grande dame_, by and by," said one lady,
watching her that night. "She has some very stately airs already, and
yet she is absolutely without affectation. Mr. Campion is a very lucky
man."

Nan was asked to play; but, although she acknowledged that she still
kept up her practising, she had not brought her violin with her. She was
half afraid, moreover, that Sydney did not like her to perform. She
fancied that he had an objection to any sort of display of either
learning or accomplishment on a woman's part; she had gathered this
impression from the way in which he spoke of his sister Lettice. And she
did not want to expose herself to the same sort of criticism.

One of the younger ladies at Lady Pynsent's that night was a Mrs.
Westray, wife of the eminently respectable member for Bloomsbury, who,
as a city merchant of great wealth and influence, was one of the invited
guests. Mrs. Westray was by way of being a literary lady, having printed
a volume of her "Travels." Unfortunately she had only traveled in
France, over well-worn tracks, and her book appeared just after those of
two other ladies, with whom the critics had dealt very kindly indeed; so
that the last comer had not been treated quite so well as she deserved.
Nevertheless she keenly enjoyed her reputation as a woman of letters;
and having found on inquiry that Sydney Campion was the brother of the
lady whose novel had gained such a brilliant success in the spring, she
asked her husband to bring him to her.

"Oh, why does Miss Campion live out of England?" Mrs. Westray asked him,
after gushing a little about his sister's "exquisite romance". "Surely
she does not mean to do so always?"

"No," said Sydney. "I hope not. She was rather seriously ill last
Christmas, and we thought it best for her to live in Italy until she
quite recovered. I trust that we shall have her back again before the
end of the year." He was as yet unacquainted with the history of his
sister's movements.

"I am so glad to hear it. I want very much to make her acquaintance."

"We hope that my sister will come to stay with us for a time," said
Sydney, "and in that case you will be sure to see her."

"That will be so very nice," said the lady; "I am quite certain I shall
like her immensely."

Sydney felt a little doubtful whether Lettice would like Mrs. Westray;
and he also doubted whether his wife and his sister would be found to
have much in common. But he was more or less consciously building on the
hope that Dalton's suit would prosper, and that Lettice would settle
down quietly as the mistress of Angleford Manor, and so be weaned from
the somewhat equivocal situation of a successful author. It did not so
much as enter his mind, by the way, that there was anything equivocal in
Mrs. Westray's authorship. Her book had failed, and her husband was very
wealthy, so that she could not be suspected of having earned money by
her pen. But Lettice had cheques for _her_ romances!

The dinner was very successful, and the Pynsents were charmed with the
result. "It is a most suitable union," said Sir John, alluding to Nan's
marriage to Sydney Campion, and hoping to crush his wife a little,
seeing that she had objected to it: "it does great credit to my
discernment in bringing them together. I always knew that Campion would
get on. Lord Montagu was very much pleased with him."

"Nan looked lovely," said Lady Pynsent, ignoring her husband's innuendo.
"She tells me that Sydney is very particular about her dress, and she
seems perfectly happy."

Meanwhile, as Sydney and his wife were driving home, Nan nestled up to
him and said coaxingly,

"Now tell me, dear, just what you were thinking of to-night."

"I was thinking that my wife was the most beautiful woman in the room."

"Oh, I did not mean anything of that kind. When you were talking at
dinner-time, and after we had gone up stairs, what was really the
uppermost thought in your mind?"

"Well," said Sydney laughing, "you deserve all my candor, Nan. I was
thinking, if you must know, that I could meet any one of those men in
debate, or in council, and hold my own against him. There's vanity for
you! Now it is your turn."

"Mine?" she said. "Why, it was just the same as your own. That you were
as wise and great as any of them----"

"Ah, I didn't say that."

"--And that when you are a Minister of State, and I threw open my
drawing-room, we will challenge comparison with any other house in
London. Do you like the idea?"

He put his arm round her and kissed her very fondly. She had assimilated
his ambitions to a remarkable degree, and he was as surprised as he was
delighted to find her almost as eager for his success as he himself
could be. The two were by no means destitute of that community of
interests and pursuits which has been said to constitute the best hope
of wedded bliss. But Nan's hopes were less material than Sydney's. It
was as yet a doubtful matter whether he would draw her down from her
high standard, or whether she would succeed in raising him to hers. At
present, satisfied with themselves and with each other, they were a
thoroughly happy couple.




CHAPTER XXXII.

AT MRS. CHIGWIN'S COTTAGE.


Birchmead in the summer and autumn is a very different place from the
Birchmead which Alan Walcott saw when he came down to visit his aunt in
the early days of February. Then the year had not begun to move; at most
there was a crocus or a snowdrop in the sheltered corners of Mrs.
Chigwin's garden; and, if it had not been for a wealth of holly round
the borders of the village green, the whole place would have been
destitute of color.

But, in the summer, all is color and brightness. The blue sky, the
emerald lawns, the dull red earth, the many-hued masses of foliage, from
the dark copper beech to the light greys of the limes and poplars,
mingle their broad effects upon their outspread canvas of Nature, and in
the foreground a thousand flowers glow warmly from the well-kept gardens
or the fertile meadow-side. Nowhere do the old-fashioned flowers of the
field and garden seem to flourish more luxuriantly than at Birchmead, or
come to fuller bloom, or linger for a longer season. Here, as elsewhere
in the south of England, June and July are the richest months for
profusion and color; but the two months that follow July may be made,
with very little trouble, as gay and varied in their garden-show, if not
so fragrant and exquisite. The glory of the roses and lilies has
departed, but in their place is much to compensate all simple and
unsophisticated lovers of their mother-earth.

In the second week of October, Mrs. Chigwin was at work in her garden,
with her dress tucked up, a basket in her left hand, and a large pair of
scissors in her right. Every flower that had begun to fade, every
withered leaf and overgrown shoot fell before those fatal shears, and
was caught in the all-devouring basket; and from time to time she bore a
fresh load of snippets to their last resting-place. Her heart was in her
work, and she would not rest until she had completed her round. From the
clematis on the cottage wall and the jessamine over the porch she passed
to a clump of variegated hollyhocks, and from them to the hedge of sweet
peas, to the fuchsias almost as high as the peas, the purple and white
phlox, the yellow evening primrose, and the many-colored asters.
Stooping here and there, she carefully trimmed the rank-growing
geraniums and the clusters of chrysanthemums, cut off the straggling
branches of the mignonette and removed every passing bloom of harebell,
heartsease, and heliotrope.

The euthanasia of the fading blossoms filled her shallow skep
half-a-dozen times over, and, to anyone ignorant (to his shame) of the
art which our first ancestor surely learned from his mother, and loved,
it might have seemed that Mrs. Chigwin used her scissors with a too
unsparing hand. But the happy old soul knew what she was about. The
evening was closing in, and she had cut both the flowers whose beauty
had passed away and those which would have been wrinkled and flabby
before the morning, knowing full well that only so can you reckon on the
perfection of beauty from day to day.

"There, now," she said, when her last basketful was disposed of, "I have
done. And if old Squire Jermyn, who first laid out this garden, was to
come to life again to-morrow, there would be nothing in Martha Chigwin's
little plot to make his hair stand on end."

She threw her eyes comprehensively round the ring of cottages which
encircled the village green, with a sniff of defiant challenge, as
though she would dare any of her neighbors to make the same boast; and
then she came and sat down on the garden-seat, and said to her old
friend and companion,

"What do you think about it, Elizabeth?"

"You are right, Martha; right as you always are," said Mrs. Bundlecombe,
in a feeble voice. "And I was thinking as you went round, cutting off
the flowers that have had their day, that if you had come to me and cut
me off with the rest of them, there would have been one less poor old
withered thing in the world. Here have I been a wretched cripple on your
hands all the summer, and surely if the Lord had had any need for me He
would not have broken my stalk and left me to shrivel up in the
sunshine."

"Now, Bessy," said Mrs. Chigwin, severely, "do you want to put out the
light of peace that we have been enjoying for days past? Fie, for shame!
and in a garden, too. Where's your gratitude--or, leastways, where's
your patience?"

"There, there, Martha, you know I did not mean it. But I sit here
thinking and thinking, till I could write whole volumes on the vanity of
human wishes. Cut me off, indeed, just at this moment, when I am waiting
to see my dear boy once more before I die!"

Mrs. Bundlecombe was silent again, and the other did not disturb her,
knowing by experience what the effort to speak would be likely to end
in.

Things had not gone well at Birchmead in the last six months. The news
of Alan's arrest on the charge of wife-murder--that was the exaggerated
shape in which it first reached the village--was a terrible blow to poor
Aunt Bessy. She was struck down by paralysis, and had to keep to her bed
for many weeks, and even now she had only the partial use of her limbs.
Mrs. Chigwin, buckling to her new task with heroic cheerfulness, had
nursed and comforted her and lightened the burden of her life so far as
that was possible. As soon as the cripple could be dressed and moved
about, she had bought for her a light basket-chair, into which she used
to lift her bodily. Whenever the weather was fine enough she would wheel
her into the garden; and she won the first apology for a laugh from Mrs.
Bundlecombe when, having drawn her on the grass and settled her
comfortably, she said,

"Now, Bessy, I have repotted you and put you in the sun on the same day
as my balsams, and I shall expect you to be ready for planting out as
soon as they are."

But that was too sanguine a hope, for Mrs. Bundlecombe was still in her
chair, and there was not much chance of her ever being able to walk
again. As it had been impossible for her to go and see her nephew,
either before his trial or since, Mrs. Chigwin had written a letter for
her, entreating Alan to come to Birchmead as soon as he was free; and
the writer assured him on her own account that there was not a better
place in England for quiet rest and consolation. They heard from the
prison authorities that the letter had been received, and that it would
be given to the prisoner; and now Aunt Bessy was counting the days until
his time had expired.

There had been other changes at Birchmead in the course of the year.
Mrs. Harrington no longer occupied the adjoining cottage, but lay at
peace in the churchyard at Thorley. Her grand-daughter had written once
to the old ladies from London, according to her promise; after which
they had heard of her no more, although they sent her word of her
grandmother's death, to the address which she had given them.

The sun was sinking low in the sky, and it was time for Mrs. Bundlecombe
to be taken indoors. So Martha Chigwin wheeled her into the house,
rapidly undressed her, and lifted her into bed. Then there was a chapter
to be read aloud, and joint prayers to be repeated, and supper to be
prepared; and Mrs. Chigwin had just made the two cups of gruel which
represented the last duty of her busy day's routine, when she heard a
noise of wheels on the gravel outside.

It was not a cart but a cab, and it stopped at the door. Cabs were not
very familiar in Birchmead, and the appearance of this one at Mrs.
Chigwin's cottage brought curious eyes to almost every window looking
out upon the green. There was not much to reward curiosity--only a lady,
dressed in a long fur-lined cloak, with a quiet little bonnet, and a
traveling-bag in her hand, who knocked at Mrs. Chigwin's door, and,
after a short confabulation, dismissed the cabman and went in. At any
rate it was something for Birchmead to know that it had a visitor who
had come in a Dorminster cab. That was an incident which for these good
souls distinguished the day from the one which went before and the one
which came after it.

It was Lettice Campion who thus stirred the languid pulse of Birchmead.
She had found her way like a ministering angel to the bedside of Alan's
aunt, within three or four days of her arrival in England.

Mrs. Chigwin felt the utmost confidence in her visitor, both from what
she had heard of her before and from what she saw of her as soon as she
entered the cottage. Lettice could not have been kinder to her mother
than she was to the poor crippled woman who had no claim upon her
service. She told Mrs. Chigwin that so long as she was at Birchmead she
should be Mrs. Bundlecombe's nurse, and she evidently meant to keep her
word. Aunt Bessy was comforted beyond measure by her appearance, and
still more by the few words which Lettice whispered to her, in response
to the forlorn appeal of the old woman's eyes--so unutterably eloquent
of the thoughts that were throbbing in the hearts of both--

"I shall wait for him when he comes out!"

"God bless you!" said Aunt Bessy.

"The world has been cruel to him. He has only us two; we must try to
comfort him," whispered Lettice.

"I am past it, dearie. He has no one but you. You are enough for him."

And she went on in the slow and painful way which had become habitual to
her.

"I have been tortured in my heart, thinking of his coming out upon the
weary world, all alone, broken down may be, with none to take him by the
hand, and me lying here upon my back, unable to help him. Oh, it is
hard! And sometimes in a dream I see his mother, Lucy, my own little
sister that died so many years ago, floating over the walls of his
prison, and signing to me to fetch him out. But now she will rest in her
grave, and I myself could die to-night and be happy, because you will
not forsake him. My dear, he loves you like his own soul!"

Lettice did not reply, but she kissed the cheek of Alan's aunt, and bade
her try to sleep.

It was growing dark. Through the window she could trace the outlines of
the garden below. She was tempted by the balmy night, and went out.

"He loves you like his own soul!" Was not that how she loved him, and
was she not here in England to tell him so?

The question startled her, as though some one else had put it to her,
and was waiting for an answer. That, surely, was not her object; and
yet, if not, what was? From the hour when she read Sydney's letter at
Florence she seemed to have had a new motive power within her. She had
acted hitherto from instinct, or from mere feeling; she could scarcely
recall a single argument which she had held with herself during the past
ten days. She might have been walking in a dream, so little did she seem
to have used her reason or her will. Yet much had happened since she
left Italy.

On Thursday she had arrived in London with Mrs. Hartley.

On Saturday she went out by herself, and managed to see the governor of
the gaol where Alan was lodged. From him she learned, to her dismay,
that "Number 79" had had a severe and almost fatal illness. He was still
very weak, though out of danger, and it was thought that with the
careful attention which he was receiving in the infirmary he would
probably be able to leave on the 29th of October.

Captain Haynes told her that his prisoner appeared to have no relatives
"except the wife, who was not likely to give herself much trouble about
him, and an aunt in the country who was paralyzed." So, Lettice arranged
to bring a carriage to the prison gates on the morning of the 29th, and
to fetch him away.

Having learned Mrs. Bundlecombe's address, thanks to the letter which
had been written to the governor by Mrs. Chigwin, she came to Birchmead
on Monday--lingering an hour or two at Angleford in order that she might
see her native place again, and recall the image of the father whom she
had loved and lost.

Now, at length, her heart was in a measure contented and at rest. Now
she could think, and reason with herself if need be. What did she mean
to do? What had she done already? How had she committed herself? She was
only too painfully aware that she had taken a step which there was no
retracing. Had she not virtually broken with Mrs. Hartley, with the
Daltons, with Sydney and his wife? They would doubtless think so,
whether she did or not. She had no illusions in the matter. Not one of
them would forgive her--not even Mrs. Hartley--for her treatment of
Brooke Dalton, for her independent action since she left Italy, and for
her association with Alan Walcott.

As for that--it was true that she had not yet gone too far. She had not
coupled her name with Alan's in any public manner, or in any way at all,
except that she had used her own name when calling on Captain Haynes. He
would not talk, and, therefore, it was not too late to act with greater
secrecy and caution. She need not let anyone know that she had taken an
interest in him, that she had been to his prison, and had promised to
bring him away when he was released. Beyond that point of bringing him
away she had not yet advanced, even in her own mind. What was to prevent
her from sending a carriage, as though it had been provided by Aunt
Bessy, and letting him find his way to Birchmead, or wherever he wished
to go, like any other discharged prisoner. Then she would not shock her
friends--she would not outrage the feelings of poor Sydney, who thought
so much of the world's opinion and of the name they held in common.

That was a strong argument with her, for, to some extent, she
sympathized with her brother's ambitions, although she did not greatly
esteem them. She would do all that she could to avoid hurting him. How
much could she do? Was it possible for her now, when she was calm and
collected, to form a strong resolution and draw a clear line beyond
which she would not let her pity for Alan Walcott carry her? What she
thought right, that she would do--no more, but certainly no less. Then
what was right?

There was the difficulty. Within the limits of a good conscience, she
had been guided almost entirely by her feelings, and they had led her so
straight that she had never been prompted to ask herself such questions
as What is right? or What is the proper thing to do? She had done good
by intuition and nature; and now it was out of her power to realize any
other or stronger obligation than that of acting as nature bade her. One
thing only was plain to her at the moment--that she must be kind to this
man who had been persecuted, betrayed, and unjustly punished, and who,
but for her, would be absolutely alone in the world. Could she be kind
without going to meet him at the prison gates?

She was trying to persuade herself that she could; and so deeply was she
absorbed by the struggle which was going on in her mind that she did not
notice the feeble wailing sound which ever and anon came towards her on
the silent night air. But, at last, a louder cry than before disturbed
her quiet reverie, and startled her into attention.

It seemed to be close at hand--a cry like that of a little child; and
she stood up and peered into the shadow behind her. She could see
nothing, but the wailing came again, and Lettice groped her way across
the flower border, and stood by the low garden wall.

There was just enough light to enable her to distinguish the form of a
woman, crouching on the rank grass in what used to be Mrs. Harrington's
garden, and vainly attempting to soothe the baby which she held in her
arms.

It was too dark to see the woman's features, or to judge if she were in
much distress, but Lettice could not be satisfied to leave her where she
was.

"Who are you?" she asked; and, at the sound of her voice the little
child was hushed, as though it knew that a friend was near. But the
mother did not answer.

"What do you want? Why are you sitting there? Have you no home?"

A very weak "No" reached her straining ears.

"Can you walk? Come here, if you can."

The figure did not move.

"Then I must get over the wall and come to you."

She was beginning to do as she had said, when the other slowly rose to
her feet, and drew unwillingly a step nearer.

"Come," said Lettice, kindly, but firmly. She felt that this was a woman
over whom it would not be hard to exercise authority.

Gradually the mother approached, with her baby in her arms, until she
was within half-a-dozen yards of the wall. Then she leaned against the
trunk of an old apple-tree, and would not come any further.

"Are you ill?" said Lettice, gently.

Again the half-heard "No," but this time accompanied by a sob.

"Then why are you out at this time, and with your poor little baby, too?
Have you walked far to-day?"

"From Thorley."

"Do you live at Thorley?"

"Not now."

"Where do you come from?"

"London."

"Let me see your baby. Is it hungry, or cold? Why do you keep so far
away from me? and why are you crying? Oh, Milly, Milly! Is it you? Dear
child, come to me!"

Then the girl came from amongst the branches of the tree, and tottered
to the wall, and laid her child in the arms stretched out to receive it.

"Why did you not come to the door, Milly, instead of waiting out here?
You might have been sure of a welcome!"

She laid her hand on the head which was bowed down upon the wall, and
which shook with the poor girl's sobs. Her bonnet had fallen off, and
hung on her back; and Lettice noticed that the long hair of which the
girl used to be so proud was gone.

"I did not come to the village till it was dark," Milly said, as soon as
she could speak. "Then I should have knocked, but I saw you looking out
at the window--and I was ashamed!"

"Ashamed?" said Lettice, in a low voice. There was one thing she
thought, of which Milly could be ashamed. She looked from the weeping
mother to the baby's face, and back again to Milly. "My poor girl," she
said, with a sudden rush of tender feeling for the woman who had perhaps
been tempted beyond her strength--so Lettice thought--"my poor child,
you don't think _I_ should be unkind to you!"

"No, no! you were always so kind to me, miss. And I--I--was so
wicked--so ungrateful--so deceitful----"

And with that she broke down utterly. Lettice's arms were round her
neck, and the young mother, feeling herself in the presence of a
comforter at last, let loose her pent-up misery and sobbed aloud.

"Where is--he? your husband?" said Lettice, remembering that she had
heard of Milly's marriage from Mrs. Bundlecombe some time ago, and
conjecturing that something had gone wrong, but not yet guessing the
whole truth.

Milly sobbed on for a minute or two without replying. Then she said,
somewhat indistinctly,

"He's gone away. Left me."

"Left you? But--for a time, you mean? To look for work, perhaps?"

"No, no; he has left me altogether. I shall never see him again--never!"
said the girl, with sudden passion. "Oh, don't ask me any more, Miss
Lettice, I can't bear it!"

"No, no," said Lettice, pitifully, "I will ask you no questions, Milly.
You shall tell me all about it or nothing, just as you like. We must not
keep the baby out in the night air any longer. Come round to the door,
and Mrs. Chigwin will let you in. I will tell her that you want a
night's lodging, and then we will arrange what you are to do to-morrow."

Milly did not move, however, from her position by the wall. She had
ceased to sob, and was twisting her handkerchief nervously between her
fingers.

"Do you think Mrs. Chigwin would let me in," she said at last, in a very
low voice, "if she _knew_?"

Lettice waited; she saw there was more to come.

"Oh, Miss Lettice," said the girl, with a subdued agony in her tone
which went to Lettice's heart; "it wasn't all my fault ... I believed in
him so ... I thought he would never deceive me nor behave unkindly to
me. But I was deceived: I never, was his wife, though I thought--I
thought I was!"

"My dear," said Lettice, gently, "then you were not to blame. Mrs.
Chigwin would only be sorry for you if she knew. But we will not tell
her everything at once; you must just come in, if only for baby's sake,
and get some food and rest. Come with me now."

And Milly yielded, feeling a certain comfort and relief in having so far
told the truth to her former mistress.

Mrs. Chigwin's surprise, when she saw Lettice coming back with the baby
in her arms, may well be imagined. But she behaved very kindly: she at
once consented to take in Milly for the night and make her comfortable;
and, after one keen look at the girl's changed and downcast face, she
asked no questions.

For Milly was wonderfully changed--there was no doubt of that. Her
pretty fair hair was cropped close to her head; her eyes were sunken,
and the lids were red with tears; the bloom had faded from her cheeks,
and the roundness of youth had passed from face and form alike.
Ill-health and sorrow had gone far to rob her of her fresh young beauty;
and the privations which she confessed to having experienced during the
last few days had hollowed her eyes, sharpened her features, and bowed
her slender form. Her dress was travel-stained and shabby; her boots
were down at heel and her thin hands were glove-less. Lettice noticed
that she still wore a wedding-ring. But the neat trim look that had once
been so characteristic was entirely lost. She was bedraggled and broken
down; and Lettice thought with a thrill of horror of what might have
happened if Mrs. Chigwin had left Birchmead, or refused to take the
wayfarer in. For a woman in Milly's state there would probably have
remained only two ways open--the river or the streets.

"I've never had five in my cottage before," said Mrs. Chigwin,
cheerfully; "but where there's room for two there's room for
half-a-dozen; at least, when they're women and children."

"You must have wondered what had become of me all this time," said
Lettice.

"Nay, ma'am; you were in the garden, and that was enough for me. I knew
you couldn't be in a better place, whether you were sorrowing or
rejoicing. Nought but good comes to one in a garden."

They set food before Milly, and let her rest and recover herself. The
child won their hearts at once. It was clean, and healthy, and good to
look at; and if Lettice had known that it was her own little niece she
could not have taken to it more kindly. Perhaps, indeed, she would not
have taken to it at all.

Lettice's visit had greatly excited Mrs. Bundlecombe, who had for some
time past been in that precarious state in which any excitement, however
slight, is dangerous. She was completely happy, because she had jumped
to the conclusion that Lettice would henceforth do for Alan all that she
herself would have done if she had been able, but which it was now
impossible for her to do. And then it was as though the feeble vitality
which remained to her had begun to ebb away from the moment when her
need for keeping it had disappeared.

In the early morning, Lettice was roused from her sleep by the
restlessness of her companion, and she sat up and looked at her.

"Dearie," said the old woman, in a whisper, "my time is come."

"No, no!" said Lettice, standing by her side. "Let me raise you a little
on the pillow; you will feel better presently."

"Yes--better--in heaven! You will take care of my Alan?"

"Oh yes, dear!"

"And love him?"

"And love him."

"Thank God for that. It will be the saving of him. Call Martha, my
dear!"

Lettice went and roused Mrs. Chigwin, who came and kissed her friend.
Then, with a last effort, Aunt Bessy raised her head, and whispered,

"'Lord, now lettest Thou Thy servant depart in peace!'"

The watchers scarcely heard the words; but when she sank back upon her
pillow, and smiled as though she had found the peace which passes
understandings they knew that she had gone.

Lettice stayed on at Birchmead until she had seen Alan's aunt carried to
the churchyard, and laid under the shadow of the great yew trees.

Aunt Bessy's death changed her plans. It was no longer necessary for
Alan to undertake so long a journey, and in his weak condition it might
be better that he should not attempt it. But what was to be done? She
had promised Aunt Bessy to "take care of him." Haw could she do it? How
do it, at least, without outraging the feelings of her brother and her
friends? She loved Sydney, although she had long ago ceased to be
greatly in sympathy with him, and she had looked forward to the day when
she could make friends with his wife and--by and by--interest herself in
their children. She knew that Sydney would be against her in this. Ought
she to consider him? Should his opinion weigh with her or not?

She was still pondering this question on the day after the funeral, when
something happened which went far towards removing her hesitation. She
was sitting in Mrs. Chigwin's garden, which was warm and dry in the
afternoon sun. Mrs. Chigwin was indoors, vigorously "straightening" the
house. Milly was sewing a frock for her child, and the child itself was
tumbling about on a soft rug at her feet.

During the past few days, little had been said respecting Milly's
future. Mrs. Bundlecombe's death had thrown her history into the
background, and she had not seemed eager to obtrude it on any of her
friends. Lettice's assurance that she might safely stay where she was at
present seemed to satisfy her. She had lost her briskness--her
occasional pertness--of manner; she was quiet and subdued, attaching
herself with dog-like fidelity to Lettice's steps, and showing that no
satisfaction was so great as that of being allowed to wait on her. But
her submissiveness had something in it which pained Lettice, while it
touched the deepest fibres of pity in her heart.

She was vaguely wondering what it was that pained her--why there should
be that touch of something almost like subserviency in Milly's manner,
as if to make up for some past injury--when her eyes were arrested by a
locket, which, tied by a black ribbon round Milly's neck, had escaped
from the bosom of her dress, and now hung exposed to view.

It contained a portrait of Sydney's face, evidently cut from a
photograph by the girl herself.

A flood of light entered Lettice's mind; but she took her discovery with
outward calmness. No thought of accusing or upbraiding Milly ever
occurred to her. Why should it? she would have said. It was not Milly
who had been to blame, if the girl's own story were true. It was Sydney
who had been guilty of the blackest treachery, the basest of all crimes.
She thought for a moment of his wife, with pity; she looked with a new
interest and tenderness at the innocent child. She had no
certainty--that was true; but she had very little doubt as to the facts
of the case. And, at any rate, she allowed her suspicion to decide her
own course of action. Why need she care any longer what Sydney desired
for her? His standard was not hers. She was not bound to think of his
verdict--now. He had put himself out of court. She was not sure that she
should even love him again, for the whole of her pure and generous
nature rose-up in passionate repudiation of the man who could basely
purchase his own pleasure at the expense of a woman's soul, and she knew
that he had thenceforth lost all power over her. No opinion of his on
any matter of moral bearing could ever sway her again. The supreme scorn
of his conduct which she felt impelled her to choose her own line of
action, to make--or mar--for herself her own career.

It was one of those moments in which the action of others has an
unexpectedly vivifying result. We mortals may die, but our deed lives
after us, and is immortal, and bears fruit to all time, sometimes evil
and sometimes good. If the deed has been evil in the beginning, the
fruit is often such as we who did it would give our lives, if we had the
power, to destroy.

Thus Sydney's action had far-off issues which he could not foresee. It
ruled the whole course of his sister's afterlife.

There was a light shawl on Milly's thin shoulders. Lettice took one end
of it and drew it gently over the telltale locket. Then, unmindful of
Milly's start, and the feverish eagerness with which her trembling hand
thrust the likeness out of sight, she spoke in a very gentle tone: "You
will take cold if you are not more careful of yourself. Have you
thought, Milly, what you are to do now? You want to earn a living for
yourself and the child, do you not?"

Milly looked at her with frightened, hopeless eyes. Had Miss Lettice
seen the locket, and did she mean to cast her off for ever? She
stammered out some unintelligible words, but the fear that was uppermost
in her mind made her incapable of a more definite reply.

"You must do something for yourself. You do not expect to hear from your
child's father again, I suppose?" said Lettice.

"He said--he said--he would send me money--if I wanted it," said Milly,
putting up one hand to shade her burning face; "but I would rather not!"

"No, you are quite right. You had better take nothing more from
him--unless it is for the child. But I am thinking of yourself. I am
going back to London the day after to-morrow, and perhaps I may take a
small house again, as I did before. Will you come with me, Milly?"

This offer was too much for the girl's equanimity. She burst into tears
and sobbed vehemently, with her head upon her hands, for two or three
minutes.

"I couldn't," she said at last. "Oh, you're very good, Miss Lettice--and
it isn't that I wouldn't work my fingers to the bone for you--but I
couldn't come."

"Why not?"

"I deceived you before. I--I--should be deceiving you again. If you
knew--all, you would not ask me."

"I think I should, Milly. Perhaps I know more of your story than you
have told me. But--at present, at any rate--I do not want to know more.
I am not going to question you about the past. Because you cannot undo
what is past, dear, however much you try, but you _can_ live as if it
had never happened; or, better still, you can live a nobler life than
you had strength to live before. Sorrow makes us stronger, Milly, if we
take it in the right way. You have your little one to live for; and you
must be brave, and strong, and good, for her sake. Will you not try?
Will it not be easier now to look forward than to look back? I used to
teach you out of an old Book that speaks of 'forgetting the things that
are behind.' You must forget the things that lie behind you, Milly, and
press forward to the better life that lies before you now."

The girl listened with an awed look, upon her face.

"I am afraid," she murmured.

"Forget your fear, dear, with the other things that you have to forget,
and gather up your strength to make your little girl's life a good and
happy one. In that way, good will come out of evil--as it so often does.
Will you try?"

"Yes," said Milly, "I'll try--if you will help me--and--forgive me."

"You will come with me, then," Lettice rejoined, in a more cheerful
tone. "You can bring your child with you, and you shall have money
enough to clothe her and yourself; but you know, Milly, you must be
ready to work and not to be idle. Then I shall be able to help you."

Milly was glad enough to be persuaded. She had learned a sad and bitter
lesson, but she was the wiser for it.

"I shall be able to work better for you than I did at Maple Cottage,"
she said, with touching humility. "You see I know more than I did, and I
shall have more heart in my work. And--" with sudden vehemence--"I would
work for _you_, Miss Lettice, to my life's end."

So it was arranged that they were to go up to London together. Mrs.
Chigwin moaned a little about her prospect of loneliness. "But there,"
she said, "I am not going to make the worst of it. And nobody that has a
garden is ever really lonely, unless she has lost her self-respect, or
taken to loving herself better than her fellow-creatures. By which," she
added, "I do not mean snails and sparrows, but honest and sensible
flowers."




BOOK VI.

SUCCESS.

                          "May I reach
    That purest heaven, be to other souls
    The cup of strength in some great agony,
    Enkindle generous ardor, feed pure love,
    Beget the smiles that have no cruelty,
    Be the sweet presence of a good diffused
    And in diffusion ever more intense.
    So shall I join the choir invisible
    Whose gladness is the music of the world."

    GEORGE ELIOT.




CHAPTER XXXIII.

AT THE PRISON GATE.


Months had passed since Lettice had written a page of her story. The
arrival of the Daltons at Florence had interrupted her at a critical
point. She had not yet acquired the mechanic art of stopping and going
on again as at the turn of a handle, in obedience to a law of demand and
supply; and she would probably have been unable to gather up her threads
and continue the old woof, even if she had made the effort. But she had
not made the effort, and now that she was back in London again it seemed
less possible than ever that she should sit down and make it.

This was a serious matter, for the book was to have been done to order.
She had undertaken to furnish the whole of the manuscript by the middle
of November, and now the time had come when she was obliged to admit
that this was quite impracticable. She had hoped to put such a
constraint upon herself at Birchmead as would have enabled her to fulfil
her promise in the spirit, and to ask a fortnight's grace for the
completion of the manuscript. But circumstances had prevented her from
writing a single line, and she gave up the idea as hopeless.

So when she came up to London, three days before the end of October, she
called upon the publisher with whom she had made her agreement, and
confessed her inability to keep her word. Mr. MacAlpine was polite, but
at the same time evidently vexed. If Miss Campion had been ill he was
very sorry to hear it, but he liked to be able to rely on the
engagements which he made.

"Pray don't let it trouble you," he said, seeing that her face had begun
to fall. "When do you think you can be ready? I must have your next
story, at any rate. Take another three months."

"That is very good of you," said Lettice. "I think I can promise it
before the end of January."

So it was settled, and Lettice went away contented.

The discovery which she had made in regard to Sydney and Emily
Harrington had destroyed her former scruples as to the displeasure which
Sydney might feel if he were to hear what she now contemplated. She had
no wish to punish her brother. She thought he had been cruel, and
indifferent to the suffering which he had caused; but she was not moved
by anything like a vindictive feeling towards him. She had simply lost
the scruples which had beset her, and there was no longer a desire in
her mind to avoid a mere semblance of unconventionality for his sake.

She had chosen three rooms on the ground-floor of a house in a long and
dreary terrace, the windows of which looked across an intervening waste
to the walls of Alan's prison; and here she watched and waited.

The time hung heavy on her hands. She could do nothing, read nothing,
think of nothing--except of the unhappy man within those walls, who had
been brought to death's door, and who must have known a living death for
the past six months. To her, merely looking at the walls and thinking of
their victim, every minute seemed an hour, and every hour a day of blank
despair. What must the minutes and hours have seemed to him, buried
alive in that hideous pile of bricks, and in the yet more hideous pile
of false accusations and unmerited disgrace?

She had found out the date of the trial, and procured the papers in
which it was reported. The whole wretched story was before her now. She
saw how the web had been weaved round him; she understood the pains
which had been taken to keep her own name from being mentioned, and she
noted with burning indignation the persistency with which Sydney had
labored, apparently, to secure a conviction.

She was on the point of seeking out Mr. Larmer, in order to learn from
him the assurance of innocence which Alan must have given to his
solicitor; but she refrained. It would look as though she wanted
evidence of what she believed so absolutely without any evidence; and
besides, was it not one of the pleasures which she had promised herself,
to hear from Alan's own lips all that he cared for her to hear?

She stood by her window in the evening, and saw the lights spring up one
by one about the frowning gates of the prison. She was quite alone,
Milly having gone out with her baby to buy her some clothes. Lettice was
miserable and depressed, in spite of her good intentions; and as she
stood, half leaning against the shutter in unconscious weariness of
body, yet intent with all her mind upon the one subject that engrossed
her, she heard the distant stroke of a tolling bell.

Dong!--dong!--dong! it sounded, with long intervals between the notes.
Straight across the vacant ground, from the shrouded walls of Alan's
dungeon, and into the contracting fibres of her own tortured heart; it
smote with sudden terror, turning her blood to ice and her cheeks to
livid whiteness.

Great heaven, it was a death-knell. Could it be Alan who was dead!

For a moment she felt as if she must needs rush into the street and
break open those prison gates, must ascertain at once that Alan was
still alive. She went out into the hall and stood for a moment
hesitating. Should she go? and would they tell her at the gates if Alan
was alive or dead?

The landlady heard her moving, and came out of a little apartment at the
back of the house, to see what was going on.

"Were you going out, ma'am?" she asked, curiously.

"I? no; at least," said Lettice, with somewhat difficult utterance, "I
was only wondering what that bell was, and----"

"Oh, that's a bell from the church close by. Sounds exactly like a
passing-bell, don't it, ma'am? And appropriate too. For my son, who is
one of the warders, as I think I've mentioned to you, was here this
afternoon, and tells me that one of the prisoners is dead. A gentleman,
too: the one that there was so much talk about a little while ago."

Lettice leaned against the passage wall, glad that in the gathering
darkness her face could not be seen.

"Was his name--Walcott?" she asked.

"Yes, that was it. At least I think so. I know it was Wal--something. He
was in for assault, I believe, and a nicer, quieter-spoken gentleman, my
son says he never saw. But he died this afternoon, I understand, between
five and six o'clock--just as his time was nearly out, too, poor man."

Lettice made no answer. She stole back into her sitting-room and shut
the door.

So this was the end. The prisoner was released, indeed; but no mortal
voice had told him he was free, no earthly friend had met him at the
door.

She fell on her knees, and prayed that the soul which had been
persecuted might have rest. Then, when the last stroke of the bell had
died away, she sat down in mute despair, and felt that she had lost the
best thing life had to give her.

Outside upon the pavement men and women were passing to and fro. There
was no forecourt to the house; passers-by walked close to the windows;
they could look in if they tried. Lettice had not lighted a candle, and
had not drawn her blinds, but a gas-lamp standing just in front threw a
feeble glimmer into the room, which fell upon her where she sat. As the
shadows deepened the light grew stronger, and falling direct upon her
eyes, roused her at last from the lethargy into which she had sunk.

She got up and walked to the window, intending to close the shutters.
Listlessly for a moment she looked out into the street, where the
gas-light flickered upon the meeting streams of humanity--old folk and
young, busy and idle, hopeful and despairing, all bent on their own
designs, heedless like herself of the jostling world around them.

She had the shutter in her hand, and was turning it upon its hinges,
when a face in the crowd suddenly arrested her. She had seen it once,
that ghastly painted face, and it had haunted her in her dreams for
weeks and months afterwards. It had tyrannized over her in her sickness,
and only left her in peace when she began to recover her strength under
the bright Italian skies. And now she saw her again, the wife who had
wrecked her husband's happiness, for whom he had lingered in a cruel
prison, who flaunted herself in the streets whilst Alan's brave and
generous heart was stilled for ever.

Cora turned her face as she passed the window, and looked in. She might
not in that uncertain light have recognized the woman whose form stood
out from the darkness behind her, but an impulse moved Lettice which she
could not resist. At the moment when the other turned her head she
beckoned to her with her hand, and quickly threw up the sash of the
window.

"Mon Dieu!" said Cora, coming up close to her, "is it really you? What
do you want with me?"

"Come in! I must speak to you."

"I love you not, Lettice Campion, and you love not me. What would you?"

"I have a message for you--come inside."

"A message! Sapristi! Then I must know it. Open your door."

Lettice closed the window and the shutters, and brought her visitor
inside.

The woman of the study and the woman of the pavement looked at each
other, standing face to face for some minutes without speaking a word.
They were a contrast of civilization, whom nature had not intended to
contrast, and it would have been difficult to find a stronger antagonism
between two women who under identical training and circumstances might
have been expected to develop similar tastes, and character, and
bearing. Both had strong and well-turned figures, above the middle
height, erect and striking, both had noble features, natural grace and
vivacity, constitutions which fitted them for keen enjoyment and zest in
life. But from their infancy onward they had been subjected to
influences as different as it is possible to imagine. To one duty had
been the ideal and the guide of existence; the other had been taught to
aim at pleasure as the supreme good. One had ripened into a
self-sacrificing woman, to whom a spontaneous feeling of duty was more
imperative than the rules and laws in which she had been trained; the
other had degenerated into a wretched slave of her instincts, for whom
the pursuit of pleasure had become a hateful yet inevitable servitude.
Perhaps, as they stood side by side, the immeasurable distance which
divided them mind from mind and body from body was apparent to both.
Perhaps each thought at that moment of the man whose life they had so
deeply affected--perhaps each realized what Alan Walcott must have
thought and felt about the other.

"Why have you brought me here?" said Cora at last in a defiant voice.

"It was a sudden thought. I saw you, and I wanted to speak to you."

"Then you have no message as you pretended? You are very polite,
mademoiselle. You are pleased to amuse yourself at my expense?"

"No, I am not amusing myself," said Lettice. There was a ring of sadness
in her tones, which did not escape Cora's attention. She argued weakness
from it, and grew more bold.

"Are you not afraid?" she said, menacingly. "Do you not think that I
have the power to hurt--as I have hurt you before--the power, and, still
more, the will?"

"I am not afraid."

"Not afraid! You are hatefully quiet and impassive, just like--ah, like
all your race! Are you always so cold and still? Have you no blood in
your veins?"

"If you will sit down," said Lettice steadily, "I will tell you
something that you ought to know. It is useless trying to frighten me
with your threats. Sit down and rest if you will; I will get you food or
coffee, if you care for either. But there is something that I want to
say."

Cora stared at her scornfully. "Food! Coffee! Do you think I am
starving?" she asked, with a savage little laugh. "I have as much money
as I want--more than you are ever likely to have, mademoiselle. You are
very naive, mon enfant. You invite me into your room--Lettice Campion
invites Cora Walcott into her room!--where nobody knows us, nobody could
trace us--and you quietly ask me to eat and drink! Eat and drink in this
house? It is so likely! How am I to tell, for example, if your coffee is
not poisoned? You would not be very sorry if I were to die! Parbleu, if
you want to poison me, you should tempt me with brandy or champagne.
Have you neither of those to offer me?"

Lettice had drawn back at the first hint of this insinuation, with a
look of irrepressible disgust. She answered coldly, "I have neither
brandy nor champagne to give you."

"Allons, donc! Why do I stay here then?" said Cora jumping up from the
chair where she had seated herself. "This is very wearisome. Your idea
was not very clever, Mademoiselle Lettice; you should lay your plans
better if you want to trick a woman like me."

"Why should I wish to trick you?" said Lettice, with grave, quiet scorn.
"What object could I have in killing you?"

"Ma foi, what object should you not have? Revenge, of course. Have I not
injured you? have I not taken away your good name already? All who know
you have heard my story, and many who do not know you; and nearly every
one of them believes it to be true. You robbed me of my husband,
mademoiselle, you know it; and you have but too good reason to wish me
dead, in order that you may take a wife's place at the convict's side."

"You are mad. Listen to me----"

"I will listen to nothing. I will speak now. I will give you a last
warning. Do you know what this is?"

She took a bottle from her pocket, a bottle of fluted, dark-colored
glass, and held it in her hand.

"Look! This is vitriol, the friend of the injured and the defenceless. I
have carried it with me ever since I followed my husband to your house
at Brook Green, and saw you making signals to him at midnight. I came
once after that, and knocked at your door, intending then to avenge my
wrongs; but you had gone away, and I was brutally treated by your
police. But if I could not punish you I could punish _him_, for he
belonged to me and not to you, and I had a right to make him suffer. I
have made him suffer a little, it seems to me. Wait--I have more to say.
Shall I make him suffer more? I have punished you through him; shall I
punish him through you? For he would not like you to be maimed and
disfigured through life: his sensitive soul would writhe, would it not?
to know that you were suffering pain. Do you know what this magic water
is? It stings and bites and eats away the flesh--it will blind you so
that you can never see him again; and it will mar your white face so
that he will never want to look at you. This is what I carry about for
you."

Lettice watched the hand that held the bottle; but in truth she thought
very little of the threat. Death had done for her already what this
woman was talking about. Alan was past the love or vengeance of either
of them, and all her pleasure in life was gone for ever.

"I thought I should find you here," Cora went on, "waiting at the
prison for your lover! But I am waiting for him, too. I am his wife
still. I have the right to wait for him, and you have not. And if you
are there when he comes out, I shall stay my hand no longer. I warn you;
so be prepared. But perhaps"--and she lifted the bottle, while her eyes
flamed with dangerous light, and her voice sank to a sharp
whisper--"perhaps it would be better to settle the question now!"

"The question," said Lettice, with almost unnatural calm of manner, "is
settled for us. Alan has left his prison. Your husband is dead."

The woman gazed at her in stupefaction. Her hand fell to her side, and
the light died out of her bold black eyes.

"Alan dead!' What is it you say? How do you know?"

"He had a fever in the jail to which you sent him. He has been at
death's door for many weeks. Not an hour ago a warder came here and said
that he was dead. Are you satisfied with your work?"

"My work?" said Cora, drawing back. "I have not killed him!"

"Yes," said Lettice, a surge of bitter anger rising in her heart, "yes,
you have killed him, as surely as you tried to kill him with your pistol
at Aix-les-Bains, and with his own dagger in Surrey Street. You are a
murderess, and you know it well. But for you, Alan Walcott would still
be living an honorable, happy life. You have stabbed him to the heart,
and he is dead. That is the message I have to give you--to tell you that
you have killed him, and that he is gone to a land where your unnatural
hate can no longer follow him!"

Lettice stood over the cowering woman, strong and unpitying in her stern
indignation, lifted out of all thought of herself by the intensity of
her woe. Cora shrank away from her, slipping the bottle into her pocket,
and even covertly making the sign of the cross as Lettice's last words
fell upon her ear--words that sounded to her untutored imagination like
a curse. But she could not be subdued for long. She stood silent for a
few moments when Lettice ceased to speak, but finally a forced laugh
issued from the lips that had grown pale beneath her paint.

"Tiens!" she said. "You will do the mourning for us both, it seems.
Well, as I never loved him, you cannot expect me to cry at his death.
And I shall get his money, I suppose; the money that he grudged me in
his lifetime: it will be mine now, and I can spend it as I choose. I
thank you for your information, mademoiselle, and I pardon you the
insults which you have heaped upon my head to-night. If I have my
regrets, I do not exhibit them in your fashion. Good-night,
mademoiselle: il me faut absolument de l'eau de vie--I can wait for it
no longer. Bon soir!"

She turned and left the house as rapidly as she had come. Lettice sank
down upon a couch, and hid her face in the cushion. She could not shed a
tear, but she was trembling from head to foot, and felt sick and faint.

As Cora sauntered along the pavement, turning her head restlessly from
side to side, her attention was caught by a young woman carrying a
child, who went in at Lettice's door. Mrs. Walcott stopped short, and
put her finger to her forehead with a bewildered air. "Now where have I
seen that face?" she muttered to herself.

After a moment's reflection, she burst into a short, harsh laugh, and
snapped her fingers at the blind of Lettice's room. "I know now," she
said. "Oh yes, I know where I have seen that face before. This will
justify me in the eyes of the world as nothing else has done. Bon soir,
Madame Lettice. Oh, I have a new weapon against you now."

And then she went upon her way, leaving behind her the echo of her
wicked laugh upon the still night air.




CHAPTER XXXIV.

A BRAVE PURPOSE.


If Lettice had not seen Cora when she did, she would probably have gone
to the prison that evening, to ask whether she could not arrange for
Alan's funeral, as she could not arrange for his release. Her spirit was
crushed by the blow which had fallen on her, but she could not give way
so long as his body was there to receive the last token of her love.
When the Frenchwoman left her it was too late to see Captain Haynes,
even if she had been physically able to make the attempt.

It never occurred to her to think that any mistake could have been made
in the information she had received from her landlady. The struggle
which had been going on in her mind, the consciousness that she had
broken with all her old friends, the exaltation which had possessed her
since she resolved to give to Alan all that was possible for her to
give, or seemed to be worth her giving, the death of his aunt and the
thought of his loneliness, had combined to make her nervously
apprehensive. As soon as she had settled down under the shadow of the
prison walls, the idea took hold of her with unaccountable force that
the life of Alan was hanging by a thread, and the news of his death came
to her only as the full confirmation of her fears.

But, as it happened, there was another man in the prison named Walters,
who had been convicted of an assault upon his wife some time previously,
and had been ill for many months of an internal complaint which was
certain, sooner or later, to end fatally.

A sleepless night brought Lettice no ray of hope, and it was with a
heavy and despairing heart that she went to the governor's residence
next morning, and sent up to him the note which she had written before
leaving her room.

Captain Haynes remembered her former visit, and being disengaged at the
moment, he came down at once.

"My dear lady," he said, bustling into the room, "what is the meaning of
this letter? What makes you talk of burying your friend? He has been in
this tomb of stone long enough to purge him of all his offenses, and I
am sure you don't want to bury him alive again!"

Lettice started to her feet, gazed at the speaker with straining eyes,
and pressed her hands upon her tumultuous heart.

"Is--he--alive?" she gasped, in scarcely audible words.

"Of course he is alive! I told you when you were here before that he was
out of danger. All he wants now is careful nursing and cheerful company;
and I must say that you don't quite look as if you could give him
either."

"Alive--alive! Thank God!"

A great wave of tenderness swept through her heart, and gushed from her
eyes in tears that were eloquent of happiness.

"I was told that he was dead!" She looked at the governor with a smile
which disarmed his bluff tongue.

"I am on the borderland of a romance," he thought, "and a romance of
which the ending will be pleasanter than the beginning, unless I am much
mistaken. This is not the wife; it is the woman he was writing his
verses to before he took the fever. The doctor says she has written the
best novel of the year. Novels and poetry--umph! not much in my line."

Then aloud, "you are under a mistake. A man named Walters died
yesterday; perhaps that is how you have been misled. Some rumor of his
death must have got abroad. Mr. Walcott is getting over his illness very
nicely; but he will need a good rest, good food, and as much
cheerfulness as you can give him. I told him, just now, that you had
arranged to meet him to-morrow, and I fancy it roused him more than
anything Dr. Savill has done for him. I must wish you good-morning,
madam!--but let me impress upon you again, before you go, that he is to
be kept perfectly quiet, free from anxiety, and as cheerful as you can
manage to make him."

Captain Haynes was rather ashamed of the laxity into which Miss Campion
had drawn him. He was not accustomed to display so much sympathy with
his prisoners, whatever he may have felt in his own mind. But, to be
sure, the case was quite exceptional. He did not have prisoners like
Alan or visitors like Lettice every day. So he had no difficulty in
finding excuses for himself.

Lettice walked on air as she came out of the precincts of the jail,
which had now lost all its terrors. In less than twenty-four hours she
was to come again, and transport her hero--whom the dense and cruel
world had branded as a criminal--from slavery to freedom, from misery to
peace and joy. The world had cast him out; well, then, let the world
stand aside, that she might give this man what was his due.

What would she say to him? Ah, she dare not think of that beforehand!

What would she do for him? For one thing, she would give him back his
self-respect. He had been the object of scorn and the victim of lying
scandals. He should find that the woman he loved intended from
henceforth to take those paltry burdens on herself, and to know no other
praise or merit than that which came to her from him.

He had borne troubles and suffered injuries which before now had driven
men to suicide, or madness, or self-abandonment. In order to save him
from any of these things she meant to give herself into his hands,
without terms or conditions, in order that the wrong-doing of the world
might be righted by her act, were it ever so little.

Who could call that a sacrifice which made her heart so light, her step
so elastic, her eyes so bright with hope and satisfaction? It was no
sacrifice, but a triumph and reward of the highest kind that she was
preparing for herself. How should she not be happy?

There was no time to be lost if she was to provide all that was
necessary for the well-being and comfort of her patient before to-morrow
morning. Everything had to be done at the last moment. She had been so
long in coming to a definite and final resolution to treat this
friendless discharged prisoner as a hero and a king, that it was almost
too late to make arrangements. Why had she not done yesterday something
of what she had left to be done to-day? She scarcely realized to herself
that her mind was only just made up. That facile belief in the report of
Alan's death was only the outcome of her distress and perplexity--of the
failure of her courage on the threshold of decision and action.

With a cold shudder she thought of the dust which she had unwittingly
thrown in Cora's eyes. She had told her that her husband was dead, and
the tale had been readily believed, for the very opposite reason to that
which had prevailed with herself. She had been convinced by her
fears--Cora by her hopes and greed. And now she could not undeceive the
woman, for she did not know where to find her. Would she if she could?
Perhaps it was the the best thing which could have happened; for it
would be terrible if Alan were to step out of his prison back into the
hell on earth which that woman had created for him.

Well, now, at any rate, she must devote herself to the task which she
had undertaken. She felt as a sister might feel who had been suddenly
commissioned to provide a home within twenty-four hours for an invalided
traveler; and she set about the work with enthusiasm.

She began by taking Milly in some measure into her confidence, and
giving her a number of directions as to what she was to do in the course
of the day. Then she hired a cab, and went to a house-agent whose name
she remembered. That seemed the quickest way of getting what she
wanted--a small furnished house, cheerful and yet retired, which she
could take at any rate for a month, and for longer if she needed it. The
agent by good chance had the very thing she asked for. He turned over
the leaves of his register, and presently came upon a desirable bijou
residence, plainly but adequately furnished, containing three reception
rooms and five bedrooms, conservatory, with large and well-stocked
garden, lawn and shrubbery, coach-house and stable. Vacant for three
months; very moderate terms to a suitable tenant. That sounded well.
The "very moderate terms" came to something more than Lettice wanted to
give; but she had a hundred pounds in her pocket, and a spirit which
disdained to grudge in such a service.

So, having journeyed to Chiswick, and found Bute Lodge to be, if not
precisely a jewel amongst lodges, at any rate clean and comfortable, she
came back to the agent with an offer to take it from month to month, and
with a roll of notes ready to clinch the bargain. Money is the best
reference, as she found when she paid a month's rent on the spot, and
promised that all her payments should be in advance. But, as the agent
had asked her for a reference of another kind, Lettice, who had expected
this demand, and was prepared for it, gave the name of James Graham. She
ought not to have made use of him without asking him beforehand. She
might have referred to the owner of Maple Cottage, where she had lived
when last in London, or even to her publisher. But she wanted to go and
see her old friend Clara; and, woman-like, did a more important thing to
serve as a pretext for a less important.

Clara Graham was delighted to see her again, and the two women had a
long and confidential talk.

"I, at any rate," said Clara, "have never doubted his innocence, and I
was sure that you would not."

"Yet you never told me what troubles had fallen upon him!"

"My dear, I thought you must have heard about it all. But the fact was
that James asked me not to mention the trial. Remember, you were not
well at the time; and it was a difficult case. I could not quite assume
that your interest would be strong enough to justify me in risking the
loss of your health--perhaps of your life. Really, it is a hard question
to deal with--like one of those cases of conscience (didn't they call
them?) which men used to argue for the sake of having something to do. I
stood up for poor Mr. Walcott with my husband; but you know it is
useless to argue against him."

"He believes with the rest of them?"

"Everybody believes alike. I never heard of one who thought that he did
not do it."

"Only yourself!"

"Yes, and that was, perhaps, for your sake," said Clara, affectionately.

"And I suppose that I believe in him for his own sake."

"That is natural; but will people think that it is logical?"

"No, they won't," said Lettice, "at all events, not at first. But,
gradually perhaps, they will. I am perfectly convinced that Alan did not
stab his wife--because I feel it with a force that amounts to
conviction. You see, I know his character, his past history, the
character and history of his wife, the circumstances in which they were
placed at the time. I am sure he is innocent, and I am going to act up
to it. Alan will live down this horrible accusation and punishment--he
will not give way, but will keep his self-respect, and will do
infinitely better work for all the torture he has gone through. And our
hope must be this--that when the world sees him stronger than ever,
stronger in every way, and doing stronger work in his vocation, it will
come to believe in him, one by one, beginning with us, until his
vindication is brought about, not by legal proof, which is impossible,
but by the same feeling and conviction which to-day only draw two weak
women to the side of an unhappy and discredited man."

"Are you calling yourself a weak woman? You have the strength of a
martyr, and in days when they used to burn women you would have chosen
to be a martyr."

"I am not so sure. It is one thing to do what one likes, but quite
another thing to burn, which no one likes."

"Well, you are very brave, and you will succeed as you deserve. But not
at first."

"No, not at first. The hardest task will be with Alan, who has been in
despair all these months, and at death's door with fever. He will come
out weak, helpless, hopeless; there will be constant danger of a
relapse; and, even if he can be made to forget his despair, it will be
very difficult to restore him to cheerfulness." Her eyes filled with
pitying tears as she spoke.

"Only one thing can do that!" Clara stroked her friend's bright brown
hair, and kissed her on the cheek. "With you for his doctor he will soon
be well."

"Only two things can do it--a joy greater than his sorrow, and a
self-respect greater than his self-abasement."

Lettice stood up; and the far reaching look that Clara knew so well came
into the true and tender grey eyes, strong with all the rapt purpose of
a devoted woman. Her resolutions were forming and strengthening as she
went on. She had been guided by instinct and feeling, but they were
guiding her aright.

There was one thing more in which Clara was a help to her. She took her
to an old woman, the mother of her own parlor-maid, exceptionally clean
and respectable, whom Lettice engaged to go at once to Bute Lodge,
taking a younger daughter with her, and make everything ready for the
morrow.

"I shall come and see you soon," said Clara, as they wished each other
good-bye.

"Do! And if you can convert your husband----"

"If not, it will not be for want of trying."

It was evening before Lettice was at her lodging again. She had done all
that she could think of--made every preparation and taken every
precaution--and now there was nothing left but to wait until the
appointed hour should strike, and Alan should be a free man again.

One concession she made to Mrs. Graham's sense of propriety. There was
an old lady who had once been Clara's governess--a gentle, mild-tongued,
unobservant person, who was greatly in want of a home. Mrs. Alison was
easily induced to promise the support of her presence to Lettice during
the days or weeks which Lettice hoped to spend at Bute Lodge. She was a
woman of unimpeachable decorum and respectability, and her presence in
the house would, in Clara's opinion, prove a bulwark against all
dangers; but, although evil tongues might be silenced by the fact of her
presence, the old lady was singularly useless in the capacity of
chaperon. She was infirm, a little deaf, and very shy; but her presence
in the house was supposed to be a sop to Cerberus, in the person of Mrs.
Grundy, and Clara was less afraid for her friend than she had been
before Mrs. Alison was installed at Bute Lodge.




CHAPTER XXXV.

FROM PRISON TO PARADISE.


Punctually at ten o'clock on the 29th of October a brougham drove up to
the gates of the prison in which Alan Walcott had spent his six months
of retreat from the world; and almost immediately Alan made his
appearance, leaning on the arm of a warder.

Lettice hurried to meet him, displacing the warder with a few words of
thanks, and repressing with an effort the painful throbbing of her heart
and throat. The sight of his shrunken form and hollow eyes, as he looked
at her with pathetic and childlike trust, for a moment took away all her
strength; but when his hand was laid upon her arm, and she accommodated
her steps to his slow and unsteady movements, he found in her no trace
of the weakness she had overcome.

It was clear that he had not yet made a good recovery from his fever.
Lettice's last little qualm of doubt as to the use or need for what she
had done disappeared as she saw this wreck of the man whom she
loved--whom she believed to be innocent of offense and persecuted by an
evil fate. What might have become of him if he had been left to crawl
out of his prison into the cold and censorious world, without a friend,
a hope, or an interest in life? What lowest depth of despair might he
not have touched if in such a plight as this he should be found and
tortured anew by his old enemy, whose cruelty was evidently not assuaged
by the sufferings she had heaped upon him? Who now would say that he had
no need of succor, that her service was unasked, unwarranted, unwomanly,
that the duty of a pure and delicate soul was to leave him either to his
own wife or to the tender mercies of strangers?

The carriage was piled with cushions and shawls, the day was bright and
warm, Lettice was full of light gossip and cheerfulness, and Alan had
reason to think that he had never had a more delightful drive.

"Where are you taking me?" he said, with a smile of restful gratitude,
which clearly implied, "I do not care where it is, so long as I am taken
by you!"

"You are going to a convalescent home, where you will be the only
patient. If you obey the rules, you may get well in a month, and the
first rule is that you are not to ask questions, or to think about
unpleasant things."

"Are you my nurse?"

"That is the first breach of rules! They are very strict at this home, I
can tell you!"

She spoke in a playful mood, but it left him with the impression that he
was really being taken to a "home" of some kind, where he was to be
nursed until he was well. He had no objection to make. He would have
gone anywhere with equal pleasure, if he could be sure that she would be
there to look after him. His one thought in prison, when he lay in the
grip of fever, was that he must surely die before his sentence had run
out. That was his hope and belief from day to day; and only when he
heard that Lettice had come and made inquiries about him, and promised
to fetch him as soon as he was released, did any real desire for life
return to him. Now, in her presence, he was so completely happy that he
forgot all his former sufferings and despair.

Weak as he was, he would have found words to tell her of his
gratitude--and of much more than gratitude; but this because of, not in
spite of, weakness--if she had not carefully checked him whenever he
tried to speak. Fortunately, it was not at all hard to check him. He was
infirm in mind as in body. Apart from the illness, which sapped his
energies and paralyzed his power of thought, he had never thrown off the
cloud of callous and despairing indifference which fell upon him after
the fatal scene in Surrey Street. Add to this that the surrender of his
independence to Lettice was in itself a pleasure to him, and we need not
wonder that her self-imposed task seemed to her fairly easy of
accomplishment.

At Bute Lodge they found everything very nice and comfortable. Mrs.
Jermy and Mrs. Beadon (as Milly was to be called), who had come earlier
in the morning with a cabful of yesterday's purchases, had carried out
Lettice's instructions to the letter. The best room in the house looked
out upon a delightful garden landscape--two borders, backed by
well-grown box and bay-trees, holly, Irish yews, and clambering roses,
with a lessening crowd of herbaceous plants in front, dwindling down to
an edge of brilliant annuals on either side; and between these a long
and level lawn, broken near the house by a lofty deodara, and ending in
a bowling-green, and a thickly-planted bank of laurels, beyond which lay
a far-off vista of drooping fruit-trees. The garden was reached through
a small conservatory built outside a French window at one end of the
room, and a low verandah ran along the remainder of the garden front.

Inside, all was as Lettice had planned it. A square writing table in
front of the window was covered with a dozen of the books which had made
most noise during the past season, with the November magazines, and the
weekly papers which Alan had been wont to read. Milly had cut them all
over night, and here they lay, with an easy-chair beside them, ready to
tempt the student when he felt inclined and able to read. That was not
just yet; but Alan saw the pile, and darted at his guardian angel
another look of gratitude from his lustrous, melancholy eyes.

"Why, here," he said, looking round the room and out upon the garden, "a
man must get well only too soon! I shall steadily refuse to mend."

"You will not be able to help yourself," said Lettice. "Now you are
going to be left alone----"

"Not alone!"

"For half an-hour at the very least. All this floor belongs to you, and
you are to have nothing to do with stairs. When you want anything you
are to ring this bell, and Milly, whom you saw when we came in, will
attend on you. Here, on this sideboard, are wine, and biscuits, and
jelly, and grapes. Sit down and let me give you a glass of wine. We will
have some lunch at one, tea at four, and dinner at seven--but you are to
be eating grapes and jelly in between. The doctor will come and see you
every morning."

"What doctor?"

"Why, the doctor of the Establishment, to be sure!"

"Oh, this is an Establishment?"

"Yes."

"It is more rational in its plan than some I have heard of, since it
takes in your nurse and your nurse's maid. Will this precious doctor
dine with us?"

"This precious! You are to have great faith in your doctor; but I am
sorry to say he will not be able to dine with us. He has other
occupations, you see; and for company I am afraid you will have to be
content with such as your nurse may be disposed to give you!"

Before he could say anything else, she had left the room.

He was alone--alone and happy.

Straight from prison to paradise. That was what the morning's work meant
for him, and he could not think with dry eyes of the peri who had
brought him there.

Oh, the bitterness of that dungeon torture, when his heart had been
branded with shame and seared with humiliation; when he had sworn that
life had no more hope or savor for him, and the coming out from his cell
had seemed, by anticipation, worse than the going in!

This was the coming out, and he was already radiant with happiness,
oblivious of suffering, hopeful of the future. It was enough, he would
not probe it, he would not peer into the dark corners of his prospect;
he would simply realize that his soul had been lost, that it had been
found by Lettice, and that it was hers by right of trover, as well as by
absolute surrender.

The mid-day sun shone in at his window and tempted him to the verandah
outside. Here he found one of those chairs, delightful to invalids and
lazy men, which are constructed of a few crossed pieces of wood and a
couple of yards of sacking, giving nearly all the luxury of a hammock
without its disturbing element of insecurity. And by its side,
wonderful, to relate, there was a box of cigarettes and some matches.
Since they were there, he might as well smoke one. His last smoke was
seven or eight months ago--quite long enough to give a special relish to
this particular roll of Turkish tobacco.

As he lay back in his hammock chair, and sent one ring chasing another
to the roof of the verandah, he heard a step on the gravel beneath him.
Lettice, with a basket in one hand and a pair of scissors in the other,
was collecting flowers and leaves for her vases. Unwilling to leave him
too much alone, until she saw how he would bear his solitude, she had
come out into the garden by a door at the other end of the house, and
presently, seeing him in the verandah, approached with a smile.

"Do I look as if I were making myself at home?" he said.

"Quite."

"As soon as I began to smoke, all kinds of things came crowding into my
mind."

"Not unpleasant things, I hope?" She said this quickly, being indeed
most afraid lest he should be tempted to dwell on the disagreeable past.

"No, almost all pleasant. And there are things I want to say to
you--that I must say to you, very soon. Do you think I can take for
granted all you have done, and all you are doing for me? Let me come
down and join you!"

"No!" she said, with a great deal of firmness in her gesture and tone.
"You must not do anything of the kind until the doctor has seen you; and
besides, we can speak very well here."

The verandah was only a few feet above the ground, so that Lettice's
head was almost on a level with his own.

"There is no difficulty about speaking," she went on, "but I want you to
let me have the first word, instead of the last. This is something I
wanted to say to you, but I did not know how to manage it before. It is
really very important that you should not fatigue or excite yourself by
talking, and the doctor will tell you so when he comes. Now if you think
that you have anything at all to thank me for, you will promise not to
speak to me on any personal matters, not even your own intentions for
the future, for one clear month from to-day! Don't say it is impossible,
because, you see, it is as much as my place (as nurse) is worth to
listen to you! If you will promise, I can stay; and if you will not
promise, I must go away."

"That is very hard!"

"But it is very necessary. You promise?"

"Have I any choice? I promise."

"Thank you!" She said this very earnestly, and looked him in the eyes
with a smile which was worth a faggot of promises.

"But you don't expect me to be deaf and dumb all the time?" said Alan.

"No, of course not! I have been told that you ought to be kept as
cheerful as possible, and I mean to do what I can to make you so. Do you
like to be read to!"

"Yes, very much."

"Then I will read to you as long as you please, and write your letters,
and--if there were any game----"

"Ah, now, if by good luck you knew chess?"

"I do know chess. I played my father nearly every evening at Angleford."

"What a charming discovery! And that reminds me of something. Is there
any reason why I should not write to Mr. Larmer? He has some belongings
of mine, for one thing, which I should like him to send me, including a
set of chess-men."

"No reason at all. But you ought not to write or talk of business, if
you can help it, until you are quite strong."

"Well, then, I won't. I will ask him to send what I want in a cab; and
then, when I am declared capable of managing my own affairs, I will go
into town and see him. But the fact is, that I really feel as well as
ever I did in my life!"

"You may feel it, but it is not the case."

And later in the day, Alan was obliged to confess that he had boasted
too soon, for there was a slight return of fever, and the doctor whom
Lettice had called in was more emphatic than she had been as to the
necessity for complete rest of mind and body.

So for the next week he was treated quite as an invalid, to his great
disgust. Then he fairly turned the corner, and things began to change
for the better again. Lettice read to him, talked, played chess, found
out his tastes in music and in art (tastes in some respects a little
primitive, but singularly fine and true, in spite of their want of
training), and played his favorite airs for him on the piano--some of
Mendelssohn's plaintive Lieder, the quainter and statelier measures of
Corelli and Scarlatti, snatches of Schumann and Grieg, and several older
and simpler melodies, for most of which he had to ask by humming a few
bars which had impressed themselves on his memory.

As the month wore itself out, the success of Lettice's experiment was in
a fair way of being justified. She had charmed the evil spirit of
despair from Alan's breast, and had won him back to manly resistance and
courageous effort. With returning bodily strength came a greater
robustness of mind, and a resolution--borrowed, perhaps, in the first
instance, from his companion--to be stronger than his persecutors, and
rise superior to his troubles.

In the conversations which grew out of their daily readings, Lettice was
careful to draw him as much as possible into literary discussions and
criticisms, and Alan found himself dwelling to an appreciative listener
on certain of his own ideas on poetic and dramatic methods. There is but
a step from methods to instances; and when Lettice came into his room
one morning--she never showed herself before mid-day--she saw with
delight on the paper before him an unmistakable stream of verses
meandering down the middle of the sheet.

He had set to work! Then he was saved--saved from himself, and from the
ghouls that harbor in a desolate and outraged mind.

If, beyond this, you ask me how she had gained her end, and done the
good thing on which she had set her heart, I cannot tell you, any more
than I could make plain the ways in which nature works to bring all her
great and marvelous mysteries to pass. Lettice's achievement, like her
resolution, argued both heart and intellect. Alan would not have yielded
to anyone else, and he yielded to her because he loved her with the
feelings and the understanding together. She had mastered his affections
and his intelligence at the same time: she left him to hunger and thirst
up to the moment of his abject abasement, and then she came unasked,
unhoped, from her towering height to his lowest deep, and gave
him--herself!

"Do you remember," he said to her once, when he had got her to talk of
her successful story, "that bit of Browning which you quote near the
end? Did you ever think that I could be infatuated enough to apply the
words to myself, and take comfort from them in my trouble?"

She blushed and trembled as he looked at her for an answer.

"I meant you to do it!".

"And I knew you meant it!" he said, not without a dangerous touch of
triumph in his voice. "If I were a little bolder than I am, I would
carry you to another page of the poet whom we love, and ask if you ever
remembered the words of Constance--words that you did not quote----"

Ten times more deeply she blushed at this, knowing almost by instinct
the lines of which he thought. Had he not asked her to read "In a
Balcony" to him the night before, and had she not found it impossible to
keep her voice from trembling when she read Constance's passionate
avowal of her love?

                      "I know the thriftier way
    Of giving--haply, 'tis the wiser way;
    Meaning to give a treasure, I might dole
    Coin after coin out (each, as that were all,
    With a new largess still at each despair),
    And force you keep in sight the deed, preserve
    Exhaustless till the end my part and yours,
    My giving and your taking; both our joys
    Dying together. Is it the wiser way?
    I choose the simpler; I give all at once.
    Know what you have to trust to trade upon!
    Use it, abuse it--anything, but think
    Hereafter, 'Had I known she loved me so,
    And what my means, I might have thriven with it.'
    This is your means. I give you all myself."

And in truth, that was the gift which Lettice offered to him--a gift of
herself without stint or grudging, a gift complete, open-handed, to be
measured by his acceptance, not limited by her reservation, Alan knew
it; knew that absolute generosity was the essence of her gift, and that
this woman, so far above him in courage, and self-command, and purity,
scorned to close her fingers on a single coin of the wealth which she
held out to him. And he, like Norbert, answered reverently: "I take you
and thank God."

For just because he knew it, and was penetrated to the core by her
munificence, he took the draught of love as from a sacred chalice, which
a meaner nature would have grasped as a festal goblet. He might have
grasped it thus, and the sacramental wine would have been a Circe's
potion, and Lettice would have given her gift in vain. But nature does
not so miscalculate her highest moods. "Spirits are not finely touched
but to fine issues." Lettice's giving was an act of faith, and her faith
was justified.

This was the true source of Alan's self-respect, and from self-respect
there came a strength greater and more enduring than he had ever known
before. Redeemed from the material baseness of his past when he changed
the prison cell for Lettice's ennobling presence, he was now saved from
the mental and moral feebleness to which he might have sunk by the
ordeal through which his soul had passed.

Lettice felt that her work was accomplished, and she was supremely
happy. When Clara Graham kept her promise, and came to see her
friend--though she had not been able to bring her husband with her--she
was struck by the blithe gaiety of Lettice's looks and words.

"There is no need to tell me that you are satisfied!" she said, kissing
the tender cheeks, and gazing with wistful earnestness into the eyes
that so frankly and bravely met her own.

"Satisfied?" Lettice answered, with something like a sigh. "I never
dreamed that satisfaction could be so complete."

When Alan came in, and Clara, who had expected to see a face lined and
marred with sorrow, found that he too had caught the radiance of
unblemished happiness, she felt that Lettice had not spent her strength
in vain. And she went home and renewed her efforts to make her husband
see things as she saw them, and to give Alan Walcott his countenance in
the literary world.

But that was a task of no slight difficulty. James Graham had always
believed Walcott guilty of a barbarous attack on his wife; he thought
that he had been lightly punished, and would not admit that he was to be
received when he came out of prison as though he had never been sent
there. When Clara told him of Lettice's audacity he was terribly
shocked--as indeed were all who heard the story--and his resentment
against Alan increased. The news that they were happy together did not
produce the good effect upon his temper which Clara thought it might
have done.

It was Lettice herself who tackled Mrs. Hartley. She wrote her a long
and candid letter, very apologetic as regarded her conduct in Italy, but
quite the opposite when she spoke of what she had done since she came
back to London. The answer was short, but much to the point.

"I thought you would write to me," Mrs. Hartley said, in her note. "I
should hardly have forgiven you if you had not. There is some of your
letter which I cannot understand, and some which I do not quite agree
with. But come and explain it to me. I am an old woman, and have no time
to be angry with those I love. Come on Thursday afternoon--alone--and we
will have a good talk."

So Lettice went, and made her peace with her old friend, and was
admitted to her favor again. But Alan was on probation still. The last
thing which he would have expected, or indeed desired, was that he
should be received and treated by his former acquaintance as though
nothing had happened since he was a welcome guest in their houses.
Especially as he and Lettice had not yet settled the question which all
their friends were asking: "How would it end?"




CHAPTER XXXVI.

MISTRESS AND MAID.


Poor Milly Harrington had faithfully kept her promise of amendment. She
was as loyal and serviceable to her mistress as any one could be, and
evidently did her utmost to show her gratitude to Lettice, studying her
tastes, and, as far possible, anticipating her wishes. But it was plain
that she was not happy. When not making an effort to be cheerful as part
of her daily duty, she would sit brooding over the past and trembling
for the future; and, though she tried to conceal her hopeless moods,
they had not altogether escaped notice.

Lettice was troubled by Milly's unhappiness. She had taken deep pity on
the girl, and wanted, for more reasons than one, to save her from the
worst consequences of her mistakes. To see her, in common parlance,
"going to the bad"--ruined in body and in soul--would have been to
Lettice, for Sydney's sake, a burden almost heavier than she could bear.
For this reason had she brought the girl up to London and taken her into
her own service again; and from day to day she watched her with kindly
interest and concern.

Milly's good looks could scarcely be said to have come back to her, for
she was still thin and haggard, with the weary look of one to whom life
has brought crushing sorrow and sickness of heart. But her eyes were
pretty, and her face, in spite of its worn expression, was interesting
and attractive. Lettice was hardly surprised, although a little
startled, to find her talking one day in a somewhat confidential manner
to a man of highly respectable appearance who was walking across the
Common by her side as she came home one day from a shopping expedition.
It was, perhaps, natural that Milly should have acquaintances. But
Lettice felt a sudden pang of anxiety on the girl's account. She did not
know whether she had been seen, and whether it was her duty to speak to
her maid about it; but her hesitation was ended by Milly herself, who
came to her room that night, and asked to speak with her.

"Well, Milly?"

"I saw you to-day, Miss Lettice, when I was out," said Milly, coloring
with the effort of speech.

"Did you? Yes? You were with a friend--I suppose?"

"I wanted to tell you about him," said Milly, nervously. "It's not a
friend of mine, it was a messenger--a messenger from _him_."

Lettice sat speechless.

"He does not know what has become of me; and he set this man--his
clerk--to find out. He wants to send me some money--not to see me again.
He was afraid that I might be--in want."

"And what have you done, Milly?"

"I said I would not take a penny. And I asked the clerk--Mr. Johnson,
they call him--not to say that he had seen me. I didn't tell him where I
lived."

"Did he say that he would not tell his master?"

"Yes, he promised. I think he will keep his word. He seemed--kind--sorry
for me, or something."

"You were quite right, Milly. And I would not speak to the man again if
I were you. He may not be so kind and friendly as he seems. I am glad
you have told me."

"I couldn't rest till I had spoken. I was afraid you might think harm of
me," said the girl, flushing scarlet again, and twisting the corner of
her apron.

"I will not think harm of you if you always tell me about your
acquaintances as you have done to-day," said Lettice with a smile.
"Don't be afraid, Milly. And--if you will trust to me--you need not be
anxious about the future, or about the child. I would rather that you
did not take money from anyone but myself for your needs and hers. I
have plenty for you both."

Milly could not speak for tears. She went away sobbing, and Lettice was
left to think over this new turn of affairs. Was Sydney's conscience
troubling him, she wondered, after all?

This was early in November, soon after she came to Bute Lodge, and as
the time went on, she could not but notice that the signs of trouble in
Milly's face increased rather than diminished. Lettice had a suspicion
also that she had not managed to get rid of the man with whom she had
been walking on the Common. She was sure that she saw him in the
neighborhood more than once, and although he never, to her knowledge,
spoke to Milly or came to the house, she saw that Milly sometimes looked
unusually agitated and distressed. It was gradually borne in upon
Lettice's mind that she had better learn a little more of the girl's
story, for her own sake; and coming upon her one day with the signs of
trouble plainly written on her face, Lettice could not forbear to speak.

Milly was sitting in a little dressing-room, with some needlework in her
hand. The baby was sleeping in a cradle at her side. She sprang up when
Lettice entered; but Lettice made her sit down again, and then sat down
as well.

"What is it, Milly? Is there anything wrong that I don't know of? Come,
don't give way. I want to help you, but how can I do that unless you
tell me everything?"

"There is nothing to tell except what you know," said Milly, making an
effort to command herself. "But, sometimes, when I think of it all, I
can't help giving way. I did not mean you to see it though, miss."

"I have never asked you any questions, Milly, about all that happened
after you left me, and I do not want to know more than you wish to tell
me. But don't you think I might do something to place matters on a
better footing, if I knew your circumstances a little better?"

"Oh, I could never--never tell you all!" said Milly hiding her face.

"Don't tell me all then. You have called yourself Mrs. Beadon so far.
You have heard nothing of Mr. Beadon lately except what you told me the
other day?"

"Only what Mr. Johnson said." Milly averted her head and looked at her
child. "The name," she went on in a low voice, "the name--is not--not
Beadon."

"Never mind the name. Perhaps it is as well that you should not tell me.
When did you see him last?"

"In May."

"Never since May?"

"Not once." Milly hung her head and played with the ring on her finger.
"He does not want to see me again!" she broke out almost bitterly.

"Perhaps it is better for you both that he should not. But I will not
ask any more," said Lettice. "I can understand that it must be very
painful, either to tell me your story or to conceal it."

"I hate to conceal it from you!" Milly said passionately. "Oh, I wish I
had never seen him, and never listened to him! Yet it was my fault--I
have nobody to blame but myself. I have never forgiven myself for
deceiving you so!"

"Ah, if that were the worst, there would not be much to grieve about!"

"I almost think it is the worst. Miss Lettice, may I really tell you my
story--all, at least, that it would be right for you to hear?"

"If you would like to tell me, do! Perhaps I can help you in some way
when I know more."

"There are some things I should like you to understand," said Milly,
hesitatingly, "though not because it will take away the blame from
me--nothing can do that. When I first knew Mr. Beadon (I'll call him
so, please), I was very giddy and foolish. I longed to see the world,
and thought that all would go well with me then. I don't know where I
picked up the idea, but I had read stories about beautiful women who had
had wonderful good fortune, through nothing at all but their looks--and
people had told me I was beautiful--and I was silly enough to think that
I could do great things, as well as those I had read about. I suppose
they must have been very clever and witty--or, perhaps, they had more
luck. I wanted to be free and independent; and I am afraid I was ready
to listen to any one who would flatter my vanity, as--as Mr. Beadon
did."

"When did he first begin to say these things to you? Was it after you
came to London?"

"Yes--not long after. He was above me in station, and very handsome, and
proud; and when he began to speak to me, though I was all the time
afraid of him, and uneasy when I spoke to him, my head was fairly
turned. It shows I was not meant to shine in the world, or I should not
have been so uneasy when I spoke to him. For some time he said nothing
out of the way--only kind words and flattery; but when he found what I
had set my heart on, he was always telling me that I was fit to be a
great lady, and to make a noise in the world. That set me all on-fire,
and I could not rest for thinking of what I might do if I could only
find my way into society. It makes me mad to remember what a fool I was!

"But I was not quite bad, Miss Lettice. When he said that he would give
me what I wanted--make me a lady, and all the rest of it--I shrank from
doing what I knew to be wrong; or perhaps I was only afraid. At any
rate, I would not listen to him. Then he declared that he loved me too
well to let me go--and he asked me to be his wife."

"Oh!" said Lettice. It was an involuntary sound, and Milly scarcely
heard it.

"If you knew," she said, "what a proud and dignified gentleman he was,
you would laugh at me thinking that he really meant what he said, and
believing that he would keep his word. But I did believe it, and I
agreed at length to leave you and go away with him."

"Did you think that I should have anything to say against your marriage,
Milly?" said Lettice, mournfully.

"I--I thought you might. And Mr. Beadon asked me not to mention it."

"Well!--and so you trusted him. And then, poor girl, your dream soon
came to an end?"

"Not very soon. He kept his word----"

"What?"

"He married me, on the day when I left you. Not in a church, but
somewhere--in Fulham, I think. It looked like a private house, but he
said it was a registrar's. Oh, Miss Campion, are you ill?"

Lettice was holding her side. She had turned white, and her heart was
throbbing painfully; but she soon overcame the feeling or at least
concealed it.

"No. Go on--go on! He married you!"

"And we went on the Continent together. I was very happy for a time, so
long as he seemed happy; but I could never shake off that uncomfortable
fear in his presence. After a while we came back to London, and then I
had to live alone, which of course I did not like. He had taken very
nice rooms for me at Hampstead, where he used to come now and then; and
he offered to bring some friends to visit me; but I did not want him to
do that--I cared for nobody but him!"

"Poor Milly!" said Lettice, softly.

"I had been suspicious and uneasy for some time, especially when he told
me I had better go to Birchmead and stay with my grandmother, as he was
too busy to come and see me, and the rooms at Hampstead were expensive.
So I went to Birchmead and told them that Mr. Beadon was abroad. He was
not--he was in London--and I went up to see him every now and then; but
I wanted to put the best face on everything. It would have been too hard
to tell my grandmother that I did not think he cared for me."

She stopped and wiped the tears away from her eyes.

"There was worse than that," she said. "I began to believe that I was
not his lawful wife, or he would not behave to me as he did. But I
daren't ask, I was so afraid of him. And I felt as if I could not leave
him, even if I was not his wife. That's where the badness of me came
out, you see, Miss Lettice. I would have stayed with him to the end of
my days, wife or no wife, if he had wanted me. But he tired of me very
soon."

"Did he tell you so, Milly?"

"He wrote to me to go back to the Hampstead rooms, miss. And I thought
that everything was going to be right between us. I had something to
tell him which I thought would please him; and I hoped--I hoped--even if
things had not been quite right about the marriage--that he would put
them straight before my baby came. For the child's sake I thought maybe
he wouldn't give me up. I had been dreadfully afraid; but when he sent
for me to London again, I thought that he loved me still, and that we
were going to have a happy time together.

"So I went to Hampstead; but he was not there. He sent his clerk
instead--the man you saw me walking with the other day. And he told me
that Mr.----Beadon did not wish to see me again, that I had been
deceived by the mock marriage, and that he sent me twenty pounds, and I
might have more by writing to his clerk. Not to him! I was never to see
him or speak to him again."

"And what did you do then, Milly?"

"It was very hard for me. I fainted, and when I came to myself Mr.
Johnson was gone, and the money was stuffed into my pocket. Perhaps it
was mean of me to keep it, but I hadn't the heart or the spirit to send
it back. I did not know what I should do without it, for I hadn't a
penny of my own. I stayed for a little time at the Hampstead lodgings,
but the landlady got an idea of the true state of things and abused me
shamefully one day for having come into her house; so I was forced to
go. I don't know what I should have done if I hadn't met Mr. Johnson in
the street. He was really kind, though he doesn't look as if he would
be. He told me of nice cheap lodgings, and of some one who would look
after me; and he offered me money, but I wouldn't take it."

"How long did your money last?"

"It was all gone before baby came. I lived on the dresses and presents
that Mr. Beadon had given me. I heard nothing from Birchmead--I did not
know that my grandmother was dead, and I used to think sometimes that I
would go to her; but I did not dare. I knew that it would break her
heart to see me as I was."

"Poor girl!" said Lettice again, below her breath.

"You must despise me!" cried Milly, bursting into tears. "And you would
despise me still more--if I told you--everything."

"No, Milly, it is not for me to despise you. I am very, very sorry for
you. You have suffered a great deal, for what was not all your fault."

"Yes, I _have_ suffered, Miss Lettice--more than I can tell you. I had a
terrible time when my baby was born. I had a fever too, and lost my
hair; and when I recovered I had nothing left. I did not know what to
do. I thought of throwing myself into the river; and I think I should
have done it when I came to Birchmead and found that grandmother was
dead, if it had not been for you. You found me in the garden that night,
just as I had made up my mind. There's a place across the meadows where
one could easily get into a deep pool under the river-bank, and never
come out again. That was where I meant to go."

"No wonder you have looked so ill and worn," said Lettice,
compassionately. "What you must have endured before you brought yourself
to that! Well, it is all over now, and you must live for the future. Put
the past behind you; forget it--think of it only with sorrow for your
mistakes, and a determination to use them so that your child shall be
better guarded than you have been. You and your baby have your own lives
to live--good and useful lives they may be yet. No one would blame you
if they knew your story, and there is no reason why you should be
afraid. I will always be your friend, Milly, if you will work and
strive--it is the only way in which you can regain and keep your
self-respect."

Milly bent her head and kissed Lettice's hand with another outburst of
tears. But they were tears of gratitude, and Lettice did not try to
check them now.

Whilst they were still sitting thus, side by side, the servant knocked
at the door with a message for her mistress; and her voice broke
strangely through the sympathetic silence that had been for some time
maintained between mistress and maid.

"Mr. Campion wishes to see you, ma'am."

Lettice felt the face which still rested on her hand flush with sudden
heat; but when Milly raised it it was as white as snow. The baby in its
cradle stirred and began to wake.

"I will come at once, Mrs. Jermy," said Lettice.

"Milly, you had better finish your work here, and let me give baby to
Mrs. Jermy for a few minutes. She will be quite good if I take her
downstairs."

She did not look at Milly as she spoke; or, if she did, she paid no heed
to the mute pain and deprecation in the mother's eyes. Folding the baby
in the white shawl that had covered it, she took it in her arms, and
with slow, almost reluctant steps, went down to meet her brother.

Sydney had come upon what he felt to be a painful errand.

Although the session had begun, and the House of Commons was already
hard at work on a vain attempt to thresh out the question of
Parliamentary Procedure, he was not yet able to devote himself to the
urgent affairs of the nation, or to seek an opening for that eloquent
and fiery speech which he had elaborated in the intervals of his autumn
rest. Before he could set his mind to these things there was an equally
urgent question of domestic procedure which it was necessary for him to
arrange--a question for which he had been more or less prepared ever
since he heard of the flight of Lettice from Florence, but which had
assumed the gravest possible importance within the last few hours.

A terrible and incredible thing had come to the knowledge of Sydney
Campion. That morning he had looked in at his chambers in the Temple,
and he had found there, amongst other letters, one written about three
weeks before by Cora Walcott, which had made his blood run cold.

     "SIR,"--the letter ran--"you were just and bold on that day when
     you vindicated my character in the Criminal Court, and procured a
     well-deserved punishment for the husband who had outraged me.
     Therefore it is that I write to give you warning, and to tell you
     that the man Walcott, discharged from prison, has been secretly
     conveyed away by one whom you know, after I had been deceived in a
     most shameful manner with a story of his death in prison. I saw her
     on the day before his release--her and his child--waiting to
     appropriate him, and like an idiot I believed her lies. I know not
     where they hide together, but.... I seek until I find. If you know,
     take my advice, and separate them. I go prepared. You proved last
     time that my husband stabbed me. That was very clever on your part;
     but you will not be able to prove the like thing again, if I should
     meet my husband and your sister together.

     "CORA WALCOTT."

This letter had exasperated Sydney beyond endurance. He did not know
Lettice's address; but, thinking it possible that Mrs. Graham might have
it, he went the same afternoon to Edwardes Square. Clara, being at home,
was able, though in some trepidation, to tell him what he wanted; and
thus it was that he found himself at Bute Lodge.

Lettice came into the room where he had been waiting, intrepid, and yet
boding something which could not be entirely pleasant for him, and might
be very much the reverse. She did not want to quarrel with Sydney--she
had made many efforts in the past to please him, without much effect,
and had been pained by the increasing interval which separated them from
each other. But she believed that to earn his good word would imply the
forsaking of nearly all that she valued, and the bowing down to images
which she could not respect; and therefore she was content that his good
word should be a thing beyond her reach.

She carried the baby on her left arm, and held out her right to Sydney.
He barely touched her fingers.

"You are back again," she said. "I hope you had a pleasant time, and
that your wife is well."

"She is pretty well, thank you. We should have gone on to Florence if
you had remained there, as we expected. You have taken your fate in your
hands, Lettice, and cut yourself adrift from those who care for you!"

"Not willingly, Sydney. You might believe that at every step I have done
what seemed to be my duty."

"How can one believe that? I only wish I could. Read this letter!"

She looked at him first, and her eyes flashed at his expression of
unbelief. She drew herself up as she took Cora's letter in her hands,
and read it through with a curl of contempt upon her lips. Then she
dropped the paper, and, clasping Milly's child to her breast, looked
long and steadily at her brother.

"Why did you give me that to read?" she said quietly.

"There could be only one reason," he replied; "to ask you if it is
true?"

"You _ask_ me? You expect an answer?"

"I don't see why you should object to say 'yes' or 'no' to a charge
which, if true, must destroy all brotherly and sisterly feeling between
us."

"But you _are_ my brother! Ask me your own questions, and I will answer.
I will not answer that woman's!"

She stood in front of him, by far the more proud and dignified of the
two, and waited for him to begin.

"Did you bring that man with you here from the prison?"

"I brought Mr. Walcott here."

"And is he here now?"

"Yes."

"What more is there to be said? Wretched woman, it is well for you that
your parents are beyond the reach of this disgrace!"

Whether he meant it or not, he pointed, as he spoke, to the infant in
her arms.

Lettice heard a step outside. She went to the door, and spoke in a low
voice to Mrs. Jenny. Then she came back again, and said,

"What do you mean, Sydney, by 'this disgrace'?"

"Can you say one word to palliate what you have already admitted? Can
you deny the facts which speak for themselves? Great Heaven! that such a
shameful thing should fall upon us! The name of Campion has indeed been
dragged through the mire of calumny, but never until now has so dark a
stain been cast upon it!"

Theatrical in his words, Sydney was even more theatrical in his action.
He stood on the hearth-rug, raised his hands in horror, and bowed his
head in grief and self-pity.

"You pointed at the child just now," said Lettice, steadily; "what do
you mean by that?"

"Do not ask me what I mean. Is not its very existence an indelible
disgrace?"

"Perhaps it is," she said, kissing the little face which was blinking
and smiling at her. "But to whom?"

"To whom!" Sydney cried, with more of real indignation and anger in his
voice. "To its miserable mother--to its unscrupulous and villainous
father!"

Lettice's keen ears caught the sound of light and hesitating footsteps
in the passage outside. She opened the door quickly, and drew in the
unfortunate Milly.

Sydney started back, and leaned for support upon the mantelpiece behind
him. His face turned white to the very lips.

"Milly," said the remorseless Lettice, "tell Mr. Campion who is the
father of this child!"

The poor mother who had been looking at her mistress in mute appeal,
turned her timid eyes on Sydney's face, then sank upon the floor in an
agony of unrestrained weeping.

Except for that sound of passionate weeping, there was complete silence
in the room for two or three minutes, whilst Sydney's better and worse
self strove together for the mastery.

"Milly!" he ejaculated at last, in a hoarse undertone, "I did not know!
Good God, I did not know."

Then, to his sister--"Leave us alone."

So Lettice went out, but before she went she saw him stride across the
floor to Milly and bend above her as if to raise and perhaps to comfort
her. He did not ask to see his sister again. In a short ten minutes, she
saw him walking hastily across the Common to the station, and she
noticed that his head was bent, and that the spring, the confidence of
his usual gait and manner had deserted him. Milly locked herself with
her baby in her room, and sobbed until she was quieted by sheer
exhaustion.

But there was on her face next day a look of peace and quietude which
Lettice had never seen before. She said not a word about her interview,
and Lettice never knew what had passed between her brother and the woman
whom he had wronged. But she thought sometimes, in after years, that the
extreme of self-abasement in man or woman may prove, to natures not
radically bad or hopelessly weak, a turning-point from which to date
their best and most persistent efforts.




CHAPTER XXXVII.

"COURAGE!"


The reawakening of Alan's mind to old tastes and old pursuits, though
fitful in the first instance, soon developed into a steady appetite for
work. Much of his former freshness and elasticity returned; ideas and
forms of expression recurred to him without trouble. He had seized on a
dramatic theme suggested in one of the books which Lettice had been
reading, and a few days later admitted to her that he was at work on a
poetic drama. She clapped her hands in almost childlike glee at the
news, and Alan, without much need for pressing, read to her a whole
scene which had passed from the phase of thought into written words.

Lettice had already occupied her mornings in writing the story which she
had promised to Mr. MacAlpine. Fortunately for her, she now found little
difficulty in taking up the threads of the romance which she had begun
at Florence. The change of feeling and circumstance which had taken
place in her own heart she transferred, with due reservation and
appropriate coloring, to the characters in her story, which thus became
as real to her in the London fog as it had been under the fleckless
Tuscan sky.

So long as Alan was out of health and listless, it was not easy for her
to apply herself to this regular morning work. But now that he was fast
recovering his spirit and energy, and was busy with work of his own, she
could settle down to her writing with a quiet mind.

Alan had not accepted the hospitality of Lettice without concern or
protest, and, of course, he had no idea of letting her be at the expense
of finding food and house-rent for him.

"Why do you not bring me the weekly bills?" he said, with masculine
bluntness, after he had been at Chiswick for nearly three weeks.

She looked at him with a pained expression, and did not answer.

"You don't think that I can live on you in this cool way much longer?
You are vexed with me! Do not be vexed--do not think that I value what
you have done for me according to a wretched standard of money. If I pay
everything, instead of you, I shall be far more grateful, and more truly
in your debt."

"But think of my feelings, too!" she said. "I have had my own way so
far, because you could not help it. If you are going to be unkind and
tyrannical as soon as you get well, I shall find it in my heart to be
almost sorry. Do not let money considerations come in! You promised that
you would not say anything of the kind before the end of the month."

"I promised something; but I don't think I am breaking my promise in
spirit. Look here; I have not been in retreat for six months without a
certain benefit in the way of economy. Here's a cheque for a hundred
pounds. I want you to get it cashed, and to use it."

"I have plenty of money," Lettice said, patting impatiently with her
foot on the floor. "I cannot take this; and until the month is out I
will not talk about any kind of business whatsoever. There, sir!"

Alan did not want to annoy her, and let the subject drop for the time.

"You shall have your way in all things, except that one," he said; "but
I will not mention it again until you give me leave."

The truth is that Lettice did not know what was to happen at the end of
the month, or whenever her tenancy of Bute Lodge might be concluded. How
was she to leave Alan, or to turn him out of doors, when the object of
her receiving him should have been accomplished? Was it already fully
accomplished? He had been saved from despair, and from the danger of a
physical relapse; was he now independent of anything she could do for
him? It gave her a pang to think of that possibility, but she would have
to think of it and to act upon it very soon. She could not put off the
evil day much beyond the end of November; before Christmas they must
come to an understanding--nay, she must come to an understanding with
her own heart; for did not everything depend on her firmness and
resolution?

Not everything! Though she did not know it, Alan was thinking for her
just what she could not think for herself. He could not fail to see that
Lettice had staked her reputation to do as she had done for him. As his
perception grew more keen, he saw with increasing clearness. A man just
recovering from serious illness will accept sacrifices from his friends
with little or no demur, which in full health he would not willingly
permit. Alan could not have saved Lettice from the consequences of her
own act, even if he had realized its significance from the first--which
he did not. But now he knew that she was giving more as a woman than he,
as a man, had ever thought of taking from her; and he also, with a
somewhat heavy heart, perceived that a change in their relations to one
another was drawing near.

Lettice was sitting in her little study one morning, turning over in her
mind the question which so deeply agitated her, and trying to think that
she was prepared for the only solution which appeared to be possible or
acceptable. Alan and she were to go their separate ways: that was, she
told herself, the one thing fixed and unalterable. They might meet again
as friends, and give each other help and sympathy; but it was their
irrevocable doom that they should live apart and alone. That which her
heart had sanctioned hitherto, it would sanction no longer; the cause
and the justification were gone, and so were the courage and the
confidence.

Lettice had appropriated to her own use as a study a little room on the
ground floor, opening upon the garden. In warm weather it was a
particularly charming place, for the long windows then always stood
open, and pleasant scents and sounds from the flower-beds and leafy
trees stole in to cheer her solitude. In winter, it was a little more
difficult to keep the rooms warm and cosy; but Lettice was one of the
women who have the knack of making any place where they abide look
home-like and inviting, and in this case her skill had not been spent in
vain, even upon a room for the furniture of which she was not altogether
responsible. Heavy tapestry curtains excluded the draught; a soft rug
lay before the old-fashioned high brass fender, and a bright fire burned
in the grate. Lettice's writing-table and library chair half filled the
room; but there was also a small table heaped high with books and
papers, a large padded leather easy-chair, and a bookcase. The walls
were distempered in a soft reddish hue, and such part of the floor as
was not covered with a bordered tapestry carpet of divers tints had been
stained dark brown. One of Lettice's favorite possessions, a large
autotype of the Sistine Madonna, hung on the wall fronting her
writing-table, so that she could see it in the pauses of her work.

It was at the door of this room that Alan knocked one stormy December
day. The month which Lettice had fixed as the period of silence about
business affairs had passed by; but Alan was so very far from strong
when November ended that she had managed, by persuasion and insistence,
to defer any new and definite arrangement for at least another
fortnight. But he had gained much physical and mental strength during
those two weeks, and he had felt more and more convinced from day to day
that between himself and Lettice there must now be a complete
understanding. He knew that she had taken the house until the end of
December; after that date she would be homeless, like himself. What were
they both to do? It was the question which he had come to put.

Lettice received him with a touch of surprise, almost of embarrassment
in her manner. She had never made him free of her study, for she felt it
better that each should have a separate domain for separate work and a
separate life. She had no wish to break down more barriers than
circumstances demanded; and the fact that she had utterly outraged the
laws of conventionality in the eyes of the world did not absolve her
from the delicate reticence which she had always maintained in her
personal relations with Alan. He saw the doubt in her face, and hastened
to apologize for his intrusion. "But I could not work this morning," he
said, "and I wanted to speak to you. Milly told me you were here,
and----"

"Oh, I am very glad to see you. Come and sit down."

"You are not too busy for a little talk?"

"Not at all."

She wheeled the leather-covered chair a little nearer to the fire, and
made him sit down on it. He cast his eye round the cheery room, noting
the books and papers that she was using, the evidences of steady work
and thought. The firelight leaped and glanced on the ruddy walls, and
the coals crackled in the grate; a dash of rain against the window, a
blast of wind in the distance, emphasized the contrast between the
warmth and light and restfulness within the house, the coldness and the
storm without.

Alan held his hands to the blaze, and listened for a moment to the wind
before he spoke.

"One does not feel inclined," he said, "to turn out on such a day as
this."

"Happily, you have no need to turn out," Lettice answered, taking his
words in their most literal sense.

"Not to day, perhaps; but very soon. Lettice, the time has come when we
must decide on our next step. I cannot stay here any longer--on our
present terms, at least. But I have not come to say good-bye. Is there
any reason why I should say good-bye--save for a time?"

He had risen from his chair as he spoke, and was standing before her.
Lettice shaded her eyes with her hands. Ah, if she could only give way
to the temptation which she felt vaguely aware that he was going to
raise! If she could only be weak in spite of her resolution to be
strong, if she could only take to herself at once the one consolation
and partnership which would satisfy her soul, how instantly would her
depression pass away! How easily with one word could she change the
whole current and complexion of life for the man who was bending over
her! He was still only half-redeemed from ruin; he might fall a prey to
despair again, if she shrank in the supreme moment from the sacrifice
demanded of her.

Alan did not know how her heart was pleading for him. Something, indeed,
he divined, as he saw her trembling and shaken by the strife within. His
heart bounded with sudden impulse from every quickened vein, and his
lips drew closer to her hidden face.

"Lettice!"

There was infinite force and tenderness in the whispered word, and it
pierced her to the quick. She dropped her hands, and looked up.

But one responsive word or glance, and he would have taken her in his
arms. He understood her face, her eyes, too well to do it. She gave him
no consent; if he kissed her, if he pressed her to his breast, he felt
that he should dominate her body only, not her soul. And he was not of
that coarse fibre which could be satisfied so. If Lettice did not give
herself to him willingly, she must not give herself at all.

"Lettice!" he said again, and there was less passion but more entreaty
in his tone than before he met that warning glance, "will you not let me
speak?"

"Is there anything for us to say," she asked, very gently, "except
_good-bye_?"

"Would you turn me away into the cold from the warmth and brightness of
your home, Lettice? Don't be angry with me for saying so. I have had
very little joy or comfort in my life of late, and it is to you that I
owe all that I know of consolation. You have rescued me from a very hell
of despair and darkness, and brought me into paradise. Now do you bid me
go? Lettice, it would be cruel. Tell me to stay with you ... and to the
last hour of my life I will stay."

He was standing beside her, with one hand on the wooden arm of her
circular chair. She put her hand over his fingers almost caressingly,
and looked up at him again, with tears in her sweet eyes.

"Have I not done what I wanted to do?" she said. "I found you weak,
friendless, ill; you have got back your strength, and you know that you
have at least one friend who will be faithful to you. My task is done;
you must go away now and fight the world--for my sake."

"For your sake? You care what I do, then: Lettice, you care for me? Tell
me that you love me--tell me, at last!"

She was silent for a moment, and he felt that the hand which rested on
his own fluttered as if it would take itself away. Was she offended?
Would she withdraw the mute caress of that soft pressure? Breathlessly
he waited. If she took her hand away, he thought that he should almost
cease to hope.

But the hand settled once more into its place. It even tightened its
pressure upon his fingers as she replied--

"I love you with all my heart," she said; "and it is just because I love
you that I want you to go away."

With a quick turn of his wrist he seized the hand that had hitherto lain
on his, and carried it to his lips. They looked into each other's eyes
with the long silent look which is more expressive even than a kiss.
Soul draws very near to soul when the eyes of man and woman meet as
theirs met then. The lips did not meet, but Alan's face was very close
to hers. When the pause had lasted so long that Lettice's eyelids
drooped, and the spell of the look was broken, he spoke again.

"Why should I go away? Why should the phantom of a dead past divide us?
We belong to one another, you and I. Think of what life might mean to
us, side by side, hand in hand, working, striving together, you the
stronger, giving me some of your strength, I ready to give you the love
you need--the love you have craved for--the love that you have won!
Lettice, Lettice, neither God nor man can divide us now!"

"Hush! you are talking wildly," she answered, in a very gentle tone.
"Listen to me, Alan. There is one point in which you are wrong. You
speak of a dead past. But the past is not dead, it lives for you still
in the person of--your wife."

"And you think that she should stand in our way? After all that she has
done? Can any law, human or divine, bind me to her now? Surely her own
acts have set me free. Lettice, my darling, do not be blinded by
conventional views of right and wrong. I know that if we had loved each
other and she had been a woman of blameless life, I should not be
justified in asking you to sacrifice for me all that the world holds
dear; but think of the life she has led--the shame she has brought upon
me and upon herself. Good God! is anyone in the world narrow-minded
enough and base enough to think that I can still be bound to her?"

"No, Alan; but your course is clear. You must set yourself free."

"Seek my remedy in the courts? Have all the miserable story bandied
about from lip to lip, be branded as a wretched dupe of a wicked woman
on whom he had already tried to revenge himself? That is what the world
would say. And your name would be brought forward, my dearest; it would
be hopeless to keep it in the background now. Your very goodness and
sweetness would be made the basis of an accusation.... I could not bear
it, I could not see you pilloried, even if I could bear the shame of it
myself."

He sank on his knees beside her, and let his head sink almost to her
shoulder. She felt that he trembled, she saw that his lips were pale,
and that the dew stood on his forehead. His physical strength had not
yet returned in full measure, and the contest with Lettice was trying it
to the utmost.

Lettice had turned pale too, but she spoke even more firmly than before.

"Alan," she said, "is this brave?"

"Brave? no!" he answered her. "I might be brave for myself, but how can
I be brave for you? You will suffer more than you have any conception
of, when you are held up to the scorn--the loathing--of the world. For
you know she will not keep to the truth--she will spit her venom upon
you--she will blacken your character in ways that you do not dream----"

"I think I have fathomed the depths," said Lettice, with a faint, wan
smile. "I saw her myself when you were in prison, and she has written to
my brother Sydney. Oh, yes," as he lifted his face and looked at her,
"she stormed, she threatened, she has accused ... what does it matter to
me what she says, or what the world says, either? Alan, it is too late
to care so much for name and fame. I crossed the line which marks the
boundary between convention and true liberty many weeks ago. The best
thing for me now, as well as for you, is to face our accusers gallantly,
and have the matter exposed to the light of day."

"I have brought this upon you!" he groaned.

"No, I have brought it on myself. Dear Alan, it is the hardest thing in
the world to be brave for those we love--we are much too apt to fear
danger or pain for them. Just because it is so hard, I ask you to do
this thing. Give me courage--don't sap my confidence with doubts and
fears. Let us be brave together, and for one another, and then we shall
win the battle and be at peace."

"It will be so hard for you."

"Not harder than it has been for you these many years. My poor dear my
heart has bled so many times to think how you have suffered! I am proud
to have a share in your suffering now. I am not ashamed to tell you that
I love you, for it is my love that is to make you strong and brave, so
that we may conquer the world together, despise its scorn, and meet its
sneers with smiles! We will not run away from it, like cowards! I come
of a fighting race on my mother's side, the very suggestion of flight
makes my blood boil, Alan! No, we will die fighting, if need be, but we
will not run away."

"Yes, yes, my brave darling, you are right. We will stand or fall
together. It was not for myself that I hesitated."

"I know--I know. So you see, dear, that we must part."

"For a time only."

"You will see Mr. Larmer to-morrow?"

"I will."

They were silent for a while. Her arm was round his neck, and his head
was resting against her wearily. It was Lettice who first roused
herself.

"This must not be," she said, drawing back her arm.

"Alan, let us be friends still--and nothing else. Let us have nothing to
reproach ourselves with by and by."

He sighed as he lifted his head from its resting place.

"I will go to Larmer to-day," he said. "There is nothing to be gained by
waiting. But--have you thought of all that that woman may do to us?
Lettice, I tremble almost for your life."

"I do not think she would attempt that."

"She threatened you?"

"With vitriol. She said that she would blind me so that I could not see
you--scar me so that you would not care to look upon my face. Ought I to
have told you? Alan, do not look so pale! It was a mere foolish threat."

"I am not so sure of that. She is capable of it--or of any other
fiendish act. If she injured you, Lettice----"

"Don't think of that. You say you will go to Mr. Larmer this afternoon."

"Yes. And then I will look out for lodgings. And you--what will you do?
Stay here?"

She shook her head. "I shall go into lodgings too. I have plenty of
work, and you--you will come to see me sometimes."

"As often as you will let me. Oh, Lettice, it is a hard piece of work
that you have given me to do!"

She took his hand in hers and pressed it softly. "I shall be grateful to
you for doing it," she said. There was a long silence. Alan stood by the
fire-place, his head resting upon his hand. Finally he spoke in a low
uncertain tone--

"There is one point I must mention. I think there may be a difficulty in
getting the divorce. I believe she claims that I condoned her--her
faults. I may find insuperable obstacles in my way."

Lettice drew a quick breath, and rose suddenly to her feet.

"We have nothing to do with that just now, Alan. You must try."

And then they said no more.

But when the afternoon came and Alan was ready to depart--for when once
he had made up his mind that he must go, he thought it better not to
linger--he drew Lettice inside her little study again, and looked her
full in the face.

"Lettice, before I go, will you kiss me once?"

She did not hesitate. She lifted her face, calmly and seriously, and
kissed him on the mouth.

But she was not prepared for the grip in which he seized her, and the
passionate pressure of her lips which he returned. "Lettice, my dearest,
my own love," he said, holding her close to him as he spoke, "suppose I
fail! If the law will not set me free, what will you do?"

She was silent for a minute or two, and he saw that her face grew pale.

"Oh," she said at last, in a sighing voice, broken at last by a
despairing sob, "if man's law is so hard, Alan, surely then we may trust
ourselves to God's!"

"Promise me," he said, "that you will never give me up--that, whatever
happens, you will one day be mine!"

"Whatever happens," she answered, "I am yours, Alan, in life or
death--in time and for eternity."

And with this assurance he was fain to be content.




CHAPTER XXXVIII.

SYDNEY PAYS HIS DEBTS.


The fight which Sydney Campion had had to wage with his creditors was
bitter enough up to the time of his marriage. Then there had been a lull
for a few months, during which it was confidently said and believed that
he was about to touch a large sum of money, and that all who had put
their trust in him would be rewarded.

Month after month went by, and there was no realization of the prospect.
Sydney touched no money but what he earned. He might, no doubt, have
touched some of his wife's money, even for the payment of his old debts,
if he had told her the distress that he was in. But it had never
occurred to him to be thus sincere with Nan. He had thought to figure
before her as one who was not dependent on her fortune, who could very
comfortably play with his hundreds, though not able, like herself, to be
generous with thousands. He would, in fact, have been ashamed to own his
rotten financial condition, either to Nan or to any of his social or
political friends; and he fancied that he was concealing this condition
in a very ingenious manner when he made a liberal outlay in connection
with their quiet marriage, the honeymoon abroad, and the subsequent
arrangements of their household in London.

This was all the more unfortunate because Nan, just of age, with her
fortune in her own hands, would have given him anything without demur or
question, if she had for a moment suspected that he needed it. His
concealment was so effectual that it never entered her unsophisticated
mind that this barrister in good practice, this rising politician, who
seemed to have his feet on the ladder of success, could be crushed and
burdened with debt. Sydney, however, was by no means blind. He knew well
enough that he could have had the few thousands necessary to clear him
if he had asked his wife for a cheque; but he did not trust her love
sufficiently to believe that she would think as well of him from that
day forward as she had done before, and he was not large-minded enough
to conceive himself as ever shaking off the sense of obligation which
her gift in such a form would impose upon him.

He had therefore drifted, in the matter of his debts, from expedient to
expedient, in the hope that by good fortune and good management he might
avoid the rocks that beset his course, and reach smooth water by his own
exertion. But, as ill luck would have it, he had given a bill for six
hundred pounds, due on the 23rd of November, to a certain Mr. Copley, a
man who had been especially disgusted by Sydney's failure to obtain
ready money at the time of his marriage, and who for this and other
reasons had worked himself up into a malicious frame of mind. But on the
23rd of November, Sydney and his wife had run over to Paris for a few
days with Sir John and Lady Pynsent, and then Nan had been so seriously
indisposed that Sydney could not leave her without seeming unkindness;
so that they did not reach London again until the 26th. This delay
opened a chapter of incidents which ended as Sydney had not foreseen.

He had not forgotten the date of the bill, and knew that it was
important to provide for it; but he did not anticipate that the last day
of grace would have expired before he could communicate with the man who
held his signature.

Early on the morning of the 27th, he set out for Mr. Copley's office;
and it so happened that at the same moment Mr. Copley set out also for
Sydney's private house.

"Master in?" said Mr. Copley, who was a man of few words.

"No, sir."

"Lady in?"

"My mistress does not receive any one so early."

"Take that up--answer important--bearer waiting."

The footman condescended so far as this, and gave Mr. Copley's letter
into the charge of Mrs. Campion's maid.

In less than ten minutes Nan sent for the unwelcome visitor. She was
very pale when she received him, and she looked so young and fair that
Mr. Copley was a little taken aback. He knew that Sydney had married an
heiress, and it was from her, therefore, that he had determined, if
possible, to get the money; but he half repented his resolve when he saw
Mrs. Campion's face. "Too young to know anything about business," he
said to himself.

But Nan was more business-like than he expected. She had for some time
insisted on knowing a good deal about her own money matters, and she was
well aware of her powers.

"Where is this paper--this acceptance you mention in your letter?" she
began.

Mr. Copley silently took it from his notebook, and laid it on the table.

"Why did you bring this here? or, rather, why did you send it in to me?
Mr. Campion is not difficult to find when he is wanted. This is, of
course, _his_ business." There was a little indignation in her tone.

"Beg your pardon, madam. You will observe the date of the acceptance. I
presented it yesterday."

"At the bank?"

"Yes."

Nan bit her lip. She knew what this signified, and she would have given
a thousand pounds to undo what had happened.

She went to a drawer in her writing-table and quietly took out a
cheque-book. "We were delayed in returning to England by my illness,"
she said, as indifferently as she could. "Mr. Campion has gone out for
the purpose of seeing to this." Her heart smote her for making a
statement which she could not vouch for, but as Mr. Copley only bowed
and looked uninterested, she went on rapidly, "As you have the paper
with you it will save time--it will be satisfactory, I suppose--if I
give you a cheque for it?"

"Amply satisfactory."

She sat down before the table and took the pen in her hand, hesitating a
moment as to whether she ought to ask for further details. Her tears and
her curiosity were alike aroused, and Mr. Copley divined the question,
which she hardly knew how to put into words. He produced a sheet of
notepaper, containing a few memoranda, and passed it across the table.

"That was to refresh my memory if necessary; but happily it isn't. Mr.
Campion may like to see it however. He will find it is all correct. I
knew I was right in asking to see you, ma'am."

Nan did not look at the memoranda. She was satisfied that she had the
details before her for her own or Sydney's consideration if necessary.
She signed her cheque and took possession of the dishonored bill; and
then Mr. Copley departed.

When he was gone, she caught up the sheet of paper and hastily glanced
at it.

"1880--studs, pin, money advanced L50. 1881--ring, money advanced L100;
bracelet, necklace, pendant, money advanced L150----" and so on. Further
down the page, Nan's eye was caught by the words: "Diamond and sapphire
ring."

"Ah!" she said, catching her breath as if she were in pain, and laying
the paper down on the table, "_that_ was mine!"

The ring was on her finger as she spoke. It had been her engagement
ring. She looked at it for a minute or two, then slowly, took it off and
put it into the drawer.

Next, with an absent look upon her face, she took up a small taper, and
lighted it; and, holding Mr. Copley's paper by one corner, she raised it
to the flame and converted it into ashes. One line escaped. A fragment
of the paper was scorched but not consumed, and as she took it up to
make her work more thorough, the words and a date caught her attention
once again.

"Bracelet, necklace, pendant, bought after we knew each other," she
murmured with a curious smile. "Those were _not_ for me. I wonder----"

But she did not go on. It was the first time that a shadow from Sydney's
past had crossed her life; and she dared not investigate it too closely.
She put the bill and her cheque-book out of sight, and sat down to think
over the present position of affairs.

Sydney came home just before lunch-time, and, hearing that she was in
her own little sitting-room (she would not have it called a boudoir),
went up to her. He looked vexed and anxious, as Nan was quick to notice,
but he came up to her side and kissed her affectionately.

"Better, Nan?" She had not been very well when he left her: indeed, the
delicacy of her health had lately been more marked, and had several
times given him cause for uneasiness.

"Yes, thank you. But you don't look well, Sydney."

She hoped that he would tell her what was wrong. To her disappointment,
he smiled, and answered lightly.

"I'm all right, Nan. I have a good deal to do just now, and am rather
tired--that is all."

"Tired--and anxious?" she said, looking at him with more keenness than
he had thought her soft eyes capable of expressing.

"Anxious! no, I have not much to be anxious about, have I?"

He spoke with a laugh; but, to her fancy, there was something
half-alarmed and half-defiant in the pose of his lifted head, the glance
of his handsome bright eyes. Her heart sank a little: it seemed to her
that it would have been nobler in her husband to tell her the whole
truth, and it had never occurred to her before to think of him as
ignoble in any way.

"I suppose you do not want to tell me for fear of troubling me," she
said, with a tremor in her voice; "but I think I know what you are
anxious about, Sydney."

He gave a little start as he turned towards her.

"Some man has been here whilst you were out, and he sent up this letter
with a request that it should be opened. Look!" she said, giving him the
bill, "you can tear it up now. I was sure you had gone out to see about
it, but I thought it better that I should settle it at once. I
hope"--with a little girlish nervousness--"you don't mind?"

He had sat down on a chair when she showed him Mr. Copley's letter, with
the look of a man determined to bear a blow, but he sprang up again at
the sight of his dishonored acceptance.

"And you have paid it, Nan?" he cried.

"Yes, I paid it. Oh, Sydney, it was a little thing to do! If only you
had told me months ago!"

Her eyes brimmed over with tears at last. She had been smarting under a
sense of terrible humiliation ever since Mr. Copley's visit, but
hitherto she had not wept. Now, when her husband took her in his arms
and looked into her eyes, the pain at her heart was somewhat assuaged,
although the tears fell swiftly down her pale cheeks.

"Nan, I never dreamed that I should find your kindness so bitter to me,"
Sydney said.

He was profoundly moved by her gentleness and by her generosity alike.
But inasmuch as it requires more generosity of nature to accept a gift
nobly than to make it, he felt himself shamed in her eyes, and his wife
was in her turn pained by the consciousness of his shame.

"Why should you be afraid to trust me?" she said. "All that concerns you
concerns me as well; and I am only setting myself free from trouble and
anxiety if I do anything for you. Don't you understand? And as far as my
money is concerned, you know very well that if it had not been for John
and those tiresome lawyers, you should have had it all and spent it, if
you chose, without the slightest reference to me. What grieves me,
dearest, is that you should have been suffering without taking me into
your confidence."

"I ought to have done so," said Sydney, rather reluctantly, "but I felt
as if I could not tell you all these paltry, sordid details. You might
have thought----"

Then he paused, and the color rose darkly in his face.

"I should have thought nothing but what was honorable to you," said Nan,
throwing back her graceful head with a gesture of natural pride and
indignation.

"And now you think the worse of me?"

"No, no!" she cried, stealing one arm round his neck, "I think nothing
bad of you--nothing! Only you _will_ trust me, now, Sydney? You will not
hide things from me again?"

"No, my darling, nothing that you ought to know," he said. There was a
touch of new but restrained emotion in his voice. It struck him for
almost the first time how much of his life he had hidden from her frank
and innocent eyes.

Presently, when he had kissed her tears away, she begged him to tell her
what he still actually owed, and, after some little demur, he consented.
The amount of the debt, which lay heavily on his conscience, was
comparatively a trivial thing to her. But when he had told her all, she
looked at him with eyes which, although very loving, were full of wonder
and dismay.

"Poor Sydney!" she said caressingly. "My poor boy! As if you could give
your mind properly to anything with this heavy burden on it! To-morrow
we can get the money, and pay off all these people. Then you will be
able to work without any disturbance."

"Thanks to you, Nan," said her husband, with bowed head. She could not
understand why he did not look more relieved. She never suspected that
his mind was burdened with another debt, that money could not pay.

She had not asked him for any explanation of the items in the paper that
she had read. The momentary wonder that had flitted across her mind
passed as quickly as it came. The gifts that were not for her had been
intended perhaps for his sister Lettice, perhaps for the wedding present
of a friend. She did not like to ask. But a slightly uncomfortable
sensation remained in her mind, and she never again wore the ring for
which, as it now turned out, she herself had had to pay.

Sydney's position was certainly a painful one just then. But he was at
any rate relieved of the burden of his debts, and he hoped, with some
compunction of heart, that no other secret of his life would ever come
to his wife's ears. It was about this time that he received the letter
from Cora Walcott and had the interview with Lettice, of which mention
has been made; and Nan fancied that it was anxiety about his sister that
caused him to show signs of moodiness and depression. He had told her
nothing more of Lettice's doings than he was obliged to tell, but other
friends were not so reticent, and Lady Pynsent had enlightened Nan's
mind very speedily with respect to the upshot of "the Walcott affair."
Nan made some reference to it shortly afterwards in conversation with
her husband, and was struck by the look of pain which crossed his face
as he replied,

"Don't talk about it, Nan, my dear."

"He must be much fonder of his sister than I thought," Nan said to
herself. She made one more effort to speak.

"Could I do nothing, Sydney? Suppose I went to her, and told her how
grieved you were----"

"You, Nan! For heaven's sake, don't let me hear of your crossing the
threshold of that house!" cried Sydney, with vehemence, which Nan very
naturally misunderstood.

It was, on the whole, a relief to her to find that he did not want her
to take any active steps in any direction. She was not very strong, and
was glad to be left a good deal at peace. Sydney was out for a great
part of the day, and Nan took life easily. Lady Pynsent came to sit with
her sometimes, or drove in the Park with her, and other friends sought
her out: she had tender hopes for the future which filled her mind with
sweet content, and she would have been happy but for that slight jar
between Sydney and herself. That consciousness of a want of trust which
never ceased to give her pain. Sydney himself was the most attentive of
husbands when he was at home: he brought her flowers and fruit, he read
aloud to her, he hung over her as she lay on the sofa, and surrounded
her with a hundred little marks of his affection--such as she would have
thought delicious while her confidence in him was still unshaken. She
still found pleasure in them; but her eyes were keener than they had
been, and she knew that beneath all the manifestations of his real and
strong attachment to her there ran a vein of apology and misgiving--a
state of things inexpressibly unsatisfactory to a woman who knows how to
love and how to trust.

Sydney, only half-conscious that something was wrong, had no idea how to
mend matters, and was, therefore, in a fair way to make them worse.
Frankness would have appeared brutal to him, and he did not see how
subtly poisonous was the effect of his habits of concealment upon his
wife's mind. Gifted with the instinct of discernment, which in sensitive
women is almost like a sort of second-sight, she knew, without knowing
how she knew, that he had trouble which he did not confide to her,
secrets which his tongue would never tell. He could deceive her as to
their existence so long as the period of illusion lasted; but as soon as
her eyes were opened her sight became very keen indeed. And he,
believing himself always successful in throwing dust in her eyes,
fancied that her wistful look, her occasional unresponsiveness to his
caresses, proceeded from physical causes only, and would with them also
pass away.

Thus December left them, and the dark foggy days of January flew apace.
It was close upon February before Nan recovered from a severe cold which
had assailed her about Christmas time, and left her very weak. For a
week or two she was confined entirely to her room, and when she came
downstairs she was forced for a time to keep to the warm atmosphere of
one sitting-room. But one day, when February was close at hand, and the
fogs had begun to clear away, she felt so much stronger that she
resolved to make a new departure and show Sydney that she was really
better. Instead of going into the drawing-room, therefore, she came down
another flight of stairs, and resolved to establish herself in Sydney's
study, ready to greet him on his return.

But Sydney was late, and she was rather weaker than she knew. She had
her tea, and ordered lights to be brought in, and the curtains drawn,
but still he did not come. Then she found that the lights hurt her eyes,
and she had them extinguished--all but one small silver lamp which stood
on a centre-table, and gave a very subdued light. Her maid came and put
a soft fur rug over her, and at her orders moved a screen of carved
woodwork, brought from an Arab building in Algeria, between her and the
fire before she left the room. Thus comfortably installed, the warmth
and the dimness of the light speedily made Nan sleepy. She forgot to
listen for the sound of her husband's latchkey; she fell fast asleep,
and must have remained so for the greater part of an hour.

The fire went down, and its flickering flame no longer illuminated the
room. The soft light of the lamp did not extend very far, and the
screen, which was tall and dark, threw the sofa on which Nan lay into
deep shadow. The rug completely covered the lower part of her dress, and
as the sofa stood between the wall and the fire-place on that side of
the room furthest removed from the door, any one entering might easily
believe that the room was empty. Indeed, unless Nan stirred in her
sleep, there was nothing at all to show that she was lying on the couch.

Thus, when Sydney entered his study about a quarter to seven, with a
companion whom he had found waiting for him on the door-step, it would
have been impossible for him to conjecture the presence of his wife. He
did not light another lamp. The first words of his visitor had startled
him into forgetting that the room was dark--perhaps, as the interview
went on, he was glad of the obscurity into which his face was thrown.
And the sounds of the low-toned conversation did not startle Nan from
her slumber all at once. She had heard several sentences before she
realized where she was and what she was listening to, and then very
natural feelings kept her silent and motionless.

"No, I've not come for money," were the first words she heard. "Quite a
different errand, Mr. Campion. It is some weeks since I left you now,
and I left you because I had a competency bequeathed to me by an uncle."

"Pleased to hear it, I am sure, Johnson," was Sydney's response. "As you
mentioned the name of another person, I thought that you had perhaps had
a letter from her----"

"I have seen her, certainly, several times of late. And I am the bearer
of a message from her. She has always regretted that she took a certain
sum of money from you when she first found out how you had deceived her;
and she wishes you to understand that she wants nothing more from you.
The fact is, sir, I have long been very sorry for her misfortunes, and
now that I am independent, I have asked her to marry me and go with me
to America."

There was a little silence. "I am quite willing to provide for the
child," said Sydney, "and----"

"No," said the man, almost sternly; "hear me out first, Mr. Campion. She
owes her misery to you, and, no doubt, you have always thought that
money could make atonement. But that's not my view, nor hers. We would
rather not give you the satisfaction of making what _you_ call
restitution. Milly's child--your child, too--will be mine now; I shall
adopt it for my own when I marry her. You will have nothing to do with
either of them. And I have brought you back the twenty pounds which you
gave her when you cruelly deserted her because you wanted to marry a
rich woman. In that parcel you will find a locket and one or two other
things that you gave her. I have told her, and Miss Campion, who has
been the best of friends to us both, has told her that she must
henceforth put the memory of you behind her, and live for those whom she
loves best."

"Certainly; it is better that she should," said Sydney.

"That is all I have to say," Johnson remarked, "except that I shall do
my best to help her to forget the past. But if ever _you_ can forget
your own cruelty and black treachery and villainy towards her----"

"That will do. I will not listen to insult from you or any man."

"You should rather be grateful to me for not exposing you to the world,"
said Johnson, drily, as he moved towards the door. "If it knew all that
I know, what would your career be worth, Mr. Campion? As it is, no one
knows the truth but ourselves and your sister, and all I want to remind
you of is, that if we forget it, and if you forget it, I believe there
is a God somewhere or other who never forgets."

"I am much obliged to you for the reminder," said Sydney, scornfully.
But he could not get back the usual clearness of his voice.

Johnson went out without another word, and a minute later the front door
was heard to close after him. Sydney stood perfectly still until that
sound was heard. Then he moved slowly towards the table, where an
envelope and a sealed packet were lying side by side. He looked at them
for a minute or two, and flung himself into an arm-chair beside the
table with an involuntary groan of pain. He was drawing the packet
towards him, when a movement behind the screen caused him to spring
desperately to his feet.

It was Nan, who had risen from the sofa and stood before him, her face
white as the gown she wore, her eyes wide with a new despair, her
fingers clutching at the collar of her dress as if the swelling throat
craved the relief of freedom from all bands. Sydney's heart contracted
with a sharp throb of pain, anger, fear--he scarcely knew which was
uppermost. It flashed across his mind that he had lost everything in
life which he cared for most--that Nan would despise him, that she would
denounce him as a sorry traitor to his friends, that the story--a
sufficiently black one, as he knew--would be published to the world.
Disgrace and failure had always been the things that he had chiefly
feared, and they lay straight before him now.

"I heard," Nan said, with white lips and choking utterance. "I was
asleep when you came, but I think I heard it all. Is it true? There was
some one--some one--that you left--for me?--some one who ought to have
been your wife?"

"I swear I never loved anyone but you," he broke out, roughly and
abruptly, able neither to repel nor to plead guilty to the charge she
made, but miserably conscious that his one false step might cost him all
that he held most dear. To Nan, the very vagueness and--as she deemed
it--the irrelevance of his answer constituted an acknowledgment of
guilt.

"Sydney," she murmured, catching at the table for support, and speaking
so brokenly that he had difficulty in distinguishing the words,
"Sydney--I cannot pay _this_ debt!"

And then she fell at his feet in a swoon, which at first he mistook for
death.




CHAPTER XXXIX.

"SO SHALL YE ALSO REAP."


For some time Nan's life hung in the balance. It seemed as though a
straw either way would suffice to turn the scales. Dead silence reigned
in the house in Thurloe Square: the street outside was ankle-deep in
straw: doctors and nurses took possession of Nan's pretty rooms, where
all her graceful devices and gentle handicrafts were set aside, and
their places filled with a grim array of medicaments. The servants, who
loved their mistress, went about with melancholy faces and muffled
voices; and the master of the house, hitherto so confident and
self-reliant, presented to the world a stony front of silent desolation,
for which nobody would have given Sydney Campion credit.

"Over-exertion or mental shock must have brought it on," said the
doctor, when questioned by Lady Pynsent as to the cause of Mrs.
Campion's illness.

"She can't have had a mental shock," said Lady Pynsent, decidedly. "She
must have over-excited herself. Do you know how she did it, Sydney?"

"She fainted at my feet almost as soon as I saw her," said Sydney. "I
don't know what she had been doing all the afternoon."

Nobody else seemed to know, either. The maid bore witness that her
mistress had insisted on going downstairs, and it was generally supposed
that this expedition had been too much for her strength. Only Sydney
knew better, and he would not confide his knowledge to Lady Pynsent,
although he spoke with more freedom to the doctor.

"Yes, she had bad news which distressed her. She fainted upon hearing
it."

"That did the mischief. She was not in a condition to bear excitement,"
said the doctor, rather sharply; but he was sorry for his words, when he
noted the distressed look on Sydney's face. He was the more sorry for
him when it was discovered that he could not be admitted to the
sick-room, for his appearance sent Nan's pulse up to fever-height at
once, although she did not openly confess her agitation. The only thing
that Sydney could do was to retire, baffled and disconsolate, to his
study, where he passed the night in a state of indescribable anxiety and
excitement.

When the fever abated, Nan fell into such prostration of strength that
it was difficult to believe she would ever rise from her bed again.
Weaker than a baby, she could move neither hand nor foot: she had to be
fed like an infant, at intervals of a few minutes, lest the flame of
life, which had sunk so low, should suddenly go out altogether. It was
at this point of her illness that she fainted when Sydney once persuaded
the doctor to let him enter her room, and the nurses had great
difficulty in bringing her back to consciousness. After which, there was
no more talk of visits from her husband, and Sydney had to resign
himself to obtaining news of her from the doctor and the nurses, who, he
fancied, looked at him askance, as blaming him in their hearts for his
wife's illness.

"I can't make Nan out," said Lady Pynsent to him one day. "She is so
depressed--she cries if one looks at her almost--and yet the very thing
that I expected her to be unhappy about does not affect her in the
least."

"What do you mean?" said Sydney.

"Why, her disappointment about her baby, of course. I said something
about it, and she just whispered, 'I'm very glad.' I suppose it is
simply that she feels so weak, otherwise I should have thought it
unnatural in Nan, who was always so fond of children."

Sydney made no answer. He was beginning to find this state of things
intolerable. After all, he asked himself, what had he done that his wife
should be almost killed by the shock of finding out that he had
behaved--as other men behaved? But that sort of reasoning would not do.
His behavior to Milly had been, as he knew, singularly heartless; and he
had happened to marry a girl whose greatest charm to him had been her
tenderness of heart, her innocent candor, and that purity of mind which
comes of hatred--not ignorance--of sin. A worldlier woman would not have
been so shocked; but he had never desired less crystalline transparency
of mind--less exquisite whiteness of soul, for Nan. No; that was the
worst of it: the very qualities that he admired and respected in her
bore witness against him now.

He remembered the last hours of his father's life--how they had been
embittered by his selfish anger, for which he had never been able to
make amends. Was his wife also to die without giving him a word of
forgiveness, or hearing him ask her pardon? If she died, he knew that he
would have slain her as surely as if he had struck her to the ground
with his strong right hand. For almost the first time in his life Sydney
found himself utterly unnerved by his anxiety. His love for Nan was the
truest and strongest emotion that he had ever felt. And that his love
for her should be sullied in her eyes by comparison with the transient
influence which Milly had exercised over him was an intolerable outrage
on his best and holiest affections and on hers. "What must she think of
me?" he said to himself; and he was fain to confess that she could not
think much worse of him than he deserved. It was a bitter harvest that
he was reaping from seed that he himself had sown.

He was almost incapable of work during those terrible days when he did
not know whether Nan would live or die. He got through as much as was
absolutely imperative; but he dreaded being away from the house, lest
that "change," of which the nurses spoke, should come during his
absence; and he managed to stay at home for many hours of the day.

But at last the corner was turned: a little return of strength was
reported, and by and by the doctor assured him that, although his
patient still required very great care, the immediate danger was past,
and there was at least a fair hope of her ultimate recovery. But he
might not see her--yet.

So much was gained; but Sydney's spirits did not rise at once. He was
conscious of some relief from the agony of suspense, but black care and
anxiety sat behind him still. He was freer to come and go, however, than
he had been for some time, and the first use he made of his liberty was
to go to the very person whom he had once vowed never to see again--his
sister Lettice.

She had written to him since his interview with her at Bute Lodge. She
had told him of Alan's departure, and--to some extent--of its cause: she
had given him the address of the lodgings to which she was now going
(for a continued residence at Bute Lodge was beyond her means), and she
sent him her sisterly love--and that was all. She had not condescended
to any justification of her own conduct, nor had she alluded to the
accusations that he had made, nor to his own discomfiture. But there had
been enough quiet warmth in the letter to make him conscious that he
might count on her forgiveness and affection if he desired it. And he
did desire it. In the long hours of those sleepless nights and weary
days in which he had waited for better news of Nan, it was astonishing
to find how clearly the years of his boyhood had come back to him--those
quiet, peaceful years in which he had known nothing of the darker sides
of life, when the serene atmosphere of the rectory and the village had
been dear to his heart, and Lettice had been his cherished companion and
trusty comrade in work or play. It was like going back into another
world--a purer and a truer world than the one in which he lived now.

And in these hours of retrospect, he came to clearer and truer
conclusions respecting Lettice's character and course of action than he
had been able to do before he was himself smitten by the hand of Fate.
Lettice was interpreted to him by Nan. There _were_ women in the world,
it seemed, who had consciences, and pure hearts, and generous emotions:
it was not for him to deny it now. And he had been very hard on Lettice
in days gone by. He turned to her now with a stirring of affection which
he had not known for years.

But when he entered Lettice's room, and she came to meet him, gravely,
and with a certain inquiry in her look, he suddenly felt that he had no
reason to give for his appearance there.

"Sydney!" she had exclaimed in surprise. Then, after the first long
glance, and with a quick change of tone: "Sydney, are you ill?"

For he was haggard and worn, as she had never seen him, with dark lines
under his eyes, and an air of prostration and fatigue.

"No, I'm very well. It's Nan--my wife," he said, avoiding her alarmed
gaze.

"I am sorry--very sorry. Is she----"

"She has been on the brink of death. There is some hope now. I don't
know why I came here unless it was to tell you so," said Sydney, with an
odd abruptness which seemed to be assumed in order to mask some
unusually strong feeling. "I suppose you know that the man Johnson came
to see me----"

"Yes: they have gone," said Lettice, quickly. "They were married
yesterday, and sailed this morning."

"Ah! Well, _she_ was in the room when he--made his communication to me.
I did not know it--Johnson never knew it at all. She had been
asleep--but she woke and heard what he said. She fainted--and she has
been ill ever since." He added a few words concerning the technicalities
of his wife's case.

"Oh, Sydney!--my poor Sydney! I am so sorry," said Lettice, her eyes
full of tears. For she saw, by his changed manner, something of what his
trouble had been, and she instantly forgot all causes of complaint
against him. He was sitting sideways on a chair, with his head on his
hand; and when she put her arms round his neck and kissed him, he did
not repulse her--indeed, he kissed her in return, and seemed comforted
by her caress.

"I can't even see her," he went on. "She faints if I go into the room.
How long do you think it will last, Lettice? Will she ever get over it,
do you think?"

"If she loves you, I think she will, Sydney. But you must give her time.
No doubt it was a great shock to her," said Lettice.

He looked at her assentingly, and then stared out of the window as if
absorbed in thought. The result of his reflections seemed to be summed
up in a short sentence which, certainly, Lettice had never expected to
hear from Sydney's lips:--

"I can't think how I came to be such a damned fool. I beg your pardon,
Lettice; but it's true."

"Can I be of any use to you--or to her?"

"Thank you, I don't think so--just yet. I don't know--"
heavily--"whether she will want you some day to tell her all you know."

"Oh, no, Sydney!"

"You must do just what you think best about it. I shall put no barriers
in the way. Perhaps she had better know everything now."

Then he roused himself a little and looked at her kindly.

"How are you getting on?" he said. "Writing as usual?"

"Yes, I am busy, and doing very well."

"You look thin and fagged."

"Oh, Sydney, if you could but see yourself!"

He smiled at this, and then rose to go.

"But you will stay and have tea with me? Do, Sydney--if only," and
Lettice's voice grew low and deep, "if only in token that there is peace
between us."

So he stayed; and, although they spoke no more of the matters that were
dearest to their hearts, Lettice's bitterness of feeling towards her
brother disappeared, and Sydney felt vaguely comforted in his trouble by
her sympathy.

She did not tell him of the strange marriage-scene which she had
witnessed the day before--when Milly, almost hysterical from
over-wrought feeling, had vowed to be a true and faithful wife to the
man who had pitied and succored her in the time of her sorest need: of
Johnson's stolid demeanor, covering a totally unexpected fund of
good-feeling and romance; or of his extraordinary desire, which Lettice
had seen carried out, that the baby should be present at its mother's
wedding, and should receive--poor little mite--a fatherly kiss from him
as soon as he had kissed the forlorn and trembling bride. For Milly,
although she professed to like and respect Michael Johnson, shrank
somewhat from the prospect of life in another country, and was nervous
and excitable to a degree which rather alarmed her mistress. Lettice
confessed on reflection, however, that Johnson knew exactly how to
manage poor little Milly; and that he had called smiles to her face in
the very midst of a last flood of tears; and that she had no fear for
the girl's ultimate happiness. Johnson had behaved in a very
straightforward, manly and considerate way; and in new surroundings, in
a new country, with a kind husband and good prospects, Milly was likely
to lead a very happy and comfortable life. Lettice was glad to think so;
and was more sorry to see the baby go than to part from Milly. Indeed,
she had offered to adopt it; but Johnson was so indignant, and Milly so
tearful, at the idea, that she had been forced to relinquish her desire.
All this, however, she withheld from Sydney; as also her expedition to
the station to see the little party start for Liverpool, and Milly's
grief at parting with the forbearing mistress whom she had once
deceived, and who had been, after all, her truest friend.

       *       *       *       *       *

Nan began, very slowly, but surely, to amend; and Sydney, going back to
his usual pursuits, seemed busier than ever.

But, in spite of himself, he was haunted night and day by the fear of
what would happen next; of what Nan meant to do when she grew strong.
Would she ever forgive him? And if she did not forgive him, what would
she do? Tell the whole story to Sir John, and insist on returning to her
brother's house? That would be an extreme thing, and Sir John--who was a
man of the world--would probably pooh pooh her virtuous indignation; but
Nan had a way of carrying out her resolves whether Sir John pooh-poohed
them or not. And supposing that Nan separated herself from him, Sydney
could not but see that a very serious imputation would be thrown on his
character, even if the true story were not known in all its details.
That mock marriage--which he had not at first supposed that Milly had
taken seriously--had a very ugly sound. And he had made too many enemies
for the thing to be allowed to drop if once it came to the light.

His career was simply at the mercy of two women--the Johnsons were not,
he thought, likely to break silence--and if either of them should prove
to be indiscreet or vindictive, he was a ruined man. He had injured and
insulted his sister: he had shocked and horrified his wife. What Nan
though of him he could not tell. He had always believed that women were
too small-minded to forget an injury, to forgive an insult, or to keep
silence regarding their husbands' transgressions. If Nan once enlisted
Sir John's sympathies on her side, he knew that, although he might
ultimately recover from the blow inflicted by his brother-in-law's
offense and anger, his chance of success in life would be diminished.
And for what a cause? He writhed as he thought of the passing,
contemptuous fancy, for the indulgence of which he might have to
sacrifice so much and had already sacrificed part of what was dearest in
life to him. Yes, he told himself, he was at Nan's mercy, and he had not
hitherto found women very ready to hold their hands when weapons had
been put into them, and all the instincts of outraged vanity made them
strike.

Sydney Campion prided himself on a wide experience of men and women, and
a large acquaintance with human nature. But he did not yet know Nan.

       *       *       *       *       *

The story which had been so suddenly unfolded to her had struck her to
the earth with the force of a blow, for more than one reason, but
chiefly because she had trusted Sydney so completely. She was not so
ignorant of the ways of men as to believe that their lives were always
free from stain; indeed she knew more than most girls of the weakness
and wickedness of mankind, partly because she was well acquainted with
many Vanebury working-people, who were her tenants, partly because Lady
Pynsent was a woman of the world and did not choose that Nan should go
about with her eyes closed, and partly because she read widely and had
never been restricted in the choice of books. She was not a mere
ignorant child, shrinking from knowledge as if it were contamination,
and blindly believing in the goodness and innocence of all men. But this
theoretical acquaintance with the world had not saved her from the error
into which women are apt to fall--the error of setting up her lover on a
pedestal and believing that he was not as other men. She was punished
for her mistake, she told herself bitterly, by finding that he was even
worse, not better, than other men, whose weaknesses she had contemned.

For there had been a strain of meanness and cruelty in Sydney's behavior
to the girl whom he had ruined which cut his wife to the heart. She had
been taught, and she had tried--with some misgiving--to believe that she
ought to be prepared to condone a certain amount of levity, of
"wildness," even, in her husband's past; but here she saw deliberate
treachery, cold-blooded selfishness, which startled her from her dream
of happiness. Nan was a little too logical for her own peace of mind.
She could not look at an action as an isolated fact in a man's life: it
was an outcome of character. What Sydney had done showed Sydney as he
was. And, oh, what a fall was there! how different from the ideal that
she had hoped to see realized in him!

It never once occurred to Nan to take either Sir John or Lady Pynsent
into her confidence. Sydney was quite mistaken in thinking that she
would fly to them for consolation. She would have shrunk sensitively
from telling them any story to his discredit. Besides, she shrewdly
suspected that they would not share her disappointment, her sense of
disillusion; Sir John had more than once laughed in an oddly amused way
when she dropped a word in praise of Sydney's high-mindedness and
generous zeal for others. "Campion knows which side his bread's
buttered," he had once made her angry by saying. She had not the
slightest inclination to talk to them of Sydney's past life and
character.

Besides, she knew well enough that she had no actual cause of complaint
in the eyes of the world. Her husband was not bound to tell her all that
happened to him before he met her; and he had severed all connection
with that unhappy young woman before he asked her, Anna Pynsent, to be
his wife. Nan's grievance was one of those intangible grievances which
bring the lines into so many women's faces and the pathos into their
eyes--the grievance of having set up an idol and seen it fall. The
Sydney Campion who had deceived and wronged a trusting girl was not the
man that she had known and loved. That was all. It was nothing that
could be told to the outer world, nothing that in itself constituted a
reason for her leaving him and making him a mark for arrows of scandal
and curiosity; but it simply killed outright the love that she had
hitherto borne him, so that her heart lay cold and heavy in her bosom as
a stone.

So frozen and hard it seemed to her, that she could not bring herself to
acknowledge that certain words spoken to her husband by the stranger had
had any effect on her at all. In the old days, as she said to herself,
they would have hurt her terribly. "_You cruelly deserted her because
you wanted to marry a rich woman._" She, Nan, was the rich woman for
whom Sydney Campion had deserted another. It was cruel to have made
_her_ the cause of Sydney's treachery--the instrument of his fall. She
had never wished to wrong anyone, nor that anyone should be wronged for
her sake. She would not, she thought, have married Sydney if she had
known this story earlier. Why had he married her?--ah, there came in the
sting of the sentence which she had overheard: "You wanted to marry a
rich woman." Yes, she was rich. Sydney had not even paid her the very
poor compliment of deserting another woman because he loved her best--he
had loved her wealth and committed a base deed to gain it, that was all.

She was unjust to Sydney in this; but it was almost impossible that she
should not be unjust. The remembrance of his burden of debt came back to
her, of the bill that he could not meet, of the list of his liabilities
which he had been so loath to give her, and she told herself that he had
desired nothing but her wealth and the position that she could give him.
To attain his own ends he had made a stepping-stone of her. He was
welcome to do so. She would make it easy for him to use her money, so
that he need never know the humiliation of applying to her for it. Now
that she understood what he wanted, she would never again make the
mistake of supposing that he cared for her. But it was hard on her--hard
to think that she had given the love of her youth to a man who valued
her only for her gold; hard to know that the dream of happiness was
over, and that the brightness of her life was gone. It was no wonder
that Nan's recovery was slow, when she lay, day after day, night after
night, the slow tears creeping down her cheeks, thinking such thoughts
as these. The blow seemed to have broken her heart and her will to live.
It would have been a relief to her to be told that she must die.

Her weakness was probably responsible for part of the depth and darkness
of her despair. She was a puzzle to her sister-in-law, who had been used
to find in Nan a never-failing spring of brightness and gentle mirth.
Lady Pynsent began to see signs of something more than a physical
ailment. She said one day, more seriously than usual,

"I hope, Nan, you have not quarreled with your husband."

"Oh no, no," said Nan, starting and flushing guilty; "I never quarrel
with Sydney."

"I fancied there was something amiss. Take my advice, Nan, and don't
stand on your dignity with your husband. A man is ready enough to
console himself with somebody else if his wife isn't nice to him. I
would make it up if I were you, if there has been anything wrong."

Nan kept silence.

"He is very anxious about you. Don't you think you are well enough to
see him to-day?" For Sydney had not entered Nan's room since that
unlucky time when she fainted at his appearance.

"Oh no, no--not to-day," said Nan. And then, collecting herself, she
added, "At least--not just yet--a little later in the afternoon, I
mean."

"I'll tell him to look in at four," said Lady Pynsent.

So at four Sydney was admitted, and it would have been hard to say
whether husband or wife felt the more embarrassment. Sydney tried hard
to behave as though nothing were amiss between them. He kissed her and
asked after her well-being; but he did so with an inward tremor and a
great uncertainty as to the reception that he should meet with. But she
allowed him to kiss her; she even kissed him in return and smiled a very
little, more than once, while he was talking to her; and he, feeling his
heart grow lighter while she smiled, fancied that the shadow of sadness
in her eyes, the lifelessness of her voice and hand, came simply from
bodily weakness and from no deeper cause.

After this first visit, he saw her each day for longer intervals, and
realized very quickly that she had no intention of shunning him or
punishing him before the world, as he had feared that she would do. She
was so quiet, so gentle to him, that, with all a man's obtuseness where
women are concerned, he congratulated himself on being let off so
easily, and thought that the matter was to be buried in oblivion. He
even wondered a little at Nan's _savoir-faire_, and felt a vague sense
of disappointment mingling with his relief. Was he to hear no more about
it, although she had been struck down and brought almost to death's door
by the discovery of his wretched story?

It seemed to be so, indeed. For some time he was kept in continual
suspense, expecting her to speak to him on the subject; but he waited in
vain. Then, with great reluctance, he himself made some slight approach,
some slight reference to it; a reference so slight that if, as he
sometimes fancied, her illness _had_ destroyed her memory of the
conversation which she had overheard in the study, he need not betray
himself. But there was no trace of lack of memory in Nan's face, when he
brought out the words which he hoped would lead to some fuller
understanding between them. She turned scarlet and then white as snow.
Turning her face aside, she said, in a low but very distinct voice,

"I want to hear no more about it, Sydney."

"But, Nan----"

"_Please_ say no more," she interrupted. And something in her tone made
him keep silence. He looked at her for a minute or two, but she would
not look at him and so he got up and left her, with a sense of mingled
injury and defeat.

No, she had not forgotten: she was not oblivious; and he doubted whether
she had forgiven him as he thought. The prohibition to speak on the
subject chafed him, although he had previously said to himself that it
was next to impossible for him to mention it to her. And he was puzzled,
for he had not followed the workings of Nan's mind in the least, and the
words, concerning his marriage with her and his reasons for it had
slipped past him unheeded, while his thoughts were fixed upon other
things.




CHAPTER XL.

"WHO WITH REPENTANCE IS NOT SATISFIED--."


Before the summer came, Mrs. Sydney Campion was well enough to drive out
in an open carriage, and entertain visitors; but it was painfully
apparent to her friends that her health had received a shock from which
it had not by any means recovered. She grew better up to a certain
point, and there she seemed to stay. She had lost all interest in life.
Day after day, when Sydney came home, he would find her sitting or lying
on a sofa, white and still, with book or work dropped idly in her lap,
her dark eyes full of an unspoken sorrow, her mouth drooping in mournful
curves, her thin cheek laid against a slender hand, where the veins
looked strangely blue through the delicate whiteness of the flesh. But
she never complained. When her husband brought her flowers and presents,
as he still liked to do, she took them gently, and thanked him; but he
noticed that she laid them aside and seldom looked at them again. The
spirit seemed to have gone out of her. And in his own heart Sydney raged
and fretted--for why, he said to himself, should she not be like other
women?--why, if she had a grudge against him, should she not tell him
so? She might reproach him as bitterly as she pleased; the storm would
spend itself in time and break in sunshine; but this terrible silence
was like a nightmare about them both! He wished that he had the courage
to break through it, but he was experiencing the truth of the saying
that conscience makes cowards of us all, and he dared not break the
silence that she had imposed.

One day, when he had brought her some flowers, she put them away from
her with a slight unusual sign of impatience.

"Don't bring me any more," she said.

Her husband looked at her intently. "You don't care for them?"

"No."

"I thought," he said, a little mortification struggling with natural
disappointment in his breast, "that I had heard you say you liked
them--or, at any rate, that you liked me to bring them----"

"That was long ago," she answered softly, but coldly. She lay with her
eyes closed, her face very pale and weary.

"One would think," he went on, spurred by puzzled anger to put a long
unspoken thought into bare words, "that you did not care for me
now--that you did not love me any longer?"

She opened her eyes and looked at him steadily. There was something
almost like pity in her face.

"I am afraid it is true, Sydney. I am very sorry."

He stood staring at her a little longer, as if he could not believe his
ears. The red blood slowly mounted to his forehead. She returned his
gaze with the same look of almost wistful pity, in which there was an
aloofness, a coldness, that showed him as nothing else had ever done the
extent of her estrangement from himself. Somehow he felt as though she
had struck him on the lips. He walked away from her without another
word, and shut himself into his study, where he sat for some minutes at
his writing-table, seeing nothing, thinking of nothing, dumbly conscious
that he was, on the whole, more wretched than he had ever been in the
course of a fairly prosperous and successful life.

He loved Nan, and Nan did not love him. Well, there was an end of his
domestic happiness. Fortunately, there was work to be done still,
success to be achieved, prizes to win in the world of men. He was not
going to sit down and despair because he had lost a woman's love. And
so, with set lips and frowning brow he once more set to work, and this
time with redoubled vigor; but he knew all the while that he was a very
miserable man.

Perhaps if he had seen Nan crying over the flowers that she had just
rejected, he might have hoped that there was still a chance of
recovering the place in her heart which he had lost.

But after this short conversation life went on in the old ways. Sydney
appeared to be more than ever engrossed in his work. Nan grew paler and
stiller every day. Lady Pynsent became anxious and distressed.

"Sydney, what are you doing? what are you thinking about?" she said to
him one day, when she managed to catch him for five minutes alone.
"Don't you see how ill Nan is?"

"She looks ill; but she always says there is nothing the matter with
her."

"That is a very bad sign. I hope you have made her consult a good
doctor? There is Burrows--I should take her to him."

"Burrows! Why, he is a specialist!"

"Nan's mother died of decline. Burrows attended her."

Sydney went away with a new fear implanted in his heart.

Dr. Burrows was sent for, and saw his patient; but he did not seem able
to form any definite opinion concerning her. He said a few words to
Sydney, however, which gave him food for a good deal of reflection
during the next day or two.

At the end of that time, he came to Nan's sitting-room with a look of
quiet purpose on his face. "May I speak to you for a minute?" he began
formally--he had got into the way of speaking very formally and
ceremoniously to her now. "Can you listen to me?"

"Certainly. Won't you sit down?"

But he preferred to remain standing at an angle where she could not see
his face without turning her head. "I have been talking to Dr. Burrows
about you. He tells me, I am sorry to say, that you are still very weak;
but he thinks that there is nothing wrong but weakness, though that is
bad enough in itself. But he wishes me also to say--you will remember
that it is he who speaks, not I--that if you could manage to rouse
yourself, Nan, if _you_ would made an effort to get stronger, he thinks
you might do it, if you chose."

"Like Mrs. Dombey," said Nan, with a faint, cheerless smile.

"He is afraid," Sydney went on, with the air of one who repeats a
lesson, "that you are drifting into a state of hopeless invalidism,
which you might still avoid. Once in that state you would not die, Nan,
as you might like to do: you would live for years in helpless, useless,
suffering. Nan, my dear, it is very hard for me to say this to you"--his
voice quivering--"but I promised Burrows, for your own sake, that I
would. Such a life, Nan, would be torture to you; and you have still
within your power--you can prevent it if you chose."

"It seems to me very cruel to say so," Nan answered, quietly. "What can
I do that I have not done? I have taken all the doctors' remedies and
done exactly as they bade me. I am very tired of being ill and weak, I
assure you. It is not my fault that I should like to die."

She began to cry a little as she spoke. Her mouth and chin quivered: the
tears ran slowly over her white cheeks. Sydney drew a step nearer.

"No, it isn't your fault," he said, hoarsely, "it is mine. I believe I
am killing you by inches. Do you want to make me feel myself a murderer?
Could you not--even for my poor sake--_try_ to get stronger, Nan, _try_
to take an interest in something--something healthy and reasonable? That
is what Dr. Burrows says you need; and I can't do this thing for you; I,
whom you don't love any longer," he said, with a sudden fury of passion
which stopped her tears at once, "but who love _you_ with all my heart,
as I never loved in all my life before--I swear it before God!"

He stopped short: he had not meant to speak of his love for her, only to
urge her to make that effort over her languor and her indifference which
the great physician said she must make before her health could be
restored. Nan lay looking at him, the tears drying on her pale cheeks,
her lips parted, her eyes unusually bright; but she did not speak.

"If there was anything I could do to please you," her husband went on in
a quieter tone, "I would do it. Would you care, for instance, to live
abroad? Burrows recommends a bracing air. If you would go with me to
Norway or Switzerland--at once; and then pass the winter at Davos, or
any place you liked; perhaps you would care for that? Is there nothing
you would like to do? You used to say you wanted to see India----"

"But your work!" she broke in suddenly. "_You_ could not go: it is
useless to talk of an impossibility."

"If it would make you better or happier, I would go."

"But the House?----"

"Nothing easier than to accept the Chiltern Hundreds," said Sydney.

"And your profession?" said Nan, raising herself on one arm and looking
keenly at him.

She saw that he winced at the question, but he scarcely paused before he
replied.

"I have thought it well over. I could go on practising when I came back
to England; and in the meantime----I suppose you would have to take me
abroad, Nan: I could not well take you," he said with a grim sort of
jocularity, which she could not help seeing was painful to him. "If it
did you good, as Burrows thinks it would, I should be quite prepared to
give up everything else."

"Give up everything else," Nan murmured. "For me?"

He drew a long breath. "Well, yes. The fact is I have lost some of my
old interest in my work, compared with other things. I have come to
this, Nan--I would let my career go to the winds, if by doing so, I
could give you back strength and happiness. Tell me what I can do: that
is all. I have caused you a great deal of misery, I know: if there is
any way in which I can----atone----"

He did not go on, and for a few moments Nan could not speak. There was
color enough in her cheeks now, and light in her eyes, but she turned
away from him, and would not let him see her face.

"I want to think over what you have said. Please don't think me
ungracious or unkind, Sydney. I want to do what is best. We can talk
about it another time, can we not?"

"Any time you like."

And then he left her, and she lay still.

Had she been wrong all the while? Had she of her own free will allowed
herself to drift into this state of languor, and weakness, and
indifference to everything? What did these doctors know--what did Sydney
himself know--of the great wave of disgust and shame and scorn that had
passed over her soul and submerged all that was good and fair? They
could not understand: she said to herself passionately that no man could
understand the recoil of a woman's heart against sensual passion and
impurity. In her eyes Sydney had fallen as much as the woman whom he had
betrayed, although she knew that the world would not say so; and in his
degradation she felt herself included. She was dragged down to his
level--_she_ was dragged through the mire: that was the thought that
scorched her from time to time like a darting flame of fire. For Nan was
very proud, although she looked so gentle, and she had never before come
into contact with anything that could stain her whiteness of soul.

She had told Sydney that she loved him no longer, and in the deadness of
emotion which had followed on the first acuteness of her grief for her
lost idol, and the physical exhaustion caused by her late illness, she
had thought she spoke the truth. But, after all, what was this yearning
over him, in spite of all his errors, but love? what this continual
thought of him, this aching sense of loss, even this intense desire that
he should suffer for his sin, but an awakening within her of the deep,
blind love that, as a woman has said, sometimes

    "Stirreth deep below"

the ordinary love of common life, with a

                    "Hidden beating slow,
    And the blind yearning, and the long-drawn breath
    Of the love that conquers death"?

For the first time she was conscious of the existence of love that was
beyond the region of spoken words, or caresses, or the presence of the
beloved: love that intertwined itself with the fibres of her whole
being, so that if it were smitten her very life was smitten too. This
was the explanation of her weariness, her weakness, her distaste for
everything: the best part of herself was gone when her love seemed to be
destroyed. The invisible cords of love which bind a mother to her child
are explicable on natural grounds; but not less strong, not less
natural, though less common, are those which hold a nature like Nan's to
the soul of the man she loves. That Sydney was unworthy of such a love,
need not be said; but it is the office of the higher nature to seek out
the unworthy and "to make the low nature better by its throes."

Nan lay still and looked her love in the face, and was startled to find
that it was by no means dead, but stronger than it had been before. "And
he is my husband," she said to herself; "I am bound to be true to him. I
am ashamed to have faltered. What does it matter if he has erred? I may
be bitterly sorry, but I will not love him one whit the less. I could
never leave him now."

But a thought followed which was a pain to her. If she loved him in
spite of error, what of her own sense of right and wrong? Was she not in
danger of paltering with it in order to excuse him? would she not in
time be tempted to say that he had not erred, that he had done only as
other men do?--and so cloud the fair outlines of truth which had
hitherto been mapped out with ethereal clearness for her by that
conscience which she had always regarded, vaguely but earnestly, as in
some sort the voice of God? Would she ever say that she herself had been
an ignorant little fool in her judgment of men and men's temptations,
and laugh at herself for her narrowness and the limitation of her view?
Would she come to renounce her high ideal, and content herself with what
was merely expedient and comfortable and "like other people"? In that
day, it seemed to Nan that she will be selling her own soul.

No, the way out of the present difficulty was not easy. She could tell
Sydney that she loved him, but not that she thought him anything but
wrong--wrong from beginning to end in the conduct of his past life. And
would he be content with a love that condemned him? How easy it would be
for her to love and forgive him if only he would give her one little
sign by which to know that he himself was conscious of the blackness of
that past! Repentance would show at least that there was no twist in his
conscience, no flaw in his ethical constitution; it would set him right
with the universe, if not with himself. For the moment there was nothing
Nan so passionately desired as to hear him own himself in the wrong--not
for any personal satisfaction so much as for his own sake; also that she
might then put him upon a higher pedestal than ever, and worship him as
a woman is always able to worship the man who has sinned and repented,
rather than the man who has never fallen from his high estate; to
rejoice over him as angels rejoice over the penitent more than over the
just that need no repentance.

       *       *       *       *       *

Sydney was a good deal startled when his wife said to him a few days
later, in rather a timid way:

"Your sister has never been here. May I ask her to come and see me?"

"Certainly, if you wish it." He had not come to approve of Lettice's
course of action, but he did not wish his disapproval to be patent to
the world.

"I do wish it very much."

Sydney glanced at her quickly, but she did not look back at him. She
only said:

"I have her address. I will ask her to come to-morrow afternoon."

"Very well."

So Nan wrote her note, and Lettice came.

As it happened, the two had never met. Lettice's preoccupation with her
own affairs, Sydney's first resentment, now wearing off, and Nan's
subsequent illness, had combined to prevent their forming any
acquaintance. But the two women had no sooner clasped hands, and looked
into each other's eyes, than they loved one another, and the sense of
mental kinship made itself plain between them.

They sat down together on the couch in Nan's private sitting-room and
fell into a little aimless talk, which was succeeded by a short,
significant silence. Then Nan put out her hand and look Lettice's in her
own.

"_You know!_" she said, in a whisper.

"I know--what?"

"You know all that is wrong between Sydney and myself. You know what
made me ill."

"Yes."

"And you know too--that I love him--very dearly." The words were broken
by a sob.

"Yes, dear--as he loves you."

"You think so--really?"

"I am quite sure of it. How could you doubt that?"

"I did doubt it for a time. I heard the man say that he married me
because I was--rich."

"And you believed it?"

"I believed anything--everything. And the rest," said Nan, with a rising
color in her face, "the rest was true."

"Dear," said Lettice, gently, "there is only one thing to be said
now--that he would be very glad to undo the past. He is very sorry."

"You think he is?"

"Can you look at him and not see the marks of his sorrow and his pain
upon his face? He has suffered a great deal; and it would be better for
him now to forget the past, and to feel that you forgave him."

Nan brushed away some falling tears, but did not speak at once.

"Lettice," she said at last, in a broken whisper, "I believe I have been
very hard and cold all these long months. I thought I did not care--but
I do, I do. Only--I wish I could forget--that poor girl--and the little
child----"

She burst into sudden weeping, so vehement that Lettice put both her
arms round the slight, shaken figure, and tried to calm her by caresses
and gentle words.

"Is there nothing that I could do? nothing Sydney could do--to make
amends?"

"Nothing," said Lettice gently, but with decision. "They are happy now,
and prosperous; good has come out of the evil, and it is better to
forget the evil itself. Don't be afraid; I hear from them, and about
them, constantly, and if ever they were in need of help, our hands would
be the ones stretched out to help them. The good we cannot do to them we
can do to others for their sakes."

And Nan was comforted.

       *       *       *       *       *

Sydney came home early that evening; anxious, disquieted, somewhat out
of heart. He found that Lettice had gone, and that Nan was in her
sitting-room. He generally went up to her when he came in, and this time
he did not fail; though his lips paled a little as he went upstairs, for
the thought forced itself upon him that Lettice might have made things
worse, not better, between himself and his wife.

The daylight was fading as he entered the room. Nan was lying down, but
she was not asleep, for she turned her head towards him as he entered.
He noticed the movement. Of late she had always averted her face when he
came near her. He wished that he could see her more plainly, but she was
wrapped in shadow, and the room was almost dark.

He asked after her health as usual, and whether Lettice had been and
gone. Then silence fell between them, but he felt that Nan was looking
at him intently, and he did not dare to turn away.

"Sydney," she said at last. "Will you come here? Close to me. I want to
say something----"

"Yes, Nan?"

He bent down over her, with something like a new hope in his heart. What
was she going to say to him?

"Sydney--will you take me to Switzerland?"

"Certainly." Was that all? "When shall we go?"

"When can you leave London?"

"To-morrow. Any time."

"You really would give up all your engagements, all your prospects, for
me?"

"Willingly, Nan."

"I begin to believe," she said, softly, "that you do care for me--a
little."

"Nan! Oh, Nan, have you doubted it?"

Her hand stole gently into his; she drew him down beside her.

"Dear Sydney, come, here. Put your arm right round me--so. Now I can
speak. I want to tell you something--many things. It is Lettice that has
made me think I ought to say all this. Do you know, I have felt for a
long, long time as if you had killed me--killed the best part of me, I
mean--the soul that loved you, the belief in all that was good and true.
That is why I have been so miserable. I did not know how to bear it. I
thought that I did not love you; but I have loved you all the time; and
now--now----"

"Now?" said Sydney. She felt that the arm on which she leaned was
trembling like a leaf.

"Now I could love you better than ever--if I knew one thing--if I dared
ask----"

"You may ask what you like," he said, in a husky voice.

"It is not such a very great thing," she said, simply; "it is only what
you yourself think about the past: whether you think with me that it is
something to be sorry about, or something to be justified. I feel as if
I could forget it if I knew that you were sorry; and if you justified
it--as some men would do--oh, I should never reproach you, Sydney, but I
would much rather die!"

There was a silence. His head was on the cushion beside her, but his
face was hidden, and she could gather only from his loud, quick
breathing that he was deeply moved. But it was some time before he
spoke. "I don't try to justify myself," he said, at last. "I was
wrong--I know it well enough--and--well if you must have me say it--God
knows that I am--sorry."

"Ah," she said, "that is all I wanted you to say. Oh Sydney, my darling,
can anything now but death come between you and me?"

And she drew his head down upon her bosom and let it rest there, dearer
in the silent shame that bowed it before her than in the heyday of its
pride.

       *       *       *       *       *

So they were reconciled, and the past sin and sorrow were slowly blotted
out in waters of repentance. Before the world, Sydney Campion is still
the gay, confident, successful man that he has always been--a man who
does not make many friends, and who has, or appears to have, an
overweening belief in his own powers. But there is a softer strain in
him as well. Within his heart there is a chamber held sacred from the
busy world in which he moves: and here a woman is enshrined, with all
due observance, with lights burning and flowers blooming, as his patron
saint. It is Nan who presides here, who knows the inmost recesses of his
thought, who has gauged the extent of his failures and weakness as well
as his success, who is conscious of the strength of his regrets as well
as the burdensome weight of a dead sin. And in her, therefore, he puts
the trust which we can only put in those who know all sides of us, the
worst side even as the best: on her he has even come to lean with that
sense of uttermost dependence, that feeling of repose, which is given to
us only in the presence of a love that is more than half divine.




CHAPTER XLI.

A FREE PARDON.


St. James' Hall was packed from end to end one summer afternoon by an
eager mob of music lovers--or, at least, of those who counted themselves
as such. The last Philharmonic Concert of the season had been announced;
and as one of its items was Beethoven's Ninth Symphony, the crowd was,
as usual on such an occasion, a great and enthusiastic one.

Even the dark little gallery near the roof, fronting the orchestra, was
well filled, for there are music lovers (mostly those whose purse is
lean) who declare that, though the shilling gallery is hot, and close,
and dark, there is in all the room no better place for hearing the great
waves of sound rolled out by the orchestra from the Master's mighty
scores. And it was for this reason that Lettice Campion came up the
narrow stairs that afternoon at ten minutes to three, and found, as she
might have expected, that only a few seats against the wall remained
empty. Into the nearest of these she dropped, rather exhausted by her
climb and the haste that she had made; and then she noticed, as her eyes
became accustomed to the dim light, that some one beside her had half
turned round, and was looking earnestly into her face.

"Alan!"

The color sprang into Lettice's face: the roll of music that she carried
dropped from her lap as she held out her hand. Alan returned her
greeting, and then dived for her music, thus giving her a moment in
which to recover her self-possession. When he came up again, she was
still a little flushed, but she was smiling tranquilly.

"I am so glad to see you," she said simply.

"I don't know what impelled me to come this afternoon. I never thought
that I should have this happiness." Then in a lower tone, "You don't
mind my being here? You don't want me to go away?"

"No, no, why should I? It does not matter--here."

They had not seen each other at all for weeks, and had met only two or
three times, and then for a few minutes only, since Alan left Bute Lodge
in December. They corresponded freely and frankly, but Lettice had
decreed, in spite of some murmurs from Alan, that they should not meet.
Scandal had been busy with her name, and, until Alan obtained his
divorce, it seemed better to her to live a very retired life, seeing
almost nobody, and especially guarding herself against accusations of
any close association with Alan Walcott.

"I had just posted a letter to you before I came out," he said. They
were at the end of the last row of seats and could talk, before the
music began, without any fear of being overheard. "It is as I expected,
Lettice. There are great difficulties in our way."

She looked an interrogation.

"The length of time that has elapsed is an obstacle. We cannot find any
proof of worse things than drunkenness and brawling during the last year
or two. And of the events before that time, when I know that she was
untrue to me, we scarcely see how to obtain absolute proof. You must
forgive me for mentioning these things to you, but I am obliged."

"Yes, and there is no reason why you should not tell me everything," she
said, turning her quiet eyes upon him with a look of such perfect trust
that the tumult in Alan's mind was suddenly stilled. "But you knew that
there would be difficulties. Is there anything else?"

"I hardly know how to tell you. She has done what I half expected her to
do--she has brought a counter charge against me--against----"

"Ah, I understand. All the more, reason, Alan, why we should fight it
out."

"My love," he said, in the lowest possible tone that could reach her
ears, "if you knew how it grieves me that you should suffer!"

"But I am suffering with you," she answered tenderly; "and don't you
think that I would rather do that than see you bear your suffering
alone?"

Here the first notes of the orchestra fell upon their ear, and the
conversation had to cease. For the next hour or so they had scarcely
time to do more than interchange a word or two, but they sat side by
side rapt in a strange content. The music filled their veins with
intoxicating delight; it was of a kind that Lettice rejoiced in
exceedingly, and that Alan loved without quite knowing why. The
Tannhauser Overture, the Walkueren-Ritt, two of Schubert's loveliest
songs, and the less exciting but more easily comprehensible productions
of an earlier classical composer, were the chief items of the first part
of the concert. Then came an interval, after which the rest of the
afternoon would be devoted to the Choral Symphony. But during this
interval Alan hastened to make the most of his opportunity.

"We shall have a bitter time," he murmured in her ear, feeling,
nevertheless, that nothing was bitter which would bring him eventually
to her side.

She smiled a little. "Leave it alone then," she said, half mockingly.
"Go your own way and be at peace."

"Lettice! I can never be at peace now without you."

"Is not that very unreasonable of you?" she asked, speaking lightly
because she felt so deeply. The joy of his presence was almost
oppressive. She had longed for it so often, and it had come to her for
these two short hours so unexpectedly, that it nearly overwhelmed her.

"No, dearest, it is most natural. I have nobody to love, to trust, but
you. Tell me that you feel as I do, that you want to be mine--mine
wholly, and then I shall fight with a better heart, and be as brave as
you have always been."

"Be brave, then," she said with a shadowy smile. "Yes, Alan, if it is
any help to you to know it, I shall be glad when we need never part."

"I sometimes wonder," he murmured, "whether that day will ever come!"

"Oh, yes, it will come," she answered gently. "I think that after our
long days of darkness there is sunshine for us--somewhere--by and by."

And then the music began, and as the two listened to the mighty
harmonies, their hands met and clasped each other under cover of the
book which Lettice held, and their hearts seemed to beat in unison as
the joyous choral music pealed out across the hall--

    "Freude, schoener Goetterfunken,
      Tochter aus Elysium,
    Wir betreten feuertrunken,
      Himmlische, dein Heiligthum,
    Deine Zauber binden wieder,
      Was die Mode streng getheilt;
    Alle Menschen werden Bruder,
      Wo dein sanfter Fluegel weilt."

"I feel," said Alan, as they lingered for a moment in the dimness of the
gallery when the symphony was over, and the crowd was slowly filing out
into Regent Street and Piccadilly, "I feel as if that hymn of joy were
the prelude to some new and happier life."

And Lettice smiled in answer, but a little sadly, for she saw no happier
life before them but one, which must be reached through tortuous courses
of perplexity and pain.

The dream of joy had culminated in that brief, impulsive, unconscious
transmigration of soul and soul; but with the cessation of the music it
dissolved again. The realities of their condition began to crowd upon
them as they left the hall. But the disillusion came gradually. They
still knew and felt that they were supremely happy; and as they waited
for the cab, into which Alan insisted on putting her, she looked at him
with a bright and grateful smile.

"I am so glad I saw you. It has been perfect," she said.

He had made her take his arm--more for the sake of closer contact than
for any necessity of the crowd--and he pressed it as she spoke.

"It is not quite over yet," he said. "Let me take you home."

"Thank you, no. Not to-day, Alan. See, there is an empty hansom."

He did not gainsay her, but helped her carefully into the cab, and, when
she was seated, leaned forward to clasp her hand and speak a parting
word. But it was not yet spoken when, with a sharp cry, Lettice started
and cast herself in front of him, as though to protect him from a danger
which he could not see.

In the confused press of men and women, horses and carriages, which
filled the street at this hour from side to side, she had suddenly
caught sight of a never-forgotten face--a hungry face, full of malice,
full of a wicked exultation, keen for revenge.

Cora Walcott, crossing the road, and halting for a moment at the central
landing-place, was gazing at the people as they poured out of St. James'
Hall. As Alan helped Lettice into the hansom and bent forward to speak
to her, she recognized him at once.

Without a pause she plunged madly into the labyrinth of moving carriages
and cabs; and it was then that Lettice saw her, less than three yards
away, and apparently in the act of hurling a missile from her uplifted
hand.

It was all the work of an instant. The woman shrieked with impotent
rage; the drivers shouted and stormed at her; men and women, seeing her
danger, cried out in their excitement; and, just as she came within
reach of her husband's cab, she was struck by the shaft of a passing
brougham, and fell beneath the horse's hoofs.

It was Lettice's hands that raised the insensible body from the mire. It
was Alan who lifted her into an empty cab, and took her to the nearest
hospital--whence she never emerged again until her last narrow home had
been made ready to receive her.

Cora did not regain consciousness before she died. There was no
death-bed confession, no clearing of her husband's name from the
dishonor which she had brought upon it, no reawakening of any kind. Alan
would have to go through the world unabsolved by any justification that
she was capable of giving. But with Lettice at his side, he was strong
enough, brave enough, to hear Society's verdict on his character with a
smile, and to confront the world steadily, knowing what a coward thing
its censure not unfrequently is; and how conscious courage and purity
can cause it to slink, away abashed.

       *       *       *       *       *

On a certain evening, early in the session of 1885, some half-dozen men
were gathered together in a quiet angle of the members' smoking-room at
the Oligarchy Club.

During the past day or two there had been unwonted jubilation in every
corner of the Oligarchy, and with reason, as the Oligarchs naturally
thought; for Mr. Gladstone's second Administration had suddenly come to
an end. It had puzzled many good Conservatives to understand how that
Administration, burdened by an accumulation of blunders and disasters,
was able to endure so long; but at any rate the hour of doom had struck
at last, and jubilation was natural enough amongst those who were
likely, or thought they were likely, to profit by the change.

Sir John Pynsent and his friends had been discussing with much animation
the probable distribution of the patronage which the see-saw of party
government had now placed in the hands of the Conservative leader. Sir
John, whose opinion on this subject was specially valued by his
political associates, had already nominated the Cabinet and filled up
most of the subordinate offices; and he had not omitted to bestow a
place of honor and emolument upon his ambitious relative, Sydney
Campion.

The good-natured baronet was due that evening at the house of Lord
Montagu Plumley, and he hurried away to keep his appointment. When he
had gone the conversation became less general and more unrestrained, and
there were even a few notes of scepticism in regard to some of Sir
John's nominations.

"Plumley is safe enough," said Mr. Charles Milton. "He has worked hard
to bring about this result, and it would be impossible for the new
Premier to pass him over. But it is quite another matter when you come
to talk about Plumley's friends, or his friends' friends. I for one
shall be very much surprised if Campion gets the solicitorship."

"He's not half a bad sort," said Tom Willoughby, "and his name is being
put forward in the papers as though some people thought he had a very
good chance."

"Ah, yes, we know how that kind of thing is worked. The point most in
his favor is that there are not half-a-dozen men in Parliament good
enough for the post."

"What is the objection to him?"

"I don't say there is any objection. He is not a man who makes many
friends: and I fancy some of his best cases have been won more by luck
than by judgment. Then he has made one or two decidedly big mistakes. He
will never be quite forgiven for taking up that prosecution of Walcott
for a purely personal object. I know the late Attorney was much put out
when he found how he had been utilized in that affair."

"Pynsent seems to think him pretty sure of the offer."

"Just so; and if anyone can help him to it, Pynsent is the man. That
marriage was the best thing Campion ever did for himself, in more ways
than one. He wants holding in and keeping straight; and his wife has him
well in hand, as everybody can see."

"They seem a very happy couple."

"He is devoted to her, that is plain enough; and I never thought he had
it in him to care for anybody but himself. I met them last Easter at
Dalton's place. They seemed to hit off extremely well."

"Oh, she has improved him; there is no doubt about that. She is a very
charming woman. What on earth does Dalton do with himself at Angleford?"

"He has become an orchard man on a grand scale," said Willoughby. "Three
years ago he planted nearly a hundred acres with the best young stocks
he could find, and he says he has every apple in the _Pomona_ worth
eating or cooking."

"He has got over that affair with Campion's sister, I suppose?"

"I don't know that he has. Brooke Dalton's one of the finest fellows in
existence: there's a heart in him somewhere, and he does not easily
forget. I came upon him and Campion one day in the garden, and though
they knew I was close to them they went on talking about her and her
husband. 'You were always too hard on her, Sydney,' Brooke was saying,
'and now you have admitted as much.' 'I don't wish to be hard on _her_,
but I can't bear that man,' Campion said--meaning Walcott, of course.
'Well,' Dalton said,' I am perfectly sure that she would not have stuck
to him through thick and thin, so bravely and so purely, unless she had
been convinced of his innocence. As I believe in her, I am bound to
believe in him. Don't you think so?' he said, turning to me. 'I hope
every one who knows her will show her the respect and reverence that she
deserves. Now that they have come back to England, Edith is going to
call on her at once.' Edith is his sister, you know: and she tells my
mother that she called immediately."

"How did Campion take it?"

"Very well, indeed. He said, 'You were always a good fellow, Brooke, and
I may have been mistaken.' New thing to hear Campion owning up, isn't
it?"

"So the Walcotts have come back?" said Milton, with some excitement. "By
Jove, I shall leave my card to-morrow. Of course, he was innocent. I
knew all about it, for I defended him at the Old Bailey.--No wonder
Campion is uncomfortable about it."

The idea seemed to divert Milton very much, and he chuckled over it for
two or three minutes.

"From what my mother says," Willoughby continued, "people seem disposed
to take them up. Her books, you know, are awfully popular--and didn't
you see how well the papers spoke of his last poems? You mark my
words--there will be a run upon the Walcotts by and by."

"Just the way of the world!" said Charles Milton. "Three or four years
ago they would have lynched him. Poor devil! I remember when I was about
the only man in London who refused to believe him guilty."

"One thing is plain enough," said Tom Willoughby. "He would have gone to
the dogs long ago if it had not been for her. I have not come across
many heroines in my time, though I have heard of plenty from other
people; but I am bound to confess that I never heard of one who deserved
the name better than Mrs. Walcott."

       *       *       *       *       *

The world bestowed its free pardon upon Alan Walcott, and for the sake
of her who had taught him to fight against despair and death he accepted
graciously a gift which otherwise would have been useless to him.
Inspired by her, he had built a new life upon the ruins of his past; and
if, henceforth, he lived and labored for the world, it was only with the
new motives and the new energy which she had implanted in him.

The house at Chiswick is now their own. There Alan and Lettice crown the
joys of a peaceful existence by remembering the sorrows of other days;
and there, in the years to come, they will teach their children the
faith of human sympathy, the hope of human effort, and the charity of
service and sacrifice.


THE END.





End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Name and Fame, by Adeline Sergeant

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK NAME AND FAME ***

***** This file should be named 30110.txt or 30110.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/3/0/1/1/30110/

Produced by Robert Cicconetti, Mary Meehan and the Online
Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This
file was produced from images generously made available
by the Canadian Institute for Historical Microreproductions
(www.canadiana.org))


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.